Another crucial step for the Balkans
Since the world has been focused on Iraq, North Korea and a possible crisis with Iran over nuclear weapons, Kosovo has gone somewhat unnoticed.
The public will soon have the opportunity to turn its attention once again toward this province after the decision is made regarding its fate.
The United States and their European friends have repeatedly stated their intention to take before the end of the year the difficult decision to separate or not Kosovo from Serbia.
This decision, crucial to the future of an unstable region, will test Western resolve and unity.
The talks this year in Vienna, orchestrated by the United Nations, have shown that an agreement between Serbia and Kosovo on a "final status" will not happen.
Negotiations are continuing, but, as UN negotiator and former Finnish president Martti Ahtisaari said very tactfully in the Security Council, they are in actual fact dead.
No Serbian leader will accept the independence of Kosovo because nationalism remains the dominant political force in the country.
Indeed, the Prime Minister Vojislav Kostunica, the apostle of Serbian nationalism, has made every effort to undermine the interim government of Kosovo.
He is eager to hold a national referendum this very month on a new constitution without serious parliamentary debate or the usual prior education of the public.
The main objective of this new constitution consists in the preamble, which maintains Kosovo in its status as an inalienable part of Serbia.
The Kosovo Albanians have said they will accept no link with Serbia, so tiny that it is.
Throughout the 1990s, they virtually left Serb-managed Kosovo by creating parallel institutions.
Their mass forced exodus in 1999 and the NATO intervention that followed, putting an end to the Serbian reign and establishing a quasi-state under the auspices of the UN, has made any solution other than that of independence intolerable.
A month or two from now, the Contact Group in the Balkans, the United States, the United Kingdom, France, Germany, Italy and Russia, will consider the recommendations of Ahtisaari on the final status of Kosovo and will perhaps offer a solution to the Security Council, which must make the final decision.
In public, all members of the contact group attempted to leave the question of Kosovo's final status open, but in private the United States and some of its allies told the two parties they propose the independence this year.
Some members of the Security Council, notably Russia and China, take a dim view of or remain sceptical about an imposed solution, and few governments are in favor of dividing up the territory of another nation, however compelling the circumstances may be.
The choice by the Security Council to approve independence depends largely on the possibility of preventing a Russian veto, which will require considerable diplomatic efforts.
The nature of the independence granted also has its importance.
Independent Kosovo should be able to live in safety and its minorities should be protected.
The north of Kosovo, today in great part under the control of Belgrade, must not be partitioned off in fact while not being so in name.
In order to reduce the blow dealt to Serbia, the Security Council must avoid granting independence in such a convoluted manner that the new state cannot really function.
If the Security Council fails to make a decision as to a final status, it will create a critical situation: Kosovo will declare its independence unilaterally and all the nations will have to decide whether or not to recognize the new country.
If that happens, it is highly likely that the Serbs in northern Kosovo will declare their own independence.
At least, Serbia will greatly campaign against any recognition.
In fact, the government of Serbia is already trying to convince the West to defer the decision until mid 2007.
He claims that if Kosovo becomes independent, the ultra-nationalist Radical Party will rise to power in the coming elections, and he believes that holding elections this year will prompt the Contact Group to reject his proposal in the Security Council.
Moreover, the government has encouraged the leaders of the Republika Srpska from Bosnia to threaten to hold their own referendum on the separation from a still fragile Bosnia.
And they keep pressing in vain for the removal of Ahtisaari in order to extend the Vienna talks.
The timing for the organisation of the constitutional referendum appears to be part of this dilatory strategy.
Some hope that postponement will stimulate violence in Kosovo and will push the West to reconsider the independence of Kosovo.
This tactic may be working.
Many EU countries are worried about the implications of the withdrawal of territory from of a country, as well as the impact of the independence of Kosovo on Serbian Democracy.
Being given the political instability of Serbia, they put in doubt the damage that would cause a delay in the short term, which would be mainly self-inflicted.
But delaying the decision would only allow Kostunica to find new ways to make even more difficult a decision by the Security Council.
The West should ignore the siren song of Belgrade.
Serbian politics will be chaotic and unstable in the near future, and the Serbian politicians will try to use this as an excuse to avoid facing the loss of Kosovo.
Similarly, establishing ties between Serbia and Kosovo, whatever the circumstances, will be problematic.
But a failure to make a definitive decision today on the final status of Kosovo will produce a situation that is worse than in the Balkans, will hold up Serbia's movement toward the West and its future accession to the EU, will condemn Kosovo's ethnic minorities to a dangerous ambiguity and will endanger fragile nations such as Bosnia and Macedonia.
The only realistic option for Kosovo is independence.
If Serbia wants to rejoin the West, it must not relinquish this opportunity by letting itself get trapped by its nationalist past.
A new and dangerous beginning for South Korea.
North Korea's decision to expel the UN atomic energy inspectors is one more reason to consider the election of Roh Moo Hyun to the presidency of South Korea two weeks earlier as a historic landslide.
The beginning of his mandate does not only coincide with one of the most dangerous events of Korea for decades, but his presidency will also hold spectator to a testing relationship between the U.S. and South Korea to a degree never achieved before.
The victory of Roh on Lee Hoi Chang shows a generational change in the Korean policy, with a young people determined to win a freedom of movement in its relations with the United States.
In fact, generation differences were the decisive factor in the presidential election race, replacing the regional feelings that dominated every presidential race before it.
According to a report, more than 60% of the 20- to 30-year-old population voted for Roh, creating a gap of 2.3% in this presidential race which, for the first time in 31 years, found two men face to face, fighting one on one.
The populist and nationalist position of Roh will be quickly and severely tested by the reality when he takes his post in February.
But if one associates the generational change that brought him to power with a strong popular will to continue with the commitments as regards North Korea, beyond the fact that North Korea continues to strengthen its nuclear power, and the recipe is complete for a disagreement with the United States.
Roh, a student who passed the bar examination without ever going to a university nor doing his duty, has managed to convince voters that he would open a new era in politics, reflecting a better South Korea enriched and with a strengthened middle class, sweeping away the political games that are dominated by insiders, regional disputes and the struggles of factions.
His style and rhetoric put forth a new image (for Korea!) of a man of the people engaged in eliminating the sclerotic networks of favoritism and corruption.
For the first time in the modern history of Korea, the presidential campaign has truly been the site of debates on the central issues which the country must face, rather than focusing on the parties and personalities.
The candidate Roh has called for new relations between South Korea and America, based on the principle of independence and equality.
Thus, he announced no longer wanting to be an extension of the US nor to go to Washington to take the traditional photo. He also promised to continue the policy of President Kim Dae Jung, called "the politics of the sun ray" in its involvement with the North.
It is remarkable that Roh won the election despite the decision of North Korea to reactivate its nuclear reactors arrested since 1994.
A few years earlier, that simple gesture would have condemned the candidacy of Roh.
That he has overcome this obstacle without changing his position on engagement with North Korea shows that times have changed quite radically.
The People's urgent desire for change rather than a comfortable situation has now become the main concern of North Korea.
The Roh election campaign also benefited from a growing trend of anti-Americanism.
The acquittal by an American military tribunal of two American soldiers who accidentally killed two Korean schoolchildren on board their armored vehicle in June last year set off demonstrations in streets all across the country.
Although President George W. Bush apologized twice for the deaths of two girls, demand continued to grow for modification of the agreement on the status of the armed forces (Status of Force Agreement, SOFA) which governs the legal treatment reserved for American troops stationed in South Korea.
The Koreans insist that the American soldiers who commit crimes should be judged by the Korean courts .
This expression of wounded national pride was possible after the extraordinary performance of the South Korean team at soccer's World Cup last summer, which helped convince the Koreans of the full maturity of their country, and who thus can now defend themselves without the presence of 37,000 American soldiers.
In fact many Koreans now see the American presence, and not the communist regime of North Korea, as the biggest obstacle to unification.
According to a recent poll, only 54.8% of Koreans still favour the maintenance of American troops in their country, while 31.7% oppose it.
These feelings will form part of the test of diplomacy, which will give shape to the presidency of Roh since its inception, because it needs to rethink the relationship between Korea and the United States even as the Bush administration is concerned about North Korea's nuclear ambitions and its role in the spread of weapons of mass destruction in rogue states.
For now, Korean voters, apparently insensitive to threats posed by the nuclear weapons of North Korea, support Roh's policy of maintaining dialogue and economic exchanges with the North.
Under the presidency of Roh, the domestic policy of South Korea and its relations with the United States and North Korea will necessitate an almost total revamping.
Will he be able to walk the tightrope of maintaining security in the peninsula while remaining committed to America and keeping the support of his electorate?
Knowing these targets would be a difficult test even for the most experienced and the most cynical politician, then knowing if President Roh can succeed would be a good omen.
Any failure, however, connotes so horrific outlook  that nobody can really wish him that.
To each his path towards peace
Over the next three weeks, the Israeli army will engage in an exercise without precedent: Instead of defending the country against external enemies or terrorists, it is going to evacuate, by force if necessary, 9,000 Israelis in their homes.
The unilateral withdrawal of Israel is the culmination of a deep political change caused by two convictions that are somewhat contradictory and which characterised the policies of the Prime Minister Ariel Sharon since 2003: first, that the "road map" initially launched by the United States is going nowhere, and then that the status quo is untenable.
For Sharon, there is no doubt that the 9,000 Jewish settlers who live among the 1.2 million Palestinians in the Gaza Strip have no future.
Therefore, without negotiations, a unilateral withdrawal is the only sensible approach to reducing violence and stabilisation.
This policy has deeply disturbed Israel. The settlers, for most religious, but not all, have felt betrayed by Sharon, "the father of settlements."
It is today the Israeli left, although reluctantly, that realises the new pragmatism preached by Sharon is perhaps the first step in the right direction.
Just as de Gaulle in Algeria, Sharon has redesigned the maps of the Israeli policy.
The last few weeks have been the setting for massive demonstrations, some of them nearly violent. A number of settlers have declared that they would not obey the evacuation orders.
The army and the police have mobilized nearly 50,000 soldiers to carry out the evictions successfully.
This approach by force is traumatic not only for the settlers, but also for many other Israelis.
Only the next few days and weeks can tell us if the evacuation is going on peacefully or not.
Meanwhile, Sharon has paid dearly for his policy.
Right-wing parties have left the ruling coalition, it has lost its majority in his own Likud party, and its finance minister, Benjamin Netanyahu, has left its government.
It is only by inviting Shimon Peres's Labour party into his Cabinet that Sharon managed to retain his parliamentary majority.
The question evidently arises on the situation after the withdrawal from Gaza.
Initially, this retreat leaves many governments sceptical, but they have come to realize, as they say in Washington, that this was the only thing to do.
Among them, as among the Palestinians, some hope that after the withdrawal from Gaza, it will be possible to return to the road map and resume negotiations that will lead to a final agreement between Israel and the Palestinians.
It is a huge mistake.
Even if he is motivated by the best intentions, hopes to resurrect the road map is not realistic.
Future negotiations will have to address the issue of final borders between Israel and Palestine, the fate of the 200,000 Jewish settlers in the West Bank, the status of Jerusalem and the problem of the Palestinian refugees of 1947-48.
The chasm between the Israeli and Palestinian positions on these issues has not diminished since the unsuccessful negotiations at Camp David in 2000, while fear and lack of confidence have only grown.
To try to enter into negotiations under such circumstances would not only be a futile exercise, but could serve to further increase the alienation and suspicion on both sides.
The failure of the Annan Plan for Cyprus suggests that good intentions are not enough - and disagreements in Cyprus were miniscule compared to what divides Israelis and Palestinians.
What is therefore possible?
The only rational way to proceed is probably to recognize that the unilateral steps of each side can further promote the cause of reduced violence and final reconciliation.
On the Israeli side, other withdrawals of dozens of small isolated settlements from the West Bank, causing the evacuation of 20,000 to 30,000 settlers, could prove politically feasible and would provide the Palestinians with a contiguous territory in the West Bank.
For the Palestinians, consolidating control of a dozen security services and militias under the Palestinian Authority would be an significant step forward.
The Palestinian leader, Abu Mazen, acknowledges it, but the question is whether he is capable of it.
The Palestinian Authority could also take the difficult path of telling the refugees that, contrary to 50 years of Palestinian propaganda, they will not return to Israel, but will have to settle in the West Bank and Gaza, areas that will become part of the ultimate Palestinian State.
In an ideal world conflicts are resolved through agreements and treaties.
But in real life, as the examples of Cyprus, Bosnia and Kosovo illustrate, stabilization and the slow decline in violence can sometimes lead to the same goal, even without formal agreement.
Plausible fault of alternative, one can only hope that it will be also the case for the Israelis and the Palestinians.
A new world?
BERLIN: Like old horses becoming frisky again at the sound of the bugle, the strategists of the Cold War feel their adrenalin rate increasing when missile defense is once again in the headlines.
To be sure, the anti-missile defense proposed by Bill Clinton (reluctantly) and George W. Bush (enthusiastically) -- and solidly backed by the American Congress -- does not resemble the Star Wars dream of Ronald Reagan 20 years ago: the NMD (nuclear missile defense), an American anti-missile defense system, is only supposed to catch a modest number of warheads and thus does not furnish complete protection against enemy missiles.
But the question revives the old debates about deterrence, of mutual assured destruction and control of nuclear weapons, and reanimates the rivalry between the nuclear powers at a time when nuclear weapons have lost much of their raison-d'etre.
Strangely, even while he is not certain that the missile defence programme concluded, the debate rages on.
Even if the system works, it will take between 10 and 15 years, perhaps more, before it is operational.
Things are also heating up about something which, if it exists one day, may only have little impact.
Ordinarily cautious governments are now lining up as if the future awaited them in the wings.
How can this strange behaviour be explained ?
Certainly not by a blind faith in technology.
After all, the history of missile defense is full of examples of technological disappointments for its supporters, whether or not they are part of the government.
No sane person can assume that what has never succeeded before, that is destroying a small number of warheads in flight, is going to happen overnight.
Out of the three tests that were carried out so far, one failed in part, the other two completely, it is the reason why President Clinton has preferred to pass the problem on to his successor.
If President Bush is now, as he mentioned, working toward a new formula, it will take even more time to develop the structure and design a testing program.
And we cannot be sure that will work.
Governments are worried at the present time, not because of what will be possible or not, but about the intentions, real or supposed of America.
Although the Americans say loud and clear that the missile defence programme is not aimed against anyone in particular, that the only goal of the US is to protect their citizens from countries like Iraq or North Korea, almost everyone is convinced of the opposite: the Russians fear that Americans want to cement their military superiority (and the inferiority of Russia) permanently; the Chinese fear that the missile defence programme is a sign of America's determination that Taiwan remain independent; Europeans fear that America's plans will create tensions with Russia and between the United States of Europe.
Because what is of primary importance is political intentions and not technical capabilities, now that the missile defense program is creating problems: it is pushing Russia to confrontation, making China nervous and strengthening a European sense of a lack of unity with the United States.
The damage begins at the starting line while the path remains uncertain.
The political consequences are further reinforced by the fact that, thirty years ago, the United States and the Soviet Union gave up on establishing an effective defense against strategic nuclear missiles.
Normally, an American defense project still in an embryonic state, should not cause as much excitement as the NMD.
But the 1972 Anti-Ballistic Missile Treaty banning, for an undetermined amount of time, systems designed to protect both of these two countries against such nuclear attacks.
Given the way the United States proceeds with the nuclear missile defense program, it will either have to violate the treaty or give six months' advance notice to condemn it, which the two signatories are entitled to do if they feel it is vital to their security.
In the eyes of many, it would mean that America chooses to abandon the structure of the control of nuclear weapons built during the last part of the Cold War.
The Bush administration claims that, because the Cold War is over, the formal disappearance of the ABM Treaty would not endanger nuclear stability.
But the stability is as well as a problem of perception policy than of technical calculations.
By limiting the antimissile strategy, the old treaty offers some insurance of desuasion for the governments that have nuclear weapons.
Its demise would affect all other agreements on weapons controls.
Russia threatens of tearing them all up if the US leave the ABM treaty.
Even if this threat lacks credibility (it would first be harmful to Russian interests), it rests on a certain logic.
The main question posed by the NMD is not how to prepare for a world missile defense but how to alleviate the concerns regarding current policies.
A few attempts are made quietly in the background.
Legal experts in Washington suggest that a moderate amount of  preparation for missile construction and radar sites does not violate the ABM Treaty and therefore does not force the United States to denounce it.
For now, the Bush administration will wait for the test results before making a decision.
Moscow and Washington both suggested that a deep cut to their offensive nuclear arsenal is possible.
The assurance that the United States will include them in the deliberations makes the sceptical European allies more indulgent.
The most important of the measures meant to gain trust, a modification of the ABM Treaty in order to allow a limited antimissile defense, is being studied.
The previous "nyet" from Russia might not turn out to be final.
Thus the political turmoil which Russia and Europe are involved in will perhaps calm down.
But China?
It is not part of an alliance (like Europe) or a network of arms control treaties with which political solutions can be found (such as Russia), and it is a contributing factor to the instability in Asia and the nervousness in China.
There, the trust can only be built on a rapprochement between China and the United States.
Unfortunately, there is nothing to indicate that Washington was aware of the gravity of the problem.
The old cold war planners are very disappointed by it all.
As they revise the vocabulary and abbreviations of the royal era of deterrence, they discover that it is a lost world.
The missile defence does not threat strategic stability between the US and Russia but if it is poorly presented, it endangers the long term political vision.
In announcing its determination to carry out a future missile defense program, the United States has created a policy storm that it must deal with now if it wants to avoid the worst of the damage.
To avoid a lost generation
A little bit everywhere, unemployed young people adrift are a cause for worry.
They are a problem in developing countries which have an increasingly strong population explosion, the equivalent of "baby boom" in the West at the end of the second world war.
But the period that followed the war in most developed countries has been an era of unprecedented prosperity for the baby boom that now approaches retirement.
Will the future also be promising for the 1 billion and a some-odd young people aged 12 to 24 years in developing countries?
These countries should, with all possible urgency, combine the investments and the political measures necessary to encourage young people to get training, find work, remain in good health, start a family and exercise their citizenship.
The benefit is considerable if they succeed: accelerated development thanks to the contribution of a young population and a decrease in the dependency rate.
In East Asia, this "demographic dividend" is said to be the cause of more than a quarter of the economic growth in the region.
Developing countries have already invested a lot as far as younger people are concerned.
They are now better educated and healthier than previous generations.
More than 80% of children go to primary school, compared to 50% in 1970, and infant mortality has fallen from more than 10% to 6.5% during the same period.
But governments should not be satisfied with investing on behalf of children, they must also begin to deal with the new generation of young people.
However, in countries where the vast majority of children complete primary education, few of them have access to secondary school.
The young represent half of new cases of HIV infection.
In the Middle East and North Africa, a quarter of young people are without work.
All this raises difficult questions: what is it that hinders access to secondary education?
Is it illiteracy that sometimes remains high, even at the end of primary school, or the lack of resources?
Why are there not more young people who know how to protect themselves against AIDS?
Why do companies in these countries often complain of a shortage of skilled labour when so many students find themselves unemployed upon leaving university?
An effective policy directed toward the young is based on three different types of action: more opportunities for success offered to young people, more skills and the offer of a second chance.
Governments must offer more possibility for success to young people by improving the access to and quality of care and education.
It's only in secondary school that students benifit of there primary school teachings.
However, many young people are still unprepared for the secondary and positions are rare.
Today, employers want highly skilled workers.
In countries as diverse as Algeria, Bangladesh, Brazil, China, Estonia and Zambia, qualifications and inadequate training are difficult obstacles to overcome.
If you want to prevent young people getting caught up in jobs without any hope of promotion or simply having no employment, they must be able to enjoy a better education and training that meets the needs of companies.
Many countries are now trying to facilitate access to secondary ("high school") education, particularly through "conditional aid programs" that allow for the distribution of funds to poor families whose children attend school regularly.
These programs have helped increase the number of pupils in secondary school in Mexico, Ecuador, Bangladesh and Cambodia.
But for these programmes to have a purpose, the pupils must have the skills necessary to enter secondary school.
In Morocco, for example, more than 80% of children accomplish a first round of education, but less than 20% reach the required level.
The measures are also needed to help young people make good decisions.
Although a government cannot replace the parents or the community, it can incite young people and their families to take care of themselves.
With the necessary information and adequate encouragement, the young will be better equipped to make decisions as to their health and their future.
In Cameroon, Horizon Jeunes, a program on sexual hygiene intended for the young people in the cities, helped to increase their knowledge in this area and change their behavior. Thus, the rate of young women insisting on the use of condoms rose from 58% to 76% in the group that took part in the program.
Another example: in the Dominican Republic, the rate of enrollment in high schools increased when students were informed of the amount of money earned by those who finished their secondary education, an amount that they had greatly underestimated.
In Bangladesh, the assistance project for the female secondary school has financially helped girls aged 11 to 14 to continue their studies and delay their marriage.
Governments should also offer a "second chance" to young people who have failed because of circumstances or bad choices.
The corresponding programmes must be well designed, well targeted and coordinated in a way that provides adequate support to their beneficiaries.
And so, in sub-Saharan Africa, thousands of young fighters -- 100,000 in Sudan alone -- hope to rebuild their lives for peacetime, but they are obviously in need of training and employment, medical care and psychological support.
With political will, measures based on the efforts of the young people themselves to increase their chances of success and their skills, and the offer of a second chance to those who need it, these countries could maximize their demographic advantage.
They can either seize this opportunity for growth to improve their development prospects or take the risk of a lost generation embittered at the lack of a future.
End with European paternalism
The Italian President of the European Union bears a huge responsibility, that of reinvigorating the expansion as an essential aspect of the new EU.
The best place to start would be to encourage a better attitude towards adopting the Euro by the countries entering the Union.
In fact, the paternalistic attitude of EU institutions to the country homebuyers threatens to create a two-tier Europe which will complicate the process of integration.
The conceding countries have held their market share by achieving trade integration with EU countries that are more advanced than other countries.
Three of them --Estonia, Latvia and Lithuania-- have a currency board system or a fixed exchange rate with the euro, like Bulgaria, which must join the EU in 2007.
The others have shown their interest for several years in adopting the euro from the beginning, unilaterally in some cases, even before they enter the EU -- a position openly advocated by the National Bank of Poland, and to a lesser degree by the National Bank of Hungary and the National Bank of the Czech Republic.
However, despite their progress in getting their rates of inflation and interest closer to European levels, a good many candidate countries fear that, with the total openness required for accession to the EU, they will be exposing themselves to the risk of sudden stoppages of capital flow and to currency crises.
They have learned the lessons of Latin America and Asia in the 1990s.
The euro adoption, would very easily permit them to escape such risks and to focus their efforts on the creation of a real growth for their economies.
However, the response of the European institutions and especially the European Central Bank and the European Commission was negative: the candidates were made to understand that they must first pass two years in the European exchange rate mechanism (ERM II), where candidates for the Euro would have to show what their policies were able to accomplish.
At the start, even the currency boards were seen as unacceptable, though, as is often the case in Europe, exceptions have been made: countries with a currency board could keep them even after union membership.
The opposition of the ECB and the Commission for the early adoption of the euro is ill-informed.
What should count for the European Union remains that the policies of any member state are not harmful to the other member states.
As Leszek Balcerowicz, governor of the National Bank of Poland pointed out, the adoption of the Euro by the candidate countries will certainly benefit them while, in the worst case, having absolutely no effect on the current members.
Indeed, the combined economic weight of all the candidate nations is much too small -- only 6% of GDP of the expanded EU -- to exert any effect whatsoever on the Euro.
However, the continuing opposition to EU institutions has led most of the candidate nations to abandon the idea of adopting the Euro unilaterally or as soon as possible after their entry into the Union.
Unfortunately, the persistence of the ECB and of the Commission now provide ammunition to populist governments in the accessing countries who rely on the variation in exchange rates to escape fiscal discipline that implies adopting the euro.
However, such fiscal manoeuvers probably discalify a country that wants to go quickly in the euro zone.
In fact, member nations which have not established a spending cap have seen their budget deficits soar -- beyond 9% of GDP in Hungary in 2002 and more than 5% in Poland, Czech Republic and Slovakia -- while significant capital movements have exerted strong pressure on their currencies causing them to rise.
This trend sets out the real economies of the candidate countries to the risks of reversal of capital flows and exchange crises that an early adoption of the euro would eliminate.
Ironically, the candidate nations find themselves being lectured to by officials of the ECB and the Commission on the compromise between nominal convergence and real convergence.
It would appear that Brussels' only imperative is the targeted growth of candidate countries, and that macroeconomic stability can wait.
Large budget deficits support growth, and inflation is clearly not a problem.
If this reasoning sounds familiar, it is perhaps because it repeats more or less the foundations of the non sustainable planning system in which the accession of candidate countries was suspended in the early 1990s.
It was, of course, the adoption of economic policies that focused on market forces in the former communist countries who brought them to the gates of EU membership.
Thus, the European institutions should abandon their paternalistic approach and take the concerns of the central banks of candidate countries seriously on the subject of the risks associated with maintaining their own currency over a long period during which their economy must be fully opened up to the movement of capital.
Today, the ECB and the European Commission give their de facto support to the positions of the populist governments in Eastern Europe which are already spending the funds they expect to get from the EU in the future.
It is high time that European institutions address in a more serious fashion the challenges and opportunities expansion presents.
They may start by considering the early adoption of the Euro by the candidate countries in a more favorable eye both for countries with a currency board system for those using a floating exchange rate.
Blair's European disaster
When the Dutch and French voters rejected the proposed EU constitution, everyone quickly realised that the European project was in a difficult situation.
The painful battle of last week in regard to the medium term future of the budget of the Union has further confirmed this verdict.
She also regretfully brought an end to the British presidency of the European Council, recalling that Britain continues to maintain its long-standing reputation of standing apart from the European Union.
The two facts are inextricably linked.
In France and Holland, voters have not explained why they voted against the draft constitution.
However, many commentators have believed that this vote expressed their protest against the admission of the ten new states, which was felt to be too hasty, especially with respect to the poorest countries of central and eastern Europe.
More specifically, it would seem that the voters have been afraid of losing their jobs to swarms of immigrants coming from the East. This fear has been widely illustrated during this time by the image of the inexpensive Polish plumber.
The irony, of course, is that most of the fifteen old member states have refused to the new member states full and immediate access to Western job markets.
In any case, it was too late to protest since the ten eastern countries had actually become full European Union members.
But now, the 25 states must face the economic consequences of this growth, not only on the issue of the size of the entire European budget for the next seven years, but also on the distribution of donor and recipient countries.
The key issue above all is knowing how much the older member states are prepared to pay to boost the lagging economies of the new member states.
In fact, the battle took place on three fronts and opposed Britain, France and the new member states.
Traditionally, a large majority of the budget went to agriculture and regions where development was lagging.
In practice, huge sums of money have been attributed whether to the major agricultural producers, whether to the poorest members such as Greece and Portugal.
At these two levels, the new member states expected to benefit significantly from the EU system.
Previously, in budgetary terms, the biggest loser as a result of the European measures was the United Kingdom. At the time when two-thirds of European spending was going toward agriculture, its agricultural sector was weak, and therefore the British benefitted little from European agricultural subsidies.
For a long time, they have complained about the unfairness of these rules, especially since at that time, the United Kingdom was one of the poorest members. It is in 1984 that the conservative government of Margaret Thatcher demanded and obtained a massive rebate on the  net contribution of Britain to the EU budget.
Today, the situation has changed in three key points. First, the reform of the European agricultural policy has begun and the proportion of the European agricultural budget has fallen from 60 to 40%.
Then, for many years Britain had a faster economic growth than most other member states so that it has become one of the richest countries in the EU, even in comparison with France and Germany. Finally, the new member states are so much poorer that the poorest of the old member states that they have a moral argument weight to ask a for a generous budget negotiation.
The start of negotiations, six months ago, coincides with the start of the presidency of the European Council.
Tony Blair, British Prime Minister, has galvanized politicians in Europe by declaring before Parliament in Brussels that he was "passionately pro-European."
That was the message that the British pro-Europeans hoped for a long time and that they expected vainly since the election of Blair in 1997.
Of course, he never expressed such a feeling when he was actually in Great Britain, over the course of the last eight years.
In addition, since Britain has been one of the strongest advocates of expansion regarding the countries of central and eastern Europe, one might have expected that, during budget negotiations, the Blair government would have behaved with a proportional amount of generosity and enthusiasm towards the new entrants.
Initially, this seemed to be the tactics chosen by the British government.
But contrary to all expectations, it adopted an ethically advantageous position in proposing to give up part of its budget rebate, on the sole condition that the rest of the European Union (and France, in particular) agree on the fundamental reforms in terms of European agricultural policy.
It took time for the British to understand that since President Jacques Chirac was a shaky and desperate president, remaining in the Élysée until 2007 but possessing no power, he did not have the means to make such a bargain.
Once the British became aware of this harsh reality, they played their pitiful last card in the handling of the negotiations. They made ridiculously paltry offers, all primarily designed to safeguard Britain's petty interests and did so mainly at the expense of the new member states.
How sad conclusion to a presidency opened with great fanfare, six months ago by the statements passionately pro-European of Tony Blair!
The full text of his speech is clear.
Blair is favorable toward Europe, but not toward this one.
He wants to be part of a political Europe, but only if the other member countries agree to follow the model of economic and social reform.
The problem is that economic and social reform is purely and simply a matter of national policy and is not part of the powers of the Union. If such a reform must take place in France or in Germany, this issue would be discussed only between politicians and the French or German voters.
It could be within the competence of the Union only if the EU becomes a real federation.
Can you say Blair is a federalist, then?
Of course not!
It is mostly a mindless nationalist who lives in fear of the sneaky tabloid press in his country.
Then, why did he assert his pro-European fervor?
Maybe he didn't reflect on the issue in the end.
Europe in the challenge of neoliberalism
For more than 20 years I have argued that the high rates of unemployment in Western Europe could not persist.
At the end of the 1970s, monetarists made a bet that only a modest and temporary increase in unemployment could contain the rampant and open-ended inflation of the industrial West, and that with this recession the cost of the return to effective price stability would have proved worthwhile.
In Britain and the United States, this monetarist challenge has seen a happy ending.
Not in Western Europe.
Over the past 25 years, European unemployment has increased as the monetary policy does, and interest rates were raised to combat inflation.
But while inflation has yielded, unemployment has not fallen, or almost not.
Even if the unemployment rate has not reached the level of the Great Depression, it has remained high enough to make long-term unemployment,, or the fear of long-term unemployment, a truly disturbing experience.
The governments of societies in which the official unemployment rate remains at 10% or more for several generations have poor economic management.
Consequently, it seemed to me for 20 years that the balancing act underlying the policy in Western Europe, collective bargaining and generous social insurance on one hand, and tight monetary policies on the other, was doomed to crack.
The European policymakers seem paralyzed by a double fear.
Europe's central bankers fear that their political masters order them to relax their monetary policy, that the structural reforms needed to release the aggregate offer be not given and that this results in a return to the inflation of the 1970s..
In short, they fear that all the sacrifices made to stabilize prices have been fruitless.
Politicians in Western Europe, on their part, fear the opposite effect.
They are concerned with the idea that, even after undertaking structural reforms to reduce the attractiveness of unemployment insurance, and motivate workers to go to businesses and companies to workers, central bankers will continue to press for tightening the purse strings.
In short, they fear that without increased production and employment, the net effect will simply be an increase in poverty.
Of course, these fears are accompanied with the hope that the structural reforms and monetary expansion work in harmony, provoking a boom in employment and production without causing substantial increase in inflation.
But the reality is that not any move towards the loosening of monetary policy has been put in place, particularly with the novice European Central Bank , keen to assert its credibility in the fight against inflation -- and that attempts to structural reforms are hesitant, cut and undertaken without enthusiasm.
I have been wrong for 20 years: Western European regimes have remained stable despite the exclusion of a large proportion of citizens from meaningful participation in the economic life.
The growth of economies in Western Europe countries has continued, despite the heavy burden that is 10% unemployed, but did not do so as quickly as it could.
Today, it seems, I am finally right, if it's not time to panic, at least it's time for me to worry.
The French have rejected the EU constitution, above all (at least according to appearances), because a greater European integration is feared to result into enormous costs and the disruption of neoliberalism.
It's one thing to support the "European project" when it comes to linking Germany and France so closely that nobody considers it worthwhile anymore to go to war to determine what language should be spoken in Alsace-Lorraine.
It is another matter when the European project means that French workers will have to face competition from Polish plumbers, Roumanian farmers and Turkish vendors.
In Germany, voters seem poised to evict the Chancellor Gerhard Schroeder, because his lukewarm allegiance to the neo-liberal project displeases them.
The problem is that they may find themselves governed for four years by Angela Merkel, a Chancellor almost as committed to the neo-liberal project as I am.
I believe that Germany would be better in ten years, with more neoliberal policies.
But that does not appear to match the desire of German voters, making it impossible to predict what German politics will be like in four years.
Besides, you have to add in the displeasure of northern Europe with respect to the central bankers, particularly of the ECB, and with respect to the Euro.
Not that the end of the European monetary union is decided, but it is simply that some have begun to consider a bleak future where the end of the EMU would be put to the program.
This is enough to shake asset prices around the world.
The successes of Western Europe since World War II are among the most impressive and the most encouraging success of world history.
Everyone should hope that the united Europe today builds on these successes, rather than see generations of high unemployment rates put them in danger.
For this, the ECB's attitude will have to change.
Europe needs a monetary policy considering that the decrease in the Northern European unemployment rate is more important than the price stability of the continent.
The southern and eastern Europe will suffer inflation, it is unavoidable, because as the regions develop and industrialize, the terms of trade improve, and under the auspices of a monetary union, regional inflation can become a barrier to overcome.
The ECB should not try to balance the inflation in the southern and eastern with the deflation of the north attempting to reach artificial targets in the scale of the entire continent
Rescued by taxes
What do we owe to our great-great-great grandchildren?
What measures do we have to take today to reduce the risks posed to our descendants and our planet by the increasing likelihood of global warming and of climate change?
Almost all the world -- except for Exxon Mobil, US Vice-President Dick Cheney, their appointed servants and their manipulated acolytes -- understands that when human beings burning hydrocarbons, the carbon dioxide escapes into the atmosphere, where it acts as a massive cover that absorbs the infrared radiation emitted underneath, resulting in the warming of the planet.
Similarly, almost everyone understands that global warming could be whether more serious, or less serious than existing models suggest, but that this uncertainty is not an excuse to do nothing.
In fact, it should instead prompt us to better protect ourselves if we knew that global warming would occur exactly according to the average projections.
Finally, almost everyone agrees that governments, nonprofit organizations and oil companies should designate more money for research on carbon dioxide emission free energy technologies, or those able to remove pollutants from the atmosphere and oceans, cooling the planet by reflecting more solar radiation.
It is clear that it is the rich countries which must shoulder the burden of solving the problem of climate change over the course of the coming generations.
After all, they were allowed access to industrialization and wealth by polluting blithely.
Today, China, India and other fast-developing countries do not have this freedom of movement and it would be unfair to penalize them.
It is time now to build, not dismantle or undermine the international institutions which will have to manage our response to climate change in the coming years.
But should we do something different now and during the next decade?
Economists like to think in terms of cost.
And when they note a behavior with destructive side effects, they like to tax it.
The tax forces people to feel the damage they cause where it hurts -- in the pocketbook.
Imposing a tax on those who drive 4x4s in the city, for example, is a way to spur the collective intelligence to decide that adverse side effects are a good reason to change its behavior.
But it must be a fair tax.
A 4x4 that runs through 17 miles in the city and uses 3.7 litres of petrol, pumps about 3 kilograms of bioxyde of carbon into the atmosphere.
Should the "greenhouse" tax be 0,010 €, 0.38 or €1.15 per litre?
This choice will be determined by what we will learn over the years, but today, the amount of tax stems more from a philosophical question: how much do we think we owe our distant descendants?
Australian economist John Quiggin posted an informative discussion on his Web site (
However, critics of this calculation stress that the world today is poor. The average annual per capita, at purchasing power parity, stands at about €5,500.
One expects the improvement of technologies and their dissemination to make the world much richer by 2100: With an annual growth of 2 percent, it will reach almost 40,000 euros per head in terms of 2006 purchasing power.
These critics argue therefore we have much more need today of this  €55 marginal expense than people richer in 2100 will need the €400 that they would earn by being preserved the effects of climate change.
But what critics often fail to mention is that the same logic applies to today's world.
The average annual per capita income is now around €30,600 in the US, Japan and Western Europe and less than €4,600 for half of the poorest people in the world.
The same logic according to which we need €55 today, more than people from 2100 quote will need the additional €400, means the rich should be taxed more, since every additional €380 in taxes in rich countries corresponds to an increase in per capita income of €55 in poor countries.
In other words, if the rich are stingy today toward our much richer descendants, and if we decide to let them get by with an ecological disaster, we must now be generous with the poor of this world.
Conversely, if we are greedy today with the poor, we need to be generous with our descendants.
At least that is what we should do if our actions are based more on moral principles than on the leitmotif of Leonid Brezhnev: "What we have taken, we keep."
Take pharmacovigilance seriously
Health threats -- nuclear reactors, firearms and contaminated food -- threaten all of us; it is why governments are playing an active role in limiting them, by means of regulations which are often successful.
But the situation is very different when it comes to the safety of prescription-only medicine.
In fact, for the regulator, the pharmacovigilance is the forgotten relation of public protection.
The scope of the problem is yet enormous.
In the United States alone, it is estimated that side effects are responsible for the deaths of 100,000 patients each year.
If these figures are valid, it means that deaths caused by drugs rank fourth or fifth among the leading causes of death (according to the mortality estimates used).
In addition, the annual hospital costs directly attributable to adverse effects would run into the billions of dollars, not to mention the suffering caused by side effects which don't lead to hospitalization or death.
The difficulties of determining causes and effects should be taken into account.
It is sometimes difficult to know if the death or hospitalization of a patient is attributable to a particular drug, the underlying illness or a combination of both.
This phenomenon only underlines the need to ensure the safety of medicines.
The fact that all drugs, in addition to their benefits, produce adverse effects in some patients is one reason why pharmacovigilance exists.
It is necessary to weigh carefully the beneficial and undesired effects of medicines before approving them and using them.
These judgments vary, depending on whether they are issued by a pharmaceutical company, which expects the benefits of its sales, or by a patient who risks suffering a serious side effect.
The incomplete nature of knowledge complicates this estimate.
The rush to put new medicines on the market often leads to an incomplete research on their safety.
More than half of approved drugs cause a serious side effect that was unknown at the time they were authorized for sale.
One example: when the new class of analgesics called Cox-2 inhibitors  was put on the market, regulators, doctors and patients were unaware that these medicines could cause heart attacks and strokes.
Tens of thousands of innocent patients, perhaps more, have suffered from side effects before the withdrawal of the first two drugs in this class.
It is difficult to provide a complete and appropriate list of the harmful effects of drugs.
The rate of spontaneous alerts to the regulatory agencies is low, around 1%, and controls are passive in many countries.
One must also count with the general reluctance to report the adverse effects of drugs.
Doctors sometimes feel guilty and fear trials, and pharmaceutical companies are concerned about threats to their profits. The regulatory agencies must confront the question, "why this drug has been allowed?"
It is particularly difficult to blame adverse reactions to a drug when the symptom is common in the age group of the user or treated disease.
Because the risk of heart attack is important in the elderly, many  suffer from arthritis-related pain requiring treatment with painkillers, it took six years to make the link between Cox-2 inhibitors and a multiplication by two or three risk of heart attacks.
A recent Harris poll in the United States concluded that 60% of adults are either not very convinced or not convinced at all that drug manufacturers disclose their information on the undesirable side effects of their products.
This scepticism is justified: internal documents obtained from recent trials show that pharmaceutical companies often fail to submit critical safety information to the regulatory agencies, as the law requires, and fail to pass this information along to doctors and patients.
One of the problems is that the consequences of this neglect of the harmful effects of drugs are nonexistent or minimal.
It is time to be serious.
· Citizens and governments must make pharmacovigilance a priority, and commit the resources needed to solve the problem.
• The penalties imposed on pharmaceutical companies which fail to raise an alert and provide information on the safety of their medicines should be increased substantially to make them an effective deterrent.
The agencies in charge must have the means of enforcing the laws in order to implement stricter regulations.
• Pharmacovigilance's problem has to be considered a failure of the system.
It is not fair to blame serious adverse effects on doctors, particularly in the absence of comprehensive information on the safety of medicines.
The full cooperation of doctors is essential to solve the problem, but it means an end to their fear of being dragged in court.
This approach works well in the aviation industry: the pilots who point out the mistakes that they have nearly made are not penalized.
Patients must be better informed about the risks of medicines that are prescribed to them and more involved in their diagnosis and their reporting.
Instructions printed in tiny letters are useless.
• the control of side effects should be more proactive.
This calls for more funding, which should come from the main beneficiaries of the sale of medicines: the pharmaceutical industry, in the same way as the monitoring of air safety is funded by the airlines.
Above all else, improving pharmaco-vigilance will depend, if we want the efforts to succeed, upon the establishment of an independent body designed to promote, coordinate and give advice to the program of regulation.
The office exists in the United Kingdom.
Other governments should follow this model in order to fulfill their role, neglected so far, as the guardian of public health.
The virtual enemy
Five years have passed since the terrorist attacks of September 2001 on New York and Washington, and yet it seems that policymakers have learned little about how terrorist cells work and their weaknesses.
The Bush administration always uses the expression "war against terrorism" and behaves as if it were really a regular kind of war   where one government is in combat with another.
However, after five years of military efforts, strategies based on the targeting of a single opponent have only worsened the situation.
It is time to understand the new model of conflict that is currently emerging.
So that the paradigm "war" would work, the Bush administration referred to al Qaeda as a definite enemy.
In reality, there is no great organiser or financing of terrorist activity.
The attacks in Madrid, Bali and London, and several attempts thwarted the United States and Great Britain, were all marked by their scattered organisation.
It is conspiracies generated independently who have used the resources of ad hoc, often at home.
These small operations also lacked a common internal pattern.
The motives of terrorists differ from cell to cell, even from person to person.
Individuals can be motivated by profit, or the thirst for power, or for political and religious reasons, while others are acting out of hatred or out of high anxiety.
In addition, there are big differences in terms of risks, rewards and imperatives as one climbs the organizational chain or moves from one unit to another.
Conventional military models are equipped to decapitate something which, in this particular case, has no head.
The features of this new structure have already been studied in very different circumstances.
Terrorism is the violent version of an "agile virtual company".
A virtual company is a small group that assemble alone in an organization just large enough to implement a collective intention.
Virtual companies are unusually innovative, and in business, they are doubtless the only system capable of effectively creating a unique product.
The industry of film production is a blatant example of this.
In fact, it is without a doubt the business model of the future.
Profits from virtual corporations come from their casualness in terms of stability.
At present, most of the price of a product finances the huge and inefficient organization which assembled it.
Almost all the creativity and problem solving occur in small businesses and are "integrated" later by big companies, those whose infrastructure is expensive and fragile, and that retain the bulk of profits.
This model is the basis of the business world today, just as centralization has been its preferred defense strategy.
When you buy a General Motors car , 80 cents of every dollar spent goes back to GM, which manages itself almost alone.
Small suppliers provide you in fact with 80% of the value and innovation, but only receive 20% of the reward.
Ironically, in-depth research on alternative models has been funded by the US Department of Defense, which, as the biggest buyer of complex machinery in the world, wanted better quality goods, cheaper and made to order besides.
This research uncovered the requirements and mechanisms necessary for facilitating the autonomous establishment of small opportunistic groups and for enabling them to act like large companies.
Unfortunately, the research programme was cancelled before its findings could be applied to the business world, surely because it threatened big business.
It is often forgotten that American Secretary of Defence Donald Rumsfeld has abandoned a comfortable retirement to reorganize the American army into a smaller and more agile force, using some of these ideas.
But the organisation of the invasion of Iraq, for which Rumsfeld had recommended the use of fewer troops than expected, shows a poor understanding of distributed systems.
While the troops were deployed with the goal of a quick and easy entry and exit, the Bush administration ended up using them for an old-style occupation.
The terrorists have shown a greater talent for capitalizing on the distributed models of operations.
A multitude of books is coming out in the Muslim world on strategic studies of jihad.
The most famous in the West is the Management of Savagery [the management of  brutality], but only because it has been translated and made public.
These books (and the trends they indicate) are becoming less dogmatic and increasingly complex in terms of adoption of the modern techniques of management.
Their research will surely include the young science of management of the virtual company: how to feed and support self-organized cells.
The first lesson for decision makers in the West to learn is perhaps the virtual companies rely on a culture of trust.
Some kinds of confidence can be based on an artificial concept of 'not us' rather than real values and direct experience.
This is why the actions of the Bush administration only reinforce the dynamics of online terrorist activity.
Bush's rhetoric "them and us" clearly defines an "other" and positions it as a cohesive enemy.
His "war" approach helps Islamic terrorists consider the West as a force just as united and malicious.
In the future, the model of the virtual company will shape the way business will be conducted, the way wars will be fought, and probably the way government services will be administered.
He promises to separate financial management from production management, which would imply increased innovation and more rapid economic growth.
However, if Western governments do not develop a deep understanding of how to operate these structures, they have no chance of combatting agile terrorist activity.
Expansion as a solidarity
Nowadays, it is often said that the European Union's sense of solidarity has been put in danger, not to say that it has exploded, by expanding to the countries of Central and Eastern Europe.
With Bulgaria and Romania approaching their turn to gain entry into the EU, and with the negotiations which have to be opened with Turkey and Croatia, it has become essential to call this notion into question.
The values and interests of the new EU members are most often consistent with those of the first 15 states.
It is true, of course, that expansion has fundamentally changed the Union and gave birth to new problems and political questions.
However, the new member states of Central and Eastern Europe are deeply embedded in the economic, social and cultural development of our continent.
The ties that bind us have been eroded by 40 years of Soviet rule, but this has not changed fundamentally the European nature of these countries.
My country, Poland, has always had deep cultural ties with other European countries, particularly France.
We participated in all the major European developments in terms of music, literature and cinema (such as, for example, Andrzej Wajda's Solidarity-era films such as "Danton," a French co-production.)
In sports too, eastern Europeans have for a long time been included  with the rest of Europe.
Indeed, before the first world war, the national football team in Germany was entirely composed of players with Polish surnames.
But, above all, there is a profound sense among the Poles, the Hungarians, and the Czechs as well as others who all feel they are Europeans.
Which is the true meaning of the word "solidarity" as the Petit Robert dictionary defines it: "relationship between people who are aware of a commonality of interest".
Solidarity as meaning a unit resulting from common interests also clearly exists in the 15 original members that members of the enlarged Union today.
The exceptions prove the rule.
The lack of unity in the European Union on the Iraq issue should not overshadow the agreements that the member states have reached on all the other important issues of international affairs.
For the economic questions, disagreements on a single regulation of the European Union, for example, should not obscure the fact that no member state, new or historic, has ever challenged the EU market.
Finally, the enlargement process itself is clearly a symbol of a social, civil and cultural European unity.
The fact that it provoked debate and discussion does not contradict the conviction shared by all, old and new member states alike, that they have an obligation to rebuild a continent after 40 years of division.
There remain a few questions which, if they are not the source of basic division, are disturbing.
Should we fear that Europe is now a continent purely Judeo-Christian and white?
Will the European Union's citizens whose origins are in other continents and whose religion is Hindu, Muslim, Sikh or Buddhist be able to identify with "European" values and culture?
Are they able to feel European, as the Poles and Czechs have always done?
These questions are especially valuable, in fact they cannot be avoided, in the case of Turkey's possible admission to the European Union.
Is European integration driven by respect for the values of others?
Is it a matter of sharing them or contributing to it?
These are tricky questions.
They are particularly difficult if we look at culture as the cement of Europe's future.
All European countries probably thought at the beginning that non-European newcomers would be assimilated in the same way that the Polish immigrants were assimilated in the Ruhr German in the 19th century.
The fact that this has not happened, at least on a large scale, does not mean that this cannot happen.
One should only look at the number of respectable citizens of Turkish origin living in Germany.
Or the large number of second generation British Indians and Pakistanis that we now see wearing a tie, laptop in hand, always between two aircraft.
Europeans must however admit that these people represent only a minority.
A number of groups of immigrants in Europe are themselves rejected by their communities because of the impossible social and economic integration.
The constant threat of terrorism has made the insulation of Islamist groups in Europe even more dramatic.
The European Union cannot simply declare "solidarity" a core value and do nothing to encourage it among those who feel marginalized.
They must be allowed, also, to feel this "relationship between people who are aware of a community of interest".
The European solidarity cannot survive this neglect and will not survive it.
After Kyoto
The treaty of the Kyoto Protocol is now in force for the 126 nations who have signed it so far.
It is now time to begin to question the following: how to bring all the nations, including the major emitters, to discuss what actions to undertake after after the expiration of the treaty in 2012?
That is exactly what the European Commission has done recently in unveiling its first strategy for a post-Kyoto era, which will be examined by the European Council this coming March.
While the Kyoto Protocol is only a modest reduction of carbon emissions in industrialized countries (5.2% between 2008 and 2012 compared to 1990 levels, with variable targets depending on the country), real progress can be made by supporting the development efforts and preserving our planet.
In the first place, all countries must include climate concerns in the planning of their policies and improve their governance in key sectors such as energy, infrastructure and transport.
In other words, we must act by being aware that climate change and its effects on the inhabitants of rich and poor countries remain a threat to world security.
Ultimately, the long-term approach will probably include a system based on some rules, a system of incentives and some investments in the area of technological change.
The adaptation at national level will be increasingly recognised as a major issue that will require adequate funding.
The treatment of the effects of climate change and the treatment of emissions reductions should not rule each other out, but be complementary.
Imagining the post-Kyoto world will offer us a chance to start a new dialogue and to consider new options for climate change.
The nations could establish a more ambitious goal which would be to limit long-term change in the Earth's temperature, then allocate emissions rights among countries so as to ultimately restrict  temperature increases to an acceptable level.
That would require to increase energy research and development in order to develop both new and better technologies, a process that must be supported by more solid partnerships between the public and private.
Until now, with only 15% of the world population, rich countries are responsible for more than 75% of global emissions of carbon dioxide (CO2), and therefore most of the environmental damage.
It is however developing countries (and therefore poor countries around the world) who are most vulnerable.
It is unrealistic to ask the poor countries, where more than 1.6 billion people do not have access to energy and clean technologies, to support the costs associated with technological change as expected.
In collaboration with its partners, the World Bank supports financial strategies which aim to help developing countries regulate costs due to climate change.
To date, more than $1 billion invested in GEF projects (Global Environment Facility - funds for the global environment) and around $8 billion placed in co-financing, have been used in programs related to climate change.
While the regulatory mechanisms of Kyoto and the European system of tradeable emissions (European Trading Scheme) have contributed to the creation of an emerging market for carbon trading, interested parties are now worried about the immediate future.
Without regulatory framework after 2012, the new opportunities for engaging transactions based on projects will end by 2006/2007.
Given the long delay between the preparation of projects and the first benefits of emission reductions, project developers only have a few years to act before carbon payments stop making a significant contribution to financing projects in the current context.
The development of projects related to infrastructure is a long process that requires between 3 and 7 years, from identification via licensing, financing and construction, to the first certification of reductions in carbon emissions.
The projects must therefore be operational by 2007 at the latest.
The World Bank has greatly contributed to forward the financing of carbon as a tool of sustainable development and to facilitate private sector's participation in the market.
The Bank is focused on the representation of the interests of its borrowing countries, helping them to develop assets for the carbon trade according to their own priorities.
But without the involvement of governments to limit greenhouse gas emissions beyond 2012, the carbon market will remain uncertain and the private sector (indispensable to the success of the market) should not extend its participation in a significant and lasting manner.
According to a recent study of companies interested in the financing of carbon, commissioned by the World Bank, only one company out of five surveyed said that it was interested in emissions reductions after 2012.
We now have the opportunity to turn toward the future and mobilize the global community (all of the countries without exception, albeit with different responsibilities) in the quest for a safer world, a world which would avoid the terrible risks of the environmental degradation and social conflict that go along with inaction.
State of the art or art of the State?
September is traditionally the month when orchestras and opera companies leave the festivals of Aix, Salzburg, Tanglewood and many others to return home.
This season is also marked (on both sides of the Atlantic) by the return of concerns as to the means of financing classical music.
The American Symphonic life is eurocentric in almost all areas except for its funding.
While Americans depend on private donations deductible from tax and revenue to fund classical music performances, Europeans prefer direct governmental support.
Ironically, while the defenders of the arts in the United States have long demanded the adoption of the "European model", which has produced a rich and varied artistic lifestyle, Europe is being forced to change course and to guide its support system towards greater dependence on private money and revenue.
Unfortunately, the European system of direct government funding is a victim of slow European economic growth and budget deficits.
The problem is especially for countries that have adopted the euro, as public spending in the art sector will be limited during a time by the obligation to keep the deficit below 3% of GDP.
The resulting pressure on the European institutions performing arts causes concern on several levels.
Traditionally, the European social democracies prefer to distribute scarce goods and services such as concerts and operas, according to a queue system (financed by huge subsidies to keep prices low) rather than by the willingness of each to pay.
That will change from now on.
Supporters of the Performing Arts in Europe point to the United States where, among others, even major orchestra conductors must actively participate in seeking funding and play an active role in the local community on behalf of the orchestra.
They fear that the same thing will happen in Europe.
Some conductors, refusing to handle the begging bowl at the same time as the baton, refused important positions in the United States for this reason, believing that it would upset their art.
It is said that Daniel Barenboim left the Chicago Symphony Orchestra in part because he objected to the demands for fundraising that were put upon him.
But the North American experience shows that getting big names in the art world, like the heads of orchestras, to participate in fundraising, does not necessarily harm the artistic aspect of the profession.
Michael Tilson Thomas in San Francisco, for example, has combined effective fundraising with artistic direction to place the San Francisco Symphony as one of North America's top orchestras.
The Europeans, concerned that greater dependence on private money inevitably means conservative programming, should also be reassured to see that the San Francisco Symphony has one of the most audacious repertoires in the United States.
If the public has progressive tastes, private money and innovative programming are entirely compatible.
The corollary is that public money makes possible an adventurous programming even if the public's taste has a tendency to be conservative.
This is one reason why artists in Europe like public money; it frees them from a repertoire of only Beethoven and Mozart.
In addition, the public can come to appreciate a daring plan if someone proposes it to them.
Of course, if the public founds are reduced regarding showbusiness, not only these one will have to depend more of private founds, but the price of tickets will have to increase.
Some complain, and prefer the system of queuing for tickets because they fear that higher prices will compromise future audiences by excluding youth.
But low prices for the performing arts do not solve the thorny issue of young people's access.
First, young people may not take advantage of cheap seats, simply because whatever the cost, classical music does not interest them.
Then, even if they want to go there, it is sometimes impossible for them to get tickets, which are often no longer available because the subscriptions stay in the same hands year after year.
What is the interest of low prices, which serve mainly to subsidise the same subscriptions holders, if there is no room?
If the taste for classical music has to be subsidized, one must favor  better-targeted grants rather than low prices.
The best way to attract youth to the performing arts is to go through education.
Given that American orchestras can't count on schools or the government to provide the basic music education to ensure an ongoing audience for classical music, some orchestras are doing it themselves with private money.
In San Francisco, for example, the Symphony is running a project called Keeping Score, financed with private funds of up to $23 million, which includes a national TV series, radio broadcasts, an interactive music apprenticeship and school music programs.
This type of innovative program applies as much to European orchestras as to American.
The problem of youth and its access to the performing arts exists on both sides of the Atlantic.
Just like the poor quality of music education in the public schools.
If the orchestras don't take care of their own future, they may simply not to have one.
Respect for the law, Russian-style.
Throughout the world, we are concerned with the disappearances of political freedoms in Vladimir Putin's Russia.
The Russians themselves are practically the only ones not to worry about this creeping authoritarianism.
They seem less concerned about political freedoms that with social protection: pensions, family violence, children's rights or police brutality.
In fact, most Russians are indifferent to the government's efforts to restrict freedom of press and the right to protest.
This apathy makes my job as a mediator, a position established in the Duma (parliament) to protect political rights in Russia, difficult, if not impossible.
The ombudsman serves as a bridge between authorities and the people; he tries to resolve conflicts between state organs and ctizens.
My office is open not only to Russian citizens, but also to foreign nationals and stateless people who believe that their political rights have been threatened.
We apply the Russian constitution, but also the principles of international law and standards on human rights, sometimes even in contradiction to our Constitution.
For example, as a mediator, I am opposed to the restriction of the right of the Russians to be jurors.
Those who wanted to limit the use of panels supposedly feared for national security.
My office worked closely with the state to ensure that most of the trials proceed with jury.
Similarly, my office has defended the weekly liberal Novoe Vremya, subject to pressure by the City of Moscow on the pretext of trade litigation concerning a lease.
The dispute is not resolved, but following my speech, the Moscow authorities were forced to take account of the negative public attitude to their attempts to censor the newspaper.
Of course Russia provides examples of problems relating to the fundamental political freedoms and much more in the headlines, as the dirty war in Chechnya or the Yukos affair.
My office concerns itself with Chechnya as much as possible, although this is not easy from Moscow.
I could spend all my time there, but Russia has 89 regions and innumerable human rights problems to solve.
This is why I suggested to Mr Putin that Chechnya be given its own regional mediator permanently.
The new Chechen authorities appear to be delighted.
With respect to the Yukos affair, my office cannot intervene in any ongoing legal proceedings.
The lawyers for the former Director General of Yukos, Mikhail Khodorkovsky, filed a complaint with the European Court of Human Rights in Strasbourg.
If Khodorkovsky contests the final decision of the Russian courts, he will no doubt appeal before this juisdiction.
Only then will I be able to give my opinion.
Many observers insist, however, that people who are the subject of a criminal investigation should be released on bail and not in jail.
For others, this is not possible in Khodorkovsky's case: He is very wealthy and could easily escape justice and flee abroad.
That's precisely what's the other people accused in the Yukos affair did.
All these serious problems in the area of human rights highlight the incompleteness of Russian legal institutions.
For example, the Duma has put in much too much time passing a law concerning pressure groups, which in most advanced democracies clearly defines acceptable and unacceptable behavior.
Khodorkovsky perhaps would not have so much trouble if such laws existed.
But the lack of legislation is directly linked to the absence of clear ideas.
Human rights in Russia are often trampled simply because the people do not know they have those rights.
The most important objective for my office is that everyone learns to better defend their rights, and that the authorities take in account complaints of ordinary russian citizens.
Unfortunately, most of bureaucrats still despise the values of Human Rights.
But the real difficulty for my office is not ignorance nor legal loopholes: it is the fact that in a legal system inadequately developed as the one of Russia, my authority is essentially personal, and requires the support of the media.
The notions of human rights are still rudimentary, and can be expected as an awareness that spreads gradually.
My strategic objective is thus to make better known the mediator's office, in order to get more respect and recognition from the citizens and the state.
It is almost impossible without co-operation with non-governmental human rights organizations in Russia.
I also consider that one of my tasks is to encourage contacts between these groups and the authorities.
The government's response to these initiatives will help to better know whether and to what extent the Putin government intends to include the political and human rights in the framework of its "dictatorship of law".
The revolutionary conservative pope
Twenty-five years ago, the Polish people were surprised that one of them, Cardinal Karol Wojtyla of Krakow, had been appointed to the papacy.
Some were frightened, others have shed tears of joy.
Here's, as a famous writer wrote, "the second Baptism of Poland."
But even in our euphoria, we did not expect the new pope to change not only Poland, but the entire world.
His first visit to his native country, shortly after his induction, showed the world the power of the new pope.
The communist police has disappeared from the main streets in Warsaw, the streets have become models of order.
After decades of being deprived of their independence, the Poles have suddenly regained their capacity for self-determination.
By saying out loud that "there can be no Europe without an independent Poland on its map," the pope has managed to sweep away the unfair post-war colonisation which had subjected Poland to Soviet power.
Then, at Auschwitz, the Pope said: "I speak on behalf of all those whose rights are unknown and trampled in the world, I speak because I am involved, we are all linked by the truth."
At this point, in this Golgotha of modern times, he called the Poles who remembered their families, gassed in the Auschwitz crematories and those who froze in the concentration camps in Siberia, in a brotherhood devoted to combating even justified hatred and revenge.
Some see the Pope as the man who has led a religious revival; others take him for a man of peace.
Some see him as a defender of the poor, others a criticism of the theology of liberation.
For the people of Poland, John Paul II, by making the human rights, the focal point of his teaching, will be forever the man who gave us the courage and hope, who has restored our historical identity.
Indeed, during the first decade of his reign, the Pope gave all his efforts to the fight against the dictatorship, and particularly the communist dictatorship.
The strategy made by the Pope for the Catholic Church and its ability to mobilize millions of believers to its cause have meant that no one can never repeat the question posed by Stalin: "How many divisions the Pope has?"
John Paul II demonstrated that moral strength was a weapon powerful enough to undo the division of the world established at Yalta.
Perhaps in part because of their staunchly anti-communist position, the Catholic Church and John Paul II often receive the label of ‘conservatives’.
This accusation suggests that the Church cannot cohabitate easily with a pluralist democracy.
In the fight against communism, the Polish church has certainly been rather conservative, thank God!
It has shown conservative in its absolute loyalty to the evangelical values, to the truth of faith and to its historical identity.
For a system which officially advocated atheism and legalized lying, the church has embodied a living reproach.
However, with the disappearance of communism, the problem encountered by John Paul II and his church at the moment is this: in what language can evangelical values be expressed in a world in which evil is not represented by a political system, but is present in each soul?
What is the message of the Pope for the post-communist world he helped to create?
John Paul II undoubtedly keep his distance with the liberal economic ideas wich he often treat as permissive and morally relative.
The Pope's statements on behalf of collective values are often marked by criticism of individualism.
He considers the shortcomings of liberalism as being particularly pernicious in the post-communist countries.
The market economy, despite its practical success, often seems, in his eyes, lacking of a heart and a human face.
He believes that the market promotes entrepreneurship at the expense of human solidarity.
John Paul II is not highly enthusiastic about modern western civilization, with its separation from the world of values, and he contrasts it with those societies which have just emerged from several decades of dictatorship.
As Alexander Solzhenitsyn, the pope has a tendency to believe that this is primarily in the resistance to totalitarianism that man can become truly free and safeguard the fundamental values of civilisation.
I confess that I consider the legacy of Communism with more skepticism.
Totalitarian pressure has in fact created exceptional men such as John Paul II and Alexander Solzhenitsyn, people who consider that religious faith has bought freedom from lies and solitude.
But it has also created men such as Andrei Sakharov and Vaclav Havel, who have defended their supreme values by referring to a secular humanism and speaking in its name.
However, for most people, life under a totalitarian dictatorship was certainly nothing ennobling; rather it acted as a daily immersion into lies, spiritual depravity and material corruption.
This is why the post-communist companies do not demonstrate nobility or show any disinterestedness that is notably different from the west.
The defeat of communism has left a large black hole in the souls of communities, a hole that is now filled by ideas of nationalism, intolerance and Western consumerism.
But the first hunch of John Paul II is correct: the post-communist world (the eastern and western) is a spiritual crisis and the Pope wishes to undermine it by leading it to realize the importance of values higher.
Indeed, by his words and the example he gives, the Pope disrupts the world: it wants to live in wealth and comfort, and the Pope reminds us that we also need to live with dignity.
No single label can apply to John Paul II who is often a mixture of contradictory characteristics: rejection of compromise/ecumenism, tenacity/enthusiasm, intellectual openness/insistence on theological orthodoxy.
This is a conservative lovers of freedom and a supporter of peace, which condemns the injustice, but that reminds us that Mercy is more important than justice.
It is in that matter that he embodies the paradox which Christianity represents: the sacred and sustainable principles associated with the understanding and tolerance.
Twenty-five years after the departure of John Paul II in Rome, we, the Polish, remain grateful for getting us to regain our freedom.
It is a good thing that John Paul II be with us.
A world in which everything changes needs a watchdog to look after what does not change.
The interventionist syndrome
Kosovo is often used as a test-case for the concept of "humanitarian" intervention.
But while Iraq enters into the spiral of chaos, diplomats and national leaders are wondering again if it is appropriate for the alliances of nations or the international community to intervene when a sovereign country seems unable or unwilling to defend its citizens against genocide, war crimes, or ethnic cleansing.
At the center of this debate is the so-called doctrine of "responsibility to protect."
As a mediator in Kosovo, appointed by the United Nations over five years I have had the unique opportunity to observe the effects of this doctrine after NATO intervention in the former Yugoslavia in 1999.
Kosovo has thus become an international example of society-building, conducted by the UN Interim Administration Mission in Kosovo (UNMIK).
Experience is the right word here.
Indeed, Kosovo has turned into a tube test of the international intervention.
I have lived and worked long enough in Kosovo to see the result, and I claim that such experiments require more thorough research.
It seems clear that the need for an international intervention in a crisis situation depends on each specific period, and a rapid response is often necessary.
However, setting aside military factors, where such interventions are considered it is vitally important to concentrate the international policy discussions on the rapid deployment of a civilian presence and on security ties between one another.
It is even more true when the human suffering is caused by the conflict of communities, as was the case in Kosovo.
The immediate deployment of a civilian presence and adequate security immediately after the end of the NATO bombing of 1999 could have provided appropriate means to protect against the backlash that allowed the victims to become executioners.
The peacekeeping forces of NATO were not tasked with preventing abductions and disappearances, revenge killings and the massive destruction of property by ethnic Albanians, which resulted in a large reverse ethnic cleansing of the non-Albanian (predominantly Serbian) population.
A consequence of this neglect, a residue of social and political venom pervades Kosovo.
Instead of calming the community conflicts, inter-ethnic hatred is fiercer than ever.
Besides the lack of civilian and security presence to reassure each community, the general lack of legal mechanism to quickly render justice for crimes committed during and after the intervention has created further tension.
This tension is so pervasive, in fact, that any hopes of wrapping up the necessary reconciliation process must now be delayed to the distant future.
Similarly, in Kosovo the international community has devoted little time to helping the former combatants onsider their collective responsibility for the atrocities, whethertheir personal involvement was directly or indirect.
Without such an effort, trying to improve the situation is tantamount to build a house on a pile of sand.
This lack of foresight and of projects in the aftermath of armed intervention is not only dangerous for the people officially "saved", it is also counterproductive.
When a humanitarian intervention is not structured to guarantee basic security, the underlying antagonism that inspired the intervention is, at its core, only strengthened, not diminished.
Six years after NATO intervention, Kosovo is farther than ever from stability and social peace.
Despite repeated assurances from the UN authorities that Kosovo is on the path of reconciliation and genuine autonomy, the NATO representatives indicate that there are plans to maintain a long-term military presence in the province to "ensure that the political process will be put in place with success."
This leads me to another key point: a possible exit strategy is as important to the success of any humanitarian intervention in the future that the entry strategy.
For international intervention to have a real chance of success, it is advisable from the beginning to define the criteria of "success."
One such clarity can properly be an end to the commitment of international players.
In Kosovo, such clarity is and has been lacking; as a result, NATO and the UN have no clear idea about the time or the means by which they must both withdraw.
One day, someone quite rightly said that it is easy to bomb, but much more difficult to rebuild; it is relatively easy to dissolve a military regime, but it is much more difficult to build a robust civil and durable society in its place.
The United Nations General Assembly should keep this idea in mind when it begins to codify the doctrine of "responsibility to protect."
The divisions of the right in Central Europe
Will Eastern Europe reach a certain political stability?
Since 1989, the election results did not stop oscillating between right and left.
Vicktor Orban, the young and bright Hungarian prime minister will he put an end to this situation ?
Thanks to a brutal program designed to absorb its political rivals on the right, Fidesz (the Hungarian Civic Union party) has come to have almost as many members as the Socialist Party on its left.
He also benefited from the internal conflicts in the Socialist Party, which have harmed one of its main assets: his strict discipline and professionalism, inherited from communism.
Vicktor Orban's efforts to gather the divided right under the banner of FIDESZ have been partial successful and are unique in Eastern Europe.
Since the collapse of communism in the Czech Republic, in Hungary, Poland and in Slovakia, the moderate right-wing parties are fragmented and lack a genuine political perspective.
Although these countries have not yet fully recovered from several decades of communist management, the divisions within the right have facilitated the election victory for the left, sometimes represented by former communists.
The right-wing forces in central Europe have to confront problems similar to those faced by right-wing parties elsewhere in Europe, where Social-Democrats, salvaging liberal ideas, manage to succeed in occupying all alone the center of the political chessboard.
In central Europe, this phenomenon was amplified by the fact that the ruling parties, of all political persuasions, had to privatize the economy and introduce under pressure from the European Union reforms which in the West would have been put in place by the right.
In several Central European countries, the left have been better positioned to accomplish these reforms than the right because, paradoxically, they have a greater legitimacy for that.
Many people believe that the socialists get involved in privatisation or attack social protection unless it is absolutely necessity.
In Central Europe, the fundamental problem of the right is its lack of a  clearly defined identity.
Although politicians of the moderate right wing formally claim  traditional ideologies, liberalism or conservatism for example, their electorate, little accustomed to Western political concepts, does not always understand the significance of these terms.
Numerous polls show that a significant part of the electorate of various countries in central Europe align themselves to the right, but decades of paternalistic communism have moved the center of gravity in the region far to the left.
Thus, a person can simultaneously declare herself liberal and ask that the government continue to subsidize the energy, education and housing.
Under the communist regimes, the ideology was just a vulgar instrument at the power service.
As this time, even today many people accept formally ideological labels, but does not want insofar as they can remove a tangible benefit in the short term.
This cynicism about ideologies leads to the electorate's abrupt changes of heart.
The problem of identity is further exacerbated by the upsurge of nationalism. Most of the central European countries in which the building of a national identity was delayed by communism succumb to nationalist sentiments that can be manipulated by politicians.
Although some of them say they are right-wing, the image of Vladimir Meciar, the former Slovak Prime Minister, are in fact populist and authoritarian demagogues.
The current situation of the right in the countries of central Europe is also explained by their history and tradition.
The political evolution in Czechoslovakia during the last 20 years of Communism has alienated the Czech Republic and Slovakia from Poland and Hungary.
While Poland and Hungary knew under communism an internal liberalization which has allowed a part of the activity to escape semi-officially to communist control, Czechoslovakia knew a strict neo-Stalinist regime after the Soviet invasion of 1968.
In 1989, when the communist regime collapsed, the Communist parties in Poland and Hungary have turned into left-wing parties, democratic and credible. They were able to effectively oppose the right-wing parties that were created.
But in Czechoslovakia, the rigid communist party has not been able to give birth to a Democratic Party, anchored to the left.
Faced with this gap, the moderate right wing had a free hand and was able to retain a certain unity until 1997.
But the lack of a strong opposition led to the collapse of the right, which had become divided and lost a common language.
In Slovakia, country where the nationalist sentiments have played an important role after 1989, the political forces do not split for the moment on a left-right axis.
The main political battles are taking place between the essentially antidemocratic nationalist and populist forces on one side, and the forces fighting for democracy on the other.
The threat of Meciar's return to power led all the Democrats, from both right and left, to stand up together.
Even in these circumstances, the right remains divided, thereby allowing a possible return to power by Meciar.
In Hungary, the right has been a victim of the opposition between the conservatives and the populists on one side and the liberals from mainly urban classes on the other.
The right-wing parties have not come to an agreement as to whether they need to align with the traditional ideologies inspired by the West or with a form of conservative nationalism like that of Hungary.
Although the current ruling coalition, made up of conservatives and populists, has achieved some successes, the moment of truth for the right has not yet arrived.
The Polish right wing represents the hardest case.
Its problems date back to the communist era, when the Solidarity trade union became the main movement of opposition against the communists, during the time that unions are generally left.
Since the fall of communism, various groups of Solidarity have wanted to embody the right, sowing confusion in the political discourse.
The Christian Democrat parties linked to the church and the liberal parties have been to some extent marginalized.
The situation is made more complex by the need to include the populist and nationalist parties. They are relatively strong, because they can rely on the farming community which is an important electoral base in Poland.
As in other post-communist countries, it is essentially the democratic forces of the left who have benefited from divisions of the right.
Fed up with WalMart?
Do you want to know what video clip will soon be making policymakers throughout the world tremble?
The economist Thomas Holmes, following a scenario that looks like a disturbing way the spread of a global epidemic, has prepared a dynamic map simulation showing the expansion of the United States Wal-Mart stores.
Starting with the epicentre in Bentonville in Arkansas, where Sam Walton opened his first store in 1962, huge Wal-Mart big-box stores [magasins-boîtes] have now multiplied to the point that the average American lives less than seven kilometers from one of these retailers.
It is interesting to note that the shops are changing like the petals of a flower; ever thickening and expanding.
Rather than jumping directly to the coasts, since 80% of Americans live within a radius of 80 km from the Atlantic or the Pacific, Wal-Mart has spread in a more organic and indirect way, with a chain of suppliers that is constantly expanding.
Even if every new shop steals some of the clientele of Wal-Mart stores in the vicinity, the effectiveness of supply steadily improving helps maintain the overall growth of the chain.
Love it or hate it, Wal-Mart is undeniably the perfect example of the costs and benefits of modern globalization.
Consumers spend considerably less there than in traditional stores.
For example, economists believe that groceries at Wal-Mart are 25% cheaper than in any other supermarket chain.
The difference in price for many other consumer products is even greater.
Consider this astonishing fact: along with some other stores of the same sort, like Target, Best Buy and Home Depot, Wal-Mart accounts for about 50% of the vaunted increase in productivity in the U.S. as compared to Europe over the course of the past ten years.
Fifty percent!
And the same kind of progress among the chains of Wholesalers account for 25% more!
The idea that Americans have become better in all things while the other rich countries stagnated is very wrong.
The miracle of US productivity and the emergence of trade in the style of Wal-Mart are practically synonymous.
I have nothing against these big hypermarkets.
They are a godsend for low income consumers, and offset in part the tepid growth in wages from which many of them have suffered over the course of the past two decades.
And I disagree with some of my friends who snub the Wal-Mart stores and claim there have never set foot.
As a consumer, I love the big-box stores.
It is also certainly the case of America's trading partners; Wal-Mart alone accounts for more than 10% of all American imports from China.
But I nevertheless have some reservations about the Wal-Mart model being used as a blueprint of global growth.
First, there is the question of its effect on the workers on low wages and on the smaller retailers.
The investigations reveal that, while remaining within the law, its social policies exploit the gaps in regulation, which, for example, allow it to escape the burden of healthcare costs for many employees (Wal-Mart provides health coverage to less than half of its employees).
And the arrival of these hypers in a community crushes long-established retailers, and often transforms the community's personality is a startling way.
Yes, up to a certain point, it is the price to pay for progress.
But the loss of aesthetics and community is not simply calculated based on statistics on income and prices.
The big-box stores are not really cute, hence the name [big boxes].
If their explosive growth continues over the next 20 years, will Americans one day consider their proliferation a spectacular example of the failure of growth models which are weighted toward the regional level?
Indeed, many Europeans, and others, would consider the  video simulation of Holmes replicating the development of Wal-Mart as a horror film.
The French may have invented the hypermarket, ancestor of the big box store, but they never intended to allow it to develop unrestricted.
The big question for Europeans is whether they can find ways to use some of the efficiency gains encapsulated by the Wal-Mart model without being overtaken by it.
For Americans, there is also the question  of knowing what to do when the big-box stores phenomenon will slow down.
If a large part of US productivity is truly reduced to nothing more than letting Wal-Mart and its supermarket cousins continue their insane expansion, what happens when this source of growth is exhausted?
The US economy has many other forces, including its financial system and its dominant position in terms of capital goods, but the fact is that the advantage of the United States in this sector has not yet been as striking as the Wal-Mart phenomenon.
It is curious to see how many people seem to think that the US will grow faster than Europe and Japan over the next ten years, simply because it happened during the last ten years.
Wal-Mart and its ilk are a central element of our modern era of globalization.
They are not really the epidemic that their explosive growth pattern resembles, but their emergence is not completely benign.
Those who wish to emulate the trends in US productivity must ask themselves today what they would think of the emergence of stores in the shape of boxes dotting their countryside, pulling wages down and causing the death of small retail businesses.
The Americans, meanwhile, must think where is the balance between aesthetics, community, and low prices.
Accept the science.
The economic progress in the long term is mainly allowed by the invention and the spread of improved technologies.
The scientific revolution has been made possible by the press prints, the industrial revolution in the steam engine and if India from the famine, it is thanks to higher yields, the so-called "green revolution."
The era of globalization that we live emerged with the spread of computers and Internet.
In this way, when we look for solutions to some of the most difficult world problems, we can also find them, at least in part, in new technologies likely to resolve old, seemingly insolvable problems.
Take the example of poverty in Africa.
All the possible explanations were made, and usually the finger focus on what Africans did wrong.
But a visit to African villages makes it clear that the problem is more conditioned by the fight for survival in poor physical conditions than by any other problem, inherent to African societies.
The African farmers produce about one third (or less) of food less per hectare than other farmers of the world, which led to a large-scale famine, exacerbated by the heavy burden of disease.
Malaria is a unique challenge of its kind, mainly due to the species of mosquitoes in Africa, which are particularly suited to transmitting the disease.
Other tropical parasitic diseases are also heavy curses on the continent.
Add to that the practical difficulty represented by the roads in poor condition and the scarcity of cars and trucks, and the economic isolation follows.
The challenges of survival are thus enormous.
Practical solutions are available however, because simple and inexpensive technologies can solve some specific problems.
We can overcome the low crop yields with improved seed varieties specially adapted to African conditions, combined with technologies to enrich the soil and water management.
Malaria can be controlled through new long life mosquito nets and a new generation of effective medicines.
Other tropical diseases can also be controlled, and practical technologies to get drinking water can reduce substantially diarrheal diseases.
Mobile phones, wireless local Internet, and more roads could contribute greatly to breaking the economic isolation of African villages.
The donor countries are always asking the Africans to change their trade policies, their government institutions, their administrations, and more.
Some of these changes are important but the rich countries go sometimes beyond their role by focusing on everything, except on how to finance and to introduce practical technologies to solve practical problems.
The mistakes of the wealthy countries would not be significant if the African countries had enough money to acquire the necessary technologies by themselves, but Africa is so poor that it needs financial assistance in order to escape from poverty.
The challenges of development in Africa are just one example of how difficult social problems can be solved thanks to the design and the spread of improved technologies.
The same will be a correct way to best solve the problem of climate change caused by man--one of these global problems is seemingly unsolvable.
For now, rich countries change the global climate by emitting millions of tonnes of carbon dioxide each year by the use of coal, oil and natural gas.
In the coming years, China and India will also significatly contribute to increase the amount of carbon dioxide into the atmosphere.
And yet no country, it is rich or poor, is keen to reduce energy consumption, concerned that such a move could threaten its jobs, its income and its economic growth.
The new technologies will provide a very important part of the solution.
Already, "hybrid" automobiles, which combine fuel and battery, can almost double the fuel efficiency and divide by two carbon dioxide emissions.
In addition, engineers have developed techniques for the capture and safe underground storage of the carbon dioxide resulting from the burning of coal for power stations.
This new technology can reduce by 80% carbon dioxide emissions from electricity production.
The costs are relatively modest.
Let us also consider the depopulation of the oceans due to overfishing.
The global demand for fish is increasing, as well as the world's capacity for fishing, which threatens certain species with extinction.
An improved aquaculture, where fish are raised in containers and fish-tanks, is still far from being a perfect technology, particularly for environmental reasons, and yet it is very promising.
During a recent visit to Africa, a prominent agronomist stated that in today's world, the scientist is closer than ever to the farmer, but farther than ever from the legislator.
Politicians do not understand science, and rarely seek the opinion of scientists and engineers when they want to solve big problems.
Everything is viewed in terms of politics and elections, and nothing is considered a technical problem requiring technological expertise, which is why African poverty is so often attributed to corruption rather than to environmental challenges.
It is easy to dismiss the suggestion that technology can be the solution.
After all, technological progress also requires good governance, market forces, effective universities and more.
Politics also has a role to play.
Anyway, it is time to recognize that governments are poorly equipped to understand sophisticated technological challenges and opportunities the world could benefit from, and that new systems are needed to ensure science and technology are accorded the necessary authority to tackle a broad range of global problems which are becoming more and more urgent.
It is time today that all the major international agencies and governments take responsibility to use the scientific expertise and technology they will need in the 21st century.
Unblocking the Situation in Latin America
One of the biggest headaches of the world economy is undoubtedly the poor performance of Latin America.
Since the early 1980s, Latin America has found itself blocked, with per capita income (when there was any) growing slowly in most of the region and with one major crisis after another.
Many policies have been attempted, particularly the liberalization of trade, the privatisation of inefficient state-owned companies and fiscal reforms.
However, something prevents Latin America to move forward.
The lack of robust growth is even more disconcerting in light of the many benefits and social achievements of Latin America.
The natural resources are abundant and the fertile earths abound.
The health conditions are fairly acceptable and all Latin American countries have made progress against illiteracy, the majority reaching at least 90% of adult literacy.
In addition, the fertility rates have fallen sharply, to reach a rate where the populations of many countries will stabilise probably for the next decades.
The condition of women has improved and the girls are granted equal access to education, with tuition rates higher than boys in many countries.
Latin America is undoubtedly known for its "macho" culture, but the rate of women in the working population continues to grow and they are occupying more and more high-profile social and political positions.
Latin America is glorified by other advantages over the long term.
Most of its citizens live on the coasts and enjoy privileged access to international trade, and others live in cities, another advantage for growth.
Indeed, the region is not poor, according to international standards, but rather mired in the area of average earnings, between the world's poorest countries and the high-income countries of North America, Europe and Eastern Asia.
Why, then, the surprising lack of real growth in the past 25 years?
I reject the responsibility on two unsolved but soluble problems.
The first has existed for centuries: social divisions whose origins date back to the European conquest of Native Americans in the 16th Century.
More than other countries, Latin America was born during a violent conquest.
The Europeans subjugated the Amerindian people and also brought back, especially in the Caribbean basin and in Brazil, massive cargoes of African slaves.
Societies have become racially and ethnically complex since European, Native American and African populations have practiced mixed marriage, but the trend over the long term of European dominance, of indigenous and African-American enslavement, and of strongly rooted poverty have deeply scarred societies in Latin America.
Even today, the income inequality of Latin America are among the world's largest, reflecting the old models of ethnic and racial division.
Income inequality casts a large shadow.
The rich have been fighting for a long time against the taxes needed to increase investment in the areas of education and healthcare for the poor, thus perpetuating profound social divisions and leaving many people without healthcare and without the skills required by global competitiveness.
The situation is improving today in some countries, such as Brazil, which bodes well for the future.
In other countries, such as Guatemala and parts of the Andean region, the social divisions are marred by violence and mistrust.
In addition to this problem, a fundamental failure of the economic strategy has been largely ignored, a failure that is reflected in the major difference between the discussions on public policy in Latin America and Asia.
In Asia, the public debate is about the technology: how can Asia can catch up?
The Asian governments act with determination to increase the scientific and technological capacities of their economies.
In Latin America, the world technological revolution is much less discussed and the national policies to promote science and technology reach rarely the forefront.
Resulting in Latin America not taking proper advantage of the world technological revolution.
The developing Asian countries now produce computers, semiconductors, pharmaceutical products and software.
By contrast, even the star seller in Latin America, Chile, remains largely an export economy based on resources, heavily focused on exports of copper and agricultural products.
These sectors are technologically sophisticated, but form a narrow base for long-term development.
The situation is far from hopeless.
Brazil has shown predispositions to be a technological goods exporting power.
It has succeeded, obviously, to export aircrafts and many consumer goods.
Mexico has also started to mobilize a considerable amount of technological know-how.
Argentina, Chile and other countries could become noteworthy agricultural producers, in the vanguard of the agro-biotechnology for example, if they bothered.
However, Latin American countries have not yet tried to trigger a technological revolution, certainly not with the level of importance, competence, commitment and financing of the Asian countries.
Such an upsurge could play a major role in the take-off of economic growth.
Such a policy would commit to significantly increase spending on research and development, as the developing Asian countries have done.
The Latin American countries must increase spending to reach up to 2% of GDP (currently 0.5%), in part through public support for laboratories and universities, and in part by benefits for research and development of the private sector. They must unroll the red carpet for high-tech multinational companies, as Asia did.
They also need to focus more on training in science and technology and encourage a greater proportion of students to receive a university education.
The government stipends for tuition and for new universities and bigger universities can play an expanded role, as can investment in computers and information technology in schools and communities.
The social and technological program will depend on each another.
Both of them are asking Latin American companies to invest more in the people who are affected by these programs, so that the Latin Americans can position themselves at the forefront with respect to global productivity.
If these investments touch every country in Latin America, both rich and poor, the prospects of the region will improve considerably.
The price of real estate: a house of cards?
The first important city to see a boom was London, around 1996.
This attitude spread to Los Angeles, New York and Sydney around 1997 and Paris in 1998, all the way to Miami, Moscow and Shanghai in 2001 and Vancouver in 2002.
These cities and others have seen house prices inflate since then. Prices have risen to at least 50% in fixed prices since 2000.
This was the source of major unexpected profits for owners, but also the source of a problem for anyone preparing to buy a property.
Today, the rise of home prices subsides in some of these big cities.
The growth rate in London and New York slowed down dramatically during the course of the last year, and it fell to about a 1% real increase since the second quarter of 2004.
In Sydney, the prices of homes actually fell during the second quarter.
Is it the end of the boom ?
No other city would benefit from it?
Worse still, could the mood of real estate markets lead to a drop in prices?
No one had foreseen this boom, so to predict its end is risky.
Housing prices have shown a strong upward movement against the post-holiday warnings.
Any prediction about the end of the boom requires an understanding of the reasons for its development in so many different cities.
Curiously, there is no generally accepted explanation because the ultimate causes of the boom are primarily psychological.
Economists prefer to discuss interest rates or unemployment statistics, concrete and knowable factors.
Of course, these indicators have a legitimate role to play in explaining the property markets, but they are simply not sufficient to explain the recent boom.
Three psychological causes emerge from all of that: first, a change to the public perception about the sources of value in a changing global economy and growing confidence the public has in the cities' "glamour" whose name is known internationally and finally the simple dynamic of exciting speculative bubbles.
Each factor deserves more attention if you want to understand the present market conditions and see the future price trends.
First, the world economy seems more chaotic than it was ten years ago.
Plummeting share prices in most countries since 2000 offer little reassurance as to most financial assets, encouraging the move to "safe haven investments," real estate in this case.
Moreover, terrorism is now seen as a problem for everyone; Indonesia, Spain and Russia have suffered their own tragedies.
We are reassured by investing in real estate, and there is little reason to expect an imminent change.
Fear and soaring real estate prices are encouraging each other.
Then, public confidence in the cities' international glamor is growing, thanks to the explosive growth of global communications through the Internet and mobile phone.
Just as we admire international celebrities, we recognize famous international centers of business, technology and culture - whose names are familiar to everybody, possessing universally a unique value.
As for fear of terrorism and the lack of confidence in the stock markets, the geographical celebrity seems elastic, not to say self-enforced: the more New York, Paris and London are famous, the more they are attractive.
Finally, the contagious speculation behind any bubble cannot be ignored.
The current boom has seen the contagion spread within markets and across markets, with rising prices fueling popular excitement and thus further fueling the rise itself, in the same city and then in other cities, until it reaches the other side of the globe.
Residents of Shanghai may not discuss real estate prices in London, but the leaders of public opinion in Shanghai know what is going on in London, and any boom in that city makes the possibility of a boom in Shanghai plausible.
In contrast to the two other psychological reasons, speculative contagion has a natural end.
A speculative bubble, which sustains itself solely on the reaction to rising prices, cannot continue indefinitely.
So, where will it take us?
Two of the psychological causes suggest a continuing increase in house prices while the third suggests the end of this rising movement one of these days, without saying when.
I'll bet that some highly attractive cities will continue to experience a slowing of growth in housing prices, then eventually a decline.
Historically, housing prices have always demonstrated strong movements, and prices in all of these cities are still going up at a significant rate, even if it is generally a bit slower than a year or two ago.
If we extrapolate the trends of growth, it seems reasonable to forecast that prices will continue to grow significantly in most of these cities for a year or two, even if the rate of growth continues to decline.
The psychological factors are more important for the long-term prognosis, beyond a year, when the upward movement no longer plays such an important role.
At this stage, prices are likely to show unstable drop, because enthusiasm for investing in stone will probably collapse at the same time as the decline in price growth.
The prices in glamorous cities will fall significantly in the next recession or when the economy will suffer it's next major impact or if interest rates rise too quickly.
Then the contagion within and across the markets will fall, making prices faill for years.
Water for all
This month, once more, water takes centre stage at the fourth World Water Forum in Mexico.
This is an opportune moment: While the attention of most of the world is focused on energy issues, supply and security, hundreds of millions of people in developing countries, still see the supply of fresh water as equally important, if not more.
The investigations conducted by the World Bank in developing countries show that, when you ask poor people to name the three most important challenges they face, "good health" is always part of this list.
And the key factor that determines whether they will remain healthy is  the access to clean water.
Today, in the world over a billion people do not have access.
So they are always easier prey to ill health.
The World Bank estimates that by 2035, nearly three billion people, almost all in developing countries, could live in conditions of very serious water shortages, especially if they live in Africa, the Middle East or South Asia.
This will cause obvious difficulties, but will also hinder the economic growth needed for millions of people to escape poverty.
In Latin America, nearly 15% of the population, so nearly 76 million people, has no access to drinking water, and 116 million people don't have access to health service.
The numbers are worse for Africa and certain parts of Asia.
This is a situation that few people have to face in rich countries.
Normally, the citizens of these countries benefit from public services that meet all their water needs, from drinking to irrigation and sanitation needs.
In addition, other issues related to water, such as the risks posed by floods, have been reduced to manageable levels.
The rich industrial countries invested very early and very heavily in infrastructure, institutions and water management.
The results, beyond the health benefits that it provides to all, have provided evidence of record economic growth: it is enough to examine the hydro-electric investments to understand the positive impact of projects for the management of water in many countries.
Of course, rich countries have some advantages: they enjoy generally temperate climates, where the rains are regular, and have usually little risk of drought or flood.
Even so, they are not immune to water-related disasters, as the destruction of New Orleans by Hurricane Katrina has shown us.
But the impact of such events on poor countries is far more important.
The extreme variations of the rains, floods and droughts can have social and economic impact and result in loss of life on a large scale.
The coasts of the Gulf of Mexico and the Central American countries are constantly experiencing such tragedies, with the deprived communities being the most vulnerable and the least able to deal with these events.
The Ethiopia and Yemen are two comparable outstanding examples.
The development potential of the Ethiopia is so intimately linked to seasonal rains that huge variations in the rain, and the lack of infrastructure, has undermined the growth and perpetuated poverty.
A simple drought can reduce the potential for growth by 10% in the long term.
Yemen, meanwhile, has no permanent surface water and its citizens are entirely reliant on rainfall, groundwater and floods.
To move forward, developing countries need new infrastructures and better management of water.
All approaches must be designed in conjunction with the specific context of each country and the needs of their respective people, but there is no constraint linked with the investment in the use of water that ensures that local communities and the environment can obtain tangible benefits quickly.
In some countries, the implementation of new water infrastructures usually means the creation of canals, pumping stations and dams.
Other countries may need deeper reservoirs, more modern sewage treatment plants or improved water transportation systems.
All of that may be designed to improve and extend the water supply for energy generation, irrigation, and industrial and private use, while at the same time ensuring some degree of security against droughts and some protection against floods.
The key to the success of any expansion of investment in water infrastructure, is to proportionally increase investment in the institutions managing water.
If the infrastructure is poorly managed, it does not help to improve the health of populations or to support economic growth: the organisation of water and water management must work together.
The infrastructure can and should be developed in parallel with good, well-managed institutions related to the environment and with an equitable balance of costs and benefits.
A policy of investment in water that reduces the vulnerability of the poor and provides access to water for all requires a personalized management and a special partnership between the donor countries, developing country governments, the private sector and local communities.
Delegates of the World Water Forum will have multiple opportunities to build and strengthen these partnerships.
If successful, the benefits that poor people worldwide will draw will be immense.
Germany in a state of economic shock
Over the past ten years, Germany has experienced the slowest economic growth of the European Union, and Europe the slowest growth in the world.
From 1995 to 2005, German growth will not exceed 14.6%, whereas the old EU average was 24%, 39.9% in the United States, and the global economy was 45.6%.
What can explain such bad results in Germany?
According to Franz Müntefering, Chairman of the Social Democratic Party, the ruling party of Germany, it is simply because the country is already where others wish to be.
The slow growth in Germany, he maintained, is a sign of natural convergence.
This theory is far from convincing.
Germany has recently been surpassed in terms of per capita income by many EU countries including Ireland, the United Kingdom, Holland and France, and its growth remains slower than theirs.
Another theory, more plausible, is that over the last 15 years several external challenges, or shocks, have simultaneously rocked the country.
Trapped by its rigidity, its social system extended and a labour market highly regulated, Germany has been unable to react to these shocks and began to encounter problems.
This theory calls to mind a theory of the British historian Arnold Toynbee, which says that empires crumble because they are unable to respond to external challenges.
The first shock was the intensification of globalization, which provoked a massive surge of competition based on low wages.
Even if globalization is a progressive process, it gained energy when China has decided to enter the game.
China is ten times the size of Japan, and Japan had not been very easy to manage.
German precision instruments and optical equipment, for example, lost their competitiveness when Japan took the stage.
The second shock has been one of European integration, especially the expansion in the north and south.
The dismantling of the internal borders of the EU has all of a sudden extended the size of national markets and resulted in the planned economies of scale.
But this phenomenon has favoured small European countries more then large ones, and has meant more competition for Germany, the largest economy in Europe.
Take, Nokia, the mobile phone manufacturer .
Thanks to the economies of scale made possible by the common market, Nokia has been able to fully exploit their inventions, while Germany's Siemens had recently decided to drop the mobile phone market.
The third shock has been the euro. European currency has provoked a rapid convergence of long-term interest rates, which in certain countries have reached up to 5 to 7 percentage points more than in Germany.
Freed from exchange rate risks, international investors do not ask these countries for more risk premium and are happy to provide funds on favorable terms to all of them, which was formerly Germany's prerogative.
Europe only benefits from the situation, as the capital is now better distributed and growth stimulated with the migration of the German economy to the remote locations, which were previously disadvantaged in the euro zone.
However, the benefit is doubtful for German workers  who have also wanted to take advantage of this capital.
The fourth shock took the form of the enlargement to the east of the EU, which led to extraordinary opportunities for trade and investment, but also to a surge of low-priced labor.
In average, the wage levels in the 10 countries that joined the EU in 2004 represent only 14% of West Germany's.
The low wage competition has led to substantial outsourcing and offshore activities that have allowed German companies to remain competitive by reducing their demand for domestic labor.
Since neither the trade unions nor the German social system could accept pay cuts, the consequences have been rising unemployment and slow growth.
The fifth shock is the unification of Germany, a failure in economic terms.
The GDP per person of working age in eastern Germany was 61% of the level of West Germany in 1996, but it is waning today to 59%.
The slow growth of the eastern part of the country has brought down the German average, while the huge demand for public funds is only deepening the public debt.
The weakness of the fiscal position has in turn undermined investor confidence, with obvious impact on economic growth.
These five shocks are historic developments beneficial for the whole world, but problematic for Germany.
If the country wants to face challenges and continue to grow, it needs to relax its labour market.
Only if wages adjust downward to accommodate the new global environment that German workers will be competitive again, and the country will know a low unemployment rate again, by exploiting its human capital until capacity constraint.
The new government that voters will likely choose in September will be facing the difficult task of getting Germans to face reality and introducing necessary reforms.
Only then we will know if Germany is able to confront the Toynbee challenge that awaits it.
The lessons of the tsunami
Many lessons emerge from the tsunami, the cause of so much devastation and loss of human life in Asia.
This is a proof of globalization, while television showed the striking images of the destruction of homes in the whole world.
Indeed, it is in these times that the world really does seem to be a global village.
Of course, it seems that information on the scale of the disaster put more time to reach President Bush's ranch in Crawford, Texas.
But, finally, he decided to interrupt his vacation to offer some aid, the amount of which has been constantly revised upwards in an international competition which seemed likely to profit those who were waiting desperately to be helped.
American aid still appears to be shabby compared to the amount offered by countries that do have a fraction of American wealth.
Australia, which is sparsely populated, offered more than double American aid, Japan promised 50% more than America and Europe is committed to a sum five times greater.
This has helped many observers point out that the richest country in the world was the poorest in terms of international aid, especially when this sum is compared to what is being spent in defense and war.
This disaster is international, so it is also appropriate that the United Nations take the lead in coordinating the humanitarian effort.
Unfortunately, in an effort which was widely perceived as another attempt to undermine multilateralism, the United States tried to take over the leadership of a "central group" assistance program, ignoring ongoing efforts within the region under the aegis of the United Nations.
Whatever America's motive was, it judiciously decided afterwards to join the United Nations in its efforts.
The rhetoric used to save the face of the Bush administration claiming that they were developing a core group in the absence of any other effort has been slowly abandoned.
The response of some countries in the region was really impressive, showing the battle waged in the establishment of efficient and effective governments and staff.
Countless details were examined: Thailand sent ambassadors in the country's affected areas to help meet the needs of citizens, helped those who had lost everything, passport and goods, to return home, cared for the injured, set up systems for identifying bodies and dealt with the difficulties posed by the shortage of body bags and the lack of chilled areas to store bodies.
Countries who like Thailand realised that they could cope with the financial consequences themselves have asked for humanitarian aid to be sent to other countries.
They have asked for only one thing: the reduction of tariffs and better access to foreign markets.
They weren't asking for charity, just a chance to earn their own income.
They only received in response, at least at the time I am writing, an relentless silent .
Futhermore, the G7 has chosen to contribute significantly by offering to reduce the debt.
This is particularly important in the case of Indonesia, whose debt service now amounts to $132 billion, of which $70 billion is due to public creditors or is guaranteed by government agencies.
Even without the horrors of the tsunami, the burden of that debt would have represented a major obstacle in the development of this country, recovering as it was from the consequences of the 1997 financial crisis.
Indeed, the Indonesian debt relief is a convincing case as most of the debts were incurred in loans to the corrupt government of Suharto.
The leaders knew or should have known that part of the total of money lent would not be attributed to the development of Indonesia.
Moreover, part of the debt was incurred during the crisis of 1997-98, aggravated and extended by the policies imposed by the IMF.
No one pretends that it is possible to alter or prevent the forces of nature.
Instead, we must learn to manage them.
There is now talk of improved warning systems to prevent possible tsunamis.
We already have, however, received a warning on the issue of climate change.
Most countries recognize it and went to Rio and Kyoto to act together: even if it is insufficient, the Kyoto Protocol was designed as a good first step.
Unfortunately, global warming will probably destroy the same countries that have just been ravaged by the tsunami.
Islands which do not rise far above sea level, such as the Maldives, will be submerged.
We are not a global village yet .
After contesting the scientific evidence highlighting the problems, the biggest polluter of the planet, the United States, has simply refused to act beyond mere appeal to a certain voluntary restriction that we see little achievement in America in any case.
The international community must still consider the treatment to apply to this aberrant member who refuses to take his responsibilities as a global citizen.
The optimists will say that technology can solve these problems.
Realists will note that in the long-distance race between technology and the environment, it seems that as of our day technology is the loser.
Nature, as shown by the tsunami, possesses its own clock.
As long as we haven't learned to respect it, we will all miss the train.
The accuracy of experts
Every day, experts bombard us with their views on subjects as varied as Iraqi insurgents, Bolivia's coca growers, central european bankers and the Politburo of North Korea. 
Up until what point are these experts credible?
An optimistic view is that as long as those who sell expertise compete vigorously for the attention of shrewd buyers (the media), market mechanisms will ensure quality control.
The experts published in the pages of newspapers, or who appear on the television and the radio, must surely have a good reputation, because otherwise they would have been eliminated.
Skeptics, however, warn that the media impose on us their choice of speakers and they are less interested in reasoned debate than in catering to popular prejudices.
Accordingly, celebrity may well be linked negatively, and not positively, to long-term accuracy.
Until recently, nobody knew who was right because nobody kept track of the results of these experts.
But a research over the last 20 years ago suggests today that sceptics are the closest to the truth.
I describe this project in detail in my book Expert Political Judgment: How Good Is It? How Can We Know?
[the political judgment of experts: What is it worth?
How do we know? The original idea was to ask for thousands of predictions from hundreds of experts about the fates of dozens of countries, and note those predictions according to their accuracy.
We have discovered that media does not eliminate the bad ideas, but often reinforces them, especially when the truth is too complex to be presented clearly.
The evidence fall into two categories.
First, as have warned the sceptics, when hordes of experts are fighting for the limelight, many are tempted to claim that they know more than in reality.
Experts who forecast the worst and the best are those who tend to exaggerate.
Between 1985 and 2005, experts the most optimistic forecasts over 10 years ago which frontlines the chances of major changes on both the financial markets (e.g. a Dow Jones to 36,000) and in terms of global politics (for example the calm in the Middle East and dynamic growth in sub-Saharan Africa).
They gave a likelihood of 65% to optimistic scenarios that materialised in just 15% of cases.
During the same period of time, the most pessimistic experts were even more misguided, exaggerating the risks of adverse changes in the very place where over optimistic experts were overfllowing whit good news, and by adding many other's (still, I await the imminent disintegration of Canada, Nigeria, India, Indonesia, South Africa, Belgium and Sudan).
They gave the likelihood of 70% to disaster scenarios which were realized in only 12% of the cases.
In addition, as had once again been predicted the sceptics, experts claim to know more than they actually pay rarely their mistakes.
Indeed, the media pay much attention to them while neglecting their humbler colleagues.
On can see this process particularly highlighted when, in following the philosopher Sir Isaiah Berlin, we categorize the experts as "hedgehogs" and "foxes".
The hedgehogs are those who have great ideas and become infatuated with grand theories: libertarians ideas, Marxism, environmentalism, etc.
Their self-confidence can be contaigeous
They know how to maintain the momentum of a discussion by increasing the number of reasons showing that they are right and that the others are wrong.
This is what earns them the approval of the media.
But they do not know when to press on their mental brake by making concessions to other points of view.
They take their theories too seriously.
Result: the hedgehogs commit more mistakes, but they accumulate more success on Google.
The eclectic foxes are better off calming their ideological enthusiasm.
They feel more comfortable in the face of prolonged uncertainty about who is right even within the framework of bitter debates, admit their shortcomings and accord legitimacy to opposing points of view.
They punctuate their conversations with qualifiers which limit the scope of their arguments: "but", "however", and "even though".
As they scurry of oversimplifying,  foxes make fewer mistakes.
To put it simply, the foxes are often in agreement with the hedgehogs up to a point: "Yes, my colleague was right when he said that the Saudi monarchy is vulnerable, but remember that coups d'etats are rare and the government has many ways to crush the opposition."
Imagine that your job in the media depends on your ability to expand your audience.
Who would you pick: an expert who balances conflicting arguments and concludes that the most likely result is that nothing will change, or an expert who gets the public spellbound with stories of islamic radicts taking control and provoking a rise in the prices of oil?
In short, the qualities that make foxes more inclined to accuracy also make them less popular.
At this point, uncharitable skeptics chuckle that we have the media that we deserve.
But this is not fair.
No society has yet created a reliable method for evaluating the results of experts.
Even those citizens who value accuracy have little way of knowing they are sacrificing it when they change the channel to switch from boring foxes to charismatic hedgehogs.
It is there that between stage a modest proposal which applies to all the democracies: the market of ideas works better if it is easier for citizens to see the exchanges between accuracy and entertainment, or between the accuracy and loyalty to a party.
Don't they read more the reports of experts who have most often been right?
In this case, the experts could become more reliable showing more humility, and the political debate begin to be less strident.
Agreed, it is not easy to create ways to assess who was right and that would cover the full spectrum of reasonable opinions.
But in a world where, as Yeats said, "the worst are filled with passionate intensity and the best have a lack of conviction," it is worth trying.
What is Europe's future?
In many ways, 2005 represents the annus horibilis of Europe.
It started well, with the approval of the proposed constitutional treaty by the Spanish voters, but it turned to vinegar when the French and Dutch voters rejected it shortly after.
These votes reflected in part the displeasure of voters to the domestic policies as well as their disappointment regarding the governmental conduct of European affairs.
Governments are then hurriedly sent to offer more of these unsatisfactory cases.
In the days after those elections, they failed to agree on the European Union's budget for the period from 2007 to 2013.
The French and British leaders have engaged in a dispute that has wrecked the following summit, just before Britain takes the presidency in July.
Generally, the countries involved are using the European Union presidency to show their ability to solve problems and move the European Union forward.
But, since early December, Britain slumbers.
Besides burying the proposed constitutional treaty, it largely abandoned the issue of the budget.
There is very unlikely that she will succeed in getting the budget this year, and, unless the dispute is quickly resolved, the European Union will have no operating budget for 2007.
Even if the budget is finally adopted, the Austrian presidency, which begins on January 1st, will not be lacking for depressing situations.
The biggest problem remains the European inability to accelerate its growth pace and to offer jobs to its citizens.
This is mainly due to the big three, France, Germany and Italy, who produces 70% of European GDP.
The collective response, adopted in 2000, was the "Lisbon strategy," which aims to make the European Union "the most dynamic economy and the most competitive in terms of knowledge in the world" in 2010.
More realistically, it is designed to offer governments the necessary incentives to establish reforms to deal with everything that is slowing down economic growth and productivity.
That means facing a myriad of interest groups, from industrial lobbies to unions and entrenched bureaucracies that have, (so far) managed to protect their area.
The strategy is based on peer pressure and consists of pointing out governments who are not making progress in order to shame them.
In fact, however, peer pressure has turned into collusion of peers.
When European Union leaders met in the spring to assess their progress, they sadly admitted that the objectives of the Lisbon strategy had little chance to be achieved.
They could, at best, now, stop pretending to cling to this strategy and continue their progress in other areas.
Unfortunately, José Manuel Barroso, who presided over the summit in 2000, when he was prime minister of Portugal and the active chairman of the European Commission, had put his presidency at stake with the Lisbon strategy.
We should expect to see him defend her desperately.
One of the few good ideas of the Lisbon strategy was to remove the customs barriers for the exchange of services.
Competition in services in Europe is restricted by innumerable national regulations which, for example, strictly regulate professions, such as hairdressing and plumbing.
One of the key features of recent decades has been the significant increase in productivity in the services field in the U.S., but this has absolutely not happened in Europe.
Guess why.
Because the services account for 70% of the european GDP and the potential impact of increased competition is important.
However, it is always difficult, politically, to remove the protections.
The European Commission has made a proposal in 2005, even as the Constitution was subject to voting.
It is hardly surprising that this proposal was quickly abandoned.
Today, since a large number of private interest groups are trying to dilute it until removing all its meaning, this battle is assuredly registered on the agenda of the European Union for 2006.
Europe also blocks progress of the Doha cycle in international trade negotiations, due to the farming lobby that fights to preserve its subsidies.
Many are the governments which fear their farmers to the point of not having any other choice but to not give in, whatever the circumstances.
Europe has accepted the idea of a trade policy.
When the disagreements are as profound as they are in the case of agriculture, there is no latitude for conducting successful negotiations.
There is little reason to remain optimistic.
And what will the future be for ECB, which had to adjust its key interest rates by 0.25% after 30 months of waiting.
Experts may not agree on the relevance of this decision, but no one agrees with the many political leaders who argue that this small increase will derail the slight recovery in economic growth.
The acidity of political attacks against the ECB could trigger dangerous debates on the restriction of its independence.
Even if it is out of the question that this will happen, because it would necessitate amending the Treaty, all this brouhaha is not healthy.
It diverts the ECB from its objectives and inflates the notion that Europe is a bad thing, and, above all, that will be used as a scapegoat by failing governments to explain away their failures.
We can expect other anti-bce reactions.
Is Europe in a rut?
The current team of leaders has been a great disappointment.
We nevertheless have a chance to see the light at the end of the tunnel with their gradual replacement.
In Germany, Chancellor Angela Merkel, seems more positive on the issue of Europe and more focused on reforms than her predecessor, but her hands are tied by the grand coalition that supports her.
In France, President Jacques Chirac, image by excellence of the leader hostage to its pressure groups, swaying in a helpless way towards the end of his mandate, expected in 2007.
The two frontrunners to replace him, Dominique de Villepin and Nicolas Sarkozy, both members of the government, are clashing as to their agendas for reform, but the years before an election do not encourage radical changes.
Italy, will have to decide if it wants to replace Prime Minister Silvio Berlusconi, who shows no interest for reforms and European affairs, by Romano Prodi, a cautious man and former European Commission president.
Tony Blair, once a staunch defender of Europe (at least according to the low standards of Britain), may well have to give the power to Gordon Brown, who is known for its lack of warmth towards European integration.
Fortunately, Britain has always been an outsider.
Finally, whatever the light at the end of the tunnel, it may not shine before 2007, after the elections in France.
Tame politicians on both sides of the Atlantic
Despite the occasional murmuring of politicians, no one seriously doubts the independence of the European Central Bank, nor the fact that monetary policy in the eurozone is therefore well protected against political pressures.
But the recent death of the Stability and Growth Pact, killed by Germany, its father, with France playing the role of co-conspirator and complacent accomplice, reminds us of a much-needed lesson: elected politicians find it difficult, if not impossible, to give up their immense power in the area of fiscal policy.
This situation applies on both sides of the Atlantic.
The  American Federal Reserve is obviously very independent.
But any attempt aimed at limiting the American federal government's fiscal discretion in the way the Stability Pact does (as, for example, the notorious Gramm-Rudman Act of the Clinton era) always collapses in the end under pressure from the President and the Congress.
In the years of election, monetary policy can be used to stimulate, if not more, an economy, just as tax policy, and therein lies the objective of politicians.
But the ill-considered use of one of these two mechanisms to achieve short-term objectives could create long-term costs, justifying some restrictions imposed on the latitude politicians have in influencing  macroeconomic policies.
When politicians can control inflation with a decisive influence on the central banks, they can use their power to devalue the burden of public debt, thus avoiding the need for extra tax to repay that debt.
This was the great lesson of the 1970s and early 1980s, when runaway inflation forced politicians to give up this power for the benefit of independent central banks, who alone could convince the markets that price stability would be restored.
The monetary policy, however, is not a unique mode of economic policy making.
The aspects of fiscal policy could also be delegated to independent bureaucrats in order to keep politicians on the ranks.
Why not, for example, give an independent bureaucracy a few redistribution goals or control over the level of public investment and the management of deficits?
An independent tax authority could doubtless apply the long-term goals of a society in these areas better than politicians, who have their eyes fixed on the next elections.
Indeed, in principle, it is impossible to understand why the monetary and fiscal policy should be considered so different, one being fully delegated to an agency bureaucrat and the other being completely unregulated, left in the hands of politicians.
So why does this vast difference really exist, as much in America as in Europe?
Because the tax policy is the major tool used by politicians to attract and retain the support of a coalition to win voters made up of pensioners, officials and middle class property owners, while imposing costs on the losing coalition.
It is not necessary to satisfy 100% of the voters, but just a sufficient number to win the victory.
The map of tax plays a critical role in the choice of groups of voters to buy.
The independent tax authorities (or tax rules such as the stability pact) hinder this political use of fiscal policy, which is expensive.
After all, if politicians cannot win elections by taking money from some voters (including future generations, which must bear some of the cost) to give it to others, they must work much harder to show some ability to produce public benefits for all.
It is a much more difficult task!
Of course, the policy also includes the effects of redistribution.
Think of the various effects of interest rates on debtors versus creditors.
The monetary policy is however a much more awkward, indirect and imprecise way of choosing fiscal policy winners and losers .
Independent central banks can sometimes be a nuisance for politicians, but at least, they can be used as scapegoats when necessary, a role whose political benefits outweigh the costs of the loss of control over a useful tool.
These considerations should guide the choice of the system to replace the stability pact in Europe.
It is now quite clear that national governments, particularly those of major countries, will never accept significant limits on their fiscal discretion.
They may have suspended their freedom of maneuver tax long enough to allow the launch of the Euro, but in normal conditions, national governments will reclaim their land tax.
The European Commission must stop fighting a rearguard battle which only serves to undermine its credibility, especially in the eyes of the small nations, which are the only ones on which it is possible to exert pressure so that they will accept unwanted tax regulations.
Realistically, the commission can only make requests to national governments to ensure that their tax accounts are transparent and clear.
It is impossible to prevent the political use of tax policy.
But at least the fiscal measures of a country should not be hidden in obscure footnotes at the bottom of the page in their budgets.
Even this limited target can be hard to achieve.
A lack of strategic openness is in the interests of astute politicians who want to settle a lobby group while covering the costs of public largesse to the majority of citizens.
The rules which govern the behavior of politicians should not be written as if unbiased and well-intentioned civil servants were going to be applying them.
Politicians are ready to go to a lot of trouble to satisfy their supporters and win the elections.
We can at best hope to ensure that the worst acts they commit are done openly.
Will the European Union uphold its promises to Turkey?
More than 40 years ago, Turkey has applied to become an associate member of the European Economic Community.
The association agreement in 1963 has created a special relationship, crowned by the customs union in 1996.
For all these years, European governments have been reaffirming that Turkey could become a member state, provided it abides by the membership criteria.
The formal recognition of its candidacy in 1999 urged Turkey to undertake an unprecedented package of reforms in the area of human rights and the rights of minorities, notably the abolition of capital punishment, the adoption of guarantees against torture, the promotion of religious freedom and equality between the sexes and the restriction of the role of the Army in political life.
If the European Union considers that the membership criteria have been met, it must start negotiations at the beginning of 2005.
The EU would otherwise be breaking its political commitments and would seriously undermine it's credibility in the world.
However, all over Europe this accession is viewed with skepticism, because of the size of Turkey and because of its economic situation, because of a fear of massive immigration and above all because of "cultural and social differences," a euphemism referring to Islam.
We cannot deny that some of these factors are huge challenges.
But they are often exaggerated and certainly not insurmountable.
The negotiations with Turkey would be long and membership might not happen before 2015.
This time would allow Turkey as well as the Union to prepare.
With 80 million inhabitants, Turkey would become one of the largest member states of the European Union.
But the role of a country's size is limited in the decision-making process of the EU, where political influence depends more on economic power.
In addition, Turkey has for several decades been a responsible member of many European institutions, and there is no reason to think it would behave differently in the Union.
Because of the weakness of its economy, Turkey could lay claim to significant amounts of aid.
But these transfers would depend on the EU monetary policy at the time of membership, the outcome of negotiations and development of the Turkish economic situation.
In any case, putting a "ceiling" on the budget as practiced by the EU would avoid an explosion of the financial cost of Turkey's accession.
Immigration should not cause either pointless concern.
Human mobility is limited, and Turkish workers would probably not have the right to move freely within the European Union until after a long period of transition, perhaps not before 2025.
Given the strong growth expected in the Turkish economy and the decrease in birth rates, experts estimate there would then be around 2.7 million immigrants.
Meanwhile, shrinking and aging population in the bulk of Europe have made immigration a necessity.
But among the most probable countries of origin  of the migrants, Turkey offers the best chances of successful adaptation.
It is the Muslim population of Turkey who raises the most feelings.
Many have the feeling that Turkey has no place in a European company based on a culture and Christian traditions.
It also feared that Islamists make a fundamentalist state out of Turkey someday.
As improbable as it may seem, since secularism is strongly rooted in Turkey, this risk cannot be totally ruled out.
But it exists in any democracy, where extremist groups could divert the democratic process to achieve their aims.
The best way to avoid such a disaster is undoubtedly to strengthen the democratic system, and, in order to do that, to anchor Turkey firmly within a bloc of countries that are also democratic.
As to the European Union, it must decide whether it wants to be a "Christian club" closed, or on the contrary an open society, strengthened and enriched by its cultural and religious diversity.
Turkey's accession would make a strong response, with particular resonance in the Muslim world.
The need to challenge the arguments against Turkey's accession means that its benefits are rarely mentioned: a unique geopolitical location at the crossroads of the Balkans, South Caucasus, Central Asia and Middle East -regions of vital importance for the security of Europe-; a major transit country for energy supplies; military capacity at a time when the EU is developing its new European defence policy; and a strong economic potential, with a young and dynamic workforce.
At the same time, one must take into account the risk of rejecting Turkey: the probability of the failure of the reform process, which would encourage the extremist movements and cause instability and political turmoil at the gates of the EU.
Turkey's entry into the European Union opens up broad prospects and  also comes with challenges to overcome.
But the prospects are far superior.
The game of the democracy.
In Calcutta, where a younger boy went and insisted on participating in the game that my friends were playing, we let him come, but only after whispered in the ear of the other words
When we were children, it was important to master the cruel art of
The technique of the
That which applies to children and adults also applies to international institutions.
Indeed, the organizations which have officially committed to involving all of the nations in their decision making are often controlled by small groups of powerful nations, while others will only make a semblance of participation.
The World Trade Organization (WTO), supposedly founded on the principle of one country one vote, in reality has its agenda programmed in the wings by a small group of nations.
It is now common for international organizations which publish a report implicate all "stakeholders" and reflect their views.
The evolutive report is generally presented on a website and all without exception (NGOs, unions and other civil society organisations) are invited to make suggestions.
This step promotes a sense of participation, but, as a friend who is well-versed in these matters taught me, the secret is to finally ignore all the comments received and write the report as if there were no website and as if no participation had been noted.
Increasingly, free expression of opinion does not influence or control the government's behaviour.
Consider the U.S.
The Americans have expressed their opinion freely, in the newspapers, on television, in discussion forums on the Internet, about the Iraq war planned by George Bush.
Never before had there been so much opposition to a war
What happened, or rather what didn't happen, is admirable: almost no effort was undertaken to muzzle the government critics, as was the case in China and in several dictatorial countries.
But the major democracies of the world, the United States, India, the UK, etc., are becoming more and more adept at banning freely expressed opinions aimed at restricting government actions.
The war taking place in Iraq is probably the best evidence.
Let's leave aside the immorality of war, and God knows how immoral it is ! I want to draw attention on this growing ability and on the trend of democracies to "treat" with (to neutralize) public opinion.
They have adopted the strategy of
When the democracies ripen, they become more than ever expert in the management of the opinion, and in most cases in shaping public opinion.
After every comment Hans Blix made about the UN inspections he ran in Iraq, members of the Bush administration paraphrased what Blix was saying.
This paraphrase subtly modified Blix's comments in order to support America's arguments in favour of war.
By repeating the distorted comments, the Bush administration hoped that public opinion would be swayed toward the war.
It can be difficult to overturn a totalitarian regime and hold elections, but the hardest job is to turn the votes of voters into a real democracy.
For those accustomed to living in a totalitarian state, it is not easy to learn the meaning of the word "participation".
Hence the popular belief that democracies, like wine, improve with age.
Although that may be true, maturity has its own inconveniences.
While the citizens of a democracy are continually learn to participate, democratic governments learn constantly to reach their goals despite the participation.
There is no use in denying that civic participation too often serves only to legitimize shams.
We must recognize and address this problem in order to prevent the atrophy of established democracies  and to help new democracies to become more efficient.
Because it is not only morally wrong to allow nations and communities feel marginalized and without a voice; it is the best way to frustration, rage and terrorism.
The redistribution of governance in Asia
The government (the way decisions that affect public interest are taken) became a key factor in determining the pace of development of a country. A successful governance leads to solved changes.
Failures are punished by malaise, discontent and stagnation.
On April 18th a conference will be held in Bangkok to discuss the prospects for improving governance in Asia.
Today's Asian policymakers have to confront a very different environment from that of their predecessors fifty years earlier.
The Asiatic population has more than doubled since 1950, mainly in the poorest countries.
The political system in these countries was adapted for small, stable and rural populations.
Today, these societies (or companies) must administer extended  urban centers as well as talents and multiple requests from the urban populations.
The world economy has also changed dramatically.
The increase the flow of goods, capital and expertise in the world means that foreign organisations and individuals have greater influence, further complicating the task of national governments concerned by the internal management of their own nations.
Thus, the international institutions such as the WTO have changed the terms of reference from which economic decisions are taken.
The changes coming in local economies are equally radical.
In some parts of Asia, living standards have soared.
Region-specific foreign investments even external altered the structure of domestic economies.
The old models of economic growth, however, such as the encouragement of exports and the selective use of import restrictions, which have been producing good results in Eastern Asia in the last century, are less well adapted to the new international exchange laws.
So we have to create new rules of the game.
In most Asian countries, the official rules must be simplified and applied more fairly.
A "return to the sources" approach is essential in three related areas in which the national governments must take control: reducing corruption, strengthening property rights and the consistent application of legal principles.
Few countries can score points in these areas.
The close links between business and governments have been accused of being responsible for the financial crises that have hit Southeast Asia in 1997.
In some regions of South Asia, violent conflicts and the power of interests in place have jeopardized the legal principles.
The result of such failures is that the elites flourish while the masses suffer.
A clear structure of formal rules remains the best antidote to these failures because they reinforce the informal customs on which so many societies are based.
Business is not conducted in court but in the meetings where the confidence and reputation are essential elements.
As pointed out by Robert Putnam, the social theorist, "social capital" (the networks, standards and social trust which facilitate cooperation and coordination for the benefit of all) is as much a factor as a result of economic growth.
Giving power to as many members of the civil society as possible more surely tends to instill specific goals into the efforts deployed to help nations advance.
The government, the private sector and civil society all have a role in strengthening the social capital.
But some successful interactions between these sectors  cannot simply be desired without any input and it is essential for everyone's role to be clearly defined.
Many Asian governments recognize the need to redefine their role more clearly.
Following the crisis of 1997, governments have stepped back a little from the markets, recognizing the limits of their ability to act, and the importance of allowing private entrepreneurship to develop.
However, governments have a role to play in encouraging a supportive environment in which the markets can operate.
The regulation of control and application are two important but different ways of working (let's say through mixed partnerships between private and public sectors) that are increasingly used in many innovative Asian economies.
The valuable role of civil society in the expression of community opinion, that governments cannot attain, has also been recognised, but its relationship to the government and to the business world is more often characterized by conflict than cooperation.
The role of the private sector in the decision-making must also often be clearer: where companies are too influential in relation to governments, their needs to operate in a profitable manner can lead to policies promoting the elites rather than the masses.
The metaphor of the game (with its rules and its participants) leads some to think in terms of international competition.
It is not very good since our interdependent world is not a zero-sum game, where the gains of a nation represent the losses of another.
In fact, nations are not engaged in a competition between each other as is the case for companies.
Commercial trade is a positive sum game where all the countries benefit from the exploitation of their areas of comparable advantage.
A good governance can improve this positive sum game and ensure that businesses and individuals in these countries participate in profits.
It can be the right thing to consider governments as entities, competing with each other ( to offer a better service to their people than other governments).
Which confers an important role upon the international comparisons of systems
In this spirit, the conference of the UNCTAD-UNDP this month ("Governance in Asia: Underpinning Competitiveness in a Global Economy"), will bring together policymakers across Asia to discuss challenges facing the Asian governments.
The role of government (the only player to have the legitimacy of a popular mandate) is fundamentally important in the direction of a nation going forward.
The private sector and civil society are, of course, more and more often important partners for governments.
The operation of the relations between these participants will influence deeply the future of the development in Asia.
The 18 Brumaire of Arnold Schwarzenegger
Replacing a governor that they had reelected scarcely a year earlier with Arnold Schwarzenegger should have brought Californian voters a great pleasure, though tinged with guilt.
Some members of the opposition in Germany would love to do the same with Chancellor Gerhard Schröder, although they have not (yet!
) found the movie star to replace him.
Several other European governments have also experienced a certain lack of popularity shortly after their election.
This situation is also true in non-European countries, as with, for example, the recently acclaimed Brazilian President Luis Inacio "Lula" da Silva, not to mention South Korean President Roh Moo-hyun, the latter having called for a referendum to halt the decline in his popularity.
It seems that today, the effects of electoral success quickly subside.
Should each country therefore adopt a recall procedure to preserve the legitimacy of governments?
Absolutely not.
Democracy, to borrow the terms of the philosopher Karl Popper, is defined by the ability to remove those in power without violence; it is then, according to this definition, a method of trial and error.
But the leaders must have the chance to govern.
Indeed, they must have a chance to make mistakes, so long as their decisions do not affect the very foundations of the democratic order.
The method by trials and errors entails the possibility of being wrong before trying again.
The first error of California voters involves "the lure of immediacy," which is hardly surprising in a state where instant gratification is considered a value in itself.
But this desire sometimes seems damning in post-modern democracies throughout the world.
Indeed, democracy today has adopted a pop culture of fads which disappear as quickly as they appeared; today's pop group with its hysterical fans will be forgotten tomorrow and there are many others waiting in the wings.
In politics, this situation can prove to be dangerous because it encourages quick decisions, whatever their importance, according to the popular opinion that prevails at the time.
The call to an increasing number of referendums reflects and enlivens this trend.
Referendums are, for the most part, snapshots.
Switzerland, with its usually slower pace and its in-depth political debates before the elections, is probably the only exception to this rule.
In general, the referendums are used to measure the popularity of political leaders at a given time, whatever the problem at stake.
If and when Britain decides upon the adoption of the Euro, it is more likely that the outcome of this vote will teach us all sorts of things about Tony Blair and the European Union, but very little about the merits of the common currency.
Thus, the arguments in favour of a representative government remain not negligible.
Democracy is governing by organizing debates, making important decisions after in-depth deliberations which, at least in the major countries, must be conducted in a parliament by elected representatives.
Parliaments sometimes act quickly, and perhaps they are obliged to do so, but in general, they take enough time to examine issues in detail.
The parliaments speak before forming conclusions, hence their name.
Let's take the case of Germany, a country in which some leaders of the opposition Christian Democrats group burn with the desire to reduce the Schröder government to nothing.
Evidently, the proposed reforms that have already been enacted by the government are unpopular and there is little doubt that a year after its re-election, the coalition of Social Democrats and Greens has very little chance to convince at the ballot boxes.
But who can know what voters will think in three years, when the government's term ends?
In the next election, voters, with hindsight, could realize that there was no real alternative to the policies of Schroeder and it could even be that the beneficial effects expected from these painful reforms become apparent before then.
The leaders need time to make and enforce unpopular as popular decisions.
They need courage to lead often precarious parliamentary majorities on the road to popularity which has its ups and downs.
This is why they are forced to take the most painful measures during the first year of their term, only to tone things down when the next election approaches.
The precarious partnership of Prime Minister Tony Blair and Finance Minister Gordon Brown illustrates this kind of tactics perfectly.
Leaders who never risk their popularity are not worthy of their position.
California has thus shown a bad example and Californians will probably pay a high price for their mistake.
It will however probably not be as high as the one paid by France one century and a half ago, when Louis Napoleon, elected by universal suffrage, became, through a excessively popular referendum, Napoleon III, this vote being the last one in France until the end of the Second Empire.
The Californians, of course, will not be denied the right to vote, but their obstinacy may generate an unpredictable and irresponsible form of state policymaking.
It is certain that democracy means a limited period of time during which the world's powers must be able to exercise their power unchallenged.
For a democracy to be efficacious, it must allow enough time for its  elected representatives to take office, to legislate and to implement their program.
These two imperatives are by nature contradictory, but a representative parliamentary democracy is still the best way to ensure balance between the two.
Any other regime would be as stable as the ten best pop songs this week.
Herbert Hoover and the stability pact
In mid-July, the high and mighty finance ministers of the member states of the European Monetary Union (EMU) met to discuss the economic situation in the Eurozone.
They have ruminated about the most recent economic forecasts, which project an annual growth of GDP in the Eurozone this year at the woefully anemic level of 0.7%.
Then, except for a single minister, they all decided that their economy should suffer a little from this scandal or even worse.
They have reaffirmed their commitment to the Growth and Stability Pact, which requires the Eurozone countries to raise taxes and lower public spending, increasing the pressure on their economies.
The pact is already pushing Germany into recession, the Italian government is struggling to revise its growth forecasts quickly enough not to be overtaken by a failing index of production.
Yet, this does not seem like enough to force officials to review their priorities.
Some European finance ministers still consider the stability pact as the "cornerstone" of the EMU.
Others speak of the importance of obeying the "rule of the game".
Others believe that recovery must be done "in the spirit of the pact," even if it remains essential to restore economic growth.
Seen from the other side of the Atlantic, all these reasons seem very strange.
The last time that the American government tried to ensure a balanced budget despite the recession was 70 years ago, under Herbert Hoover's presidency at the beginning of the Great Depression.
Since a broad consensus is established in the United States on the cycles of economic depression which require the use of the budget deficits to relieve the sufferings, to stimulate the general request and to precipitate the recovery.
Economists call these cyclical tax surges, "automatic stabilisers."
When household incomes fall, so does the income of the public sector.
Income tax reductions can increase disposable income.
But, principally, when household incomes are falling, the social costs of the government are increasing, triggering the recovery of demand, production, investment and employment.
The lower income taxes and higher costs, expand the budget deficit, but in a healthy and effective way.
On the american side of the Atlantic, the usefulness of these fiscal stabilizers is not in doubt.
Instead, with every recession threat, the political debate revolves around their strengthening by impetus
No more than it is a matter of fiscal discipline.
Every time that proposals to amend the Constitution in order to balance the budget have surfaced, the proposals have always offered exceptions not only in case of war but also in case of recession.
We understand the origins of the stability pact and growth.
Northern European countries, particularly Germany and Holland, are always keen to maintain a loose relationship between their debt and GDP and relatively low interest rates.
When these countries have noticed that the southern European countries, Italy and Greece especially, used to had a high ratio between their debt and their GDP and high enough nominal interest rates due to their visible tolerance against inflation.
The countries of Northern Europe feared that the deficits of the South might finally create a pressure for partial monetarization of their debt through inflation of the Euro; or more precisely, their leaders feared that investors who were fearful for the same reasons would demand higher interest rates.
The growth and stability pact was intended to maintain the debt of southern European countries at low levels, and now interest rates (are) low enough to reassure investors about the fact that national debt would never be allowed to rise to the point of generating inflationary pressure.
However, if one examines the economic problems of the Euro zone today, the threat of nominally elevated interest rates over the long term is certainly not part of the ten major concerns among investors.
At worst, investors do not fear that a high debt leads governments to slow inflation by printing banknotes.
The problems of the European Union are due to a stagnant production index, increased structural unemployment, a weak increase in productivity growth, a useless and unfair common agricultural policy and the forecast of structural adjustments in view of the expansion of the European Union itself.
In a certain point of view, it is right that the euro zone finance ministers are ready to maintain a lower national debt on the long-term: this is a sign that the victories over inflation won in the 1970s will purely and simply not be ignored.
But it is dangerous to be obsessed by the past.
There is no safer way to economic disaster than historial blindness.
As demonstrated by Herbert Hoover, when one only considers the economic problems of the previous generation, one risks not seeing the dangers that are right before our eyes.
The ghosts of our economy past
In the famous novel, "A Christmas Carol," by Charles Dickens,  Ebeneezer Scrooge, a businessman without a soul, was harassed by the spirit of Christmas past.
Today, economists are similarly disturbed by undesirable ghost when they think about the resurgence of economic woes that were believed dead and buried a long time.
Whether it's Stephen Roach of Morgan Stanley or Paul Krugman of Princeton, the Board of Governors of the American Federal Reserve or whoever it might be in Japan, economists the world over are concerned about deflation.
Their concerns date back to the economic thinking of fifty years ago, when economists had discovered that the only thing to do against deflation was to avoid it like the plague!
In 1933, Irving Fisher -- Milton Friedman's predecessor as the head of the American monetary school -- announced that governments should prevent large depressions by avoiding deflation.
Deflation -- the steady and continuing deterioration of the prices -- urged the world of business and consumers to reduce their spending and hoarding their cash.
This reduces the ability of shops and banks to repay their debts and can trigger a number of enormous bankruptcies destroying confidence in the financial system, which then fuels fear and hoarding.
Such incentives for hoarding rather than for spending maintain demand at its lowest and still falling level, while unemployment develops and grows over such a long period of time that even politicians and economists who ardently argue against laissez-faire policies cannot accept it.
Thus, is that the solution: use the Keynesian monetary policies (lower interest rates) and tax (inflation of public spending and tax reduction) to keep the economy away from the Gulf which makes deflation possible.
But if this issue was settled more than 50 years ago, why does it come back to haunt us?
Why does this represent a threat that worries Japan so much today and should we be worried in the United States?
At the end of the 1940s, those who presided over the creation of a post-war international economic order tried to create an international monetary system which (a) permitted sufficient stabilization of exchange rates so that producers and consumers could avoid the dangers of excessive and irrational fluctuations in exchange rates, (b) allowed nations to establish their own macroeconomic policies and (c) anticipated catastrophic panics which affect not only banks and private individuals, but also entire nations and which caused the destructive international financial crisis called the Great Depression.
This results in the creation of the system Bretton-Wood, where the exchange rates are fixed and variable, which became over the years the floating system of the 1980's.
Then came the 90s.
Suddenly, the incredibly destructive financial crises reappeared following public panic in Mexico, Thailand, Korea, Brazil, etc., and resembled the American financial panic of 1873 or the Austrian Creditanstalt crisis in 1931.
The Argentine crisis at the end of the year 2001 bore a truly striking resemblance to the Argentine crisis of Baring Brothers, in 1890 – except for the fact that the politicians and international bankers seemed to have a much better idea of what had to be done to minimize the damage than they appear to have today.
So, if those who built the international monetary system of post-war worked to put in place safeguards to protect us from the dangers of international financial crisis created by the popular panics, why is this kind of crisis being reborn today?
The truth is that economic policies are juggling a whole series of possible disasters, tossing from one hand to another the one that seems to be the most threatening and the one that seems to be the most remote.
In the United States, the Bush administration remains skeptical about the ability of monetary policies to stimulate and wants to maintain large budget deficits to reduce unemployment, hoping that the future dangers posed by persistent deficits -- reduced investments, sluggish growth, loss of confidence, uncontrollable inflation and depreciation in exchange rates -- can be skillfully manipulated or will not become evident until after the Bush team's departure from the presidency.
In Europe, the European Central Bank believes that the danger of uncontrolled inflation, following a loss of public confidence in its commitment to low inflation, outweighs the costs of a still too high unemployment.
In developing countries, the control of capital in order to prevent financial crises is perceived as an obstacle to the attraction of the capital needed for industrialization, and as a potential source of corruption since the financial flow passes in one way or another through the hands of the nephew by marriage of the Deputy Minister of Finance.
Flexible exchange rates designed to allow markets to indicate the loss of confidence in the currency put exporters in a competitive and difficult situation compared to the producers of foreign countries whose prices are manipulated by unpredictable exchange rates.
Even the policies of import substitution, much criticized today, were originally adopted by developing countries for good (and bad) reasons: the protectionist closing of the markets in the developed countries during the Great Depression had disastrous consequences for the economies of the developing countries.
The ghosts of our past economy come back because the present lessons are still overwhelmed.
Politicians and people who decide show up their economic approach as "the one and only doctrine."
But what they do, in fact, is to manage the most important issues of the moment at the expense of the disappearance of institutions and policies put in place by their predecessors to control the problems that they received as the most urgent.
Ebenezer Scrooge's nocturnal visitors were able to convince him that he was wrong and to open his eyes to his mistakes.
Lets hope that today's economists will also learn from their undesirable ghosts.
In the shadow of the D-mark
Overcoming the Irish cocktail.
Justification for humanitarian intervention
I visited the former Soviet republics of Central Asia in 1998 to take part in talks on democratic development, which took place (or should have taken place) in these newly independent countries.
My hosts were former communist leaders who now assumed the role of more or less democratically elected presidents.
Each of them spoke without constraints of institutions, democratic procedures and respect for the law.
But human rights were a different matter entirely.
I have presented in each country a list of political prisoners, asking what was their fate.
In only one country, the president has immediately decided to release a man accused of organizing a coup.
But even this seeming success proved to be morally ambiguous.
The president had not taken a political decision: he had done a personal favour.
I had received a gift, in itself simply another demonstration of the arbitrary exercise of the strength of the president, and not proof of respect for moral principles.
In one country, I spoke with an Islamic fundamentalist opposition leader, who was launched into a long civil war against the government.
This man fancied himself president of the "National reconciliation committee."
Armed guards to the teeth circled him, although he strongly supported the concept of democracy.
Indeed, he regarded this idea as the most reliable way to power because the vast majority of people thought exactly like him.
He insinuated in a disturbing way that democracy would allow him to "eliminate" those who were opposed to his ideas. (He did not elaborate on the exact meaning of that term.)
In the democracies deprived of democrats, it is even more complicated to discuss human rights than procedural formalities, because these rights are not considered "rights" in the legal sense, but simply as fits of conscience or as gifts to exchange for another valuable asset.
This distinction is particularly important because it draws attention to the limited effectiveness of official legal standards as a means of promoting human rights.
The gap between human rights and the behavior of leaders has led to the greatest change ever in the conduct of international affairs in our time: the advent of "humanitarian intervention."
This change originally occurred outside the established international institutions and the UN system by taking root in a French group Doctors Without Borders who believed that human rights were a more important value than national sovereignty.
Doctors Without Borders has introduced the concept of the "right to intervention" in humanitarian disasters by circumventing the restrictions of classical international law.
Moreover, the international system quickly adopted (and transformed) this notion and several humanitarian interventions
The NATO intervention in Kosovo is a precedent that the American Secretary of State Colin Powell has used to justify the war with Iraq.
But, as convincing as the cause of a military humanitarian intervention may be, such actions must be taken under the auspices of the UN Charter.
After all, the promotion of human rights has been the guiding principle of the establishment of the UN.
His task in this area was declared in the Universal Declaration of Human Rights of 1948 and in the Helsinki accords in 1975, which gave human rights legal supremacy over the sovereignty of individual states.
However, an obvious contradiction exists between the universality and the supremacy of the human rights, as well as the principles of sovereignty and noninterference within the internal matters of the states; which also form the integral part of the documents of the UN.
One way of dealing with this inconsistency is to introduce a new chapter dedicated to human rights into the UN Charter and to reformulate Chapter 4, which concerns the use of force in international relations.
The principle of sovereignty must also be redefined itself.
The world needs a system for granting legal agreements (bilateral and multilateral agreements, institutions of appropriate control and surveillance) to regulate the use of force for humanitarian reasons.
The legal restrictions on humanitarian intervention are necessary because dictators use it too often to justify a criminal assault.
Adolf Hitler drew up its strategy when he dismantled Czechoslovakia, supposedly to defend the Sudeten Germans, and later when he invaded my homeland, Poland.
As Milosevic demonstrated in the 1990s, when he claimed to defend the innocent Serbs in Croatia and Bosnia, justifying military intervention based solely on moral principles leaves too much free rein to distort these principles and abuse.
This is why the debates on the reform of the Security Council should focus not on the modification of its composition, but on its mission.
The council must be explicitly accountable for the "security of mankind" and protection, in addition to its current role of safeguarding of more traditional notions of international security.
The principle of non-intervention in the domestic affairs of a nation has never been absolute and globalization is confronting this principle with a radical challenge.
The term "international relations" presupposes a Westphalian set of commitments among the sovereign nations, which has replaced the medieval communities defined by personal allegiance to a king.
But the Westphalian system is now in decline, so is the meaning of the state borders.
In this wider and uncertain context, the need to regulate military humanitarian intervention is threatening.
What wants America?
When leaders of the richest nations in the world gather in Evian, France, an unanswered question will dominate the front of the stage: what does America want in the world?
It may be useful at this point to highlight the principles and the ideas that underpin American foreign policy.
First, inconsistency is not a vice.
In effect, in foreign policy, inconsistency is often a virtue.
I speak not of principles, but of politics.
The United States do not show a "one size fit all" attitude towards the world.
What happened in Iraq should not be over-interpreted as a rigid model of American policy towards the countries that use weapons of mass destruction, which support terrorism or deny their citizens freedom.
In Iraq, the United States have used force in a last resort against a country with a heavy history of attacks, and after a strong international consensus has been developed on the actions Iraq should be taking.
Different policies, adapted to local, regional and international realities, will have to be implemented to address the challenges posed by North Korea, Iran, Syria, and many other countries.
The American military forces are an essential part of the bulk of actions taken by the United States internationally.
But the defence policy is only one of the components of foreign policy.
All the threats against the national interests of America cannot be solved by military force.
As the saying goes, for people who have nothing but a hammer, all problems come in the form of a nail.
The success in foreign policy, as in carpentry, must rely on the appropriate tools to the task.
The partnership with other countries plays a crucial role at this stage.
Despite all of America's power, there is not much the US can achieve in the world that it could not be more successful at with the active participation of others (governments, international organizations and non-governmental organizations).
The partnership facilitates the discovery of solutions to problems that are contrary to the national interest and of solutions involving sharing the burden.
America depends on partnerships in the global war against terrorism. Foreign governments provide intelligence and law enforcement; trading partners provide security for shipping containers; private financial institutions trace the transfer of funds which support the terrorist networks.
Beyond the partnerships, the international institutions are a valuable assistance, provided that they be streamlined, have realistic mandates and that their members are committed to common standards and goals.
These institutions can and often do advance US national interests.
Indeed, it would be difficult to achieve critical elements of American foreign policy (from trade to non-proliferation to policies on the environment) without these interests.
The World Trade Organization is a typical example of it.
It provides a forum for negotiating new free trade agreements, looks for remedies against protectionist and discriminatory policies and solves conflicts with trading partners.
But the US must also ensure that existing institutions are adapted to current realities.
NATO, for example, is evolving from a Cold War alliance focused solely on Europe to an organization adapted to meet current security challenges wherever they arise, as in Afghanistan and perhaps in Iraq.
Multilateralism is more successful when it is based on real convergence of interests and values.
The UN and other World structures can sometimes be best placed to deal with the US foreign policy goals.
When the UN and other organisations have been reluctant or fail to rise against sinister threats, America reserves the right to act in less all-embracing alliances and flexible coalitions
This flexibility is an asset of primary importance because of the nature of the challenges that lie ahead.
We ignore the states who go to the dogs at our peril because anarchy creates an environment conducive to extremist ideologies and can even offer a haven for terrorists, criminals and drug traffickers.
One of our most pressing tasks at the moment is to avoid the implosion of weak States.
Another focuses on assisting those countries that have descended in violence to help them to recover slowly.
One of the impetus for the international commitment of America (and one of the main sources of its global power) is its willingness to make the world better.
Any American foreign policy must involve interests and values for the American public always insists that the American national targets be linked to the national ideals.
The attraction of American leadership abroad is partly based on the attractiveness of political institutions, society and culture in America, and its enthusiasm to defend human rights and democracy.
At the same time, our efforts aiming to promote the democracy in the entire world serve the American interests thanks to the recognition objectifies on account of the fact that the democracies regulate their disagreements peacefully.
The world today does not show any irreconcilable conflict between the main concentrations of the global power: Europe, Russia, China, Japan and the United States.
This line of interest and agreement on the rules of international order offers a promising basis for the management of the common challenges we all face.
Our first objective must be to create a world in which governments, organizations and people will accept arrangements that will enable them to achieve their shared interests and that will reflect universal fundamental values.
We all have an interest in living in a world in which force is only used as a last resort, where terrorism is considered unacceptable, weapons of mass destruction do not proliferate and are not used, free trade becomes the norm, people enjoy fundamental freedoms, Democratic values triumph and the law replaces firearms.
Create a world as integrated may sound optimistic, even idealistic, but rarely naive.
The road to the double helix, the structure of DNA.
Fifty years earlier, on 25 April 1953, James Watson and Francis Crick published a short letter in the scientific journal
The second major advance took place a few months later, when Max Perutz discovered a technique aimed toward determining the structures of large molecules like myoglobin and hemoglobin.
Since then, structural analysis by radiographic protein molecules has enabled us to understand the chemistry of biological reactions.
Both discoveries (the structures of DNA and proteins) were discovered in the Cavendish laboratory of the University of Cambridge.
So why these two memorial stones of the revolution of biology and medicine that have dominated science in the second half of the 20
The major breakthroughs in 1953, were based on experimental physics such as it has been practiced at Cambridge since the end of the 19th century.
That legacy has shaped the intellectual environment in which was formed the father-son team composed of William and Lawrence Bragg and in which Lawrence Bragg, first as a student then as a student researcher, developed in 1912 the ideas that lead to structural analysis by radiography.
Although Max von Laue, Walter Friedrich and Paul Knipping have discovered the diffraction of X-rays by crystals, it was Lawrence Bragg who discovered a way to exploit scientifically this discovery.
Reflection by "Bragg planes," the sheets of atoms capable of diffracting X-rays in specific ways based on the separation between the sheets, led Bragg to calculate the exact arrangement of sodium and chloride atoms in a grain of salt.
William Bragg earned a degree in mathematics at Cambridge in 1884 and became a professor of physics at Adelaide in Australia.
In 1909, he returned to England to occupy a chair in Leeds, while continuing his work on the nature of X-rays.
He became the director of the Royal Institution in London in 1923, where he drew the attention of some exceptional young scientists, interested in X-rays.
Among them were two new graduates in Cambridge, William Astbury and John Desmond Bernal, who became interested in the problem of the protein structure, Astbury following a request to Bragg, provided X-ray patterns of wool and silk.
Bernal came back to Cambridge as a structural crystallography professor in 1927 and was promoted as assistant director of research in crystallography in 1923, at this time a sub-department of Cavendish Laboratory.
Bernal was interested first in the atomic structure of cristals, metals and minerals, then in hormones and sterols, and certain amino acids, the components of protein.
Meanwhile, Astbury 'set up in Leeds in 1928, where he also began to work on the amino acids and proteins.
While describing his fruitless attempts to obtain well-ordered patterns of radiographic diffraction from the crystals of the pepsin protein, he wondered if Bernal could help him get crystals of other proteins.
A friend of Bernal, Glenn Millikan, came to visit a laboratory in Uppsala, Sweden, where researchers had managed to obtain large crystals of pepsin, some of which were recorded to be always in their mother liquor, Cambridge.
Bernal and Dorothy Crowfoot (Hodgkin after her marriage) obtained patterns of dry crystals, just as Astbury did, with equally disappointing results.
But when Bernal observed the crystals under a light microscope, he noted that when the significant amount of water contained in the crystal network evaporated, the crystal's order disrupted because of it.
They repeated the experience with X-rays, but with the crystal surrounded by its mother liquor and sealed in a glass capillary, in this way obtaining patterns including several crystal reflections.
The results of the first defining moment in protein crystallography were published in the form of a letter in the magazine
Max Perutz, having gotten a degree in chemistry in Vienna, joined Cambridge in 1935 to work as a graduate student with Bernal.
The following year, he received excellent haemoglobin crystals and soon produced the best standards of X-ray diffraction to date.
But the observable diagram of diffraction (intensities and positions of the individual reflexions) represents only half of the necessary data to deduce the structure of object of diffraction.
In terms of mathematics, this plan gives the magnitude, but not the stages (i.e., the stages of a oscillatory movement) without which it is impossible to determine the atomic positions.
With more simple structures composed of a lower number of atoms, chemistry, could provide important information about atomic tendencies and a solution could be found by trial and error.
But the proteins, which contain thousands of atoms, were far too complicated for this solution to work.
Thus, in spite of the impressive quantity of excellent data collected, the solution remained cruelly out of reach.
But the faith in obtaining detailed information on the protein structure from X-ray patterns remained, but only if these data could be discovered.
It was to be expected that where chemistry had failed, physics and their first laboratory showed the way, a way taken by Watson and Crick in the epic breakthrough that we celebrate this month.
Separate worlds
Macroeconomic policies,financial globalisation and changes in labour market institutions have exacerbated inequalities in recent years. These include not only levels of income and wealth, but also access to education, health, welfare as well as political participation and influence.
Even in the countries with a fast economic growth, a set of factors, exacerbated by demographic changes, has led to the transmission of gaps in knowledge, social responsibilities and opportunities from a generation to another.
A shown by the United Nations with the 2005 Report on the social situation in the world: the inequality crisis, few countries, rich or poor, have proved immune to the global rise in inequality or its impact on education, health and social well-being.
There is of course no relationship of simple cause and effect that links poverty and the inequality in violence.
But inequalities and a sense of deprivation contribute to resentment and social instability, and threaten security.
Excluded and having only somber future prospects, the young, in particular, often experience a certain anomie and take refuge in anti-social, and even violent, behavior.
Not more than a simple explanation about the causes of poverty exists.
It is clear, however, that poverty stems from different and complex conditions, and that improvement requires a multifaceted approach.
It is difficult to imagine how to, for example, "send poverty to the dustbin of history" (Make Poverty History) without generating enough work, educational opportunities and health for all.
It is certain that the world has witnessed some progress in several areas in recent decades.
Access to education for girls has improved and some differences due to the gap between the sexes have been reduced.
In spite of AIDS and the resurgence of malaria and tuberculosis, life expectancy has increased almost everywhere in the world thanks to the improvement of public health systems.
Overall, however, the gap of inequalities remains wide and in some cases it is even expanding.
The most important determinant of income inequality today is the inequality of wealth, with the increased concentration of ownership of assets in recent years as primary cause greater inequality of income in most countries.
While galloping unemployment, the qualifications gap and decreasing productivity, along with the "dé-formalization" and "dé-méthodology" that have impacted the job markets have exacerbated the inequality of incomes throughout the world, the number of "working poor" and the "growth in the number of unemployed" have increased.
Not more than the stabilization and structural adjustment programs, imposed since the 1980s, have really fulfilled their promises of higher economic growth.
Growth almost everywhere in the world over the past twenty-five years has been weaker than in the preceding 25 years, despite massive growth of East Asia, India and some other countries.
Such differences in growth suggests that worldwide inequalities on the whole may not have increased unequivocally.
But the inequalities nationally has escalated in most countries in the past years, largely because of economic liberalization, both nationally and internationally.
Indeed, in many parts of the world, this kind of economic reform has in fact undermined growth rates as well as the initiating role of governments, while increasing overall inequality in other respects.
The rare exceptions are usually due to the measured or persistent interventions of certain governments.
But these are exceptions: the cumulative impact of these reforms over the past 25 years has produced a greater inequality in most developed and developing countries with rising unemployment, greater income disparities, reduction of social protection and environmental degradation.
The liberalisation of the international financial sector, for example, has undermined the use of development grants that are more inclusive and better targeted to promote economic activities.
Furthermore, contrary to the promises of its supporters, financial liberalization has in fact resulted in net capital movements from those who had the least to those who had the most in the long term, while increasing financial volatility and weakening economic activity.
Meanwhile, negotiations on the liberalization of trade appeared to ignore the historical trends.
The conditions of international trade in developing countries have gone worse: the price of commodities have declined compared to the manufactured products, just as the price of tropical agricultural products compared with prices of agricultural products from tempered countries, and the prices of generic products fell as a result of a production protected by laws on intellectual property.
Consequently, the trade liberalisation of manufactured products led to shrinking industry and a strong increase in unemployment in most parts of the world as in the case of textiles this past year.
And, while the liberalisation of agricultural trade could improve the export income of some poor countries, the main beneficiaries will be none other than the richest agricultural exporters.
The countries which import the currently subsidized products will suffer.
"The disengagement from the State" which has occurred recently in a large part of the developed world has generally involved a reduced role for the State, particularly in its ability to initiate and support development as well as in its social interventions in the areas of public education, health, housing and public services.
The economic liberalisation put in place in many countries in the past 25 years was, from the beginning, a questionable policy and its consequences have become completely obvious.
If the world does not focus on finding the appropriate economic policies, that will address the negative impact of economic inequalities on reducing the growth and poverty, poor and privileged people will continue to live in separate worlds.
One should not follow the Federal Reserve
The Federal Reserve of the United States Etats-unis faces a dilemna, because it must continue to raise its rates despite an economy devastated by Hurricane Katrina.
The inability of the Reserve to raise rates sooner teaches the European Central Bank a lesson: after a prolonged period of monetary stability with unusually low interest rates, waiting too long to raise rates to more normal and appropriate levels can have dangerous consequences.
The reserve took its time starting the process of rate normalisation and it is now paying the price.
The ECB should not make the same mistake, even if we consider that these two central banks operate under different backgrounds and under constraints.
The warning signs of impending inflation abound in all of the Eurozone.
The growth in money supply is well above target levels for some time, indicating excessive liquidity.
Headline inflation in September, to 2.6%, is superior to the target of 2% of the ECB, as is the latest forecasts for inflation in 2006 (updated forecasts come in early December).
"The period of wage restraint may be coming to an end," we were warned by Otmar Issing, the head of the ECB, implying that soaring energy prices may have risen now along with the general price level (also called secondary effects).
In these circumstances, there is no good reason to wait any longer before raising interest rates.
The longer energy prices remain at today's high levels, the greater the likelihood that anticipation of inflation will rise and the side-effects will begin to materialize.
Further procrastination on the normalisation of leading interest rates from the ECB could well lead to a nasty bout of inflation.
It would be catastrophic for Europe and the economic recovery since the ECB would have no choice but to slam on the monetary brakes.
No one really wants this.
Better an increase on the base of 50 points now, thus allowing the economic recovery to continue in curbing inflation, than an increase three or four times higher than this figure later.
The old adage "better prevent than cure," particularly applies in the case of monetary policy.
If one judges by the outcome of last month's meeting of the ECB Council of Governors, this "prevention" appears close to a major step for the economy of the Eurozone.
Indeed, the pace of warnings of the ECB on the risks of inflation has accelerated in recent months, and what was a "to be vigilant" has become a "are very vigilant" in September, before turning into "accrued vigilance about the high risks to price stability" in October.
The Council of Governors risks finding itself short of adjectives and credibility, if it does not act soon.
The tone of the comments by ECB President Jean-Claude Trichet during the question and answer session of the press conference following the meeting in October was particularly aggressive.
Mr Trichet seemed to appeal to a preemptive approach when he said: "We must not let the side effects materialise."
For the first time, the ECB president was willing to admit that the governing council had discussed advantages and disadvantages of an increase in interest rates during its meeting.
However, current interest rates are described as "still up in the air" in October, which indicates that the ECB has not yet made the decision to take action.
It is certain that an unexpected slowdown in economic activity or a sharp increase in the value of the Euro could postpone the inevitable increase in interest rates.
What seems to have emerged clearly is that the ECB has used the press conference from October to warn the politicians, unions and the markets that its long period of inactivity on monetary policy is nearing its end.
The end process is underway.
Not everyone is thrilled with this news.
Politicians, including Jacques Chirac in France, Silvio Berlusconi in Italy and Ecofin (the finance ministers of the member states of the European Union), continue to call for fixed rates, and even always lower rates.
But it is easy for politicians to act irresponsibly when it comes to monetary policy.
They are not being singled out when prices go up, any more than they are supposed to put the genie of inflation back in the bottle.
By pushing constantly for a rate cut larger than what the ECB can offer, political authorities make the ECB the scapegoat for the mediocre economic performance in Europe.
Europe is going badly, they say, not because of their own failure to conduct the required structural reforms, but because the rates are too high.
At the same time, the ECB does not have to go as far as the Federal Reserve, which has raised its key interest rates with an increase of 25 basis points over the course of 12 consecutive meetings, with further increases predicted.
For the ECB, an increase of 50 basis points would suffice at this stage, and rates could then be put on hold for some time.
The Fed waited too long to start the process of normalisation, and,as a consequence, has been more aggressive in lowering rates in the downward phase of the cycle of interest rates, and thus, had to be more aggressive in raising them in the rising phase.
This is not the kind of volatile monetary policy Europe wants, nor is what it needs.
The West against the rest of the world?
The bombings in Madrid have brought the scourge of terrorism to the gates of Europe.
March 11, from now on, represents the European version of the American September 11.
However, America and Europe often seem not to see the world with the same view: Spain's answer to terrorist attacks, a threat that affects all democracies, was to elect a government promising to end the American-led policy in Iraq.
Should we then understand that Europe and the United States have considerably different visions?
The apparent division  on foreign policy is partly due to a misunderstanding about the nature of "Europe".
The European project represents the realistic answer to globalisation and its challenges.
It was launched to create "solidarity", to promote political stability and strengthen democracy and the social model of Europe.
Having achieved these goals, Europe now wishes to make a positive contribution to the developments of the world.
This is not nostalgia for a past glory.
An unprecedented solidarity is now spreading across Europe, manifesting itself for example in collective grief and expressions of compassion towards Spain; we must use this vast potential as a basis to create a sense of solidarity in the world.
The United States, also victims of a horrific attack, feel drawn to the world, without going to promote a similar pattern of cooperation.
In defending their values and their security, Americans strive rather to  defend the world, most particularly the Western world, from new dark threats.
The messianic idealism which has delivered Europe from Nazism and has protected Western Europe from communism is now headed towards other enemies.
All the attention being focused on tense transatlantic relations, it is easy to forget that our concerns often meet.
On issues such as terrorism, the proliferation of weapons, Iran, Afghanistan (a country in which we train together with the future army) and Africa (where the French initiatives and American support have recently allowed the stabilization of the Ivory Coast and the Congo), Europe and America speak with one voice.
But on certain issues, such as the war in Iraq, Europeans are not ready to blindly follow America.
The world, and Europe in particular, have a fascination and admiration for the United States.
But today, we must reject all sentiment of fascination and gratitude and realize that the pursuit of European integration is in the interest of the United States, who has supported it for 50 years.
In the today's world, there is enough work for two to bring stability and security, and to promote shared values.
In particular, Europe's Franco-German "engine" should not be regarded as a potential rival for the United States.
France and Germany are not forming an axis aspiring to become a kind of leadership alternative to the United States.
The two countries are rather a laboratory necessary to the internal functioning of the EU.
Anyone who thinks that we produce a European rival to America has not considered properly the facts.
Indeed, France and Germany do not naturally get on.
There are many differences between them : the expansion of the EU, agriculture and the national market.
It is therefore not there.
This is why I do not believe in the imminence of a lasting break.
Most Americans still see Europe as a partner with largely the same goals in the world.
The majority of Europeans see in America a reliable friend.
We are all allies of the US; our growth strategy and our contribution to global stability depend on the unique nature of our relationship with America.
This is why the US should encourage the development of a European security and defence policy, which is simply the share the burden that America has imposed on Europe for decades.
We must forge greater European military capabilities to establish a mechanism that allows us to put ourselves side by side effectively when terrorism or other catastrophes strike one of our democracies, as has just happened.
But we also must create a capacity for independent European military planning because the EU might need to lead its own operations, perhaps because NATO is reluctant about this.
We, the French, are opposed to Europe being a " two-speed " institution.
But we want a structured cooperation (i.e., some European countries can urge the establishment of a defense capability) because we are not prepared to let the most prudent and the most cautious among us to repeat the Balkan tragedy of the 1990s, when the Europeans could not act and the Americans didn't want to (for a while).
The creation of such a capacity would make the EU a more effective transatlantic partner.
It is thus difficult for Europeans to understand why the plans for a closer European integration are seen as anti-American.
The only way to remove these fears is to establish a dialogue more closely and more often.
On the defence and security issues, the doctrine of security of the EU offers a great opportunity to consolidate our common concerns: terrorism and nonproliferation, but also the need to ensure a sustainable development in all regions of the world.
Europe and America must pursue their goals of cooperation, while ensuring that this never becomes an alliance of "the West against the rest of the world."
Some Western countries have tried to create a "clash of civilisations" based on our troubled times.
Our task is to find a way to stand up together without targeting a country in particular.
Is India ready to fully convert its currency?
It is very probable that the political audacity shown by India in its quest for peace with Pakistan in order to put an end to their nebulous clash for half a century over the conquest of Kashmir will be matched by equally bold economic initiatives.
Indeed, India is progressing slowly towards a truly courageous reform: the full international convertibility of the rupee.
This convertibility will affect not only economic development in India, but will give a lesson to China which is considering convertibility in the coming years.
Since 1991, India has fluctuated between the devaluation of the rupee and full convertibility, the Reserve Bank of India (BIS) easing a number of foreign exchange controls.
Indian residents can now own foreign currency accounts and invest in shares of foreign companies, while non-resident Indians can repatriate legacies/inheritances.
Indian companies listed on foreign exchanges can acquire property in foreign countries and resident companies are entitled to pay in advance the external commercial debt up to 100 million dollars.
The limits placed on foreign exporter accounts are removed and banks can invest in overseas capital and money markets.
Is India ready for a full convertibility?
The government is always behind as far as the national economic reforms.
Structural reforms and privatization slowed down, undermining investor confidence.
But this inability to address structural problems could expose the economy to external shocks in the long term.
It would be premature for India to open up its capital account immediately.
The stability of exchange rates is the major anchoring point when a country's reform process has begun.
However, it remains unlikely that convertibility of the capital account has a significant impact on the growth rate of a country.
With capital account convertibility, the exchange rate of the rupee will be determined more by capital flows than by differences in inflation rates, given that India’s inflation rate corresponds more or less with the average of 3% for the OECD.
Since India is still in a deficit, the rupee could be subjected to pressure following a negative shock.
Although the monetary growth stands at more than twice the rate of real GDP growth, the risk of inflation would probably be low because of a substantial excess capacity.
Indeed, the 1990's, despite an overall yield increase, have experienced significant deflation that implies that the overall performance potential of India is developing.
The steps towards the full convertibility of the capital account have continued to match the massive growth of currency reserves of India.
Indeed, the availability in foreign currencies of India have considerably grown over the last decade.
Following a surplus capital account and a gap of interest rates of 3-4%, the currency reserves have reached 70,3 billions of dollars in late 2002, enough to cover about 15 months of imports, compared to only $4 billion in 1990.
Following the balance of payments crisis in 1991, the exchange rate of the rupee has been devalued by 20%.
Exporters could exchange 30% of their profits according to market conditions.
This method has subsequently been replaced by a system of double exchange rates, which made the rupee partially convertible (60% of revenues derived from exports could be converted at market exchange and the rest, according to a fixed rate of the RBI, used by the government to finance imports of goods such as gasoline, cooking oil, fertilisers and lifesaving drugs).
The dual exchange rate acted as a tax on exports, but it didn't last long, yielding to a unified exchange rate with respect to trade.
The full convertibility of the current account has followed in August 1994.
The political debate is then turned toward the convertibility of the capital account, greatly encouraged by the IMF and the World Bank.
In May 1997, the Tarapore Committee on Capital Account Convertibility laid out a process of liberalization in three stages from now to 1999-2000, with an emphasis on fiscal consolidation, a set rate of inflation target and a solid financial system.
The fiduciary crisis of East Asia then put the designated stocks on hold and raised serious questions about the date of the resumption of trading and the need to pursue convertibility.
The sudden melting of apparently healthy economies bluntly reminded us that full convertibility should not arise from strong external liquidity.
After all, the liberalisation of the capital account could lead to instability in the change rate and even countries whose availability in currencies are important may not be able to prevent a rush on their reserves.
India must learn the following lesson: in case of national or external shock, the full convertibility could prove to be a costly and ephemeral experience.
The key question is whether a full convertibility would encourage the income or expenses of net capital funds.
The risk of greater instability for the rupee is compounded by serious problems, including a deficit equal to 6% of GDP and the impasse with Pakistan.
The movement of short-term capital, likely to happen if one of these two risks got worse, could make the overall outcome even more unstable.
So it is vital for India to increase the amount of long-term capital, as the capital account will be closed or opened.
In this context, it is remarkable that China, which has a closed capital account and reserves totaling $286 billion, or four times that of India, has an economy that's only twice the size of India's.
Full convertibility is not the key to attracting more significant direct investments (FDI) abroad.
China has attracted FDI of 52,7 billion dollars in 2002, the greatest return of capital in the world.
India needs more important FDI to absorb the excess capacity of its economy.
This situation underlines the importance of the successful management of the capital account (control of revenue and the movement of capital) for India after a first step towards full convertibility.
But in the short term, full convertibility of the capital account is not in the interests of India.
The Chancellor's Twilight ?
The resignation of Chancellor Gerhard Schreder as president of the Socio-Democratic Party of Germany will profoundly affect the distribution of forces within the German government and its weak "red green" majority in Parliament.
Although it seems premature to speak, as some do in Germany, of the "twilight of the Chancellor" or to refer to Schreder's surprising decision as the "start of the end" of his political position, it is perfectly appropriate to describe it as a consequent loss of power.
The main winner is Franz Mentefering, the 64 year old leader of the parliamentary delegation of the Social Democratic Party, who will succeed Schreder as President of the party.
The two politicians will rule in tandem, but Schreder will depend more on the loyalty of Mentefering than Mentefering will depend on the success of Schreder.
Schreder represents a platform and a moderate left political program similar to the philosophy of the New Labor’s British Prime Minister Tony Blair or centrism of the former American president Bill Clinton.
Mentefering is, however, more attached to the traditional values of the social democratic party (or the former Labour Party).
In terms of styles of leadership, Schreder plays solo, Mentefering as a team.
In Germany, the Chancellor occupies the highest position among the main political players.
The main source of strength to a German chancellor does not reside, however, in the legal powers that were conferred to him by the constitution, but in the real support gathered in his own party.
With one notable exception in the 1950s, neither of the two main political parties in Germany (the Social Democrats and the moderately conservative Christian Democrats) has ever succeeded in obtaining an absolute majority in Parliament.
In consequence of that, the German chancellors and president generally form coalition governments and their real authority is founded on the loyalty of the party forces they command in these political alliances.
Although Social Democrats have never really appreciated Schreder (they certainly don't appreciate him as much as the unforgettable Willy Brandt), they have followed him willy-nilly while they have considered him as the only guarantor of electoral success after 16 frustrating years (1992-1998) in opposition to Helmut Kohl.
But things have changed.
Since the end of 2002, Schreder and the SPD have found themselves confronted to unusually low rates of voter approval and this situation is not close to changing.
Over the course of the single year 2003, about 40,000 Social Democrats left their party, a hemorrhage without precedent.
If the national elections had been set for last Sunday, the 8th of February, a coalition of the center-right made up of Christian Democrats and Liberals would have received 57% of the votes, according to Infratest dimap, one of the main polling organizations in Germany.
With a maximum 35% votes, Schräder's "red green" coalition would have run to its loss.
At the beginning of what was called "a super election year" for Germany (14 elections, one European, five regional and eight local), it was shaping up to be catastrophe news for the SDP.
Several times, Schreder had been extremely stimulated by the desperate situations when he was back to the wall.
This quality is greatest strength and it would seem that has now launched the most risky possible counter-offensive.
It is based on the following bet: a significant economic improvemment will happen beginning in the second half of 2004 until the next national elections in autumn 2006 and the voters will attribute this expected recovery to economic, labor market and welfare state reforms,called "Agenda 2010," which Schraeder had made the spearhead of his chancellery.
For a long time, Shroeder's reformist rhetorics did not match his politics.
It was only after his reelection in the autumn of 2002 that he abandoned his former populist position, his short-term solutions and his neo-corporatist methods aimed at convincing the unions and the employers' associations.
Given the more pressing problems in Germany (an accelerating demographic decline, an excessively regulated labor market and a confusingly obscure fiscal system), Schroeder's reform program may seem far too timid, but numerous decreases have been perceived as extremely harsh by the most significant electoral constituency of the SDP, and particularly by the powerful trade unions.
But, considering the distressed economic situation in Germany, which should worsen because of the country's demographic problems, the social democrats have no choice now but to give up creating wealth in favor of its redistribution.
Germany cannot afford to become idle or, even worse, to stop the reform process.
In the best case scenario, Schrader would remain faithful to the philosophy of "Agenda 2010" and Mantefering would patiently explain to an rather ill-disposed SDP that they would have to cross the desert before arriving at the Promised Land.
In the worst case, Schrader will return to populism to win an electoral victory in the short term and Müntefering will endorse this choice to avoid having the wounded Social Democrats party fall into absolute despair.
Schraeder's tragedy is that his power could collapse further, no matter which path he chooses.
At the end of the present "super election year," we will know the answer.
The great man Syndrome
In this era of globalization, it is large, impersonal forces that are supposed to determine the course of events.
The globalization of markets, unfettered trade, militant Islam, China's awakening: these are the things historians and strategists usually portray as the key forces shaping our destiny.
Yet for most, we do not see things as well.
Most people will always instinctively look for "great men" for historical figures, the men (and women) who seem to shape events through their political vision, their personal charm and the strength of their moral views.
With the simple force of their convictions and their personalities, such figures, we believe, can stimulate progress, by providing a glimmer of hope in a universe which is otherwise detached and impersonal.
This need to find providential  men or women in this era of globalization results from three factors.
Initially, it is a question of the complexity and the vulnerability of our world.
Then, paradoxically, it is about our ever-growing criticism of politics and politicians.
Finally, it is the result of our media obsessed culture that she is to put a "face" on the events.
Faced with the problem of getting positive changes in a national or international environment that seems to defy the power of "ordinary" leaders, we then turn to new Alexanders to untangle the "Gordian knot" and transcend the complexity of the simple strength of will and dynamism.
Structural reforms in Europe, for example, are considered impossible to implement unless they are imposed by a reincarnation of Margaret Thatcher.
In the Middle East, everyone awaits the arrival of a new Anwar Sadat in the Arab world.
The disillusionment with the political world and politicians is an equally important element in our hopes for a beneficent leader.
In France, for example, the slightly too flattering celebration of the tenth anniversary of the death of François Mitterrand mainly reflects the general disillusion felt towards his successor, Jacques Chirac.
The indirect criticism of the present is often a key element of an idealized vision of the past.
The less we demand a "normal" politician, the more we are looking for a hero.
Now that the world has become an international stage, the role of the media in feeding this appetite for propitious leaders is essential.
The public calls for quick responses to complex problems that, if they remain unresolved, could endanger the planet.
He needs figures with which it can identify, that it can immediately recognize and, above all, in which he can trust.
The emergence of a "global civil society" embryonic exacerbates the requirement of universal figures and charisma, representing of a hope of world-wide accountability, with certain populist overtones.
In a world in search of providential leaders, the case of Ariel Sharon is symbolic and paradoxical, because this universal man remains one of the most controversial figures in recent decades.
He has become a man almost revered in his country and Western public opinion generally sees his political defeat as representing a blow that could be fatal for any hope of progress in the region, even if he remains loathed in many parts of the Arab and Muslim world.
The transformation of Mr. Sharon, the traitor who became a hero within a few years, is a source of fascination for his people, the region and the world, especially as his basic intents will remain forever open to discussions for tomorrow's historians and politicians who would claim to be his true heirs today.
Has Mr. Sharon really been convinced by the demographers that the "Great Israel" that once seemed to be his prime aspiration really means the end of the Jewish State and does his strategy of disengagement, which is based on "Gaza before all else," really mean "Gaza only"?
For those who support one or the other of these interpretations, Mr. Sharon will never be accorded the benefit of the doubt.
The fact that one could compare the attack Mr. Sharon suffered, in terms of political consequences, to the assassination of Yitzak Rabin demonstrates just how much we associate his persona with hope and security.
The "bulldozer" has become the grandfather of most Israelis and the last asset of Western diplomacy for Americans and, surprisingly, for Europeans as well.
He alone seemed to embody the necessary combination of strength and vision to assemble a majority of Israelis behind him in a process of unilateral disengagement.
In fact, one wonders if the world has not made a savior out of  Mr Sharon because he wanted to believe against all odds that there was still hope in the Middle East.
Was it a futile illusion or a prophecy that is being fulfilled ?
We will never know.
What is certain is that the vacuum created by the departure of Mr Sharon from political life is all the more striking in light of the images of chaos that emerges from Gaza since Israel's withdrawal and the collapse under our eyes of the Palestinian Authority.
No more than the emergence of a new providential personality will be easy.
Not every exceptional period creates its own Bonaparte, which is probably for the best, because exceptional leaders can convey the impression that all problems have solutions, which is far from being true.
The natural course of history at its most optimistic is still the progress which occurs "on the periphery," but the fast pace of technological change leads us to expect the same sort of progress in human affairs.
Many of us believe that such an impossible bet may be fulfilled by only a providential man, with all the hopes and the dangers, that it represents.
The fall of the UN
The reign of terror of Saddam Hussein is coming to an end.
His ba' athist government will not sink alone however.
Ironically, the United Nations down with him.
It is possible that the UN would not disappear completely.
The sectors dedicated to "good works" (i.e., bureaucracies to maintain low risk peace or those that fight against AIDS and malaria or to protect the rights of children) will remain.
The chatterbox arising from New York's East River will continue to moan.
The reluctance of the Security Council to endorse the use of force to enforce its own resolutions on Iraq's possession of weapons of mass destruction tolled the end of the decades-old fantasy that the UN was the basis of world order.
While we reject the remnants of the war to liberate Iraq, it is important to preserve, through international law applied by international institutions, the intellectual wreckage of the liberal concept of security in order to better understand them.
While free Iraqis describe the nightmare of Saddam's rule, which lasted a quarter century, we must not forget those who supported this war and those who did not, those who said that the moral authority of the international community was chiselled into pleas with the aim to obtain additional delays for the UN inspectors and those who demonstrated against the "regime change."
In the spirit of an after-war reconciliation that diplomats always want to promote, we should not resign ourselves to the old-fashioned and timid notion that the world order requests us to back down when faced with rogue states that terrorise their citizens and threaten ours.
Decent, thoughtful and full of principles, the millions of individuals who have demonstrated against the resolution to ask  Iraq for explanations were catalysed by the idea that only the UN Security Council had the necessary authority to justify the use of force.
A voluntary coalition of liberal democracies prepared to send their soldiers to stop the evil is not enough.
It doesn't matter that these troops will apply the UN requirements.
If a country or a coalition of countries other than the UN Security Council made use of force, even as a last resort, "anarchy" and not the international law, the sets, destroying any hope of world order.
This is what the demonstrators believed.
But this idea is dangerously wrong and leads inexorably to justify morally (and even to justify decisions politico-military existential) countries like Syria, Cameroon and Angola, Russia, China and France.
If a policy is right when the Security Council approves it, how can it be wrong, simply because the communist China, Russia, France or a multitude of secondary dictatorships refuse their approval?
Those who are opposed to the actions of the coalition in Iraq generally respond that "order" must take precedence over "anarchy."
But is it exact?
Does the UN Security Council represent the most competent institution for ensuring order and save us from anarchy?
History suggests otherwise.
The UN was born in the ashes of a war that the League of Nations has proved unable to prevent.
The league was simply not ready to face Italy in Abyssinia, and even less, if it had survived that debacle, to fight against Nazi Germany.
In the euphoria that followed the victory during the Second World War, hope to make collective security was placed in the hands of the Security Council of the UN, with ineffective results.
During the Cold War, the Security Council turned out to be completely paralysed.
In fact, the decision to defend South Korea in the attacks against it in 1950 was taken by the Council only because Stalin had ordered its diplomats to boycott sessions of the UN, implying that no Soviet Ambassador was present to exercise his veto rights.
This was a mistake that the Soviets would not commit any more.
In 1967 and 1973, the UN pulled out of the Middle East, leaving Israel to defend itself by its own resources.
The Soviet empire was brought down and Eastern Europe liberated, not by the UN but by the mother of all coalitions, NATO.
Faced with multiple attacks by Milosevic, the UN failed to put an end to the Balkan wars or even to protect its victims.
Do you recall Sarajevo?
of Srebrenica and of the massacre of thousands of Muslims under the false protection of the UN?
It took countries of good will to create a coalition to save Bosnia from extinction .
Once the war was over, peace was agreed in Dayton, Ohio, and not at the UN.
The rescue of the Muslims of Kosovo was not due to the UN: their cause had never received the approval of the Security Council.
This century is now presenting a challenge to hopes for a new world order based on a new set of blueprints.
We will neither win against nor contain the fanatical terror if we do not bring war to territories that trigger it.
We must for this use force against states who give refuge to terrorists, as we have done to destroy the  Taliban regime in Afghanistan.
The most dangerous states are those which possess weapons of mass destruction, chemical, biological and nuclear weapons which can kill not hundreds or thousands of people, but hundreds of thousands.
Iraq was one of them, but there are many others.
The hope to convince them to withdraw their support or asylum they give to the terrorists is based on certainty and efficiency they face.
The chronic inability of the Security Council to implement its own resolutions regarding Iraq, is clear: it is simply unable to fulfill its mission.
We therefore remain solely with the coalitions formed by countries of goodwill.
Far from denigrating them as a threat to a new world order, we should instead recognize that they are, by default, the best hope that remains for this order and the real alternative to the anarchy engendered by the deplorable failure of the United Nations.
Neoliberalism, and then?
Twenty years of neoliberal economic policies have provided nothing but disappointing results for developing countries.
Latin America, the region that has most tried to implement the proceeds of the "Washington Consensus" (free market, deregulation, privatisation), has experienced low and volatile growth that widens the gap of inequality.
Among the former socialist economies of Eastern Europe and the Soviet Union, few have managed the actual production levels achieved before 1990.
In sub-Saharan Africa, most of the savings have failed to address the adjustment programs required by the IMF and World Bank.
The rare examples of success occurred in countries which followed their own pace and which do not really reflect an Epinal-type image of neoliberalism.
China, Vietnam and India: all three have disobeyed virtually all the rules of the handbook of the perfect neo-liberal, even when they embarked on an approach geared more toward the markets.
It is now time to drop neoliberalism and the Washington consensus.
It remains to challenge an alternative, a set of policies with the aim to promote development without falling into the trap of a new  unworkable plan allegedly planned for the well-being of all countries without distinction.
Experience suggests that an adequate program of growth must be rooted in two strategies: an investment strategy designed to revive growth in the short term and a strategy for setting up institutions, designed to give a strong economy facing adversity some economic shocks.
The key to an investment strategy is to get local businessmen interested in the local economy.
Encouraging foreign investment or clinging to total liberalisation and then waiting until the situation improves itself is not viable.
An effective strategy must achieve two objectives: to encourage investment in relatively untraditional areas and to curtail those projects or investments that do not work out.
For that, governments must use both the carrot and the stick.
Finding out what a country easily produces (or could produce) is the main challenge of all economic development.
The policy of the carrot is necessary because there is much to gain socially if we discover, for example, that cut flowers, soccer balls or computer programs can be produced at lower cost. Also because this knowledge can guide the investments of other entrepreneurs.
The businessman who makes the first "discovery" can only capture a small part of the social value that this knowledge generates, and rapidly, it is followed on this path by others.
Consequently, entrepreneurship of this type (finding out what can be produced) is usually under-represented because of a lack of trade incentives.
It is necessary as well to use the policy of the stick to ensure that these incentives do not generate useless or barely productive investments.
The establishment of such a strategy may vary from one country to another, according to its administrative capabilities, the system of incentives that prevails, the flexibility of its tax system, the degree of sophistication of its financial sector and the underlying political economy.
The funding programmes limited in time, the funding of public companies and the financing of exports account for some ways to approach this, but there are many others.
There is no unique way which worked everywhere.
The governments that do not possess the skills required to exercise their role as director of private sector head straight to catastrophe and have little chance of improving the allocation of resources.
This attempt can succeed, but economic growth requires more than the temporary resuscitation of investment and entrepreneurship.
It also requires efforts to build four types of institutions needed to maintain the progress of growth and for strengthening resilience to economic shocks:
institutions capable of building the market (right of ownership and contract law)
institutions of market regulation (outsourcing, economies of scale, professional information).
Institutions to stabilize the market (monetary and fiscal management.)
institutions which legitimize the market (social security and insurance).
However, it takes time to build and solidify these institutions.
Have an initial period of growth to try and innovate on these fields could prove highly paying afterwards.
The key here proceeds from institutional arrangements that are, by necessity, specific to each country.
Finding out what works in any country implies some experimentation.
After all, institutions are not greenhouse plants which can be replanted in any soil under any climate.
The reforms that work in one domain can turn out to be mediocre or insufficient in others.
Such specificity helps in understanding why some countries succeed (China, India, South Korea and Taiwan among others) by combining some rather unorthodox elements with policies which are wholly traditional.
It also explains why some large institutional differences persist among industrialized countries of North America, Western Europe and Japan in areas such as the role of public sector, the legislative system, corporate governance, financial markets, labor markets and social protection.
While economic analysis can help make institutional choices, public debate and collective decisions also have important roles to play.
In fact it considers the public participation democracies as meta-institutions which allow for a choice in the "menu" of institutional arrangements for each area.
To design such a growth strategy is both more difficult and easier than setting up standardised neoliberal policies.
More difficult since the constraints that it imposes on growth are often specific to each country and adapt poorly to the standard conventions.
Easier, however, because once these constraints are clearly targeted, relatively simple policy changes can help enormously in economic terms and can open the way to a virtuous circle of growth and institutional reforms.
Adopting this approach does not mean giving up a standard economic outlook, far from it.
Neo-liberalism is to neoclassical economies what astrology is to  astronomy.
In both cases, there must be a well rooted faith to move from one to the other.
Critics of neoliberalism should not oppose classical economics but only its misuse.
The other central Europe
A spectre lingers in central Europe, while its countries prepare to join the European Union.
This promising development is compromised by a heated electoral nationalism that seeks to win votes by promising to reopen old wounds and settle old scores.
The most striking example comes from Hungary, where the Prime Minister Viktor Orban has demanded the repeal of the decrees adopted in 1945 by the president Edvard Benes (who decreed that that the goods of the Germans and Hungarians deported from Czechoslovakia be confiscated and their citizenship removed) in a campaign for re-election, which has not accomplished justice.
But Orban is not the only to see an electoral advantage in evoking memories of old ghosts.
Orban has argued that the revocation of the "Benes decrees" had to be a condition of the integration of the Czech Republic (as well as of Slovakia) into the European Union.
The unwillingness brought on by the Orban's maneuver has interrupted a large part of the regional cooperation put in place during the last decade.
Instead, a new, menacing form of national populism is emerging in the plain that stretches from Bavaria and the Danube.
The chain reaction arising from the awakening of nationalism dangerously changes the political landscape.
Since the election which brought to power the coalition of the parties of Wolfgang Schüssel and Jorg Haider in Vienna, Austria's relations with the neighboring Czech Republic have deteriorated on two points: the requirement that the Czechs close the Temelin nuclear plant on the Austrian border and that they revoke the Benes Decrees under which the Sudeten Germans were deported from the Czech Republic and moved en masse to Bavaria as well as to Austria.
Once the issue of the nuclear plant was resolved, populist pressure was channeled in a single direction, the petition for the repeal of the Benes decrees.
The Czech prime minister Milos Zeman quickly demonstrated that he could also play a popularity-seeking nationalist card.
He described the Sudeten Germans as Hitler's "fifth column" and suggested that Israel could resolve its Palestinian problem by using the Czech method of 1945: namely, deportation.
The head of the Bavarian government, Edmund Stoiber, candidate of the conservative CDU/CSU for German Chancellor against current Chancellor Schroeder and a staunch defender of Sudeten Germans, has demanded that Schroeder cancel a planned visit to Prague in response to Zeman's explosive reaction.
In order to defuse an election battle with his rival, Schroeder agreed to it.
The fact that Orban had backed the demands of Stoiber was perceived as a gift from heaven by the Slovak nationalist Vladimir Meciar in his latest attempt to become Prime Minister, because it allowed him to claim that his national opponents appeared willing to yield to pressure from the European Union and to oblige Slovakia by compensating the Hungarians expelled by Benes in 1945.
Meciar then leapt ahead, denouncing the "Hungarian threat," wiping out with a single stroke four years of hard work with the current government of Slovakia to include representatives of ethnic Hungarian minorities in the government of Slovakia.
The issues relating to the legal system of post-war Europe go well beyond the former Czechoslovakia.
Erika Steinbach, president of the Association of deported (eastern) and a member of the CDU of Stoiber, sustains that the issue of deportation of German populations affects the Poles, Czechs, Slovaks and Slovenians, thus encompassing a large part of eastern Europe and central Europe.
In the 1930s the bête noire of certain countries in Central Europe was "the Treaty of Versailles."
It seems today that statements made in Potsdam in 1945 and that ratified the mass expulsion of the German people are the new enemy.
The current concern is that this type of rhetoric could lead to a cycle of populist victories.
This concern began when the Fidesz Viktor Orban party lost the recent parliamentary elections in Hungary, but other politicians delighted to become the loudest voices for national resentments - Vaclav Klaus in Prague, Edmund Stoiber in Germany, Vladimir Meciar in Slovakia - still consider nationalism a vote-getter, despite Orban's defeat.
Given that they are linked to the sceptics who oppose the European Union, such as Berlusconi in Italy and the Schüssel-Haider coalition in Austria, the true nature of European politics is decidedly at risk for becoming unpleasant.
Since its creation, the European Union has sought to move beyond the old disputes and, through cooperation, to build a better future.
Today, some politicians want to profit from Eastern Europe's desire to turn certain historical issues to their political advantage.
Such a situation presages two fatal consequences: first, that there is no more advantageous means for turning some parts of public opinion in candidate countries against the European Union than to allow the local populists to portray the Union as an agent of the spread of German power.
An expanded European Union must represent a way to balance the asymmetric relationship which exists between the little countries of Eastern Europe and Germany.
It is possible that it is perceived as an indication of this asymmetry.
The second concern is that while NATO and the European Union is expanding, these unpleasant debates may contaminate relations within the international bodies.
This fear may be one of the reasons why President Bush recently refused to meet Prime Minister Orban and it is frequently speculated that if Orban spoke as he does now before Hungary's entrance into NATO, the candidacy of his country would have been rejected.
What could possibly interrupt this process?
After 1945, Western Europe entered painful discussions on history, which contributed to Franco-German reconciliation.
The notions of "collective guilt" have been dismissed as having no basis in a unified and unifying Europe.
President Vaclav Havel expressed himself boldly during his first trip to Germany in January 1990, but his comments were miscontrued for weakness.
With the approach of the expansion of the European Union, the mission of Europe should not be contaminated by supporters of the idea that politicians of the former "other" central Europe prefer to indulge in the past rather than thinking responsibly of how to build a peaceful and prosperous Europe.
Should Bush and Blair resign?
The most important consequences of the war in Iraq are not to be looked for on the battlefield.
They will show themselves later because they depend on the merits of the arguments put forward by George Bush and Tony Blair to launch an attack against a population largely unprotected.
These arguments have been passionately debated around the world.
If they proved to be justified, war may lead to a safer world.
But if they are shown to be unfounded or cannot be verified, the war could lead to greater instability.
In this case, in order to avoid worsening the situation, the American president and the British Prime Minister should resign.
The war was not, and could not be, justified based on the fact that Saddam Hussein is a tyrant.
The justifications put forth by Bush and Blair are linked to the danger posed by Saddam's regime.
They cited four points :
Iraq has weapons of mass destruction.
These weapons constitute a serious and immediate threat.
The UN inspections did not allow this threat to be eliminated.
The war was the best way to deal with this threat.
The first argument put forward will be the easiest to check.
Bush and Blair have spoken several times about stockpiles of weapons of mass destruction and about mobile units capable of producing and using them, as well as about programs in place aiming to manufacture nuclear weapons.
They must demonstrate that they are advancing, and they must do so before an international opinion, which they think is capable of tampering evidence.
This is why independent experts appointed by the UN should examine the evidence that could be discovered.
Without any real evidence of mass destruction weapons presenting a real threat, Bush and Blair should go - regardless of the coming events in Iraq.
The second argument is trickier to prove.
Bush and Blair will have to show that the weapons of mass destruction they have found constituted a serious and immediate threat.
We know that Iraq has owned chemical and biological weapons, because the United States sold them to them.
It is not a matter of knowing whether traces of these weapons remain - they must still remain in the storage sites - but whether there is sufficient quantity to constitute a threat.
If the Iraqis are now using these weapons, it would be the proof that they were ready to be used.
It must then be determined whether they could pose a threat outside Iraq's borders and the extent to which Iraq would have used them if the current war had not taken place.
The third argument lends greatly to controversy.
Bush and Blair must prove that the UN inspections were ineffective.
They can accomplish this by giving proof that the Iraqis have managed to conceal hardware in the sites controlled by the inspectors.
There should be a systematic review of previously visited sites.
And if we find weapons of mass destruction on other sites, one will have to explain why the inspectors would not have been able to find them if the inspections had continued.
The fourth argument will be used over and over again by the propaganda of the two camps.
Was the war justified in terms of costs and results ? Was it really the last resort ?
To answer these questions, the cost of war will need to be objectively evaluated. Loss of human lives will have to be taken into account, the destruction, the appearance of other form of violence (terrorism, for example), as well as the economical impact of the conflict in Iraq and its geopolitical consequences.
To date, Bush and Blair managed to convince only part of their own public opinion.
They have served to the American people a buffet ranging from simple patriotism to chauvinism, via the manipulation of fear and the confusion between Iraq and the networks of bin Laden.
But all that has not convinced the rest of the world, who view this war with a mixture of scorn and concern.
It will be different if the four arguments presented prove to be right.
When the 13 British colonies in North America embarked on the war of independence, Thomas Jefferson estimated that he had to explain the reasons for it in the name of "respect for the views of humanity." He outlined them in the Declaration of Independence.
Such an explanation, based on a rigorous set of arguments, is also needed today.
If the reasons presented for this war were not to be confirmed, the consequences would be serious.
Propaganda, images of Iraqis cheering U.S. and British troops and astonishment to the precision of smart bombs should not hide a terrible truth: Bush and Blair have broken the peace and organized massacres premeditated against the vast majority of world opinion.
In order to attenuate the divisions on the planet, we need to strengthen the authority of the UN and change the leaders in the United States and in England.
Given its huge cost, I hope that this war will be justified. But according to current evidence, I doubt it.
If it is proven without a doubt that Iraq is stockpiling weapons of mass destruction ready for use to the point where it constitutes a serious threat, and that it is unlikely the UN inspections could detect them, we must recognize the validity of the arguments of Bush and Blair.
But even in this case, war was perhaps not the best solution, compared to a policy that would have aimed at containing the dangers posed by Iraq.
But in this case, the war will have made sense.
The idea of a totally absurd war is almost too frightening to dare to consider.
Memory and oversight of Zhao Ziyang
So the former Chinese leader and Communist Party General Secretary Zhao Ziyang has finally died.
The political choices that he had espoused during his term have long been dead: as when he appeared May 19, 1989, at Tiananmen Square just before dawn to beg, with tears in his eyes, and apologized to the demonstrators.
"I am truly sorry," he said the spectators.
"I arrived too late."
After that, he embodied a historical fantasy more than a real person.
When his bizarre and unexpected appearance on the Square was broadcast  all across China on China's central television station the following morning, on one of the last days of media coverage without censorship, the public was astonished by this fleeting moment of official, and all too human, anguish.
After all, party leaders rarely show their personal feelings in public, even less so when it means stepping away from the party line as shamelessly as Zhao did.
Such individualism corresponds neither to Leninism nor to traditional Chinese proscriptions on the behavior of high-ranking officials.
While the repression that followed those exhilarating weeks of freedom of expression and freedom of assembly reached its apocalyptic height on the nights of June 3rd and 4th, Zhao disappeared, swallowed up in the hole of Party memory  where so many other leaders had ended up since the “socialist liberation" of China.
To the discredit of the democratic world, there was virtually no head of state who protested in defense of Zhao, not even just asking for an accounting for his illegal and immoral incarceration.
Instead of that, Zhao's life was held in suspense, under house arrest, under surveillance, so conveniently forgotten, like a sort of cryogenically frozen celebrity without any hope of resurrection.
Zhao was not killed, but simply allowed to live in an old Beijing courtyard house with his family.
He was permitted to go out from time to time, but well guarded like an animal in a fairground, to go to the baths or play golf alone, one of the manifestations of the "bourgeois liberalization" that its efforts toward economic reform had allowed into China, which formerly was hermetically sealed.
The Chinese have long used the death of fallen leaders as an opportunity to show their feelings, which can no longer be expressed through an ordinary political process.
During the winter of 1976, when the leader Zhou Enlai (seen as a liberal in the Maoist hierarchy) died, tens of thousands of people spontaneously invaded Tiananmen Square, thus offering the party a great fear.
It was, of course, the death of former party leader, Hu Yaobang, a liberal of the calibre of Zhao, that launched the protests of 1989.
It is not certain that fans of Zhao express themselves in the same way.
The events of 1989 remain very sensitive and Tiananmen Square is so well protected that it is hard to imagine that a demonstration of any kind might soon take place there.
At the same time, China seems so hooked on business these days that it is hard to imagine the crowds marching for a cause which added nothing to their bottom line.
It is as if the Communist Party had overturned Marx and replaced religion with benefits in the role of the new "opium of the masses."
Few outside the poorest classes of jobs workers and dispossessed farmers appear to have the taste for political protest.
On the other hand, Zhao embodied a chapter in Chinese history in which to stand as a reformer applied not only to the economy but also to every aspect of daily life.
Before becoming leader and party leader, he experienced many areas such as the collectivization of agriculture and the separation of the party from the business world, until the laws guaranteed the rights of journalists and greater openness to the external world for ordinary people.
He was even the first Chinese leader to wear a suit and tie rather than Maoist clothing when visiting abroad and was the first to participate in open press conferences.
Although Zhao was not a visionary, nor a Vaclav Havel and Lech Walesa, and not even anti-communist, his programme in the mid-1980s addressed to the whole economic, political, cultural, media and social milieu, and it led to one of the intellectually richest and most open eras of Chinese history.
It was a tragic paradox to see the political movement which had so peacefully swept across China in 1989 end by stopping the broad evolutionary process of reform to which Zhao had dedicated his whole life.
The Party's leadership was so shaken by the trauma of June 4th that over the following years, it was difficult to determine whether reform would survive.
Then, in 1992, Deng Xiaoping set in motion one of the the fastest and most comprehensive conversions to a market economy of any society in history, which served as the catalyst for the dramatic rise of China now transformed into an economic superpower.
The death of Zhao Ziyang not only reminds us that he was treated unfairly, but also how Chinese reforms have been uneven.
For the Chinese "miracle" to really become a miracle, party leaders ought to study the legacy of the man that they are now eager to throw into oblivion.
The real risks of deficits
The deficits are back and they want revenge.
The budget deficit of the US government now stands at $455 billions, or 4.1% of GNP.
Two years earlier, the United States had predicted a budget surplus for many years.
Although slightly less affected than the US, other rich countries are foundering due to budgetary deficits.
The European Commission estimates that the deficit of the French government will reach 3.7% of the GDP this year, against 3.4% for Germany; these figures go well beyond the ceiling of the deficit (3% of GDP) defined by the Stability and Growth Pact of the euro zone.
Upon finding itself at a deficit, a country is increasing its national debt and imposes a burden on future generations.
Of course politicians prefer to hide the way in which movements of wealth between generations happen.
They are aiming in priority to resolve the immediate problems and to collect now the benefits promised.
The accountants who calculate the deficits of the governments are trying to prevent politicians from fooling us into accepting the benefits they offer without understanding the future cost.
But those who are accountable offer us no method of determining when deficits are justifiable and when they are not.
Deficits lead not only to immediate political problems, but also to issues of fairness about distributions among the generations and intergenerational risk-sharing.
No generation should be obliged to accept unnecessary economic risks imposed by another generation.
The possibility that deficits properly treat future generations depends on how the system of taxation and expenditure of government is designed.
Supporters of an uninterrupted deficit often paint it as a necessary evil to rebuild an economy in which people's confidence is crumbling.
Inspired by John Maynard Keynes, they say that some ongoing deficits will reinstall the confidence before that occurs in a recession or depression.
But it is like prescribing Prozac to a patient before he becomes suicidal.
Such arguments, although they are entirely legitimate at certain times, have limits.
The public deficits of Japan created a national debt amounting to 140% of annual GDP without producing an economic resurgence.
Indeed, the current budget deficits reflect problems in the long term which do not correspond at all to what is foreseen in the Keynesian theory.
The debates on deficits must thus be redefined in terms of major intergenerational problems over the long term.
The problems are subtle because they depend on the actions of governments to come.
In the past, some governments, when they were faced with huge national debts, "deflated" them effectively.
They have thus removed the burden on the next generation that has in fact returned to investors who have not withdrawn from the bond market with the first signs of rising prices or who have delayed the purchase of their homes while inflation would have wiped out the real value of their mortgage-backed securities.
Governments might decide once again to act this way, particularly if national debts increase further.
The resurgence of a massive inflation may seem unthinkable in the current environment, but do not forget that even a relatively modest annual inflation rate of 6% decreases the real value of a nation's debt in a little more than 6 ½ years.
It is possible that a continuous public opposition to a gradual increase in inflation does not stand up long.
Some politicians can once again succeed at anchoring the idea that inflation, in being stimulating, is a blessing for the economy.
But in addition to deficits officially measured by the current governments, there is also certain obligations that are caused by demographic change (falling birth rate) and with the prospect of payments of considerable sums for social security benefits in the future.
The reach of these obligations is monumental.
In its 2003 report, US Social Security Administration Trust Funds administrators believe that maintaining the solvency of the system of social security for the next 75 years will cost 3.5 trillion, or about the amount of the current U.S. government debt ($3.9 trillion).
The administrators of the US Medicare Trust Funds (which provide medical services to retirees) estimate that their floating bonds are now worth 5.9 trillion dollars, which is more than half of America's national debt.
The possibility of a budget shortfall in Social Security and health care is far greater in Europe and Japan because of demographics which are much more difficult to deal with.
Moreover, unlike the official national debt, obligations in terms of social services are not linked to the currency.
They constitute, rather, the promise of a certain standard of living (including the value of medical services), corrected for inflation.
No government can ‘ debunk ’ them.
But this does not mean that pensions and other social obligations are to be completely frozen.
This means that the problem is political.
Pensioners are among the most powerful lobby groups in a democracy and politicians are reluctant to confront them on such an essential issue.
We have yet to face firmly the inter-generational problems that lie at the heart of current economic dilemmas.
Our retirement schemes and our national budgets must be based on a “generational accountancy” which guarantees that the economic risk is systematically distributed between the generations.
This means that the structures of pensions and taxes must be designed to take greater account of the changing circumstances facing different generations, rather than making fixed promises, which will certainly not be able to be kept anyway, as to some degree of recovery in the future.
For example, when demographic trends or unrelenting economic hardship impose burdens on the workers with respect to social benefits, the benefits owed to pensioners must automatically be modified by increasing the retirement age and/or by benefit adjustments.
These adjustments will probably happen in the decades following, but only after a long gap and with many injustices.
We need a system which is fair from the outset in order to deal in a rational way with risks that will span several generations.
Can these problems be resolved today, when the economic downturn in most of the advanced countries leads the majority of politicians to focus on the results on the short term?
Hard times, like the Great Depression, helped bring about decisive changes.
Under an effective leadership (which unfortunately seems to be lacking), more tempered statements today could enable a public discussion on the most appropriate methods of risk sharing between the generations.
Say no to Bush
It is three years now that the American president has been pursuing a unilateral program, denying any evidence that would contradict his positions and ignoring fundamental and historic American principles.
Take the example of global warming.
In this domain, Bush is shining by its absence without permission (AWOL in American military jargon).
From time to time, he calls into question the scientific theories.
(We know, of course, that Bush's academic performance never impressed anyone.)
Bush's stance is worse than bad: it puts us in an embarrassing position.
In fact, when Bush asked the US National Academy of Sciences to consider the issue, the verdict was resounding: greenhouse gases pose a serious threat (that is surely the only verdict that they could have reached).
But the American car manufacturers love their cars that consume a lot of gas, and the Bush's friends in the oil industry will accept no interference in their destruction of the Earth's atmosphere.
Also we did not change the environmental policies.
In Iraq, Bush once again pursued a unilateral program, explaining that he was in possession of irrefutable evidence of ties between Saddam and Al Qaeda and that Saddam possessed weapons of mass destruction.
Even before the American invasion, there was overwhelming evidence proving that Bush was lying.
The detection technologies had clearly shown that Iraq had no atomic weapon, as the leader of the United Nations inspectors, Hans Blix, pointed out.
It is possible that Bush has read these reports, but they exceeded his intellectual capacities for understanding.
It is also possible that he did not believe what he read.
Nevertheless, the American policy was not based on scientific evidence.
Since the end of the cold war, America is the only global superpower.
However, she has failed to exert the kind of necessary authority to create a new world order based on principles such as equity.
Europe and the rest of the world are aware of this failure, but they do not vote at the US elections.
Even so, the rest of the world is not without recourse.
The rest of the world should simply oppose Bush and his
America has not won the hearts and minds of Iraqis, but instead has lost them, just as it has lost the hearts and minds of many peoples.
The United States want to keep the control over the occupation, but also want other countries to take the bullets that are today decimating the American troops.
The United Nations forces do not have to bear the consequences of America's inability to manage the occupation and therefore the calls for financial aid that the United States is sending out should remain unanswered.
What support can the American programme draw when we see that President Bush has provided hundreds of billions of dollars of tax cuts to the richest people in the world?
It is not so long ago that the Republican Congress was holding back the sum of $1 billion owed to the United Nations and was threatening not to pay what was owed unless the United Nations agreed to take certain actions.
The lack of America's goodwill when pettily financing peace contrasts strongly with the fantastic sums that Congress quickly engaged in the war effort.
Supporters of a moderate approach state that if the United Nations do not get involved, it will be their death. By participating in the Iraqi occupation, it will restore the United States confidence so that the next incidence of this sort, America will turn more quickly to the United Nations.
It is absurd.
The White House occupants now firmly believe in the
I usually deal with economics, not politics.
However, at a time of globalization in this new world, economic interdependence is stronger, and requires action, regulations and the institutions more collective, as well as a rule of international law.
Economic globalization, however, has exceeded political globalization, and decision-making processes are far from democratic and transparent.
In many cases, we can establish that the failures of globalisation goes back to the same spirit behind the failure of the Iraqi occupation: pluralist institutions should not serve the interests of only one country but all countries.
During the recent summit of the World Trade Organization (WTO), which took place in Cancun, the developing countries indicated to America, and to Europe, that this system could not continue.
In this case, Europe is just as guilty as America.
Europe has no difficulty in seeing the dangers of unilateralism in America's actions, from its withdrawal from Kyoto to its refusal to participate in the International Criminal Court.
But Europe should also reflect on its own practices, including its policies on trade, especially when the EU persists in systematically unbalancing the normal operation of international trade thus putting the developing countries at a disadvantage, despite promises to restore the balance with the ongoing negotiations.
There, Europe is behaving like America, which has long since adopted the rhetoric of free trade even while its actions have long been ignorant of the principles of it.
In trade negotiations, the American rhetoric on justice and fairness is forgotten; the United States ignores the pleas of the world's poorest countries to put an end to the cotton subsidies that have such a devastating effect on them.
If we must make the world more politically safe and more economically stable and prosperous, globalization policy will have to rise to the level of economic globalization.
The principles of democracy, social justice, social solidarity and the rule of law should be extended beyond national borders.
Europe and the rest of the world will have to do their share of work: respecting these principles themselves and pushing each other, and America, in the right direction.
At the moment, that requires "just saying no" to President Bush.
The real price of the Iraq war
In life, the most important things, like life itself, are priceless.
But that does not mean that the issues involving life preservation  (or a way of life), like the defence, should not be screened by a cold and rigorous economic analysis.
Shortly before the current Iraq war, when Larry Lindsey, economist of the Bush administration, suggested that the cost could be between 100 and 200 billion dollars, other high-ranking officials quickly raised objections.
For example, the director of Budget and Management, Mitch Daniels, estimated the budget to be $60 billion.
It appears today that Lindsey's estimates were grossly underestimated.
Disturbed at the idea that the Bush administration could be scamming everyone about the cost of the war in Iraq, as it already did about weapons of mass destruction and Irak's links with Al Qaeda, I met with Linda Bilmes, budget expert at Harvard, to examine the problem.
Even we who are opposed to war, have been appalled by what we have discovered: Our estimates of low to moderate, vary from slightly less than a trillion dollars to more than 2 trillion.
Our analysis begins with the $500 billion the Congressional Budget Office is speaking openly about, which remains ten times higher than what the administration announced about the cost of the war.
His estimate is wrong at this point because the figures announced do not even include all of the budgeted costs for the government.
And the budgetary costs are only a fraction of the costs of the whole economy.
The Bush administration has, for example, done everything it could to hide the large number of veterans who have returned seriously injured: 16,000 at the current time, of whom approximately 20% suffer from serious injuries to the brain and the head.
So it is consequently not surprising that its figure of $500 billion ignores the        and the costs of lifetime healthcare that the government will have to pay over course of the years ahead.
The administration also does not want to confront the problems of military recruitment and retention of troops.
The consequence is the payment of large bonuses to those who commit to renew, more benefits and higher costs of recruitment: an increase of 20% between 2003 and 2005 alone.
In addition, war wears out the equipment, some of which will have to be replaced.
These budgetary costs (without taking into account the interests) stood at $652 billion for our most conservative estimates and $799 billion for our moderate estimates.
Presumably as the government has not reined in other expenditures or increased taxes, these expenses were funded by debt and interest costs on this debt add another $98 billion dollars (conservative estimate) to 385 billion (moderate) in budgetary costs.
Of course, the heaviest burden of injuries and deaths is borne by the soldiers and their families.
But the army pays disability benefits which are well below the value of lost income.
Similarly, the sum paid for soldiers killed only amounts to 500,000 dollars, which is well below the standard estimate of the economic cost of a death over a lifetime, sometimes referred to as the statistical value of a life (from 6.1 to 6.5 million dollars).
But the costs do not stop there.
The Bush administration once proclaimed that the war in Iraq would be good for the economy, and a spokesman even suggested that it was the best way to ensure low oil prices.
As is often the case, things turned out very different: the oil companies are the big winners, and the American and global economies have lost.
But staying extremely modest, we are estimating the total effect on the economy if only $5 or $10 of the increase is attributed to the war.
In the same time, money earmarked for the war could have be spent on something else.
We believe that if part of this money had been invested in roads, schools and research, the US economy would have been more stimulated short-term and its growth would have been better long-term.
There is a number of other costs, some potentially important, which are very difficult to quantify.
For example, Americans pay each year, $300 billion for the "option value '(potential value) of their state of military preparation, which allows them to be prepared to fight where necessary.
The fact that Americans are ready to pay it suggests that the potential value is greater than the cost.
But there is little doubt that it has been greatly diminished and will remain so for several years.
In short, even our "moderate" estimate can significantly underestimate the cost of the American engagement in Iraq.
And our estimate does not include any costs involved in the huge losses of human lives and goods in Iraq.
We are not trying to explain that the American people have been deliberately misled about the cost of the war, or that the gross underestimation by the Bush administration must be chalked up to incompetence, as it vehemently maintains in the case of the weapons of mass destruction.
We are not in the process of trying to judge if there was more profitable means to do war.
Recent evidence that the number of deaths and injuries would have been considerably reduced if we had provided better physical protection to the soldiers shows to what extent short-term cost-cutting can lead to long-term costs.
It is undeniable that when the planning of a war is a matter of choice, as it was the case here, an inadequate preparation is even less acceptable.
But such considerations appear to be out of reach of the calculations of the Bush administration.
Analysis of the costs and benefits of major projects have been routine in the Defense Department and other departments for nearly a half-century.
The war in Iraq was a huge "project" and yet it appears today that the analysis of its profits were very wrong and that of its costs are virtually nonexistent.
One cannot help wondering: were there other ways to spend a fraction of the 1-2 billion dollars spent on the war on projects that would have better heightened security, increased prosperity and promoted democracy?
Is Freedom enough?
Do democracies need values?
This question seems absurd in the light of viewing the photographs of American soldiers torturing and humiliating their Iraqi prisoners.
The fact is that the progress of democracy has gone hand-in-hand with an erosion of common values and the preponderance of individual autonomy.
It requires the moral agnosticism and a plurality of references, neither being devoted and compulsory.
Democracy is certainly cultivating values, but they are generally more liberal - in other words individual rights take precedence on the collective obligations.
For all today's Democrats, the most complete possible respect for the autonomy of the individual remains, as Thomas Jefferson put it, "self-evident."
However, are human rights, civil and political rights, enough to ensure the strength and the survival of democracies?
Are modern democracies good enough to be able to assemble the necessary qualities - including self-sacrifice - to defeat their enemies?
For a long time, these issues have not seemed urgent, in part because the core values of democracy were less abstract than they appear now.
These values fuelled the fight against Nazi and Soviet totalitarianism, fascism, and military dictatorship. In their name, minorities saw themselves granted rights to equality and dignity, and decolonization was conducted.
Democratic values are perhaps partisan in defense of human rights, but that confers on them a universality that legitimizes the struggle against oppression wherever it is produced.
However, in the more advanced countries, the promises of material prosperity made possible thanks to freedom replaced a long time ago the attention given to democratic values and to their defense as a kind of social cement.
Westerners are not rushing to copy the freedom fighters who gave birth to their society, despite the commemorations, the scene of memory and the persistence of oppression.
The terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, against the United States has changed all that - not only international relations but also the balance between rights and obligations that we've taken for granted for a long time.
In fact, the collapse of the twin towers, a surprising event in its terms, symbolism and scale, has not changed anything.
In itself, it only reveals that the urgency of a fundamental reassessment is long overdue.
What is really our Western model of democratic development worth?
Some systems of non-democratic values seem to have more adherents because they are based on community solidarity, religion or nationalism, but in brief because closed societies allow for less escape, doubt, distance, criticism or satirizing than open societies.
Beyond the basic freedoms and our economic and social systems, have we a  specific society to defend?
Our civilization prefers societies that accept selfishness with respect to one's family and one's group, which tolerate with little prejudice license taken with respect to social customs, which consider that blasphemy, criticism of power and even civil disobedience are fundamental freedoms.
Better successful companies like ours are familiar with evils such as drug use, prostitution, alcoholism, acts of incivility, otherwise known as vandalism and a government of mullahs or soldiers, because these social problems can be allayed, even completely eliminated, without changing their foundations.
Which is not true of totalitarian or fundamentalist regimes who must be destroyed to give birth to free societies.
But what can we say to all kinds of fundamentalists who see that the most determined fighters are on their side, if our civilization is to be protected?
Can we oppose something other to them than the individual freedoms?
Two temptations contrary to our principles must be exposed.
The first is the return to so-called "traditional" values, as befits fearful societies: this not only indicates a turning inward and a closing off, but sometimes also hatred.
The second temptation is a modern variant of gunboat diplomacy, which focuses on physical strength without regard for the projection of accrued credibility and legitimacy.
When enemy attacks us, we certainly need to respond immediately without asking too many questions.
If enemies threaten us, it is better first to affirm their legitimacy, thus gaining credibility, first internal and then external.
Nor must we allow too large a gap between our statement of principles and the reality of our behavior.
The values can no longer, either, as before, come from the Sy, Nature, Reason or  Law of History.
Our values must be formed in and by democratic debate, and nothing else, and our defense must deal with three areas that cannot be separated.
We will increasingly need to update our social pact.
France tried to do this with the debate that she held, and concluded with a law on secularism, an important enterprise even if it could have been done better and made to better show the link between principles, social and anthropological realities and major policies.
Such a debate should also apply to school, to its rules, to its objectives and to the content that it should convey.
Note, however, that in many countries, political parties are finding it difficult to engage in such discussions.
The second major element of such a program to re-create values concerns what I call the social and fiscal constitution of society, to which one must add regulations relating to the environment.
The so-called "community" issues, the issues related to the money gaps, the legitimacy of inequality, the definition of Justice, the redistribution, etc. will increasingly come into the political debate.
Aside from vague attempts at the beginning of the Clinton's era, this debate never took place in the United States ; the beginning of an answer was brought in the UK and Germany by Blair's third way and Schröder's variation of it.
In France, it has been stagnating because of the intensity of the conflicts over redistribution, because of too much division on the left and because of the lack of economic and social vision on the right.
Remain the values associated with the world's New order: of course, a prerequisite to defend such values is through example and not through "procedural" values linked to the crisis management or disputes settlement measures.
We must also take care that short-term interests do not harm more fundamental goals in the long-term.
The fight to defend democracy cannot be selective.
A certain desirable vision for the future of the world must appeal to a shared view of justice and fairness.
We must all become freedom fighters.
The last hope for Venezuela lies in elections.
Venezuela is paralysed in a dangerous impasse.
President Hugo Chávez is clinging to power despite the evident failure of his government, marked by a serious economic deterioration and a dangerous political polarization.
The opposition, tainted by its missed coup of April 2002, is now trying to force Mr Chávez to resign by organizing a very expensive general strike.
Each part justifies his intransigence with tendentious arguments.
His supporters glorify Mr. Chávez as a champion of the poor besieged by a selfish and scheming elite.
His most ferocious opponents portray Mr. Chávez as a diabolical autocrat, the instigator of a Cuban-style revolution who is ready to annihilate democracy.
These two points of view are debatable.
The Chavez government has not been  of great help to Venezuela's poorest classes.
Instead, its belligerent rhetoric and irrational governance have scared investors, causing an economic downturn and rising unemployment and poverty.
Today Mr. Chávez no longer enjoys the support of the majority of the underprivileged.
The opposition is made up of most of the organized civil society of Venezuela, the business world, but also trade unions,professional associations and NGOs.
And the polarization in place in Venezuela does not oppose the "poor" to the "oligarchs", but a populist to the civil society.
The opinion of the opposition, which is shared by the right wing of the Bush administration, is also unconvincing.
Rather than starting a revolution, Mr Chávez only recited overheated rhetoric.
While his qualities as a Democrat are dubious, he has never
But the insistence of Mr. Chávez as to the sanctity of the current constitution is hypocritical.
Four years earlier, Mr. Chávez has separated from the old constitution using a plebiscite to create a new one, tailor-made for him.
Today he calls upon this charter to reject calls for a plebiscite on the continuation of its mandate.
The paradox here arises from the fact that Mr. Chávez earlier provided the example for what could be the solution to today's impasse.
Since? But?  Mr. Chávez used extra-constitutional means, in 1999, to promote his desired change that the international community not be confined to the constitution in force to resolve this crisis that was eating away at the nation.
In fact, the Latin American members of the "group of friend nations" that are trying to play the mediators in this conflict can draw inspiration from an interesting experience to design such a solution.
After all, such confrontations are not unusual for the rigid presidential systems in Latin America.
When the heads of government, elected for fixed terms do not enjoy any political support any longer, they cannot be set down by a censure motion as it exists in the parliamentary systems.
Presidential systems can then undergo long conflicts that pose a threat to democracy, as is the case in Venezuela at this moment.
However, during the last decade, Latin American politicians have given more flexibility to the presidential systems by innovating in the dismissal of Presidents without popular support.
A discredited predecessor of Mr. Chávez was removed from office after accusations of some minor offenses were made against him; Equador's parliament declared its disastrous president to be suffering from "mental incapacity"; in Peru, an autocratic president was forced into exile after months of international and local pressure.
When politicians interpret the law with a certain amount of creativity in these circumstances, they usually do it to ensure the survival of fragile democracies that are in crisis.
As these maneuvers are contained and do not become easy ammunition for the opposition of the moment, they act as a safety valve for presidential systems.
International monitoring can also serve as a safeguard against frivolous use of such mechanisms.
Let's hope that the group of friendly nations can help to create an innovative solution in the case of the Venezuelan impasse.
To be accepted by both parties, such a solution cannot respond to the wishes of both parties.
The opposition would prefer a "all or nothing" vote about another term with Mr Chávez, a vote that it would likely win, but that Mr Chávez would probably never accept.
Mr. Chávez insists on the referendum mechanism of impeachment under its constitution that the opposition finds intolerable: Getting rid of the president would require many more votes than those raised by Mr. Chávez in the recent elections.
And the increase of abstention makes it virtually impossible.
So none of the two proposals is politically possible.
Only a democratic solution to the conflict that would not predict the outcome of the consultation is likely to be adopted.
This mechanism is the holding of elections, to be organized as quickly as possible (this summer seems the most realistic).
Each side will have to work hard to win the victory.
The opposition, hung, will have to go beyond the rejection of Mr Chávez; it will have to draft a plan for rebuilding the country and unite to support a candidate attractive.
President Chávez will have to clarify the content and meaning of his "Bolivian revolution".
In as much as Mr. Chávez is a clever politician and the opposition remains divided, he will have great opportunities to win, which should make him accept this solution.
The group pressures of friendly nations could lead each party to accepting this last chance to avoid a political crash.
The elections can be legitimised by a constitutional amendment to reduce the presidential term, as proposed by Jimmy Carter in his recent effort to mediate.
Since this would be thought to defuse a crisis of exceptional magnitude, it would not set a precedent that would encourage frivolous attacks against democratically elected governments of Latin America.
The organization of elections in Venezuela today would save democracy but would not undermine it.
The dangerous links to Syria
All eyes are on Syria since the assassination of former Lebanese Prime Minister, Rafik Hariri.
Lebanese opposition groups, as supporters of Hariri, openly accuse the Syrian President Bashir Assad's regime of being responsible for this killing.
The Bush administration, without formally accusing Syria, is not far from doing the same thing and has recently recalled its ambassador in Damascus.
It is said that the United States are very angry with Syria and its refusal to withdraw its troops from Lebanon as the UN required them to do
The growing opposition against Syrian hegemony in Lebanon is only one of four similar problems which Syria must face and which it has treated inappropriately.
The other three problems are the actions of Syria in Iraq, its relations with the United States and the need for domestic reforms.
While corrosive immobility is one of the characteristics of the Syrian regime, these challenges are threatening to reinforce each other and marginalize Syria even more than it already is internationally.
In Lebanon, the Syrians have not ceased to misunderstand the intentions of the Bush administration.
Last September, the United States, with the support of France, approved UN Security Council Resolution 1559 demanding the withdrawal of Syrian troops and the disarmament of the militias, principally Hezbollah.
It happened after the unconstitutional extension of the mandate of the Lebanese President, Émile Lahoud, which was imposed by force by Mr. Assad in September despite warnings from the French and the Americans.
Until now, however, Syrian officials say privately that they do not believe that the United States are serious about the withdrawal.
The Syrian leaders continue to reject requests from Lebanon to end the Syrian military presence in place for 28 years.
These demands have become more pressing since the death of Mr. Hariri, when tens of thousands of supporters of the former Prime Minister called for the departure of Syria, when they hadn't taken any position so far on the subject of Syria.
Indeed, a broad multi-community opposition front has formed in Beirut to demand the departure of Syria.
However, rather than meet the requirements on that front and create healthy bilateral relations between countries on an equal footing, Syria has sought to divide the opposition to reassert its control.
The Hariri assassination further complicates the situation and Syria must prepare for a strong reaction from France and the United States.
In Iraq, since the fall of Baghdad on 9 April 2003, Damascus has shown a misplaced nostalgia toward the old system.
Despite the strong differences that separated the Baathist parties in Syria and Iraq, they supported each other owing to their membership in a confederation of despots.
For the Syrians, a democratic Iraq and friendly to the United States has always been worse than Saddam Hussein, an enemy that they knew well, and with whom they have profited in trade, when Iraq was under international economic sanctions.
The support of the baasists Iraqi exiles blamed on Syria threatens to hurt relations with the new Iraq.
Baghdad has repeatedly accused the regime of Mr Assad to drive the Iraqi funds sent to the insurgents and has recently informed the Syrians to the discovery of a photograph showing a senior Syrian espionage in the company of an Islamist fighter, photographs found on the body to Fallujah.
Following the elections, a legitimate power is emerging in Iraq and the Syrians should show they have foresight by getting rid of their pro-Saddam friends.
The Bush administration's growing impatience with Syria's involvement in the Iraqi rebellion is one of the main reasons for the deterioration of relations between the United States and Syria.
Indeed, disdain from Washington for Syria is manifest.
This is why the denials of Syria's destructive role in Iraq are rarely taken seriously and that is why Mr Assad has no American support for the resumption of negotiations with Israel over the Golan Heights.
Some signs also show that Syrians are unable to measure the US intentions on other issues.
Mr Assad, for example, still does not understand, apparently, how the Bush administration associates his regime with terrorism.
Syrian officials think that the secularity of the Baath party guarantees it the unwavering support of the US against an Islamic resurgence.
They do not understand that American officials believe Syria to be complicit in the activities of the Islamic terrorist groups in the Palestinian territories, in Iraq and in Lebanon.
At home, Mr Assad's regime has also met with some difficulties.
The political and economic reforms move forward slowly, if they move forward at all.
One of the main elements of discussion in Syria is the rebirth of Islam as an alternative to a political and economic system which offers little encouragement, except in cases of the major characters of the regime.
The opposition from France to the Syrian presence in Lebanon was partly the result of his disenchantment with the reformist ambitions of Mr Assad and the European Union has expressed similar reservations.
Mr Assad enters now in a phase of consolidation, which leaves little room for reforms.
Indeed, its new Interior Minister Ghazi Kanaan, a hardliner belonging to the old school, led a crackdown against the reformers and the Kurds during the past year.
The reshuffle last November, which brought to power Kanaan and others, was regarded as a reflection of the preferences of Mr. Assad.
In the coming months, several rounds of retirement should allow the president to put his pawns in positions of responsibility.
Consolidation, however, is by no means reform.
Mr Assad will have to show that his strengthened authority can lead to a real transformation.
Until now, the president has taken a hard line toward Iraq, Lebanon and the internal affairs.
If he is really a reformer, he hasn't managed to convince many people.
Syria may have to pay dearly for this ambiguity.
Europe's racially divided house
The extreme right in Europe is characterized by its racism and its use of immigration issues as political differences.
The Lega Nord in Italy, Vlaams Blok in the Netherlands, supporters of Le Pen's National Front in France, are all examples of parties or movements trained on the common aversion to immigrants and the promotion of simplistic policies to monitor them.
While individuals such as Jorg Haidar and Jean-Marie Le Pen can go and (never soon enough) come, the issue of race will never disappear from European politics in the near future.
An aging population and increasingly open borders imply a growing racial fragmentation in the European countries.
The main parties of the centre left and centre right have faced this prospect by burying their heads in the sand, hoping against all expectations that the problem will disappear.
This is not the case, as the racial history of America clearly demonstrates.
Race Relations in the United States have dominated for decades - and still do - the front of the political scene, to the point that the racial divisions are as important as income, if not more, as determinants of preferences and political attitudes.
The first step to address the issue of racial politics is to understand the causes and consequences of racial animosity, even if it means the uncovering of unpleasant truths.
This is precisely the goal pursued in large part by research teams in economics, sociology, psychology and political science in the United States.
This research shows that representatives of various races are far less trusty with each other; whites are less inclined to support social welfare spending, according to them, the minorities; communities more fragmented racialy have governments less effective, corruption and influence are more important, crime rates higher and less productive public assets per dollar.
This does not mean we should eliminate diversity and create racially homogeneous communities, but it is necessary to acknowledge the reality of these problems in order to begin to develop a strong public policy on race relations.
Of course, Americans are contesting the methods to use.
Some argue in favour of affirmative action plans that offer minorities preferences in employment, admission to university and public contracts.
These policies are seen as a way to provide compensation for past injustices and, more importantly, creating role models and overcoming the remaining, probably unintentional, discrimination.
Others are protesting against affirmative action and believe that a policy that does not concern race yet which is associated with free market policies and pro-family values, is enough to create jobs for minorities and helps to not separate black families.
This last point is crucial in any policy since one of the most important causes of poverty in the US is the spread of single parents (understand single mother) in the black community.
Whatever the right answer the question is, the determination of the measures to take on issue of race is a dominant problem in American politics.
Of course, minorities have moved towards greater integration and economic success.
In the 1950s, Black people were not allowed to sit in the front of buses, today two of the main actors in American foreign policy are Black.
One cannot deny that the American right-wing politicians continue to deploy the "race card" as a tactical tool.
Take the case of Patrick Buchanan, the former assistant of Nixon and Reagan, who has been an independent presidential candidate in the last election.
He recently published a bestseller, entitled "The Death of the West: How Dying Populations and Immigrant Invasion Imperil Our Country and Civilization."
But for every book like this one, there are 10 others that pose a serious analysis of the issue of race in America.
The analysis and the political debate on race relations are way behind in Europe.
At most, the question is carefully considered in terms of immigration quotas and restrictions on borders, not in terms of opportunity and social problems created by an increasingly racially mixed Europe.
Of course, a clear immigration policy is required to avoid the accumulation of illegal immigrants.
But it's not enough: Mexican border control doesn't mean the end of American policy on domestic racial problems!
Europe is wealthy and its population is rapidly aging: Europeans, backed by generous welfare programs, are no longer prepared to accept "dirty work" in, say, agriculture or the garment industry
This attitude makes inevitable an increase in immigration.
The Europeans, however, are quick to criticise the US for the failures of their policy towards minorities and for any manifestation of racism across the Atlantic.
Reading the European press often reveals a superiority complex towards the US on racial issues: they (Americans) have problems with racism; we are immune to it, except for crazy neo-Nazi skinheads and their ilk.
What happened in recent weeks, from Paris to Amsterdam, demonstrates that the racial problem in Europe is more profound and, as the United States, is about the sad truth that the race relations are inherently difficult and that confidence and cooperative behaviour do not travel well on the racial lines.
If the major parties in Europe do not seriously undertake to understand the racial tensions that exist in their countries and to put "race" at the very center of their priorities, individuals such as Le Pen will  always try to fill the gap with their message of hate.
To combat the French exception
Europe's attention has completely turned toward growing and the constitution undergoing negotiation among member states.
However, the result of several Gallic squabbles with the European Commission will not be insignificant when it comes to determining the fate of the new enlarged Europe.
France has decided unilaterally to ignore the stability and growth pact by letting its public deficit to run beyond the limit of 3% of GDP.
French people love to talk about the rational inflexibility of their thinking, but as far as budgets are concerned, Descartes is no longer of any help and confusion makes its way in.
France was a main critic of Ireland when in 2000 the Irish Government reduced its budget surplus, which was at 4%, to a mere 0.5%.
Other countries have not complied with the stability pact, but France is the first country to do so with a small satisfied overtly contemptuous smile.
None of this should surprise.
France is only applying to the European regulations its deeply entrenched habit of considering its own culture as an exception.
Thus, France systematically vetoes any reform to the European Union's common agricultural policy.
As everyone knows, the Common Agricultural Policy is a fine gift offered to rich European farmers (particularly French farmers) who do not deserve it, at the expense of farmers in developing countries and European consumers.
France is also trying to go back to the old policies of bailing out private companies in deficit and about to collapse with a lot of public money.
The European commissioner for competition, Mario Monti, cannot lose this battle: He needs the support of those who have faith in markets and equal treatment for all.
The story is simple.
The French government plans to bail out Alstom, a company that has developed high-technology products, including the TGV, the French high-speed train, but who recently is bankrupt.
The French government proclaims that it will never abandon its rescue plan for Alstom, a plan that has all the usual reasons: job retention, investor protection, et cetera.
Moreover, insofar as Alstom is a high-tech company, the French government plays the research and development card, arguing from the fact that that investment in R & D is beneficial to growth.
To save Alstom by nationalizing the company is clearly a mistake.
The company is formed of different units, some profitable, others in bankruptcy; it clearly needs to be dismantled.
The profitable departments, such as the TGV, will easily find a buyer, the departments operating at a loss should be closed.
The French taxpayers' money would be better spent on the temporary cost of retraining workers rather than on keeping alive a company which is not profitable.
It is important for the European Commission not to allow France to get customized laws for itself in the policies on competition, as it seems to be doing with budget deficits.
The commission should condemn the public financing of private companies in France as it condemns the subsidies in any other European member state.
The commission has already achieved some success there, especially in forcing Germany to cancel government guarantees of state-owned banks.
Alstom in particular and France in general should not make an exception and must meet the same standards.
If the Commission does not act, the European Union will resemble even more a playground for French officials.
France has already taken the lead in foreign policy of the European Union with its foreign minister, Dominique de Villepin, who acts and looks more and more like the foreign minister of Europe.
Meanwhile, France ignores the basic rules of common economic policy and government support for private companies.
The European Commission says it will lose what little credibility he has left to end up looking like a Parisian district of lesser importance?
Losing on the issue of Alstom would have serious repercussions in Europe and not only for competition policy.
The war for oil
For decades, both Republicans than Democrats are pursuing the same objectives: to keep oil to the stability of the price of oil, reduce soft domestic consumption, reduce the dependence on imports and diversify the sources of supply.
Despite appearances, these objectives are always the same today, under the Bush administration.
Many observers believe that with the invasion of Iraq, Bush has chosen a different path.
A significant increase in production in Iraq would probably heighten the dependence on oil of the USA.
The price of oil will no doubt drop with the emergence of a new source of supply, from whence a dependency accrues in the USA, particularly in relation to the Middle East.
It is ironic that the US exercised more control on Iraqi oil under the UN "food against oil" programme before the war (it was then the UN and not Saddam Hussein that set the level of Iraqi exports) than they will be able to do in the context of a future Iraqi democratic state.
If the Bush administration was seeking stable, secure, diversified and inexpensive sources of petroleum, they would only have had to lift the embargo imposed on Libya, Iran, Iraq and Sudan and let the oil flow.
But America's interest for Iraqi oil is not dictated by economics or energy policy.
The Bush administration has acknowledged that Iraqi oil is primarily a geopolitical asset.
Whoever controls the Iraqi oil, controls Iraq.
Saddam owed his power to the fact that he controlled the second largest supply of oil in the world.
He knew perfectly well what he owed to the black gold.
Facing the possibility of invasion and defeat, he threatened to set Iraqi oil fields on fire.
The destruction and looting of Iraqi oil and gas installations and pipelines shows that nearly everyone understood that to control the oil is to control the country.
In the run-up to the invasion by the United States, securing the oil fields was a priority.
The aim was not an increase in supply or a lowering of prices on the American market, but the overthrow of Saddam and his replacement by a new government.
Iraq's future is linked to oil production of the country.
But given the vagaries of the oil market, especially in such a volatile situation, It is unclear how the Bush administration will be able to achieve its goals in the coming years.
The problem is simple.
The US should use the oil revenues to ease the financial burden on American taxpayers due to the Iraqi change of regime.
In the long term, any reconstruction plan depends on the ability of Iraq to export large volumes of oil.
If Iraq does not produce oil, President Bush can keep his promises to the Iraqi people, the American people and the international community.
Before the invasion, Iraq's production capacity was three million barrels of oil per day.
But it cannot return to this level of production in the time allotted to establish an Iraqi government.
An increase of production requires the development of oil installations, which requires large investments, a government in place and political stability.
Nobody, not even the Bush administration, expects that these conditions will be met soon.
Political stability is the precondition to increase production capacity.
The experience of Iran, Kuwait, Russia and even Iraq shows that it takes around three years of political stability before production capacity can increase significantly and be sustainable.
It will take several years in Iraq to develop a new constitution, establish a democratic government, negotiate the distribution of oil revenues between the different regions, regulate investment, and make the economy attractive to foreign investors.
It will also take time to negotiate with multinational oil companies and neighbouring countries the achievement of the feasibility studies and technical studies, as well as the reconstruction, the restoration and the exploration of its oil fields.
Also, even a period of 3 years seems optimistic, because that presumes that during this time the occupation will come to an an end, Iraqis will set up their own government and political instability will have been stopped.
But the reality risks being very different.
Serious tensions can persist for years.
And it would not be shocking if Iraqi oil production were suddenly stopped, even with a democratic government.
History shows that the strikes and social unrest that could disrupt oil production arise more easily in a democratic framework than under a dictatorship.
If Iraq is unable to increase its oil production within the next few years, this will be a thorn in the foot, both for the foreign policy as well as the Energy Policy of the USA.
How will the latter be able to finance the reconstruction of Iraq over the long term ?
Who pays for the upkeep of Iraq's fragile democracy?
Could the US to maintain their occupation without providing the Iraqi people, medical care and other basic services?
These are difficult questions, and we cannot respond until a democratic regime neither controls nor guarantees Iraqi oil production.
Let murderers defend human rights
If it were not so sad, it would be the macabre joke of the Millennium: Libya was elected to lead the United Nations Commission on Human Rights!
While Caligula appointed his horse to the Senate, the horse, at least, had no blood on its hooves.
Of course, the procedure was perfectly legal: the presidency changes every year from one region of the world to another.
This year it was at the Africa's turn to appoint the president and they appointed Libya.
Only the US and Canada have voted against.
To their infinite shame, the European countries abstained.
That this decision comes at such a difficult time for the United Nations speaks volumes about the moral bankruptcy of this organization.
President Bush has defied the United Nations to demonstrate their seriousness about their own binding decisions on Iraq: otherwise, they can suffer the same ignominious fate as the League of Nations, which proved impotent in the 1930s when it faced the aggressive policies of Nazi Germany and fascist Italy.
The election of Libya to preside over a United Nations body responsible for upholding human rights at the moment doesn't do anything to support the legitimacy and moral authority of the global body.
Remember that Libya is a totalitarian state; its leader, Muammar Ghaddafi, combines capricious behavior with political extremists by supporting dictators around the world.
He heads one of the most tyrannical regimes in the world, one of nothing but sham elections and where opposing views are instantly quashed.
Under his reign, Libya has supported terrorist organizations worldwide, from the IRA to numerous Palestinian extremist groups.
She still faces United Nations sanctions for her role in the attack against a Pan Am flight over Lockerbie, Scotland, ten years ago.
Over the last decade, the position of the United Nations as a symbol of the ideals of a peaceful global community has regularly been undermined.
They have proved quite incapable of stopping the war in the Balkans; and in at least one case, Srebrenica, the Dutch forces of the United Nations peacekeeping remained present for the worst massacre of post-war Europe while the Bosnian Serbs massacred around 6,000 defenseless Muslims.
A Dutch inquiry commission has later admitted that the Dutch UN battalion was in fact complicit in this war crime.
In Rwanda, when the genocide began, the UN representative in charge of peacekeeping operations ordered the evacuation of the United Nations forces from the country, leaving the field open to the bloodiest genocide since World War II.
The name of this United Nations representative is Kofi Annan.
It is a depressing and pitiful past that the United Nations is trying, probably in vain, to redeem itself for by appearing to be the voice of reason and international legitimacy in the Iraq crisis.
But at a time when the UN inspections in Iraq look like the Salvation Army to remove a bunch of gangsters, it may be that the election of Libya as head of the Commission on Human Rights remains historic day, that of the final failure of an organisation whose creation had raised great hopes.
Organizations do not usually die, and certainly, the national interest is too great not to ensure that the United Nations will continue to stand in the way.
But they will not be more than a shadow of what they should, and could, be.
The United Nations of today gives hypocrisy a bad name.
They are the supporters of authority.
Last Thursday, the judges of the central court of Jakarta in Indonesia  sentenced me to one year in prison.
According to the court, as Editor-in-Chief of Tempo Weekly Newsmagazine,  I am guilty of defamation against Tomy Winata, a business tycoon, for having implied his possible involvement in a fire in the Jakarta textile market of Southeast Asia and of having instigated riots by spreading lies.
Do my case and other similar cases forebode once more the end of a short democratic experiment in Indonesia?
"The riots" that I incited occurred in March last year when almost 200 thugs invoking Winata attacked the Tempo offices, threatening to burn down the building, hounding the personnel and injuring a journalist.
To try to resolve the situation peacefully, I was persuaded to go negotiate at the central office of the Jakarta police and I discovered, horrified, that the leaders of the gang had seized power at the police station.
I was beaten and kicked while the police stood by doing nothing.
Fortunately, many journalists came to our rescue with tape recorders and cameras to record the events.
The release of these images set off a public outcry and forced Parliament to open a public inquiry.
The leaders of the national police and the Jakarta police were called and, because of strong pressure from public opinion, the leaders of this clique were charged.
However, Winata himself escaped from the police investigation simply by declaring publicly that his supporters acted without informing him and without his agreement.
Then he brought a complaint himself against Ahmad Taufik, the author of the article, Teuku Iskandar Ali, the publisher, and myself.
The trial hearings, which lasted a year, were marked by a series of suspicious developments, all favorable to Winata.
First, the case brought by the police and the prosecutor contained documents so blatantly forged that the police arraigned two officers.
But the court rejected the request to suspend the hearings until the clarification of the legality of the prosecutor's case.
The case against the officers involved seems to lead nowhere.
Instead, one of them has been promoted to head the new anti-terror unit of Jakarta, which has just been created (and is funded by the US).
The other one, it is said, was referred back to police school to receive specialized training.
Then, after six months of hearings, the lead judge panel of three judges was suddenly promoted to head a municipal court at a time of Jakarta.
One of my lawyers noted that in 35 years of practice in court, he had never seen a lead judge be replaced in the case.
In fact, despite his promotion, the judge continued to preside over another case in the same building.
A judge who in the past had ruled against Tempo during the civil case brought by Winata came to replace him.
Finally, Winata, during his testimony, presented false testimony by denying he was interviewed by Tempo.
A recording of the telephone conversation was broadcast during the hearings, the journalist who made the interview and the two authors who witness it made a statement under oath, the telephone company gave official documents attesting of the phone call as evidence of its existence and experts testified that the voice of the recording was one of Tomy Winata.
However, the judges rejected the request of Tempo's arrest Winata asking to be tried for perjury and advised us to file a complaint with the police, something we did.
The judges have rejected our request to defer the decision of the court, until the case of Mr Winata's false testimony is judged.
In view all of these vices, my conviction and prison sentence, are hardly surprising.
But I am very hopeful of winning in the end when Tempo's call will be brought before superior bodies.
Indonesian higher courts are more respectful of ethics and the director of the Supreme Court is a staunch defender of democracy and freedom of expression. The Tempo case could become a decisive step for our democracy, like the famous Supreme Court decision in the United States in the New York Times vs. Sullivan case.
Having met the threshold of tolerance in the accusations against libel, this decision has led the American press to demand accountability of the leaders of public affairs.
No country knows better than Indonesia that freedom of expression and freedom of the press are proven signs of democratic development and that the punishment of journalists is on of the first symptoms of authoritarianism.
Indonesia was a liberal democracy in the 1950s, before the muzzling of the press by President Sukarno, aided by the military junta in 1956.
With all criticism stifled, the consolidation of power without any opposition was easy, and in July 1959, Sukarno could announce the start of the "enlightened democracy."
During the first few years following the collapse of Sukarno in 1966, all the advantages of real democracy, including freedom of press, were restored (except for the communists).
However, President Suharto's regime also launched in the muzzling of the press in the early 1970s by suspending various newspapers and putting many journalists in jails.
With the press muzzled, other political rights were quickly violated and Indonesian democracy vanished once more.
Since the fall of Suharto in 1998, Indonesia has become the third largest democratic country in the world and the first democratic Muslim community in history.
The free, fair and peaceful elections were held twice for the election of parliament and the direct election of President, including the last presidential election, proving the co-existence between Islam and democracy.
The enemies of democracy never rest nonetheless.
Islamic extremist groups have thrown themselves into bomb attacks without distinction, while groups with pronounced authoritarian tendencies have broken through into circles close to President Megawati.
But Mrs. Megawati has just lost the recent presidential elections.
Will Susilo, the newly elected president, continue to persecute journalists?
My conviction, and the trials and sentences of other journalists, will it mark the beginning of the end of the third Indonesian democracy which was so hardly won?
The answer lies in the support that the Indonesian democratic activists can generate domestically and internationally.
Losing Indonesia, potential symbol of the hope for all democracy activists in the Muslim world, would be a terrible defeat.
The moral of the death penalty
The United States is often reproached for their refusal to abolish the death penalty.
Many people claim today that the abolition of capital punishment is a necessary condition for a civilised system of criminal law.
The Nobel Prize winner Gary Becker is not of this opinion.
European governments are resolutely opposed to the death penalty -- the European Union bans it completely, and some Europeans believe that its use in the USA is barbaric.
In fact, many European intellectuals think that capital punishment, and any punishment in general, are ineffective in deterring criminals.
But while the Europeans, with crime rates far below those of the USA during the last half-century, have long entertained a certain 'softness' on most crimes, we have seen their crime rates increase sharply over the past twenty years.
On the contrary, American rates have fallen partly due to increased use of reprimands.
The death penalty is a part of it.
I am for the execution of some people accused of murder only because I believe that it prevents other murders.
If I were not convinced of it, I would be opposed to capital punishment, because revenge and other such motives should not serve as a foundation for public policy.
Serious empirical research about the death penalty in the United States began with a study by Isaac Ehrlich, published in 1975 in the American Economic Review.
Some studies have sometimes found a very weak deterrent effect, others a much stronger effect.
However, available data are quite limited, one should therefore not base any conclusions solely on the econometric evidence.
Evidemmently, public policy in terms of punishment can't hope for perfect evidence.
But even with the limited quantitative evidence available, the good reasons to believe the deterrent power of the death penalty are sufficient.
Most people, and murderers in particular, fear death, especially when it follows swiftly and almost inexorably committing murder
As David Hume said about suicide, "no man has ever rejected life as long as it was worth living".
Such is our natural horror of death..., "that even Schopenhauer believed that" when the horrors of life reach the point where they are beyond the horrors of death, a man puts an end to his life.
But the terrors of death mount considerable resistance ... "
Opponents of the death penalty often claim that the State has no right, morally, to take the life of anyone, as this would be the most reprehensible murderer.
Nevertheless,  it is an entirely wrong conclusion to think that capital punishment is a deterrent.
To see why, suppose that for every murderer executed, (instead of, say, sentenced to life in prison) the number of murders is reduced by three, which is a figure much lower than that of Ehrlich and other estimates of the effect of deterrence.
This means that for every murderer not yet executed, three innocent victims will die.
In fact, the government "would take" many lives indirectly if it did not use the death penalty.
To save three innocent lives for each person executed seems a very attractive trade off, and even two lives saved for each execution appears to be a persuasive cost/benefit ratio in favour of the death penalty.
We must agree, however, that the argument in favour of capital punishment is less clear-cut when the number of lives saved by each execution decreases.
But even if one life was saved in each execution, the deal can still be desirable if the life saved is much better than the one removed, which is usually the case.
Many are protesting the idea of comparing the quality of the life spared with that of the one which is put to an end.
Yet I do not see how to avoid such a comparison.
Take the case of a career criminal robbing and killing a victim who led a blameless life and left several children and a partner behind him or her.
Suppose that it would be possible to save the life of an innocent victim by executing a criminal of that sort.
It seems clear to me that saving the life of such a victim must carry more weight than taking the life of the criminal.
Evidently, all the cases are not so clear, but a comparison of the quality of individual lives must be part of any reasonable social policy.
This is why the death penalty should be used for murders and not for less serious crimes.
When it comes to a choice between taking lives and, for example, reducing thefts of private property, the theory of more lenient punishment is much more powerful.
Although some serious assaults, including some appalling rapes, sometimes come close to murders in their seriousness, and may call for the death penalty, I am not in favor of its use in such cases.
One of the main arguments for reserving the death penalty for murder is the "marginal deterrence" factor.
If the attacks were punished by the death penalty, that would induce attackers to kill their victims so as not to be found out (which is a major reason why the severity of the punishment should be proportional to the seriousness of the crime).
One of the complications could be, however, that a murderer would fight with more pugnacity to avoid being caught, which could cause more deaths.
But, although marginal deterrence is important, I believe the resistance to murderers being captured, possibly at the expense of their own lives, is really evidence that criminals do fear capital punishment.
Naturally, the risk of executing innocent people worries me.
My support for the death penalty would very much weaken if the number of executions of innocent people were as large as many people say it is.
However, I believe that the appeals process in the United States provides great protection, not so much against wrongful convictions as against unfair executions; which means that there were few, if any, cases of people executed and then later proved innocent.
And this situation has been immensely strengthened by the development of identification by DNA.
I repeat that the debate surrounding the death penalty is a debate on the power of dissuasion (which can be diminished by excessively long appeals).
I can understand that some remain skeptical before the existing evidence, although I think they are wrong about this as well as about the meaning of the problem.
It is very disturbing to take somebody's life, even a murderer, but sometimes extremely unpleasant acts are necessary to prevent worse behaviour that causes the deaths of innocent victims.
The people against Putin
I have contributed to the choice of Vladimir Putin to succeded the first democratically elected president, Boris Yeltsin.
Given that structures such as the KGB and the Mafia now rule Russia and manipulate the judicial system, it is accepted that Yeltsin himself wanted to choose his successor in order to avoid prosecution.
But we who chose Putin were charged with finding a successor fit to continue the reforms initiated by Yeltsin, and not someone who would protect him and his family.
Yeltsin was afraid of nothing, and did not think about his own survival, but the survival of the democratic principles that he had introduced in Russia.
This idea is, however, now threatened by the successor that we have chosen.
I do not seek to deny responsibility for my support for Putin.
We were not intimate friends, but he and I have worked together in critical situations, and I have never doubted her sincerity.
Putin acts according to his beliefs.
The problem is that his convictions, notably the belief that Russia cannot prosper if it is not led by a single source of power, are incorrect.
This gross error is in the process leading Russia to political ruin.
Obviously, nobody can hold a highly responsible job without making mistakes, even fundamental errors, and this is especially true when times are hard.
Yeltsin was not the exception, but he acknowledged his mistakes.
When he retired on Dec. 31, 1999, he asked for forgiveness for launching the war in Chechnya.
Putin, on the other hand, seems incapable of recognizing and admitting his mistakes, and persists with a policy long after its failure is apparent in the eyes of the world.
One of the errors of Yeltsin was his failure to put the moral priorities at the head of his reform program.
Russia should have repented of Stalinism and the system of gulags.
The entire nation, without exception, should have repent, as the Germans have done since 1945.
This failure counts, because it has allowed Putin's unconditional faith in centralized authority to lead to a new capture of the state by the security services.
Indeed, a direct result of national repentance should have been the ban of the Communist Party and the disqualification of all political office of those who worked for the KGB.
Even if such political sorting is not simple in post-communist societies, where victims and collaborators were so numerous and the border between the two sometimes so blurred, a viable solution could have been, as in the Czech Republic.
The choice to do nothing has left the Russian security structures unscathed and able to make their return on the political scene, which is what they have achieved today.
The resurrection of political structures of the KGB under Putin, and their efforts to silence the despised, have again changed Russia in a country of defectors.
It is impossible to silence the politicians and the independent media without stifling the independent sources of funding, which explains why the Putin's Kremlin has focused his attacks on the so-called "oligarchs".
The arrest of Mikhail Khodorkovsky and his trial have been orchestrated for this very reason.
By suppressing independent financial sources, the security services who dominate the Kremlin hope to destroy independent political life in Russia.
Without any basis for independent thinking, it is a climate of fear that unfolds.
But fear is not only degrading, it does not allow for good governance.
Yeltsin had intuitively understood that fear and centralized decision-making and a top-down approach could be the right way to run a modern country, and he thus insisted on reforming relations between citizens and state.
Putin still does not understand that a centralized political system is as unable to understand and correct mistakes today as it was during the Soviet era.
Without a solid education, Putin is, quite frankly, leading Russia towards the same disintegration that accompanied the break-up of the Soviet state.
The people are beginning to see it.
He notes that the desire for Putin to create a strong and effective modern state cannot be achieved, as a modern state is governed not from on high, but by informed citizens that force their leaders to recognize and correct their mistakes.
Putin, too, seems to accuse the impotence of his regime.
This is one of the reasons that made Russia so aggressive with its neighbours, Ukraine and Georgia, and that pushed it to maintain a military presence in places like Transdneistria, the secessionist region of Moldova.
By imposing to Russia's neighbouring regions, the Kremlin believes it can persuade the Russians of its omnipotence.
Given that the debates in Russia are castrated and that the Kremlin is able to rig the elections, regime change is the only remaining solution to preserve the idea of democracy.
It is pointless to cling to illusions.
Those who oppose Putin must decide what they want and announce that if the regime fails to uphold the constitution, they have the right to force it by all means.
Today, the question of power in Russia can no longer be decided through elections.
As in the Ukraine, Lebanon, and Kyrgyzstan, it will be decided in the streets.
Tax and spend (please)
Excessive taxation can dull incentives and hamper growth.
But a poor taxation can also produce the same effects.
Governments with little tax revenue can not provide essential public services.
Worse yet, low tax revenues in poor countries often result from problems with tax collection (rather than low tax rates), which also stagnate productivity.
India illustrates the importance of a well designed tax system.
In Bangalore, high-tech companies have built world-class campuses replete with manicured lawns and high-speed data communication networks.
Outside of the campuses, however, lie open sewers, uncollected garbage, and roads in an advanced state of decay.
While technology companies transmit terabytes of data to distant continents instantly, local transportation advances at an almost medieval rate.
Therefore, companies in Bangalore exploit their own bus services, outsource drinkable water to private providers, and install generators to protect themselves against power failures.
The state cannot compensate for this disaster because it is bankrupt.
The debt of the Indian government exceeds 70% of GDP so that more than half of its tax revenues are spent on interest payments.
But debt is not the fate of excessive spending in the past.
India's government spending accounts for around 15% of the GDP, as against an average of about 40% of GDP of the OECD.
India's financial difficulties tend to result from a ill-conceived and badley-managed tax system.
The rates and the rules for income taxes for individuals and companies appear to be reasonable given the international standards.
However, the government of India collects taxes on income, which represent only about 3.7% of GNP, roughly half of those of South Korea and the other Asian tigers.
Agriculture in India is about a quarter of GDP, but even the rich farmers do not pay taxes.
Exporting businesses in the software industry and in other industries benefit from a temporary tax exemption on their profits, although their employees pay taxes on their personal income.
Despite reasonable rates, tax fraud is commonplace.
Fraud happens because the government has not invested in sufficient staff or systems to uncover the nonpaying taxpayers, who are rarely sent to prison and who can often get out of trouble by paying out bribes if they do get caught.
More subtly, flight of "direct" taxes on income and profits reflects the disorder inherent to the "indirect tax system " from production and consumption.
The excise duty account for more than 60% of indirect taxes from India, which are in turn the same proportion of its tax revenue.
The base excise duty has been set at 16% of the value of a company's production.
Then come different cuts, exemptions and surcharges.
For example, a "favorable conditions entitlement rate" of 8% is taken from groups like food, matches, cotton yarns and computers.
A supplementary "special excise duty" of 8% is levied on products which contain polyester fibers, on cars, on air conditioners and on tires.
An "additional excise duty" (not to be confused with a "special excise duty") is levied on "goods of particular importance."
The exemption from excise duties are many and complex, including companies with total annual income below 10 million rupees and businesses located in some rough or backward areas.
In general, exemptions fall into 70 major categories, themselves subdivided into 259 entries, 52 conditions and 7 lists, each one containing many elements.
Exemptions foster abuse.
For a certain amount, officials at the bottom of the hierarchy, who have shown exemplary discretion in the implementation of the conditions, can be encouraged to give favorable interpretations.
The products with high tax rates (for example, polished granite) are sold as products taxed at lower rates (for example, like unpolished granite).
Evasion of excise taxes is more contagious than evasion of taxes on profits and incomes.
If one firm evades excise taxes and the tax rate is high compared with pretax profit margins in the industry, its competitors also have to cheat just to survive.
While the fraud rises, the governments take taxes' extra 'or' special 'that lead to greater fraud.
Perceptions of direct taxes also suffer.
The bribe paid to the collector of excise duties for a favorable classification, the difference between the value of polished and unpolished granite, and the omission of recording the real income are creating 'black' funds, which cannot be declared on the forms of statement of income.
In addition to weakening the state's capacity to provide public goods, the key to escaping the indirect taxes discourage businesses from adopting more productive technologies, which requires technologies involving a large-scale deployment.
But as indirect taxes can be more easily circumvented by several small units instead of one big unit, it is impossible to achieve economies of scale.
It is important to note that in the software industry, where all the units are exempted from indirect taxes, Indian companies operate on an effective scale.
Could India follow the example of China, where the rationalization of indirect taxes in 1994 prepared the ground for a big boom?
Or are coalition governments in a vigorous democracy incapable of such a reform?
Last year, the government led by the BJP India has passed a law allowing significant reductions in the budget deficit.
He then appointed a task force to effect the necessary changes to the policies regarding public spending and taxes.
Last July, the working group has proposed to increase taxes (rather than cut spending) by removing the majority of exemptions in indirect taxes, among other things.
The new Congress led government of India also seems to promote these proposals.
If Congress and the opposing parties follow, they will help considerably to support the economic growth of the company, and to dispel the idea that democracies cannot take the necessary measures to encourage development.
What is the problem with Turkey?
On 16 December, Orhan Pamuk, one of the most famous Turkish authors, will face a court in Istanbul. He must respond to accusations of "insult to the national identity," in order to be voted in favour of an open discussion on the genocide by the Turks to 1.5 million Armenians in 1915 and 1916.
Pamuk incurred three years in prison.
Turkey's efforts to impose fines and jail terms to those who go beyond the official framework convince me that I had reason to oppose the opening of negotiations on the country's accession to the European Union.
In December 1999, the European Council granted Turkey EU candidate status, which implied that Turkey would enter the Union at an undetermined future date.
Then the council asked the European Commission to decide before October 2004 whether Turkey met the necessary political criteria for membership, which include democracy, the rule of law and respect for the rights of ethnic minorities.
This decision was one of the last taken by the Romano Prodi's Commission, which I was a member of.
Among its 30 members, 29 have said that Turkey sufficiently satisfied the criteria to be able to continue.
I was the only dissident.
It is the very report of the Commission on Turkey, prepared by Günter Verheugen, then in charge of EU enlargement, that motivated my decision.
This report stated that in 2003, approximately 21 870 Turks have sought asylum in the EU, of which 2 127 have been accepted.
In other words, the EU governments have themselves acknowledged in 2003 that the Turkish government had persecuted over 2,000 of its own citizens.
Meanwhile, the commission published a progress report on Turkey stating that reforms were continuing, although at a slower pace, under the guidance of the moderate Islamic government of Prime Minister Recep Tayyip Erdogan.
This report was however stating serious doubts: human rights violations, including torture, were continuing, the military influence retained too much power; freedom of expression was not universally respected; non-Islamic religious and cultural minorities were victims of discrimination and violence against women was not facing a sufficiently strong opposition.
The situation has not changed much since the discussions on accession began in October.
Besides the persecution of which Pamuk is currently the victim, unacceptable behaviors abound.
In March 2005, the police violently intervened in a demonstration marking International Women's Day.
In May, the largest teaching union was banned for supporting the education of 14 million Kurds in Turkey in their own language.
It is undeniable that intolerance reaches is the highest levels of the Turkish government.
Foreign Minister Abdullah Gul has recently abruptly cancelled a press conference in Copenhagen when he saw a Kurdish journalist in the public that Danes have refused to move out.
Such actions and such attitudes justify for the most part my disagreement with the events of October 2004.
But even if these problems were corrected, Turkey should not be admitted into the EU, because it is not an European country.
Christianity, feudalism, the Renaissance, the Enlightenment, democracy, and industrialization have made us what we Europeans are, but not so for the Turks.
So I am not sure that reforms in Turkey, implemented at the insistance of the European Commission, would be pursued after membership.
I suspect even that there would be repeat offences.
In addition, Turkey's accession would lead to that of Ukraine, Belarus and Moldova, and perhaps of Georgia, Armenia and Azerbaijan.
These first three countries are certainly more European than Turkey is.
Aside from the three Caucasus republics, but counting the successor states to Yugoslavia, this would mean an EU of some 35 members.
What kind of union would it be?
The EU is not merely a club for friends.
It is founded on freedom of movement of goods, services, capital, and people.
The Commission, as guardian of the Union treaties, must protect these four fundamental freedoms, which means that it must sometimes persuade and, if necessary, force, member states to change their laws.
The policies on alcohol in Sweden, the Volkswagen Law in Germany and discrimination against foreign investment funds in France are examples of cases that have made the commission unpopular.
But they were necessary.
When I left the commission, I had to myself a stack of 1,500 findings of irregularities in this style.
In short, joining the EU means accepting incisive measures which deeply affect the internal affairs of a État.
It would be impossible with such disparate members.
The EU would fall victim to what the historian Paul Kennedy calls "imperial overreach."
It would dilute in an unacceptable way.
This is why the former French President Valéry Giscard d'Estaing feared that Turkey's membership would lead to the end of the EU, and this is why the former German Chancellor Helmut Schmidt said: "Turkey's admission would be more than the EU could bear."
But the strongest reason to oppose Turkey's membership is a question of democracy: the majority of the population of the EU simply doesn't want to.
The crisis in Bolivia, a failure of Latin America.
Bolivia is far from being a typical Latin American country.
And if it wasn't for the turmoil in Haiti, it would be the poorest country in the Western Hemisphere: it is even less stable than Haiti as shown by its history and two hundred coups since its independence.
In a region in the indigenous strong past , but at present fragmented and isolated, Bolivia is, perhaps, with Guatemala, the only Latin American countries where the indigenous peoples, represent the majority population.
Its topography and its ethnic distribution generate autonomous and even separatist forces that threaten the national unity in a much more provocative way than anywhere else.
And it is, of course, with Paraguay, the only country in the whole subcontinent denied access to the sea.
It would be imprudent to extrapolate the crisis that Bolivia is going through right now to the rest of Latin America.
The generalization would be far too simplistic: at any rate, institutions are much stronger, poverty, and particularly extreme poverty, has been reduced, and struggles over ownership of natural resources have generally been settled.
Even in countries such as Venezuela, which has huge reserves of oil and has a nationalist government with a traditional mind , the status quo had enabled the preservation of foreign investments during the almost eight years of government of President Hugo Chavez.
Even if the existence of indigenous movements is a reality in many countries, from the Chiapas to the "Araucania", from the amazon to Ayacucho, they have never posed any real threat to the national integrity of any country in Latin America.
Thus, Bolivia is not a crisis an omen, nor the eternal ‘ domino theory, "which Lyndon Jonhson and Che guevarra believed both in the case of Bolivia, is valid or even partially reasonable.
However, the current crisis in Bolivia, points a finger at the "democratic deficit" afflicting Latin America.
The elected leaders have failed for one reason or another in Bolivia, Ecuador and Haiti.
Democracy is weak or absent in Cuba, Mexico and Nicaragua, and is under threat for one reason or another in Venezuela and Colombia.
None of these cases is like the others and they all comprise different degrees of risk, destruction and reconciliation.
It remains to be known what can be done against this state of affairs, which contrasts strongly with the encouraging signs that prevailed until recent years.
At the last meeting of the American States Organization, which was held in Fort Lauderdale, Florida, the delegation of the United States has set a good idea provided by others and were simply cast because of his support.
The story began two years earlier when Dante Caputo, former foreign minister from Argentina, and the UN Development Program (UNDP) were responsible for preparing a report on democracy in Latin America.
Their findings showed that an early-warning system of democracy in the region would help to generate some actions before any loss of control, such as is the case in Bolivia today.
Mr Caputo and the team of the UNDP had convinced Chile's President Ricardo Lagos to take charge of the initiative and to promote it with several of his colleagues.
What he has done without the initiative getting very far.
In fact, the UNDP report on democracy in Latin America, published in 2004, hardly mentions it.
The United States and the new Secretary General of the OAS, Jose Miguel Insulza, the plan during the OAS meeting in Florida, but she was killed by a reasonable apprehension of Latin Americans believe that s' act is an action against Venezuela, coupled with anachronistic fears of Latinos on the violation of the sacrosanct principle of non intervention.
Despite the impossibility that the continent agree on the principle, the idea of an early-warning system should be studied.
Today, the Latin-American community probably has little possibility of any intervention into the situation in Bolivia, and yet it is dangerous for everyone.
Evo Morales, the opposition leader and of coca leaf growers, may be an honest Democratic leader, though a tad unwise, but are his supporters all free of any authoritarian will?
Hugo Chavez is perhaps not financing Mr. Morales and other Bolivian dissidents, but aren't Venezuela and Cuba tempted to meddle in the affairs of this country where Che Guevarra died at the head of the guerrilla resistance almost 40 years earlier?
The business community of Santa Cruz in Bolivia does not perhaps give out its threat to secede, but they prefer to share oil reserves and natural gas in their area with indigenous peoples rather than upland Brazilian industrialists in Sao Paulo?
Before the events get out of hand, it might be good for the OAS (and not the USA) to get involved.
The region continues to need such assistance, in terms of time, message, and appropriate democratic platform, distinct from the traditional American meddling and the usual indifference of Latin America.
The decline of France?
The French are notoriously susceptible, not to say on the defensive about the image of France abroad.
The French government spends a substantial amount to the spread of language and French culture, but the French are painfully aware that their country's global position is not what it was.
In this context, it is not surprising that during the last presidential election, the publication of a report by the European Commission stating that the economic status of France among the European countries had increased from 3
The OECD and Eurostat, the European organization charged with gathering these data, believed they had put an end to this aspect of the debate by demonstrating that France, Germany, Italy and Britain all had nearly identical per capita standards of living.
But on a larger scale the controversy has not disappeared.
Worried rumors on the "French decline" have reappeared with the protest marches held this year against pension reform, the growing disputes on fiscal policy with the European Commission and the bickering with America on the war in Iraq.
The most successful non-fiction book in France at the moment is a polemic written by Nicolas Baverez, The Fall of France.
Baverez's book of is full of quotes from de Gaulle and Napoleon.
According to the author, France's latest achievements date back to 1970, with the high-speed train, the TGV, and Airbus.
It critisise strongly both Mitterrand and Chirac  with "a same talent to win the elections and to make France a loser."
The success of the book is itself a sign of "unease".
But what kind?
Evidence of degeneration brought about by Baverez is not as convincing as he wants us to believe.
For example, he cites the depletion of industrial jobs as the more dramatic proof of France's decline.
But de-industrialization is a common reality to all advanced countries.
Indeed, France obtained much better results than most of its rich  neighboring competitors and, unlike Germany, the UK or US, it has maintained the same world market share in the industrial sector that it owned in the early 1970s.
Also, according to a more precise competitiveness and foreign investment measure, France has excellent results in these areas.
According to a recent report published by the Council of Economic Analysis, direct investment in France rose to 60 billion euros in 2001, almost twice as much as in Germany.
The French competitive cost has also improved (20%) in the past three decades, with higher productivity counterbalancing the rapid growth in wages.
But the heart of France's long-term economic problems actually lies in the fear of losing industrial jobs.
France remains a strong industrial power in traditional sectors such as automotive and aerospace, but has lagged in innovative markets in which smaller companies disseminate new technologies.
France, for example, spends only $30 billion per year in research and development on advanced technologies, versus $51 billion in Germany, $98 billion in Japan, and $265 billion in the United States.
In short, Baverez's analysis pointed in the wrong direction.
France has undertaken several major reforms over the past two decades: economic and financial liberalisation, the elimination of price and exchange rate controls, the end of restrictions on credit, European liberalisation, reducing inflationary and trade deficits, the advent of the euro and the forced globalisation of companies in the country.
The French malaise was certainly not caused by these reforms.
The problem of France is just that she has failed to recognize the new world that she is already part of.
French capitalism is dead and France can't come to accept it's disappearance.
France must be the only country where a Prime Minister, Lionel Jospin, felt obliged to apologise after saying on television that "the state is not omnipotent."
There are several reasons for this French schizophrenia, but the most important of these concerns the politics of the past 20 years.
Until 1981, France was clearly divided between right and left sides.
Since that time, the Mitterrand and Chirac administrations downplayed their ideological side to implement the difficult process of adapting to Europe and globalization.
A "shock therapy", the Mrs Thatcher's way, two decades ago could have set the foundations for a new political consciousness.
But the slow, consensual passage of reforms allowed the French to live in one world and think in another.
This fact explains much of the political cataclysm that exploded during the last presidential campaign, when the leader of the extreme right Jean-Marie Le Pen reached the second round of presidential elections against the exiting prime minister, Lionel Jospin.
The rise of the extreme left, which has won 10% of votes in this presidential campaign, also attests to this political failure.
France needs a political revolution more than an economic revolution, if it wants to come to accept reality, including the fact that French "decline" is a fear created by the French people.
The value of the European currency.
European leaders have resumed talks on the constitutional issues that had ended in December following a dispute on voting rights.
These debates naturally lead to compromise, which will be soon.
Still in need of clear understanding are the supposed objectives of the constitution.
Two fundamental principles have led to European integration: solidarity and subsidiarity.
These two principles are at the crossroads of philosophy, politics, economics, sociology and the law.
For years, they were an integral part of the legal and institutional structure of the European Union, in the treaties, in the Charter of Fundamental Rights (which the quote in the preamble) and in the recent draft constitution.
In short, they are registered in the history and ideals of the EU.
But what is the real significance of these two principles?
Let's consider solidarity, which lends itself to two interpretations at least: static solidarity, which concerns solely the distribution of income and wealth, and the wider concept of dynamic solidarity, which concerns the production of income and wealth.
In the history of post-war European integration, dynamic solidarity  strongly manifested during the first period, especially in the European Coal and Steel Community, both in its economic development strategy (reconstruction) in the treaties, particularly the Treaty of Rome.
This does not mean that the dynamic solidarity was subsequently removed: the European monetary union, for example, perfectly expresses this principle.
Thus, although some countries were not immediately benefited from the euro, they nevertheless accepted it because they were convinced that it would have positive effects on the long term.
In other words, dynamic solidarity means promoting policies that encourage investment, innovation, economic growth and employment.
However, as indicated by the growth of GNP in the EU, solidarity momentum has been undermined over the last decade.
The gap between research and development is particularly worrying.
The implementation of the so-called Lisbon strategy, adopted by the EU in 2000 with the promise of creating the world's most competitive economy, is threatened by the growing importance attached to solidarity, reflected in the high costs of social aid and the high taxes needed to finance them.
The primacy of static solidarity is due to an aging population which, together with sluggish growth, has led to structural fiscal imbalances.
One of the greatest challenges posed to the EU is to treat the predominance of static solidarity , which is geared towards the elderly, at the expense of solidarity dynamics, which encourages young people.
After all, the Union cannot allow current consumption to keep winning over the investment needed for future prosperity.
Subsidiarity is similar to the concept of solidarity in that its interpretation is twofold: vertical and horizontal subsidiarity.
Vertical subsidiarity concerns the distribution of powers among different levels of government and sovereignty: the EU, national states, regions, and municipalities.
The best known application of this principle is federalism.
European treaties clearly express this vertical subsidiarity.
But is this enough to encompass the emerging institutional and constitutional framework of the Union?
The horizontal subsidiarity is the responsibility and freedom of human beings and on the social and economic powers.
It encompasses relations between the state, society and the market.
But society and the market have their own rights and their own autonomy that are not granted by the state.
Then the next problem arises: how to ensure the autonomy of each kingdom?
An example of horizontal subsidiarity is the internal European market, which created a new type of economic freedom and increased competition among businesses by eliminating the protection of national governments.
Horizontal subsidiarity means that in society and in the economic sphere, the state cannot violate individual freedom and responsibility, which must be respected at the highest possible level.
It also implies that a "higher power" has to provide its support each time freedom and individual responsibility are not sufficient for achieving the objectives necessary for human dignity.
This support, however, must be allowed in ways that promotes the natural potential of individuals, society and the market.
But this is possible only if the role of the horizontal subsidiarity is clearly stated, which was not the case in the european treaties, the Charter of Fundamental Human Rights or the work of the European Convention.
In short, solidarity is today a redistribution rather than a growth (the current generation expressed solidarity with future generations) whereas the subsidiary is the distribution of political power rather than a cautious of the borders between the state, civil society and the market.
At the moment, these two values are set in a way that favors the State.
In effect, the emphasis placed on growth oriented towards the market has often been identified with the semi-strange values of America.
But these values are deeply rooted in Europe and they must be uprooted anew.
The EU must restore its economic vitality by pursuing a model of solidarity and subsidiarity more balanced in favour of the market and society, which would reduce the socio-economic influence of the state.
Public institutions must produce public assets (such as defence, justice and fiscal and monetary policy), society must offer social goods (such as culture, education and helping the needy) and the market must produce goods (related to profits, growth and employment.
In the 21st century, Europe must reconsider the value of these two principles (solidarity and subsidiarity) if it wants to achieve the historic objective of the integration: the freedom and the well-being needed to overcome the differences and political divisions that have resulted in the tragedies in the 20th century.
This is the spirit in which the European Constitution must be drawn up.
The politics of values
The debate about U.S. elections has still not abated.
How could President George W. Bush get three million votes more than Senator John Kerry, and offer a Republican majority in both houses of Congress?
There is little consensus on the answers, but there are two recurring themes in many explanations.
One of these issues lies in his personality.
In these uncertain times, people placed their trust in a president they knew rather than a candidate who had not yet been proven.
The second is that of values.
The citizens voted for a set of values rather than for specific policies.
Indeed, some (one would say) agree with Kerry's policies but nevertheless gave their vote to Bush because they felt "comfortable" with the whole of his attitude.
It is clear that the U.S. is now deeply divided about the electoral process.
An arch of blue States (Democrat), at the East, North and West stretches around a huge red zone (Republican) at the centre and the South.
Beyond the geographical division, the divisions recur at the local level.
Gerrymandering, the practice of drawing of electoral boundaries to favor one political party over another, is no longer needed.
Voters tend to be moved into areas where the majority of people share their values, whether Republican or Democrat.
What are these values, exactly?
These are the values that deal, from what they tell us, with "God, guns and gays."
Religion plays a role, especially with biblical truths in the history of creation.
The possession of a weapon is the ultimate test of individualism and the use of weapons in times of war is not obscene.
Gays and other "modern" practices are rejected as narsicisstic.
As the political scientist Andrew Hacker said recently, "The Bush candidacy was framed to make a majority by giving some 60 million people a chance to feel good about themselves."
Is all this an American phenomenon, or there are other trends elsewhere?
One answer is that as an American phenomenon, the politics of values may command a majority now, but is by no means general.
Europe and other parts of the world are divided in the same way.
Personality undoubtedly matters, and under the obvious political differences one finds questions of values that have not yet been highlighted.
However, traditional political differences based on disagreement over fundamental values play a diminishing role in elections.
The Prime Minister Tony Blair, for example, another leader facing an election in his country, plays the personality card and talks about policies, but he primarily represents a set of middle class values.
When he speaks of "modernisation" or "entering the 21st century," he manages to suggest a strange but attractive mix of change and stability.
This leaves the conservative opposition without any effective response.
Even the issues of tax cuts and stricter rules on asylum seeking fail to fly on the strings of the values' melody that the Republican party has managed to play to the United States' ears.
The situation is similar in Germany, where the overt influence values politics is even smaller.
The debate, in Germany, is still mostly a political debate.
When the opposition gives the government to negotiate the welfare reform or, more recently, to combat unemployment, the underlying challenge is not in terms of values, but instead of competence.
However, on the traditional battlefields of English or German political debate, and elsewhere in Europe, clashes of values threaten to occur.
The parties are fighting for those who can "feel comfortable in their own place ’, but they perhaps do not understand very well that this is only partly a political matter .
Religion will never be an important factor in European politics: opinion polls show that religious practice remains one of the rare, significant differences between Americans and Europeans.
The weapons also occupy a place in the minds of Europe: it is their absence that Europeans see as important.
Europe was no doubt well-versed in pacifist values.
And the question of politically correct (the "gay") also plays a less important role so far in Europe.
Above all, Europe itself divides Europeans, for the "national question" is present in all European countries.
It is a question of values inspired by fear.
People want to know where they stand and, in the process, will turn against the United states and towards Europe or against Europe and towards their own country.
Anyway, we are leaving the kingdom of policies and even politics, and are entering the nightmarish domain of symbols and myths.
Which, in any case, represents the main risk that democratic countries face, because the politics of values is a dangerous domain.
It reintroduced fundamental divisions of a society whose greatest democratic achievement was precisely to banish fundamentalism from political life.
An informed public debate must be a discussion on the policies contained in a community of values.
So it is essential to insist on this important goal of the policy of freedom.
The advent of interest
One swallow does not bring spring and a single month of growth of employment and price rises in the US does not mean that the Federal Reserve does not fear more unease and deflation.
But the time will come when the global interest rates will begin to increase as central bankers are preparing to resist the tide of rising inflation.
When that time comes, whether this autumn, in 2005 or 2006, or even in 2007, America and the global economy will have to deal with financial vulnerabilities reflecting the success of the last three years of monetary stimulation by arresting the decline in production and by curbing unemployment.
The short-term interest rates are surprisingly low: only 2% in the euro zone, just 1% in the United States and zero in Japan.
The monetary expansionist policy proved a success, but only after having brought interest rates down to historically low levels and having convinced investors that borrowing costs would remain at their current levels for a long time.
The stimulus has mostly resulted in an increase in asset prices: anything that produces a profit, a dividend, or rent becomes much more attractive, and therefore much more valuable in money terms, when interest rates remain very low.
This explains the huge differences between the current real estate prices in the United States, the ordinary shares in New York, London and Frankfurt, and the long-term bonds anywhere in the world and what should conventionally their core values be.
What will happen when central banks begin to raise their interest rates?
In 1994, rising interest rates in the short term has resulted in higher rates over the long term (and lower bond prices in the long term) at least twice that predicted by models standard this year.
Interest rates in peripheral developing economies have also increased much more than the rates in the major advanced industrial countries.
The first danger for 2005 and future years, when global interest rates rise, as is likely, is another wave of financial crises in emerging markets.
For countries such as Mexico, Brazil, Turkey, Argentina, Korea, Malaysia and Thailand, the decade of the 1990s demonstrates that differences in interest rates may rise and capital flows may reverse course remarkably rapidly, regardless of the degree of benevolence with which the representatives of the IMF and the analysis performed by the major banks consider the policies of a country.
Differences among interest rates in emerging markets are currently abnormally low.
International monetary flows, capital inflows to the United States excepted, are not yet at levels associated with "irrational exuberance", but there are chances of this happening before interest rates begin to climb.
This is alarming because if there is one lesson to take away from the 1990s, it is that nobody should overestimate the stability of international financial currents.
The second danger comes from high asset values in the major advanced industrial countries.
The dominant way of thinking within the Federal Reserve, which I fully support, argues that the information technology revolution continues, that the potential output in the US is still growing very quickly and that the output gap is relatively high.
This means that interest rates will certainly remain low for a relatively long period.
In addition, confidence in the Federal Reserve is high, and the last vestiges of the inflation risk premium of the 1970s no longer have any interest rate.
Therefore, even after production levels have returned to their previous levels, interest rates remain low by the standards of the 1980s and 1990s.
All of this is evidently good news for those who hold assets such as long term bonds, stocks and real estate.
Indeed, the rising prices of active on the long term was precisely what the lower interest rates had hoped: make the bondholders, and particularly property owners, richer and give after all a boost to spending.
But the bad news is that even if interest rates are expected to remain low for some time, they will not stay this low indefinitely.
The key is that when interest rates rise, the values of assets fall.
It is during these periods, especially when the assets values fall quickly and significantly, that we discover the full extent of our central bankers's competence in their main task: to reduce financial volatility and promote economic stability.
It is also during these periods that we discover how individuals who hold bonds in the long term, property or shares have them not because they believe current prices are reasonable compared to basic prices, but because their prices have risen in recent years.
It is a crucial issue for policymakers, because people who bought stocks for the long term because prices seemed to be increasing indefinitely are the same ones who will sell as soon as the trend seems to reverse itself.
Specifically, the trade deficit the US heralds a significant instability if asset prices in the long term should drop dramatically.
It is certain that the challenges facing the world's economic policy-makers in over the coming years will differ from those they have faced since the collapse of the NASDAQ bubble.
The associated risks with inflation are probably less dangerous than those generated by falling production and the threat of deflation.
But, as we have learned during the 1990s, that does not mean that the challenges ahead will be easier to resolve.
The opposing futures of America.
I recently discovered an interesting fact: American economists who are involved in international finance and American macro-economists who are concerned with the domestic economy have very different perspectives -- in fact, opposing ones -- on the possible consequences of the huge US deficit.
International finance economists consider that a financial crisis is possible, followed by a painful and possibly prolonged recession in the United States.
The macroeconomists dealing with the domestic economy instead see a further fall in the dollar's value not as a crisis but as an opportunity to accelerate growth.
The macro-economists who examined the domestic economy generally regard the circumstances as follows: at a time in the future, the foreign central banks will be less inclined to pursue their massive purchases of securities in dollars to support the greenback.
When they will put an end to their large scale dollar-purchase programs, the value of the dollar will fall, and it will fall sharply.
And from this point of view, if the dollar declines, U.S. exports will become more attractive for foreign markets, the U.S. employment market will recover, and the labor will be directed to the new booming export sectors.
The situation will be comparable to that of Britain when it abandoned its index of exchange rates and let the pound Sterling depreciate against the German mark, or what happened to the United States at the end of the 1980s when the dollar depreciated against the pound, the mark and -- especially -- against the Japanese yen.
international finance economists describe a gloomier future.
They sthink that the end of programs to buy dollars on a large scale by central banks will not only lead to the dollar decline but also to a soaring rate of American interests in the long term, which will depress household consumption, and will regulate investment spending after a short time.
Certainly, economists in international finance believe as well that American exports will benefit from the fall of the dollar, but the lag in demand is such that the surge in exports will only happen a year or two after the decline in consumption and investment spending.
Eight to ten million people will leave the service sector and the construction sector for the import-export of goods, implying that structural unemployment will increase.
Moreover, there might be a financial panic: the large financial institutions with short-term obligations and long-term assets will have difficulties to support a strong rise in long-term interest rates denominated in dollars.
This factor of inequality can lead to a certain financial tension and a bankruptcy just as easily as those caused during the crises in Mexico and East Asia in the 1990s or in Argentina during this decade because of assets in local currency and the dollar bonds held by the banks.
When international finance economists highlight this situation, the macroeconomists who specialize in home economics reply that it sounds like a case of incompetent monetary policy.
Why should the Federal Reserve allow the rise in long-term interest rates when the foreign central banks will end their programmes to buy dollars?
Should it not then intervene and take over by buying US Treasury bond in the long term, thus maintaining long-term interest rates at a satisfactory level to promote full employment?
Economists of international finance generally respond that the Federal Reserve does not have the ability to do so.
Forced to choose between full employment and price stability, according to them, the Federal Reserve will choose prices stability, because its institutional memory of the 1970s and of the soaring inflation remains very powerful.
So, since the fall in value of the dollar raise the price of importation which works as a negative shock on the supply side in the economic sector, the Federal Reserve will increase and not cut its interest rates and therefore sell rather than buying government bonds.
Serious economists  that I have great respect for are taking a stand on opposite sides of this debate.
I am not wise enough to give reason to one or the other, but I have no doubts about which side I hope to see to be wrong.
The worst students in Europe
In the US, states with misguided fiscal policies are penalised.
Their obligations are selling on the cheap compared to other better managed states.
The service of the higher debt that they would have to pay is, to a certain degree, a disciplinary measure against the temptation of spending today and paying later.
Of course, market discipline is not perfect: the bond market won't "see" the future implicit liabilities (such as promised pension payments).
However, the application of this fiscal discipline, combined with the internal budget process of each state, prevented the occurrence of the greatest fiscal crisis in the U.S. since the Great Depression.
Let's consider the case of Europe.
Before the advent of the euro, many countries in southern Europe were undergoing fiscal crises, producing waves of high inflation.
But with the introduction of the single currency, the path allowing a fiscal crisis to be solved by inflation has been blocked, since the European Central Bank (ECB) oversees monetary policy.
However, even if nations can no longer rely on inflation to address their financial imbalance, the single currency allows them to use the debt capacity which actually belongs to other members of the European Union to extend their spending boom and push away their political responsibility during "let the good times roll" periods.
It is to avoid this possibility that the EU has created the stability and growth pact: the budget deficit of governments must not exceed 3% of GDP.
Last week, the German government, formerly Europe's most prudent and fiscally prudent country, breached the pact's rules for the fifth consecutive year without offering (much) apology.
Finance Minister Peer Steinbrueck has indicated that he expected the European Commission to apply sanctions against Germany: the credibility of the pact would, he said, jeopardized if no action does was done.
Thus, Germany would not block sanctions that time, as was the case two and a half years ago.
But Steinbrueck has also made clear he only expected a purely symbolic sanction in response to the budget deficit of 3.4% of GDP, and no penalties that would have a true cost of his government or his economy.
The growth and stability pact is not, or not yet, working as planned at the start.
What about market discipline?
Is the will of the German government to increase its debt and increase its deficits limited by the fact that the market recognizes and penalizes nations that let their fiscal position erode?
In a word, no.
Interest rates on euro-denominated sovereign debt of the twelve euro-area governments are very similar.
The market doesn't seem to care that countries have different potentials to generate exports to fund the financial flow needed to repay debts, or different current or projected deficit-to-GDP ratios.
Willem Buiter of the University of Amsterdam and Anne Sibert, University of London, believe that acceptance by the ECB of any deficit in the Euro area guarantees that the market will be unable to contain fiscal moderation.
As the marginal part of German debt is used as collateral for short-term loans or as the center of a repurchase agreement to acquire cash, its value is much more likely to be determined by the terms on which ECB accepts collateral than by fundamentals.
The ECB's treatment of such debt is equally powerful as a source of liquidity that now trumps any analysis of differences in long-term sovereign risk.
It is dangerous in the long term.
It is necessary to have both a market discipline and a sound fiscal management for a reasonable chance to benefit from price stability over the long term.
Omit penalty now for the market behavior that may become reckless or the institutional levers that give a voice to future generations, and you are liable to suffer serious consequences - maybe not today not tomorrow, but someday, and for the rest of your life.
As time passes, the arrival of the single currency, and how the euro has been put in place are generating an increasing unease.
The policy of the entire Euro area in general is too deflationary.
The transfers necessary to render the current currency bearable for regions in a slowdown or already in recession when the ECB applies a more stringent policy have not been made.
The institutional foundations of a fiscal policy stable over the long term are being eroded.
Now, Buiter and Sibert convince us that the ECB gives the market less opportunity to reward the most economical and penalises the spenders when it shouldn't.
The earth isn't moving yet, and it won't happen for a while.
But the ground under the euro may well begin to shift if things do not change.
Milosevic and Hussein: same trial, even farce
Trials of war criminals were once serious undertakings.
Remember the photographs of the sinister Herman Goering and Rudolf Hess on the dock at Nuremberg.
Some of the Nazi leaders were hung after a relatively short, but fair, trial.
Nowadays, the trials of the most abject leaders of the world have become farcical.
The trial of Saddam Hussein and his friends of Baath are an uninterrupted series of embarrassing moments.
The defendants are trying one bit of monkey business after another and Hussein makes all possible displays of contempt. The only thing he hasn't done yet, is to moon the judge.
It is difficult to expect an outcome that could seem legitimate in the eyes of Iraqis or the world.
Meanwhile, Slobodan Milosevic's trial changed into a funeral after four boring years of testimony and $200 million spent unnecessarily.
In Cambodia, the United Nations and the government have stalled for nearly ten years to know how to get the senior Khmer Rouge survivors before justice.
The mass murderers who seized power in the twentieth century were doomed to be killed in popular revolts or tried for their crimes - at least they did not die while in office.
Who could be proud that the last Communist leader Nicolae Ceausescu, in Romania, was shot with his wife without even the appearance of a fair trial?
The formal trappings of a real court are always better than instant justice, even if the final result is also death.
Today there are two plausible ways to proceed with regards to a deposed dictator.
A nation can send its former leaders to court, as did the Argentinians in the 1980s with the generals responsible for the loss of more than 5,000 of their fellow citizens.
At the international level, the model of Nuremberg remains valid for serving an example for other trials, although under the conditions admit that the victorious powers sometimes ask for certain crimes, as the "crimes against humanity," which are not properly defined at the moment when they are committed.
There was a time where you could see the benefits of both domestic and international trials.
The trials on national territory allowed the local community to give vent to its grief by participating closely to the procedure.
Much like judges and juries, impartial fellow-countrymen could also bring greater sensitivity to the estimation of guilt because they could assess the harsh conditions under which a deposed dictator makes his decisions.
The trial of the generals in Argentina has been a successful ritual  as part of the painful transition from the military junta to democracy, but this experiment ended in a tearful questioning.
Even after their conviction, the generals have been strong enough to demand a denunciation of their trial followed by an amnesty for the next president.
Argentinian politics is still embroiled in the legal consequences of these trials from 20 years ago.
At the international level, the decision by the Security Council of the UN to establish the International Criminal Tribunal for the Former Yugoslavia (ICTY) was also greeted with great confidence.
The ICC has taken several fundamental decisions under the direction of Antonio Cassese.
But the judges had the misfortune to realise their most cherished  dream: to judge the chief villain, Slobodan Milosevic.
We cannot get a clear idea of how the Serbs would have judged Milosevic within the framework of a local trial.
Many would have depended on the political party that would have controlled the court.
At the international level, fears were not of too much politics but of too much law.
The Milosevic trial had to be more than fair, it had to be the emblem of UN justice.
As such, Milosevic was allowed to defend himself -- a serious error in terms of length and efficiency of the trial.
There was no limit to the number of people that the prosecution called to testify on the same dreadful story of the Serb aggression and brutality.
It will take many months to determine the problem and to know why this scandal of a four year trial.
My hunch is that the well-intentioned officials of the court were too influenced by the Truth and Reconciliation Commission in South Africa, a model sold in schools of law as a desirable alternative to distributive justice.
During South African trials, the most important issue was not the future of the defendant but the past of the victims.
Each victim was encouraged to tell his story and the defendant was listening.
In the case of twentieth-century massacres, such storytelling can endure for decades.
Encouraging victims to speak and then giving the defendant the right to monopolize the floor and block proceedings by mounting his defense as a political leader are the ingredients of an interminable session.
One of the lessons learned by the trials of Milosevic and Hussein is that one should not prosecute men or women in order to make them seem less appealing.
They will subvert the trial, particularly if they are allowed to defend themselves, and use the courtroom to justify their journey.
Tyrants should not be judged until having been clearly defeated.
Ironically, the fact that the Nuremberg trial was chaired by representatives of the prevailing powers was an advantage.
They were a constant reminder to Goering, Hess, and their henchmen that the Allies were in charge, that the Nazis were totally defeated.
Punishing the perpetrators, rather than shaping how history is written, has always been the clear goal of the process.
The tragedy of the Milosevic and Hussein trials is that the points on the 'I' of history are still missing and that history itself is on the stand.
Officials' reluctance has resulted in proceedings, both national and international, which have resulted in fantasies of vindication and justice.
In the case of Saddam Hussein, this fantasy could yet become reality.
The dividing line of the Iraqi economy
All those who study Iraq see a nation divided between the communities of Shiites, Sunnis and Kurds.
But there is another equally important division, a division that contributes to the continued insurgency as well as the sectarian conflicts and the opposition to the military occupation led by the Americans, that of the growing gap between rich and poor in Iraq.
When Iraq was liberated, the people, especially the poor people, were led to hope that a charismatic leader would rescue them from the harsh realities of daily life.
Raised in fear, they had no idea about how democracy could apply to their society or how the groups in defense of human rights and other civil rights organizations could help them to shape their future.
Iraq has quickly found a new line of social shares.
On one side were those who understood how to operate in a democracy, come to power and attain appropriate ambitions.
They have learned to speak the language of democracy, to earn money and influence at the same time, and to enlist independent organizations to defend their rights and privileges.
On the other side, however, there is a vast population of Iraqis without power, especially women widows, divorced or abandoned without anyone to take care of them and their children.
For them, democracy and Human Rights do not mean much.
They are uncultivated, poor and sick.
Victims of an educational system that collapsed more than ten years ago, they have insufficiently trained to find jobs in an Iraqi economy that is withering away.
Under the yoke of Saddam, no effort was made to raise living standards for the poor.
I visited big Iraqi slums and discovered families living in homes barely covered by a roof, infested with insects everywhere, with open sewers running under their doors.
Day and night, they live in the darkness.
No need for nothing more than food, housing, decent and prospects for jobs, these families face the death, terrified by the cries of their hungry children.
When I met women who live in these homes, they were being bombarded with questions: did democracy give them food and housing?
Will democracy stop men from beating their wives?
Democracy it give citizenship to their children?
Would it give them the right to divorce the spouses who would have abandoned them?
To all of these questions, I replied "yes".
Yes, democracy will give you the right to live in a decent home, the right to learn and work, and it will grant citizenship to children and equality between men and women.
But you must work hard and make every effort to demand these rights.
To which they replied: "Saddam has taught us to be unemployed, silent and fearful for 35 years".
"What can we do now?"
In these indiginous areas where most Iraqis live, people are prey to the bitter temptations.
There are many who are beyond the reach of political and government leaders.
They fall easily into violence, theft and sabotage.
The poverty leads some to accept money in exchange for terrorist acts, rendered accomplice by the promise of false heroism that they could not use during the long reign of Saddam.
Poverty has exacerbated the trauma of the violent history of wars and atrocities in Iraq, which have desensitized people to murder.
Although the current living conditions in Iraq lead many young men to violence, I am convinced that we need only to providing them with jobs and decent housing to save them.
Jobs, in particular, would help young people to build new lives through real employment.
Dummy jobs should not be used to disguise the army of unemployed.
We must give people jobs that allow them to contribute positively to the reconstruction of the country.
By nature, every man seeks to prove his usefulness to society.
But the culture that Saddam Hussein created convinced the Iraqis that political connections are the only way of acquiring authority, money and knowledge.
Overcoming such sentiments will take time and will require a booming economy, which suggests that the new Iraqi government should have limited power to encourage private sector growth while promoting widespread understanding of democracy and human rights.
Religious groups are ready to participate in this process.
We can also restore the technocrats who served under Saddam, so that they too have a chance to serve their country.
Last but not least, we must provide loans to poor families to help them build a respectable life for themselves.
The government must above all make every effort to convince the Iraqi people of the value of democracy and freedom and the importance of the Constitution in achieving their aspirations for a better life.
It will not be easy to achieve in a country where many people believe that to violate the law is an act of heroism.
However, we Iraqis have learned that power should not be concentrated in the hands of a minority, and that the establishment of justice needs to fight corruption in all forms.
If the constitution is to operate as a guarantee of democracy, freedom, and security, suppressed Iraqis must learn to fight their battle.
The Islamist identity
Wherever you direct your gaze at the moment, Islam is used (and misused) as a political force.
Some Muslims use it as a call to action; many Muslims in the West (and in other countries) see it as an other infringement and others an "onerous" exclusion.
As a Turk, I directly feel these two sides of the debate.
The reason why Islam seems like such an alien sort of religion in the eyes of westerners is that the West has participated in a deinstitutionalization of religion.
It is not religion that has disappeared from modern Western life, of course, but rather the claims that religious institutions can issue on the behaviour of the individual.
Religion in the modern world is more than ever a personal and spiritual experience.
However, a process of de-institutionalization of religious practice is also happening in Islam.
The politicization of Islam supersedes the authority of the religious classes of Islam, the ulema.
As in the West, the Islamic religious experience is becoming more personal.
The interpretation of the religous texts by Muslim individuals, including political militants, intellectuals, and women, is one consequence after another.
Also include the extension of religious knowledge, the teachings of the Koran being mistreated and taken out of context to support political objectives.
Who now decides what is legitimate and what is illicit in Islam?
Who has the authority necessary to interpret religious texts?
Who may issue a fatwa or declare "jihad"?
Nowadays, activism and terrorism provide, or rather impose, a source of legitimacy.
It is so that the laity decide what does or does not mean Islam, without the authority of faith schools and specialized training.
Indeed, today's Islam is essentially interpreted by politicians and cultural movements, and not by religious institutions.
This enabled the de-institutionalization of Islam to move from being a local or national social bond to a creator of imaginary connections among all Muslims around the world who feel oppressed or displaced.
Islam can thus unite adherents who were deeply divided: the Sufi Muslim scholars and the Muslims of Shariat origin; the Shiite Muslims and the Sunni; conservative Saudi Arabia and revolutionary Iran.
Islam is equally dynamic, its believers leaving rural areas for cities, including Western cities.
Many see this as a negativemovement and stress that these individuals are socially adrift and fall in the alienation and, for some, terrorism.
But social mobility is also a prerequisite for creating a modern outlook.
Obviously, migration causes a sense of distance among Muslims, if not a complete displacement, from their social origins.
Thus, their religious experience is new, as it has been deprived of collective or public theological institutions.
The religious experience becomes a form of social imagination in which they rebuild a sense of belonging to Islam in an environment which is both new and strange.
It is not the distance from modern life, but rather the proximity to this life that triggers a return to the religious identity.
Indeed, the vast majority of radicalism manifests itself in groups which, judging by their history of mobility and displacement, are familiar with secular Western ways of political thinking and urban living.
Confused by an unfamiliar environment, these individuals cling to Islam, who becomes their sole crutch.
But for that support to function, Islam should free itself from its traditionally obsequious, passive and submissive attitude in the face of modernity.
By wearing a veil or a beard, claiming the right to have places of prayer at work or school and requiring special food, Muslims openly identify themselves as Muslims.
They inform the whole world that they are more zealous and more meticulous in their religious observance than individuals who confine their religiosity to private life.
For example, non-Muslims generally consider the wearing of the veil to be a sign of the debasement and inferior status of Muslim women.
It has become shameful for Muslims to positively affirm their Islamic identity.
Young Muslim women in Europe perfectly illustrate this transformation.
The girls who wear head scarves in French and German schools are, in many ways (namely, the youth culture, the awareness of fashion and the language), more similar to their classmates than to their uneducated mothers who are forced to stay at home.
By wearing the headscarf in the European public sphere, these girls are unwittingly the symbol and role of Muslim women.
This trend goes far beyond simple headscarves.
All the Muslims in the West have a double sense of belonging, a double cultural capital.
They define themselves by their religiosity, but they have also acquired universal secular knowledge.
Because they have this double cultural capital, they can move relatively freely between different contexts and spaces (home, school, youth clubs, and recreation).
Being a Muslim and being a Islamist are two different things.
We are witnessing today the change of a Muslim identity to an Islamic identity.
The religious self for Muslim individuals passes from the private realm into public realm.
The question that remains for everyone is whether this quest for identity can be satisfied with scarves and a broad public acceptance of Islamist religious practice or if a positive affirmation of Islam requires a more fundamental renunciation of modernity.
A new era for the Islamic science?
For several hundred years, while science and mathematics went through a period of great innovation, one region of the world distinguished itself from the others.
The masters of these disciplines were revered, medicine was advancing by leaps and bounds and people were now contemplating the workings of nature.
It is no surprise that this region has been respected globally.
In the other half of the known world, scientists were punished, even killed.
Mathematics, considered irreligious and foreign, existed outside the law, and was later made subservient to religion.
The standard of living was low.
The prosperous area was the Islamic Middle East, while an ignorant Europe remained poor.
Both regions were religiously governed (historians differ about the role and nature of religions in this context), but science flourished in only one of them.
Today, obviously, the roles of the Islamic Middle East and of the West are reversed.
Since the Second World War, the United States are the undisputed global leaders in the field of science.
Throughout this period, the brightest students were lured away from their home countries by the prospect of better career and research opportunities.
Until recently, more than half of students graduating with high degrees in math, science and engineering in the United States were born abroad.
Many of these talents stayed after graduation, both industry and the government have benefited.
Meanwhile, Islamic culture walked into a historical period in which science was comparable to the influence of the West, and shunned for this same reason.
Even in countries where oil revenue could fund a significant proportion of the research, Arab leaders have not encouraged such investments, and the result is that their societies have not prospered as much as they could have.
Recently, a desire for greater political respect has led Islamic nations to invest in technology, which is most visible in Pakistani and Iranian nuclear ambitions.
But while such weapons have a political clout, the science on which they rest is banal and old.
The respect that comes from visions well thought out, rather than those born of past discoveries, is far more significant.
Imagine the influence that a Pakistani institute would have at the head of global research into cancer.
And will the political rhetoric change if researchers in Oman find a way to eliminate AIDS?
This opportunity does not present itself for now.
But there exists another, which is not confined to Islamic societies.
The United States has committed serious stumbles recently.
"issues of faith" have substituted for science among government, from the presidency.
Leading researchers have seen their reports modified by members of the reigning party when the facts contradicted the official version.
Encouraged by a government influenced by religion, school systems are shifting their focus from science to "values."
Since the terrorist attacks of September 2001, the entry visas are fewer and more difficult to obtain, which hinders the flow of young talent to American universities.
The large scientific organisations have protested to no avail.
Meanwhile, tax laws have been revised to make investors richer in the short term, discouraging long-term investment in research.
Half a trillion dollars were spent in the war in Iraq, an amount roughly equal to the funding of all fundamental research of the last thousand years.
Even if the United States avoids a dark age of fundamentalism, they are clearly at risk of losing their world domination in terms of research.
Japan has recognized the link between political weight and science in the 1980s.
The main, industrial Japanese man, Akio Morita, CEO of Sony, and the right-wing politician Shinzo Ishihara, made a series of speeches that have been compiled and released in 1986, under the title "The Japan that Can Say No."
They outlined a national strategy in which global influence would flow from scientific power.
The main idea is that military power could be made obsolete if "food chain" of military technology was controlled by other nations.
The title of the book refers to the goal of Japan to "say no" to the American military influence once Japan masters the main military technologies.
Building a knowledge-based economy on the basis of oil wealth is entirely possible.
Texas, for example, like most of the southern states of the United States , was once economically poor and on the decline.
Even with oil revenues, the flow of dollars in the economy, is not enough in itself to boost prosperity as much as one might think.
Texas has therefore decided to dedicate the oil money to provide funding for education.
Today, this budget is roughly equal to that of Harvard University and it extends to 15 universities.
It had a staggering effect: the aerospace industry has almost disappeared from California, but it booming in Texas.
The research centers and telecommunications companies have rushed to Texas, until the Canadian telecommunications giant Nortel.
Although the industry is in crisis in the United States, Texas has one of the strongest manufacturing economies in the world.
There is no reason that the same results could not be achieved in the Middle East.
But first, the Islamic world needs to rediscover and make peace with its proud heritage.
The Iranian debate on Iraq.
No country in the East is following the events in postwar Iraq as closely as Iran.
Geographic proximity, a history of intense and violent war with the Iraq of Saddam Hussein, the religious and emotional connections with the Shiites in Iraq, definite unrest in regard to the United States and their policy in the region: this is that which unites the youth of Iran with its western neighbor.
Given the never-ending tensions with America, Iran is particularly concerned by the possibility of a continued American presence in its neighbour, as well as by the dominant role of America in the construction of the future post-Saddam Iraq.
Foreign observers may find it difficult to follow the internal discussions in Iran, yet they exist, they are intense, even if they are not always visible to the international audience in general.
We can identify three general approaches in the evolving debate in Iran about post-Saddam Iraq.
Iranian pragmatists argue that Iran will inevitably have to cooperate with the USA in post-Saddam Iraq -- even if only to ensure that the rights of the Shiite population of Iraq are respected.
For this reason, Iran would be relieved that the new Iraqi leader is not hostile to him and even attempt bilateral relations.
Other key considerations for the pragmatists concern the preservation of territorial integrity of Iraq and the repatriation of tens of thousands of Iraqi refugees living in Iran.
They are moderates who believe that the Iranian government should insist that the États-unis secure the extradition of members of the Organization of moudjahidins Khalq (MKO,) based in Iraq, and the dismantling of the organisation.
In exchange, the Iranian government should offer its support to ensure peace, stability, and security in Iraq.
In sum, the pragmatists would limit the US-Iranian relations, concentrating on a program that largely reflects the concerns inside Iran.
In general, the conservative forces of Iran support this approach.
Another approach is proposing a more active and cooperative role for Iran in Iraq's reconstruction.
Advocates of this position argue that Iran is well placed to facilitate the reconstruction because of its well-established infrastructure of personal and institutional links with Iraq.
Finally, it thinks, the United States and the international community recognize the value of Iranian cooperation.
The Iranian cooperation should be rewarded by the dismantling of the MKO's infrastructure in Iraq, perhaps in exchange for a promise that Iran would tackle the activities of Al Qaeda and expel members of Al Qaeda in Iran.
Above all, Iran should urge the Americans to respond to its cooperation with the assurance of a guarantee in return that Iran would not become the target of US military actions in the future.
In short, advocates of cooperation are calling for open and explicit support from Iran to ensure stability during the current transition phase, and its commitment to maintain cooperative relations with the entire permanent government that will emerge in Iraq, in exchange for improved regional and international relations with Iran.
This position is widely shared within the reform movement in Iran, within and outside government, and by the technocratic and business class, whose orientation is more international.
Finally, for Iranian hardliners, the possibility of cooperation with the United States is pure fantasy.
They are convinced that America is merely seeking to undermine the Iranian security and endanger its national interests.
According to the radicals, the United States will seek at least to impose significant changes to Iranian foreign policy.
At worst, they say, America will actively seek to impose a regime change in Iran.
It would militate strongly against the acquisition of knowledge and nuclear energy by Iran and could even try to weaken the military capability of Iran in its entirety.
The Radicals see the American invasion of Iraq as a reflection of America's desire to contain Iran.
In return, they believe that Iran must take an aggressive stance in defending its interests, and form strategic alliances with Russia and other regional powers and use the Iranian influence in Iraq for preventing the formation of a  pro-American and anti-Iranian government in Baghdad.
Hard-line supporters on all sides support this approach.
The overthrow of Saddam and his regime was nothing but the easiest aspect of the Iraqi crisis.
Now the harder is left to do: establish peace and security, winning the war against terrorism and convince the Muslim masses that America does not intend to occupy Iraq and siphon its oil resources and redesign the Middle East to its image.
Meanwhile, the opposition against the United States, such as the wave of suicide bombings or other forms of terrorism, will probably grow.
Iran is poised to keep its dominant position in the region through its political momentum and its Muslim identity, whose echo resonates throughout the Muslim world.
What happens in Iraq has major implications in Iran and the United States would do well to find a way to recognize that.
The American threats, or the discussions on another war, feed the fire of resentment and frustration in Iran, strengthening the movements of the more radical.
If the US wants to avoid such effects, it must agree to the influence of its own radicals, assuming that American interests in Iraq are better protected through cooperation with Iran.
A way out for Iraq
The situation in Iraq has reached a point where everyone supposedly wants the same thing: for coalition forces to leave.
The recent disclosure of a confidential memorandum from the Ministry of Defence of Britain on the withdrawal of troops has stressed that aspiration.
The only question is to find out how to satisfy her.
As long as the Coalition forces remain, violence will only increase.
However, if they go, the escalation of violence will take place anyway, and even faster.
The real question in Iraq is how to organize an army and police that can be trusted to enforce law and order.
There are still many a way to approach this goal.
Despite the courage of many Iraqis who join the ranks of the police or the army, it is not surprising that some of them have motives which are less than pure.
In northern Iraq, one rule of old scores and ethnic segregation is introduced in some areas traditionally been mixed, as Irbil.
In some other regions, Sharia law is imposed.
How Iraq can create body capable of enforcing the law effectively and impartially, regardless of ethnicity, religion or gender?
The traditional response is to recruit, train and instill good values. "
But time is short.
Other ways must be found.
In the absence of a deeply rooted value system, Iraq needs associations embedded in civil society, to which the police and the army will be accountable.
These could take various forms, but most importantly they are truly pervasive at the local level, and they have the support of district authorities in the region and country when they report abuse.
If a local surveillance is put in place, supplemented and recognised nationally, then most members of the military and police forces will no doubt behave appropriately, and otherwise, it will be easier to identify and manage them.
Such measures may appear overly optimistic, yet in Afghanistan--a country like Iraq in many ways--many groups are working well.
The Coalition for Peace and Unity (CPAU) provides a model of how to operate.
In Afghanistan, as in Iraq, the priority of ordinary people has been to reduce violence.
The CPAU has worked throughout the country over three years to put in place committees of peace in the districts, supported by satellite councils of peace in the villages.
This initiative, faces a culture in which violence is so deeply rooted that children, at time, learned the arithmetic by counting  the dead Soviet soldiers .
The committees have tried to bring together all the groups in the community, particularly teachers, tribal leaders, religious leaders, women, the police, judges and businessmen, in order to devise ways to resolve conflicts without violence.
Even if the Committees did not officially have a supervisory role until now (this is expected in the future), the simple fact that the police, army and justice be part of it put them in contact with the rest of the community, enables information feedback and contributes to the establishment of trusted relationship.
Certain results are remarkable.
In one of the workshops, the local military commander came to spend some hours our of courtesy, and finished by staying all week.
He left apologizing for his violent past and committed to disarm his private army of 2,000 men.
He now makes regular visit the offices of the committee.
In Iraq, projects such as the humanitarian links center of Kirkuk are starting to play a role in monitoring by offering to the people of different ethnic groups the opportunity to explain his grievances and to get help to solve its problems.
But too often, even in the case of a trial, no judgment is handed down, because the victims yield to the pressure of threats.
The US and British forces have already worked to strengthen civil society.
However, we do not hear talk of workshops for emancipation of women or the success of organizing local elections on a small scale in the country.
Mobilizing civil society represents an enormous challenge, particularly when, as in Iraq, this must be done quickly and on a grand scale.
The military forces are still needed, but also encouragements for disarmament, which can take the form of prospects for economic opportunities more fruitful than crime and theft.
Fortunately, such an organisation of civil society is as low-cost as it is important.
The humanitarian association Liaison Center treats all Kirkuk at an annual cost of $75,000.
With ten million dollars, we could make about one hundred of the same centers, and there would still be money left.
It is time to engage in this direction, to support without fail the brave people who raise the challenge to demand accountability of power.
Having none, the Iraqi people may not have the security they desperately needed after years of suffering.
Democracy on the Nile?
The decision surprised the Egyptian President Hosni Mubarak to propose a constitutional amendment allowing holding direct presidential elections and competitive could well be a giant step for democracy in Egypt and in the Arab world.
The West used to a pluralist democracy can have difficulties to understand what potentially significant change this decision will bring in a country used to military rule for more than 50 years.
Under the current system, Egyptian citizens can only show up the day of a presidential election every six years to say yes or no to the only name on the presidential ballot.
This explains why an individual such as Mubarak has always received more than 90% of votes, althgouth among an indifferent turnout.
The strong Syrian and Iraqi men have done even better with this system, perhaps because they have demanded that the names and addresses of the voters are placed at the bottom of each ballot.
Many have long argued that democracy in the Middle East cannot progress until Egypt is fully involved in the process.
Egypt cannot really engage on a path to democracy without first amending its constitution, in order to reduce the pharaonic powers of its president and limit the length of his term.
Mubarak, after all, already is in his 24th year as president.
Thus, his announcement of competitive presidential elections is a first major step.
The regime can assume it will be able to benefit from the process, but the events could prove more difficult to monitor once people start to feel held accountable.
The democratic genie is out of the bottle.
In any case, Egypt is not the only country in this troubled region to embark on the road to democracy.
Turkey on one side of the Middle East and Morocco on the other are already engaged in this process.
The real groundswell this time seems to result from the close timing and positive results of recent elections held in Iraq, Palestine, and, to a lesser extent, Saudi Arabia.
The unprecedented protests against Syria's occupation of Lebanon  following the assassination of former prime minister Rafiq al-Hariri don't seem to be abating.
Egyptian opposition groups have also organized, increasingly bold marches and other forms of civil disobedience in recent weeks.
The catalyst of their anger has been the arrest and detention of the sick opposition leader, Ayman Nour, in late January.
The government's ambivalence has reinvigorated the national movement Kifaya (meaning "Enough"), which has demanded an end to the Mubarak regime.
Suddenly, popular wisdom that the Egyptians are passive and are afraid to act didn't seem to hold up. .
An alliance of local forces, regional and international unit against permanent tyranny exerted on the shores of the Nile.
The recent wave of popular pressure seems to have shaken the regime.
Only a month before, muybarak disrupted the demands of constitutional reform in the taxing of "futile".
But, whatever the combination of events that led the turnaround, the initiative about the elections must be welcomed.
This is a necessary first step, although it is not enough to overhaul the stagnant political system in Egypt.
The Egyptians are wary of symbolic reforms like in Tunisia, a country where the President Zine El Abidin bin Ali, who has been in office for a long time, has created the caricature of an constitutional amendment, which appeared to open the way to competitive presidential elections, but which subsequently led to a show of support with a few handpicked "opponents".
In previous Tunisian presidential referendums, Bin Ali would systematically score 99% of the votes; this time, he reached 96%.
Let's hope that Mubarak is more serious about electoral reform.
To prove his sincerity, he should order the immediate release of Ayman Nour, and take steps to end the 24 year emergency rule, which prevents the organization of political campaigns.
Mubarak must also approve a limit of two consecutive terms of five years for each president.
Just as necessary are measures to win the confidence of citizens, notably open and equal access to the media, which is currently controlled by the state.
I announced that I intended to contest the coming presidential election in order to open the debate on these essential reforms.
But I would happily go home to my life as a private citizen when I have the assurance of a free and open election next autumn.
If they are seriously implemented, these steps will transform the legacy of Mubarak.
With the events in Lebanon, Iraq and Palestine, they could very well start a long overdue Arab spring of freedom.
Historic elections for Egypt?
Egyptians go to the polls on September 7 to elect a president from among 10 candidates, including Hosni Mubarak, in power for 24 years.
Even if few doubt that he will be re-elected at the end of the election, many follow the developments with passion.
Some 6,000 national election observers have been trained for the occasion, and hundreds of international observers will come in the country this week.
Although all the trappings of a real electoral competition are put in place, it is striking that several signs of authenticity are missing.
Despite the promises to the contrary, the rules of the game are far from fair.
Mubarak has a disproportionate number of advantages: name recognition, a virtual monopoly of electronic media controlled by the state, and nothing less than 85% of print media.
A week before the election, some opposition candidates have not yet had the opportunity to launch a single campaign on Egyptian television.
All members of the presidential election commission are appointed by Mubarak, and the new electoral rules have eliminated all independent competitors.
Since 2000, a Supreme Court decision requires 8,000 Egyptians judges to supervise the elections and certify the results.
It is a big step towards fairer elections, because the professional judges have remained relatively independent during the last half-century of grip on the executive power.
The Mubarak regime has had to use a variety of subterfuges to neutralise the judges' union.
One of them was to stretch the definition of "court" to include thousands of persons who have law degrees without experience on the bench but who are otherwise loyal to the government. This leaves little room for true judges, for if they protest by boycotting their supervisory duties, the task will fall once more to the police of the infamous Ministry of the Interior.
Thus, in the past, the judges' union fulfilled its task with predictable results.
During the parliamentary elections in 2000, while the ruling party of Mubarak only received approximately 38% of votes in areas controlled by the real judges, the results managed to culminate in 86% when the almost-judges were responsible for observation.
This year promises to be very different.
In the spring, judges held a nationwide assembly and decided that unless the government gives them complete independence and exclusive oversight of the process of elections, they will not evaluate the next presidential (or parliamentary) vote.
September 2, they gave their final demand: the regime must allow groups to observe the elections, stop to change the definition of judges in a legitimate election, and accept that no ballot leaves the presence of a legitimate judge  without its content to be counted, certified and postponed.
For now, it seems that the situation is hopeless, because the head of the presidential election commission announced publicly on Egyptian television that he refused any comment by the citizens on the election process.
Among other interesting developments on the eve of the election include a fierce public debate on the topic: should we boycott the election or vote?
Many opposition parties have called on their members to abstain in protest against repressive election rules that strongly favor Mubarak.
Moreover, the Muslim Brotherhood, regarded as the only opposition group with any leverage in Egypt, pushing their supporters to vote according to their conscience but not to support any sort of "oppressive and corrupt governance."
This is an unspoken but clear repudiation of Mubarak, the only head of state for 24 years.
Some 34 civil society organisations are preparing thousands of young Egyptians for the monitoring of the elections despite the governement's repeated objections.
These groups argue that if the regime has no intention of rigging the elections, then the presence of national and international observers should not pose any problems.
The regime's response is that any external oversight is interference in Egyptian sovereignty and that national observers would be an affront to the integrity of the judges.
The last argument was quickly dropped when the group of judges ruled in favor of civil society observers.
As the Mubarak regime is frightened of the voice of internal and external that the challenge to hold free and fair elections, or that it is simply unable to remove the cheat within the party as it became associated with its operation, the current signs do not bode well on the ballot next Wednesday.
Meanwhile, for the first time the Egyptians excitedly experience a challenge to the tyranny, and take advantage of a whole new space of freedom.
The European envy of  the dollar
Currency plays a vital role not only in commercial transactions, but also in diplomatic and political negotiations.
When that happens, commercial transactions become more difficult and subject to greater uncertainty.
The politicization of money during the Depression between WWI and WWII proved to be economically devastating.
But violent currency wars have taken place more recently.
During the 1960s, the international monetary order turned into a political tug-of-war.
Every player had significantly different theories and explanations about the situation.
Europeans, especially the French, complained that General Charles de Gaulle once called the U.S. dollar an "exorbitant privilege."
The general and its monetary guru Jacques Rueff, argued that the United States used the dollar's status as a reserve currency most of the fixed exchange rate regime Woods to manage the deficits and pay their military adventurism abroad (at that time in Vietnam).
France responded by calling for monetary reform that would end the special role of the dollar, and tried to resuscitate the widely discredited gold standard.
The Europeans began a long discussion on the benefits of the monetary union, which would allow them to compete with the dollar.
But from the American point of view, the international role of the dollar was a trap.
Other countries could change their exchange rates and could maintain greater competition at the exports' level.
The American government is powerless against an undervalued yen, fueling the belief that the rest of the world is using the dollar to undermine the American manufacturing sector.
The Nixon administration concluded that the only way to save the American economy was to engage in a monetary unilateralism (a monetary expansion so spectacular that other countries would be forced to adjust their exchange rates).
These long-forgotten battles seem suddenly present again.
The world has more than one fixed exchange rate regime, but the dollar remains the major reserve currency, a kind of floating Bretton Woods.
For Americans, the role of the dollar as the reserve currency is a potential threat, while for those who are not Americans, it is, rather, another example of the American neo-imperial quest for hegemony.
During this decade, China has taken over the place that Japan held in the 1960s, preventing its exchange rate from climbing in order to push the growth of exports.
This has made it the target of American complaints about unfair competition and about efforts to impose an adjustment of exchange rates likely to dissuade Americans from buying Chinese toys, equipment and clothing.
American manufacturers have estimated that the brassieres manufactured in China threaten the American way of life.
Meanwhile, Europeans (and particularly the French) complain about the huge U.S. deficits and de Gaulle's argument asserting that the world pays for the wars America is again in vogue.
Some Europeans suggest that Asian central banks should hold a larger proportion of their reserves in euros, an echo of the failed attempt of the general to capitulate America by selling dollars against gold.
The 1960s ended with the collapse of the "system" and major financial turmoil, including an inflationary surge in commodity prices.
Everyone was affected, and America's role on the world stage has been shaken.
A similar collapse at the moment should have a slightly different effect.
The current floating rate system is more stable and the adjustment costs are differently distributed.
The majority of Americans do not suffer from the sharp drop of the dollar, because foreign dealers must make price adjustments for the American market.
The Asian economies are strongly growing and their central banks are relying on the United States.
They should continue this policy in order not to see their export industries suffer sudden failure on the American market capital.
The United States will have more time to address the current account deficit, which will prove unsustainable in the long term.
The world's economically dynamic regions (North America and Asia) are thus bound by a pact that will ensure the continued centrality of the American dollar.
The Americans will continue to accumulate debts because Asians are encouraging it.
The repeal of the pact would be contrary to the interests of both parties.
It is not question of American unilateralism because the pact requires collaboration with Asia.
But for Europeans, who are excluded from the pact, it resembles a monetary and economic unilateralism.
Meanwhile, the supremacy of the euro over the dollar negatively affected European industrial exporters.
Europe is still not in a position to relieve them.
Europe will in effect represent the biggest victim of the new currency clashes.
The answers forecasted in the 1960s (restoration of the gold standard or invention of a single European currency) do not seem very helpful anymore.
A single currency has failed to provide protection.
The old version of the European reaction (what psychologists call "the envy of the dollar") will become only more vivid.
The European Central Bank will be invited to expand the monetary base, as if imitating the dollar was the answer to all the industrial,  structural and demographic problems invading Europe.
But we should remember that Europe's problems do not arise from the manipulation of currencies.
Protests against new American monetary policy should be seen for what they are: a means of compensating for real European powerlessness.
The envy of the dollar is therefore notclose to disappearing and will grow, the value of the international dollar disappearing without clearly harmful effects on people who can and use it.
An outbreak of politics.
The Americans, like the citizens of all the countries of the world, came to accept the fact that polic plays an important role in the appointment of certain kinds of public representatives.
Few of us are surprised (although some may be disappointed) when a federal judge or a senior diplomat is appointed because he has passed a crucial test of loyalty to an important principle in the eyes of the party of president or prime minister.
But science, in the opinion of all, occupies a special place; and on this point, the United States is starting to serve as a cautionary example for the rest of the world.
Scientific appointments must be based on objective criteria for training, competence and performance.
Obviously, it is legitimate to interrogate a future secretary of the Health and Human Services (SSH) about his views on abortion.
But it is totally wrong to submit the shortlisted candidates to sit in the scientific advisory committees in tests of political loyalty.
Similarly, belonging to the bodies at the scientific proposals, a process to scientific progress, will undoubtedly be shedding all the barriers that are unrelated to the professional qualifications.
Unfortunately, scientists in the United States will more and more often face these barriers.
During last autumn, the Science journal published several reports on the issue.
One of these stories related to the massive replacement of members of the advisory committee of the National Center for Environmental Health, which is part of the Centre for Disease Prevention and Control (CCC), without prior consultation with the director of the centre.
Similar cases have also been observed in the Advisory Committee on Lead Poisoning and Prevention of CCC, the National Advisory Committee on Human Research Protections and the Advisory Committee on Genetic Testing.
The current epidemic of ideology, in which advisory committees are dissolved and then reformed with new members, and candidates are subjected to loyalty tests, seems dated to some observers.
Representatives of the SSH referred to as a "fairly common practice".
This is not a common practice in America, or at least not until today.
In any case, the fact that the Bush administration makes candidates for key posts pass tests in order to determine their compatibility with its "values" is not really disturbing.
The most alarming development is the extent of ideological investigations that intrude into areas previously immune from this kind of manipulation.
Indeed, the most revealing case in this growing political epidemic may have affected the reworking of belonging to the section of study of the National Institute of Occupational Safety and Health, which assesses the subsidies to the study of injuries occurred in the workplace.
The advisory committees could have been vulnerable to an occasional changeover of this type in the past.
After all, they have recommended the policies that politicians will take or not into account.
But (What about) the study sections ?
In October of 2002, Science published an editorial by David Michaels and several of his colleagues.
Several of them were distinguished former officials who participated in some of the relevant committees, and they have brought a valuable point of view on the issue based on their personal experience.
Their article was a matter by itself, but the consequences that it had were even more interesting.
It triggered a slew of letters in which scientists wrote of similar experiences.
A candidate for the Muscular Dystrophy Research Coordinating Committee of the National Institutes of Health reported that a member of the White House carried out an inquiry on it.
After been invited to give her views on the various policies of the Bush administration, which none had link with the committee's work, she had to say whether she supported the president's policy on embryonic stem cells.
Another person who appeared, a distinguished professor in psychiatry and psychology, reported having received a call from the White House concerning his appointment to the National Council on Drug Abuse.
His partner has told him that he had to investigate him to "determine if his views could embarrass the president".
According to Professor, a series of questions followed, the White House representative holding a notation sheet.
Example: "You got two out of three; the president is opposed to needle exchange for moral reasons, whatever the result."
Then the conversation took an even more alarming turn.
The representative asked the candidate if he had voted for Bush and, having received a negative response, he asked: "Why didn't you support the President?"
This attitude is akin to dictatorship, not democracy.
The goal of scientific advisory committees is to provide impartial advice and reflect on political processes.
There is nothing to gain, and much to lose, when a desired political result is put forward.
This is why the determination as to which research projects should be supported has always been a question to be examined objectively by peers, and not by politicians.
In fact, the law that applies here (the law on federal advisory committees, the Federal Advisory Committee Act) specifically requires that committees be impartial and "not inappropriately influenced by the authority of appointed powers."
The U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services Tommy Thompson and the White House administration should set an example for the rest of the world.
They can do it very easily: staying within the law.
Murder in Moscow
It is time to put an end to the myth that the "dictatorship of law" of Vladimir Putin has made post-communist Russia as little saying  more law-abiding.
The killing of Anna Politkovskaya, one of the journalists among the best and most courageous in Russia, a woman who dared to put out the brutal murders committed by Russian troops in Chechnya, is the ultimate proof that President Putin leads a banal dictatorship  showing the ordinary contempt for the law.
It is time for the rest of the world to recognise it, particularly for Europe.
The German Foreign Office is preparing a policy on relations between Russia and Germany, which should ratify the indifference to the lack of respect for law shown by Putin as national interest of the most powerful member of the European Union.
But indifference becomes conciliation when it encourages Putin to continue on this path in the international arena, as evidenced by his ongoing campaign to strangle Georgia's economy.
The murder of Politkovskaya caused an eerie sense of déjà vu: just as in the glory days of the KGB, people simply disappear in Putin's Russia.
The murder of Politkovskaya was the third apparently political murder in three week.
Enver ziganshin, engineer in chief of BP Russia, was killed by gunshot in Irkutsk on the 30th of September.
Andrei Kozlov, deputy governor of Russia's central bank who was leading a campaign against financial fraud, was murdered on the 14th September.
The fact that the Russian General Prosecutor, Yuri Tchaïka, took over the investigation of the murder of Politkovskaya, as he did for Kozlov's, is not a source of hope, as would be the case in a real democracy if such a senior official was involved in an investigation.
In fact, the involvement of the highest levels of government in Russia is virtually an assurance that the murderer will never be found.
The murder of Politkovskaya was a particularly grim foreshadowing, considering that she was a powerful critic of Russia's President.
In his articles for a few newspapers still independent from Moscow, "Novaïa Gazeta" (New Gazette), and in his books, "Putin's Russia: Life in a Failing Democracy" and "A Dirty War: A Russian Journalist in Chechnya," Politkovskaya commented on the abolition of freedoms sanctioned under the presidency of Vladimir Putin.
As the fate of the exiled former businessmen Boris Berezovski and Vladimir Gusinki and the jailed oil tycoon Mikhail Khodorkovsky demonstrates, the destiny of Putin's enemies can take three forms: exile, prison or grave.
I am not accusing Putin's government for ordering the murder of Politkovskaya.
After all, as an investigative journalist in the campaign she angered many others besides Putin, among whom the current prime minister of Chechnya Ramzan Kadyrov, whom she accused of conducting a policy of kidnapping for ransom, is not the least.
But even if Vladimir Putin's associates had nothing to do with Politkovskaya's death by a bullet in an elevator of his apartment building in downtown Moscow, his contempt for the law created the climate in which the murder was perpetrated.
Like the murder of Thomas Beckett in Canterbury Cathedral many centuries ago, the crime was committed with a strong conviction that the King would be satisfied.
Given what Politkovskaya represented - the responsibility of a democratic press to question the Kremlin and its policies - the government should have ensured that nothing would happen to him.
Putin's Russia has already lost 12 prominent journalists, murdered during the last six years.
None of these crimes has been uncovered, which would not be the case if Putin's "dictatorship of law" was something other than a mere public relations strategy.
The six years that have elapsed since the arrival of Vladimir Putin in the Kremlin have been marked by deeply contradictory signals.
On the one hand, the world sees a young, educated leader pledging to modernize Russia, particularly to put law enforcement and judicial practices in line with international standards.
Of the other hand, the president is content to watch without saying anything, while his former colleagues of the Russian security services of the FSB (the former KGB) does not protect those being assassinated, and even launch a number of cases of espionage notorious against journalists, scientists and environmental activists.
Among these "neo-spies" are the journalist Gregori Pasko, an expert on arms control,  Igor Soutiagine, the diplomat Valentine Moiseïev, the doctor Valentin Danilov and many others.
The supposedly civilizing influence being a Western partner, chairing a G8 summit in St. Petersburg, for example, seems to count for nothing in Putin's Kremlin cabal.
Once again, contact with Western values gave birth to another Potemkin village; Russia will present a facade of laws and democratic rules, but behind the papier mâché scene are the same stubborn and arbitrary people making the law.
Globally, the danger is that the lack of respect for the law shown by Putin could spread.
Near the Russian borders, a form of criminalized diplomacy is taking root.
Think of how Putin's attempt to rig the elections in Ukraine, and about accusations made and withdrawn against the opposition leader Yulia Tymoshenko.
Consider the breakaway regions that act as mavericks in Moldova and Georgia, which exist only because they have the support of the Kremlin.
Watch how the Kremlin is trying to blackmail its neighbors by threatening their energy supplies.
Every policeman knows that criminals are emboldened when their crimes are ignored.
It is time that the world recognizes Vladimir Putin for what he is: a man who takes Russia back to the land of shadows.
The world must now consider this old latin saying, qui tacet consentere videtur: who says nothing, agrees, and wonder if it is really wise to agree to the construction by Putin of a energy superpower when the law does not count.
A pipeline to strengthen the Russian empire
Gerhard Schröder, Germany's Chancellor less than a month ago, has agreed to become chairman of the company responsible for building a gas pipeline linking Russia to Germany across the Baltic Sea and Western Europe.
In many countries, Schroeder would be easily accused of conflict of interest.
His apparent ethical lapse is magnified by the fact that at the same time, Russia threatens to halt gas supplies to Ukraine if it does not give in to the pricing demands of Gazprom, the giant state-owned gas Kremlin.
The strategic goal of Russia is obvious. Currently, Not distributing any gas to Ukraine also means that much of Europe will not be supplied, because most of the major pipelines cross Ukraine.
Bypassing Ukraine, Poland and, of course, the Baltic states, the new pipeline will increase the influence of the Kremlin which seeks new grounds in the region.
President Vladimir Putin and his government of former KGB clones will not have to worry about Western Europe's reaction when deciding how hard to press his post-communist Russian neighbors.
Should Europe really give Putin such an imperialist weapon?
Worse still, Russia must use this weapon to surrender the EU to its energy power?
That a former German chancellor would take up the reins of the company that will give Russia the means to manipulate the European economy shows the dangerous complacency of Europe in the face of Putin's neo-imperialistic ambitions.
Of course, the Russian media are aware of Europe's growing dependence on reports from Russia's energy resources.
They are going up to be delighted. The Russian newspaper columnists have written "when we have built and expanded our energy trade with Europe, they will have to remain silent on the issue of human rights."
Putin expresses this position in a more indirect manner by committing to pursue what he calls a "policy of independence."
Thus, does he wants to simply say that Russia must be "independent" from the concerns of Western democracies on ethics and human rights.
It may be that some European leaders truly believe that maintaining the prosperity of the EU justifies its silence on the subject of human rights and other sensitive issues that vex the Kremlin.
Of course we briefly have to speak on the issues "trade," as the expropriation of Yukos. If the Kremlin had to pay our values and our critical to her -- as Chechnya bloodstained -- it seems that Europeans would prefer to hide that to tackle a potential increase in energy prices, or even a blockade, such as Ukraine is currently facing.
Alors même que Poutine réorganise sa cour, en soumettant la Douma à sa volonté, les espoirs de l'UE de voir la Russie devenir de plus en plus « européenne » devraient être abandonnés.
The Russia that Putin is in the midst of building has gradually transformed. It has abandoned its hopes of post-Soviet freedom to become an oil and gas bulwark favorable to the new elite of the former KGB.
Indeed, Matthias Warnig, the director of the pipeline consortium led by Schröder, is a longstanding friend of Putin.
Earlier this year, the Wall Street Journal revealed that Warnig, the director of the Dresdner Bank in Russia, is a former Stasi officer, East Germany's former secret police, and that he met Putin at the end of the 1980s when the Russian president was a KGB spy in the GDR.
The fact that the Russians accept a government formed by former KGB men, for which lack of compassion and intolerance of dissent are the rule, reflects their exhaustion from the tumult of the last twenty years.
Now, the Kremlin believes that what is good for ordinary Russians is also good for the citizens of independent nations. No mercy will be granted to small and weak countries when Russia will have the means to intimidate, isolate and threaten them with energy sanctions.
As a former head of state of the newly independent Lithuania, I was often confronted with such threats.
The European Union has signed several agreements with Russia, including a "common area" of freedom and justice.
The Kremlin is very good at feigning such idealism.
Its control of Eastern Europe has always been exercised on the basis of "treaties of friendship," and the Soviet invasions of Hungary in 1956 and Czechoslovakia in 1968 were "brotherly" missions.
But look how Putin abuses that "common" space: barbaric treatment of Chechens, the imprisonment of businessman Mikhail Khodorkovsky, the harassment of foreign NGOs and the accusation of Yuliya Tymoshenko, one of the muses the Orange Revolution, by Russian military prosecutors on charges completely invented.
If the Europeans believe sincerely in their common area of human rights and freedoms, they must acknowledge that these values are not shared by the henchmen calculating Putin.
It is the same as considering Russia as an ally in the fight against terrorism.
Is it truly conceivable that the land of the "red terror," of countless unpunished crimes in the Soviet era and hands still soiled with the blood of Lithuanians and Caucasians, can really help to combat the global threat brandished by Iran and North Korea?
It seems more likely that the cold spirits of the Kremlin will be content to exploit every crisis to increase their power of destruction and their influence.
For decades, the region of Europe where I come from was left to the mercy of evil.
That's why I cannot remain silent as Europe stumbles blindly into deference.
We, the new democracies of Eastern Europe, have learned from our history that behind every act of Russian diplomacy lurks imperial ambition.
Western Europeans, who have forgotten this history, should heed the warnings.
The dependence to Russia -- even if it takes the face of so-called "charismatic" Gerhard Schröder -- can only lead us into the wall.
Iraq: bullets against ballots
When the Iraq war began in 2003, the Bush administration was nursing ambitious projects: in the image of post-1945 Germany and Japan, a long and peaceful occupation was envisioned, during which the increase in oil production would ensure a growing prosperity while the democratic structures were built up piece by piece.
The foundation should be a liberal constitution, even post-modern, with the added proviso that 25% of parliamentary seats should be assigned to women.
The current Iraq knows no peace or prosperity.
The constitution to be voted on October 15th includes the 25% rule, but is not liberal at all.
The key provision (article 2) stipulates that no law can contradict the "undisputed laws of Islam," which violates the basic principles of parliamentary sovereignty, and prevents legislation consistent with international standards.
For example, the age of sexual consent for girls cannot be raised over nine years since Muhammad himself had a wife of nine years.
It appears that nine-year-old girls are also facing adult criminal law, and put before to the death penalty, for example, for converting to another religion.
The Shiites can use this clause to put their ayatollahs above the elected parliament, as in Iran, since they alone have the authority to determine the "laws" of Islam.
Foreigners and the few Iraqi liberals are especially concerned about this Islamic clause, but opposition to the constitution, widespread among Sunnis, is directed elsewhere: the exclusion of the "Saddamist Baath party" from politics and government, and the Federalist provisions that grant autonomy to Iraq's 18 provinces and allow them to join with regional governments.
The law of exclusion is a personal problem for the Sunni elite, which includes thousands of businessmen, liberals, even artists who, with a few exceptions, were all members of the Ba'ath.
In theory, the constitutional ban could not be retroactive.
But in practice, administrative laws are now being implemented in order to exclude the so-called "high ranking" members of the Baath party from any form of government employment, which affects thousands of people.
Sunnis would without doubt accept federalist arrangements if they didn't apply to the Kurds.
They know that the alternative is not a return to centralism, but the secession of the three predominantly Kurdish provinces of Dahuk, Arbil and As Sulaymaniyah to form an independent Kurdistan, with its own Ministry of Finance, army (the Pesh Merga ), and oil production around Kirkuk, the second largest reserves in Iraq.
The Sunnis reject this same federalism for Shiites because they see them as fellow Arabs, who have always agreed the law Sunni in the past and who will once again, unless they have their own government.
This is what would allow the new constitution, because the southern provinces - which own the main Iraqi oil supplies in majority Shi'ites could form their own regional government.
In the usual style of the middle east, the Sunni leaders disappointed and angry with the constitution now threaten to use violence.
But federalism is not the only reason why proponents of Sunni supremacy and islamists launch deadly attacks.
Their opposition is more basic: they do not accept the principle of democratic government by the majority.
Instead, they are trying to restore the rule of the Sunni minority.
For the islamists, all Shias deserve death anyway, as apostates.
A Shiite leader, Moqtada al-Sadr, has also vehemently opposed federalism.
His supporters, mostly illiterate, are the poorest and most violent Shiites from Baghdad's slums and beyond, including the "Mahdi militia" that fought American troops in 2004, even when the Americans were protecting the Shiites from Sunni attacks.
As a young priest deriving his authority from his father, an Ayatollah who himself died as a populist, Sadr must face opposition from the living Iraqi ayatollahs, who disdain his ignorance and violence.
Sadr cannot possibly compete with them in terms of religious authority; he chose to pose an Arab-nationalist party against them, often recalling that the highest Shiite cleric, Ayatollah Sistani, is not Arab but Persian.
Similarly, he reminds his supporters that the El Hakim, who run the Supreme Council of the Islamic Revolution in Iraq (Sciri) and their militia "Badr" were involved in exile in Iran, which many fought from the Iranian side during the long and bitter Iran-Iraq war, until the Americans' bring them back. "
Sadr opposes federalism because a Shiite regional government would submit to his enemies, Sistani and the SCIRI, and, he says, fall under the aegis of Iran.
To underscore his message, Sadr sent his men to fight the Badr militia, with success in Baghdad, where Mahdi are many, but not in Najaf, where Sadr is hated after the destruction he caused last year until that his men were massacred by the Americans.
It was difficult enough to confront Sadr bandit.À present a simple political calculation suggests that it will probably be the main character to decide the outcome of the vote to the constitution in October.
To reject the constitution and force new elections for a constitutional assembly, opponents need a two-thirds majority in at least three provinces.
The Sunnis are not likely to prevail except in two provinces, but if Sadr orders his followers from the slums of Baghdad to vote no with the local Sunnis, that would undoubtedly cause the capital to fall into the hands of opponents of the constitution and ensure its defeat.
Like every political thug, Sadr is of course for sale.
Last year he was wanted for murder.
Today he seeks a recognition as a country leader, he wants money, and, at least implicitly, the humiliation of Sistani and SCIRI.
He may well receive proposals, and the negotiations may have even begun.
But some Shiites whom he attacks with words and bullets have thousands of gunmen at their disposal, yet he does not deserve such retribution.
The end of the secret.
Transparency is not always easy in the new democracies in Eastern Europe. This is what the Hungarian Prime Minister Ferenc Gyurcsány discovered when a recording in which he confessed the lies of his government triggered riots.
Like Hungary, post-communist Romania has tried to encourage openness and honesty in a society that used to be among the most closed in the world.
But the persistence of a culture of secrecy exploded in corruption and abuses of power.
We see, however, a real shift toward greater transparency, a shift recognized by the European Union which gave the go-ahead to Romania for membership in early 2007.
In addition to the implementation of what the EU calls today  "functioning market economy", the essential reforms in the political and legal domain, that I have in charge, will increase the transparency and control of the funding of political parties to the reorganisation of the judicial system.
The judicial reforms are contributing to root out corruption.
Ministers and former ministers, parliamentarians, magistrates, lawyers and members of the police, customs and other public bodies, and also the heads of private companies, have been charged.
Moreover, new forms have been developed for the declaration of assets and financial interests by people in official functions in government, parliament, in public and local administration and in the judicial system.
The new methods of declaration are the most detailed in Europe and, above all, they are made public.
Romania's progress is confirmed by a report published this month, according to which the people of Eastern Europe now have access to government information as well as those of the long-established democracies.
The Transparency and Silence report from the Open Society Justice Initiative (available on www.justiceinitiative.org) even says that the new democracies sometimes do better than the old: some Romanian government bodies respond better to requests for information than their French or Spanish counterparts.
More precisely, 60% of the demands were met in Romania, compared to 31% in France and 24% in Spain.
Among the other good students, you can quote Peru and Mexico, two countries that have passed legislation on freedom of information in 2002, shortly after Romania.
Yet it is not always easy to gain access to sensitive intelligence in transitional democracies.
I have worked as a lawyer for the defence of human rights in the Helsinki Romanian, and we often had to go to courts to demand informations, according to the Romanian law in 2001 for freedom of information.
For example, when we officially gained access to data on wiretaps authorized by the Attorney General, he simply ignored the decision.
We attacked him in civil court, and the judge has set a fine for each day of delay in the flow of information.
It is only when the media became interested in the case that the data - the number of authorized wiretaps during the previous 10 years, the targeted people and the duration of operations - have been made public.
Romania has finally started to turn its back to a past marked by the omnipresence of the Securitate.
I am now part of the government, and I realise that it is not always easy to share some information with the public.
But sometimes painful reforms are needed.
We would not have completed the economic and political reforms that will enable us to enter the EU without submitting our policies to the scrutiny of the public and without accepting the greater participation of citizens in the decision-making process that inevitably accompanies such an opening.
In fact, access to information has become a sine qua non condition for democracy worldwide.
When the United States adopted the Freedom of Information Act in 1966, they were the only ones, with Sweden and Finland.
Today, 65 countries are equipped with such legislation.
In Romania, those who fought for the adoption of a law on the freedom of information are taking full advantage of it.
According to the Justice Initiative's study, the people who come to the Romanian government receive without much difficulty information that it would have been unthinkable to communicate a few years ago.
Thus, the Romanian Ministry of Defence released the number of soldiers who died in 2003, as well as the circumstances of their death(notably, 13 suicides, two deaths by gunshot, and two who died in battle in Afghanistan).
Another example, the court of Bucharest has received a request concerning the number of judges who have been the subject of a disciplinary procedure since the beginning of 2000, and the motives of possible sanctions.
The court referred the petition to the Supreme Judicial Council, which gave a complete response, four page list of all sanctioned judges, motives and actions.
This process is at the same time the result and the engine of the pursuit of reforms.
Leaders have not always been very comfortable with openness, and the battle continues with regard to the most sensitive documents.
But in the former Communist countries, the benefits of transparency are undeniable.
Yet the experience of Romania shows that official secrecy is always a threat, no country is immune, and that only constant vigilance can prevent it from undermining the foundations of democracy.
Save the trees of life
Nobody can finish his day without having used a a product from the forest.
In a far more important way than we normally believes, the paper on which we writte, the water flowing from the taps, the drugs that we are taking, wood from what our homes and furniture are made of come from the forest.
The forests provide us the fresh air we breathe and are home to endangered species.
They also provide us with recreational opportunities, which become increasingly important in our complex world.
About 1.5 billion people living in poor rural areas depend directly on forests for their basic needs for food and heat.
However, deforestation continues.
Every year, we lose 14.6 million acres of forest, an area almost as much as four times the size of Switzerland.
The irresponsible management of forests, exacerbated by regulations and government bonds too low, and markets that reward illegal logging conspiring to deprive the world's most valuable forests and endangered.
When the forests begin to disappear, a range of environmental, social and economic problems generally follow, that affect us all in one way or another.
The island of Sumatra in Indonesia is a good example.
Pulp and paper companies pursue an endemic and unlawful destruction of the forests that are home to the greatest diversity of plants in the world.
It is highly likely that plants still unknown will disappear in the process just like the endangered species such as the Rhino, the Sumatran Elephant, and the Orangutan.
When Sumatra's forests will have disappeared, entire communities will find themselves without a proper or decent place to live.
Moreover, the distortion that trade in illegal products and cheap products imposes on world markets causes difficulties for responsible citizens.
Developing countries lose $15 billion of tax revenues every year because of illegal logging.
To complicate matters, the demand for wood for reconstruction following the tsunami last year has intensified an already unsustainable demand for wood from Sumatran forests.
The lakes in the Amazon and the Congo are subject to similar threats.
A recent study of the United Nations, the Évaluation ecosystems of the Millennium (em), shows that the forests and other important areas have a serious decline because of their mismanagement and will continue to disappear if serious protection measures are not put in place.
The information published by the Brazilian government shows that deforestation of irreplaceable forests in the Amazon, from the agricultural talks, rose to 2.6 million acres last year, which brings the total area of deforestation in the Amazon to 17%.
But the fight against deforestation is not yet lost.
Various organisations, defense groups and businesses worried about the state of global forests are working together to reverse the phenomenon of deforestation and improve the management of forests.
So, for example, the World Wildlife Fund and the World Bank helped the Brazilian government to launch an initiative intended to establish new areas of forest protection over 17 million hectares in the form of national parks.
The cooperation between the World Wildlife Fund and the World Bank prompted also other partners to establish a trust fund in order to manage these protected areas for life.
Similarly, a meeting at the summit of leaders of countries in the Congo Basin has allowed cross-border cooperation for the preservation of forests and their proper management.
All this was led by the the release of $53 million from the State Department of the United States to promote the conservation of forests in Congo.
Since the leaders first met in 1999, 3.5 million acres of protected areas have been newly organised in the Congo basin.
Nevertheless, given the consequences of the Asian tsunami last December, the weight of evidence provided by the EM, and statistics on deforestation of critical regions suggest we must continue our efforts.
The World Bank and WWF have recently pledged to work toward a 10% reduction in the rate of global deforestation by 2010 and to work with institutions in the public and private spheres to promote ambitious achievements in the conservation of forests.
WWF studies show that if the world's forests are divided between different uses, including protected areas, business management, and responsible forest restoration, we can meet global needs for forestry products while preserving environmental and social values for the future.
Business leaders, governments, civil organisations should all play their role in achieving that vision.
Are the Saudis fanatics?
The terrorist attacks in Saudi Arabia have led many to question the survival prospects of the ruling House of Saud and questioning whether or not the kingdom is fundamentally dysfunctional and destructive.
For some reason, it seems that the Saudi society has produced a stream of violent bigotry that draws its inspiration from extreme religious orthodoxy.
The fact that 15 of the 19 hijackers who took part in the attacks of September 11, 2001 against the United States were Saudis crystallized a long-held view of the kingdom as a bastion of authoritarianism and intolerance.
In some respects, this perception is right, but it cannot be applied wholesale to the Saudi population.
On the contrary, it would be a serious mistake to assume that Islamic fanaticism completely defines Saudi attitudes toward religion.
Between 2001 and 2003, I was part of a team to carry out a large-scale study of values in Saudi Arabia, Egypt, Iran and Jordan.
Our results provide a surprisingly nuanced picture of Saudi attitudes.
By comparison with the people interrogated in other countries in the Middle East, the Saudis were the less religious  in general, and their attitudes towards democracy and arranged marriages also indicate an underlying moderate feeling.
It is certain that in the four countries, religion is widespread, more than 90% of respondents saying that they believe in God, in a life after death, and in heaven and hell.
But the Saudis seem less religious than their fellow Muslims.
Sixty-two percent of Saudis described themselves as religious, compared with 82% of Iranians, 85% of Jordanians and 98% of Egyptians.
The Americans also appear to be more religious than the Saudis, with 81%.
This variation can partly be explained by cross-border differences on the meaning of "religiosity".
For example, Americans can define religiosity differently from people in the Middle East countries, with perhaps a less pronounced attachment to the religious beliefs in Islamic countries.
This may also account in part for differences among Muslim countries.
But the gap, between the Saudis on one side and the Iranians, Jordanians and Egyptians on the other regarding self-defined religiosity, is so great that it challenges the prevailing perception of Saudi Arabia as highly conservative and religious.
Indeed, actions speak louder than words: only 28% of Saudis said they attended religious services weekly, versus 27% of Iranians, 44% of Jordanians, 42% of Egyptians, and 45% of Americans.
These findings, although contrary to popular perceptions of the Saudi culture, are less surprising than they appear.
Religion sociologists have argued for some time that in an monolithic religious environment, or when the religious institutions are closely linked to the state, the religiosity of the population declines.
It is sensible to believe that when the authorities of the State apply strict behavioural codes, people tend to rebel and distance themselves from officially endorsed religious institutions.
It is thus hardly surprising that the Egyptians and Jordanians, who live in countries where the state does not enforce piety, are more religious than the Iranians or the Saudis, who must deal with the local "vertue" police supported by the state.
Even on the issue of marriage, many Saudis expressed surprisingly liberal views.
Respondents were split almost evenly on the issue of arranged marriages, with half supporting the idea that marriage should be based on parental consent, versus 48% who saw love as the basis of marriage.
Given the gender segregation and paternal dominance firmly rooted, this result seems to reveal a strong desire for greater individual choice in what has always traditionally been a family decision.
Finally, the Saudis are fierce supporters of democracy, which contradicts the widespread image of Saudi conservatism.
Of all Saudis polled, 58% saw democracy as the best form of government, 23% were in disagreement and 18% had no opinion.
The overwhelming support for democracy in a country without a secular and nationalist history seems to counterintuitive.
In fact, support for democracy corresponds to many other liberal attitudes that we have noticed in Saudi Arabia.
Supporters of democracy tend to be less religious, more secular, more tolerant of others, more critical of public-sector actions, and more concerned with the Western cultural invasion.
Beyond of the study data, history has shown that liberal ideas become more prevalent when a despotic monarch governs with the support of a religious institution.
A strong movement of liberalism appeared at the end of the ninth century in Ottoman Syria in response to the religious despotism of Sultan Abdulhamid.
At the same time, a secular anti-clerical movement in the name of constitutionalism has made its appearance in Iran in response to the alliance between the absolutist Quajar shahs and the religious establishment.
In light of the similarities between past history and current conditions in Saudi Arabia, we should not dismiss the possibility of reform.
The study data also suggests that the Saudis could very well require a more transparent politics and a less interventionist religion.
The European museum
At the end of the 19th century, Asia represented for Europeans a source of artistic inspiration or the target of imperial ambitions.
In contrast, Europe was a symbol of modernity - for the Japanese of the Meiji era - or of decline - for the Chinese.
A century later, thanks to the Japanese economic miracle, the Europeans saw at least a small part of Asia as a center of technological and rapid industrial, progress.
Today, at the dawn of the 21st century, the mutual perceptions of Europe and Asia are changing dramatically, with the Asian economies booming and a European Union in the middle of an identity crisis.
Some Asian personalities, such as former Singapore prime minister Lee Kuan Yew, warning Europeans: If they continue on this track, their continent will soon have no interest for tourism and high-end real estate.
An influential Chinese businessman, who shares his time between Hong Kong and London, was even more precise.
He said a few weeks ago, during a private meeting gathering in Paris political leaders and big business leaders: "You are becoming the third world countries. You are wasting your time with the constitution, the welfare state, the funding crisis of pensions, and you systematically give the wrong answers to the questions you are asking."
The idea that Europeans are from Asia in general and China in particular is more complex. It ranges from clear acceptance on the one hand, and outright rejection on the other.
In May 1968, some French students out in the streets to invent a new world dreamed of Mao's China, even though the country was plunged into a senseless and brutal cultural revolution.
This absurd illusion is the result of both the ignorance of the Maoist regime's crimes, and the apathy felt in a prosperous society at near full employment.
Today, their heirs  criticise openly the asian capitalist model.
China, once the anti-capitalist star of the utopian revolutionaries, has become the ultra-liberal enemy feared by a new generation of utopian reactionaries who defend the status quo in Europe.
The students who have demonstrated recently in the streets of Paris do not want to emulate the Chinese and Indians; they refuse the logic of globalisation and the abandonment of hard earned social benefits.
The attitude of Europe's economic elites is very different.
They have understood that their nostalgia-tainted postcolonial ideas, according to which China and India are large export markets and huge reservoirs of cheap labor, are obsolete.
These countries have become real competitors worthy of respect, even admiration.
The quality, cost and delivery times - in the automotive industry, for example - are now reaching the European level.
Europe still has an advantage in the scientific disciplines, as in the pharmaceutical industry, but new businesses, highly competitive, especially in India, are increasingly recruiting graduates from MIT and Harvard, and -- thanks to ever lower labor costs -- remain competitive globally.
Unfortunately, if the European leaders have become aware of the Asian challenge, they have failed to translate that into a lesson of realism, in a context of globalization, or in a call to fight in the social and economic domain.
In fact, European politicians, with rare exceptions such as Tony Blair, have been too slow to adapt to lightning-fast changes within Asia.
Without long-term strategy, and obsessed with short-term interests, the European politicians - unlike the business leaders - have not won the respect of their Asian counterparts.
It remains that, on a continent that has not managed to bury the past and to do away with the spectre of nationalism, the EU is also a model of reconciliation, peace and prosperity.
But can this image survive a further decline?
For Asians, the European model could become a political version of Venice: a place that you visit with the nostalgia of former greatness, an admirable Museum.
Red and Blue
The appointment of Condoleezza Rice in the post of American secretary of State as replacement of Colin Powell shows that the recent presidential elections have still powerful effects.
It is important that Americans, but also the rest of the world, understand what these elections reveal to us of America.
The presidential election this year shows that American democracy is healthy, and that some things could be better.
Unlike the election of 2000, when President Bush had not received the support of the popular vote and barely won the vote of the electoral college, Mr Bush has won 3.5 million votes this time.
While some Democrats remain bitter, the legitimacy of Mr. Bush's win cannot be questioned.
America is deeply divided between red states, Republicans, and blue states, Democrats.
If 100 000 votes had stumbled into the red State of Ohio, John Kerry would have become president (despite a popular vote minority).
The electoral college was incorporated in the US Constitution to protect small states in the federal system and that means today that the election campaign will focus largely on a dozen states at most, battlefields where public opinion is closely divided.
Basically, there is something incredible in presidential elections without popular majority.
So it is time to discuss amending the constitution to abolish the electoral college.
Some observers are complaining about the rhetoric and negative advertisements to sow discord that have characterized this campaign.
This must be assessed in a historical perspective.
At the time of the founding fathers, newspapers were easily partisan and George Wahsington was dismayed by the severity of the political language.
For most of its early history, without mentioning the civil war and the period of reconstruction, the country was just as strictly divided as it is today, and the bitter rhetoric of the country-folk has always reflected this close competition.
However, despite the negative advertisements on both sides, the three national televised debates raised important questions in a seriousl format and have been widely followed.
In general, any president in power benefiting from economic growth is likely to be re-elected.
In this sense, the real surprise of Bush's reelection was the small margin of majority.
In large part, this is due to the unpopularity of the Iraq war.
Kerry tried to turn the war, the low rate of job creation, and Bush's insufficient medical coverage and tax credits for the privileged classes into central issues in the campaign, but some observers felt that this failed to send a clear message.
Mr Bush countered that with the issue of security against terrorism and a cultural populism on issues such as gay marriage and abortion.
Finally, cultural populism and security have won out against the economic populism.
The interpretation of the elections was influenced by the exit polls in which voters had to decide(after having voted) on the issues that mattered the most for them.
The majority (22%) said the "moral values", by comparison only 20% have cited the economy and 19% terrorism.
Social conservatives have interpreted this to mean that they won Mr. Bush's election, and that their ideas should dominate his second term.
However, a Pew poll carried out a week after the election indicated that the category of "moral values" embrace a variety of issues in addition to the rights to abortion and gay marriage.
In fact, polls show that 25% of the public supports gay marriage and 35% are in favour of legal civil unions for gay couples (a position that Mr Kerry defended).
However, for the 37% who oppose gay marriage, in particular in the red states in the centre, the issue has enabled them to rally supporters of Mr Bush to make them come to the polls.
What remains to be seen, overall, is whether the United States are divided beyond any hope.
The electoral map of red and blue states has given rise to Internet jokes and cartoons on the secession of the two blue coasts from the country's red center.
Some call this "Cotopia."
But the divisions are not so clear.
In both camps, many states were won by narrow margins, and if one were to color the map by county rather than state, most of the country turns purple.
Cities versus suburbs and rural areas would be a better description of the situation instead of coasts versus the heart of the country.
Indeed, public opinion polls show that most Americans are gathered in the moderate middle of the political spectrum rather than at the two extremes.
But the political elites, such as political activists and members of Congress, tend to be more extremist than the public.
At first glance this seems odd, since they should feel attracted by the center, rich in voices.
However, many members of Congress represent districts that are granted to their party and the real threat to their re-election is the party primaries, dominated by the wings of the most militant and extreme parties.
This trend is reinforced by the rise of cable television, which attracts viewers through controversial programs, infotainment, and bloggers, who are engaging in fierce polemics with no editorial filter.
A reform that would change the boundaries of congressional districts to make them more competitive can respond to this problem, but few are chosen will vote for changes that could increase the risk of defeat.
The narrow margin of the results suggests that Mr. Bush does not really possess the margin of victory he really won.
Faced with difficult issues in foreign policy, fiscal and dociale, it would be wise to turn towards the center rather than to reconcile its conservative base, but the policy that will prevail between conviction or the pragmatic policy remains uncertain.
Let's not use oil anymore!
Chancellor Angela Merkel has made the fight against global warming the priority of the German presidencies of the European Union and the G8, which begin in January.
His finished proposal is general enough that leaders recognize and accept it, and clear enough for other governments and businesses to understand it: at the next G8 summit, it will simply set a date from which vehicles running on gas will no longer be registered in the major industrialized countries.
This decision will have a significant positive impact at geopolitical and economic levels.
Today, the real concern in terms of energy is not related to the decrease of world oil reserves, but the decline in domestic production of the largest consumers - Europe, USA and China - even as growing demand in Asia continues in the market.
The available reserves will be concentrated more in the Middle East, because those in the other regions of the world will soon dry up.
Moreover, the major oil exporters are not prepared to submit their investment policies to market conditions.
Saudi Arabia wants to manage only its oil production, whereas Iran scares potential investors with bureaucratic hurdles and corruption.
Iraq suffers a lack of security, while foreigners are thwarted at every attempt to invest in Russia.
These four states contain half the world's oil reserves, of which two-thirds could potentially be exported.
These factors, except for the cost of production, are the cause of elevated oil prices and the race for the contracts in Africa and Central Asia.
The belief that rising oil prices is good for the environment does not take account of the basic data of international politics.
First, in most poor countries in Africa and Asia, oil imports represent a greater proportion of national expenditure than in industrialized countries, which means that economic growth and social development are compromised, which may lead to new debt crises.
Oil revenues are hampering reforms in the main exporting countries.
Thanks to the increase in their financial muscle, regimes such as those in Venezuela and Iran are feeling less constrained by the international rules.
The latest arrivals among major energy-consuming countries, such as China, mimic the old habits of the industrialized West and their long tradition of turning a blind eye to violations of human rights, to secure lucrative contracts with authoritarian regimes and the oil-rich.
Only the political and economic heavyweights, the industrialized countries which are by far the main consumers of oil, can initiate change on a global scale.
It is important to begin with the transport sector, which currently accounts for more than half the oil consumption -- a level which will certainly increase in the future.
Therefore, the G8 countries must agree not to register new gasoline-powered cars beginning in 2025.
This decision is not directed against individual mobility, but against the waste of a scarce resource whose priority is to produce synthetic materials.
Politicians in office should not show favor toward one technology or another.
Instead, they should encourage the automobile industry to develop alternative technologies that use biofuels, ethylene, hydrogen, and even natural gas for a period of transition.
The countries that have opened the door to the political will on this matter, as a side benefit, have placed their national industries in first place in energy technology to ensure the future markets.
The expected significant reduction of CO2 emissions could ultimately lead to progress in international climate policies.
Economic development also comes into play: if we treat our "addiction" to oil, poorer and less developed and newly industrialized countries, could be more, which would lower prices and calm the energy competition.
At the geopolitical level, profits would be equally significant, notably that major oil exporters would be much less able to blackmail industrialized countries.
This change would increase the strength of negotiating of the international community in the Middle East and strengthening the social forces countries such as Saudi Arabia, Iran and Russia, who want to seriously promote economic and political reforms.
A large car-producing country with advanced technology, Germany is well-situated to launch such an initiative.
Angela Merkel, who holds a doctorate in physics and began her political career in the post of Environment Minister -- presiding over the first conference of the UN Framework Convention on Climate Change in 1995 -- would be more credible than any other members of the European Union and the G8 summit in tackling the problem.
It is time to perform a political act of bravery.
The myth of humanitarian aid and trade
Humanitarian aid and trade have become buzzwords internationally.
Increased humanitarian aid (accompanied by a debt relief) and better access to markets in rich countries for the products of poor countries: it now seems to be at the top of the international agenda.
In fact, the debate today is no longer about what to do, but the extent of actions to take and how quickly they are taken.
Lost in all this: the obvious lessons to be learned from the last five decades of economic development.
At the forefront of these lessons, we find that economic development is left largely in the hands of poor nations themselves.
The countries that have done pretty well in recent history have succeeded thanks to their own efforts.
Humanitarian aid and the markets have played only a minor role.
Take the example of a developing country which has a free and preferential access to its larger neighbour's market, which also happened to be the most powerful economy in the world.
Suppose that more countries are able to send millions of its citizens to work across the border, receives a huge volume of foreign investment and is fully integrated into the international production chains.
Moreover, the country's banking system is supported by its wealthy neighbour and its willingness to intervene as lender of last resort.
Globalization does not flourish under better circumstances than those, does it not?
Let us now consider a second country.
It faces a trade embargo with the world's largest market, receives neither foreign aid nor any support from the Western world, is excluded from international organizations such as the WTO, and cannot borrow from the IMF and World Bank.
If these external disadvantes were not debilitating enough, you can add an economy that maintains its own barriers against international trade (in the form of state trade, tariffs barriers to imports and quantitative restrictions).
As the reader was able to guess, these countries really exist.  It takes place in Mexico and Vietnam.
Mexico share a long border of 3 miles with the United States, which offers not only the privileged access to a market of goods and labour, but also a proportion of the US Treasury (as the experience of the peso crisis in 1995 has shown).
However, America has maintained its trade embargo against the Vietnam until 1994, has not restored diplomatic relations before 1995 and has granted the status of the nation most favoured to the Vietnamese imports many years later.
Vietnam has not yet entered the WTO.
Now let's look at their economic performance.
Since the signing of NAFTA in December 1992, the Mexican economy has experienced an average annual growth of just over 1% each.
Not only this figure is well below the rate of the champions of the Asian economy, but it is only a fraction of the performance of growth capital in Mexico for decades before the debt crisis of 1982 (3.6% per year between 1960 and 1981).
Vietnam, however, has experienced an annual increase of 5.6% per capita between the onset of its economic reforms in 1988 and the establishment of diplomatic relations with the United States in 1995 and has experienced rapid growth continued at a rate of 4.5% since.
Vietnam has witnessed a dramatic decline of poverty while Mexico has suffered a fall in real wages.
These two countries have experienced a takeoff of international trade and foreign investment, but the picture is very different where it matters most: in improving living standards, particularly among the poor populations.
What these examples demonstrate is that a country's domestic efforts eclipse all other elements in the determination of its economic fortunes.
All that The American market had to offer in Mexico has not been able to offset the impact of policy mistakes on the internal market, particularly the inability to overturn the real appreciation of the exchange rate of the peso or extend the productivity gains achieved in an area close to export business to the rest of the economy.
What matters most is the adoption by a country of an appropriate growth strategy.
Without any of the advantages from which Mexico benefited, Vietnam has pursued a strategy centered around diversifying its economy and improving the production capacity of local suppliers.
The overall experience of the post-war era supports the conclusion that domestic policies are what matter most.
South Korea took off in the early 1960's, not when foreign aid was at their height, but when they began to dry up.
Taiwan has not benefited from foreign aid or privileged access to certain markets.
China and India, the economic superstars of our time, have prospered largely through their own efforts at economic reform.
It is tempting to put on the account of foreign demand for their products for export, the rare successes in Africa, Botswana and Mauritius (respectively diamonds and clothing), but this cannot go very far.
Evidently, these two countries would be much poorer without access to foreign markets.
But as in all cases of successful development, what distinguishes them is not the external advantages they enjoy, but their ability to exploit these advantages.
It is enough to see how other countries have wasted the advantage that their natural resources gives them.
The word 'diamond' does not particularly bring to mind an image of peace and prosperity in Sierra Leone.
Similarly, few export processing zones proliferating around the world have experienced the level of development observed in Mauritius.
This does not relieve the rich countries from their obligation to help.
They can make life harder for corrupt dictators, sharing more financial information and refusing to acknowledge the international contracts they sign.
Similarly, the incease of the number of workers in poor countries allowed to work in rich countries and a wider range of policies that focus on growth thanks to the relaxation of rules and conditions of the WTO imposed by the United States would produce a greater impact on long-term development.
It hasn't been proven that expanded access to markets and subsidies represents the best use of the Northern Hemisphere's political capital.
Development should focus on improving the policy environment in poor countries, rather than on aid and trade.
Interdependencies
If the great Argentine economist Raul Prebisch were alive today, he would no doubt wonder whether the world had been turned upside down.
His hugely influential theory of dependence argued that if poor countries relied too much on commodity exports, they would never achieve the industrial capacity necessary to sustain rapid growth.
They would get stuck instead in a cycle of global decline of commodity prices and reducing the proportion of income.
The answer to Prebisch's favourite, protectionism, has been disastrous for the many Latin American and African countries that have followed it.
But the fact is that, for years, Prebisch seems to have had the right reaction about long term commodity price trends.
Continual efficiency gains in agriculture and natural resource extraction have reduced the prices of raw materials, especially in the 1980s and 1990s.
With few exceptions, countries focused on exports of raw materials have achieved poor results, while Asian countries with only limited resources have made rapid progress.
Today however, with the Asian giants India and China joining the global economy, gasoline prices, gold, wheat, and virtually every other commodity are exploding.
Yes, there will always be cycles (the price of oil, for example, will no doubt fall again before once again starting to rise), but clearly the long-term trend of many raw materials will remain on the rise for some time yet.
What many trade negotiators and other policymakers do not seem to recognize yet, though Prebisch would have realized right away is that this sudden turn of events carries huge implications for the global balance of powers.
Indeed, no other aspect of economic globalization will give greater challenges to the leaders of the world over the coming decades.
There are many questions.
Are today's rich countries prepared to enter a period of co-dependency  in which they will all be as equally desperately seeking raw materials as the developing countries are seeking industrial products and technologies?
Are they prepared for the inevitable flow of power and influence to countries that produce raw materials as these get richer?
How the two superpowers of the world, China and the United States, will manage the fact that significant exporting areas of raw materials in Africa and the Middle East into Central Asia are covered by States-nations poorly trained?
Some self-anointed prophets portray the problem as that of finite natural resources and claim that the most critical raw materials are declining at an alarming rate.
Nowadays, many are followers of the Hubbert peak theory of oil production, which supports that we have reached the limits of our production capacities, the wells are drying up and that the situation could deteriorate.
However, as indicated by the eminent oil historian Dan Yergin , the prophets of doom have boasted that the resources in black gold were about to run dry at least four times already.
Each time, radical technological advances have made these threats evaporate.
At the end of the 1800s, drilling for oil meant dredging with mules.
Today, drilling 3,000 meters below the ocean floor is old hat.
Such moves have also been made in the fields of metal mining and agriculture.
No, the world is not facing a shortage of raw materials in the near future.
In reality, it happens that the integration of 2.5 billion people (China and India) into the world economy produced a shift in demand likely to put far more pressure on rising prices raw materials any technology gains are likely to be able to compensate.
Therefore, for at least 50 to 75 years, and perhaps even until people start to drill on Mars in the centuries to come, the prices of many natural resources will rise.
Will the new balance of economic forces that would result from it destabilise the political situation?
The First World War was partly triggered by Germany's concerns about  other colonial powers cornering too much of the world's oil and raw materials.
Similarly, during World War II, Japan feared for the stability of its stock of oil and other natural resources from abroad.
Will such tensions arise between resource-challenged China (where even water scarcity is a problem) and the West?
Fortunately, this does not seem likely for the moment, particularly in light of the sober and practical approach displayed by the Chinese leader towards the problems of resources in their country.
The Chinese are turning to regions like Africa in the hope of finding stable trading partners.
They do not share the political evangelism of Americans, who do not only want to trade with commodity exporters, but also want to convert them.
Then there are those American leaders who still talk about making the United States self-sufficient in terms of energy resources.
This is a joke: sufficient, perhaps, but self-sufficient, never.
Much of the Arab world understandably views the invasion of Iraq as the cornerstone of the US strategy to get hold of stable energy supplies.
If they are right, we can only hope that America has a rescue solution.
Meanwhile, commodity prices will continue to grow, and oil exporters constitute the biggest contributors to the deficit trade gap of the United States.
Perhaps the real American strategy is to try to owe so much money to the oil exporting countries that they will become dependent on the happiness they provide to America!
This is a turning point that Prebisch would never have expected.
Iran's radical choice
The choice of Iranians to bring to power the mayor of Tehran, Mahmoud Ahmadinejad, risks deteriorating relations with the West and increasing isolation of the country at the international level.
However, in terms of national policy, the Islamist regime will probably be better than if a more moderate candidate prevailed.
It is clear that Ahmadinejad has a real support base.
The fact that he ran as a populist, that he talked about helping the poor, condemned the government, and acted almost like an opposition candidate does not count: he embodied choice, and eventually received official help, even against rival radicals.
The regime has shown great skill.
It has transformed the candidate a little more pragmatic Hashemi Rafsanjani, disagree with some government policies, in a person in harmony with the established order, and its own candidate in a rebel.
The government has used the resentment against the establishment to consolidate its own power.
Given that former president Mohammad Khatami supported the reformist movement even though he was hardly brave and that he finally achieved nothing, this only goes to show that leaders have turned the political situation to their advantage.
Ahmadinejad is a representative of the younger activists of the anti-Shah revolution of 25 years ago.
He is directly involved in the taking of American hostages in Iran, though we really don't know to what extent.
Most disturbing is that it is close to the two main groups that represent the most extreme elements in Iran: the Corps Islamic Revolutionary Guards and the Basij organization.
The first is a parallel pro-regime army, the second is an organization that intimidates opponents and anyone seeking a more open society.
However, this concern that Iran is in the hands of  even more radical leaders is mitigated by two factors.
First, Ahmadinejad will likely focus on national problems , and try - without any way to predict his chances of success - to improve the lives of poorest Iranians.
Secondly, the group in power since the revolution will continue to control both the ideological policies and foreign policy.
The president has less power than it seems, and he is particularly dwarfed by the Supreme Leader Ayatollah Ali Khamenei.
Nevertheless, the election of Ahmadinejad coldly clarifies the challenge that Iran poses to Western policy and the stability of the Middle East.
First, it sends the signal to the more extreme elements of Iran and  terrorists in this country -- the Lebanese Hezbollah, Hamas and Palestinian Islamic Jihad, and several smaller groups who are working against Saudi Arabia, Iraq and other Arab countries -- they have the go-ahead to launch their attacks.
They will probably assume that Iran will support them, whatever they do.
Apparently, Iran has often shown itself to be relatively cautious, while secretly playing the role of global financial backer of terror.
Iranian officials have, individually, acted to command and coordinate specific operations, and they will now feel freer to do so.
Beside, Ahmadinejad openly advocates an intensive program for obtaining nuclear weapons.
Most Iranian politicians, at least those allowed by the government to act openly, supports the program, but favor a discreet, prudent approach.
Rafsanjani, for example, puts establishing better relations with the West before breakthrough on the nuclear front.
If Ahmadinejad is president of a nuclear Iran, he is more likely to haphazardly use the weapons.
This does not mean he would actually use them, but rather that he would make use of them for purposes of diplomatic blackmail, raising his threats to crisis levels.
Since Iranian leaders proclaim daily their desire to wipe Israel off the map and fight the United States (Ahmadinejad stepped on the image of an American flag when he went voting), the risk of confrontation has increased.
Finally, Ahmadinejad is likely to make bolder changes to the point of endangering the stability of Iraq, and his victory will encourage radical Iranian officials and extremist Iraqis.
Iran has already sent a number of agents to Iraq and supports clients who seek to transform this country into its clone.
The Iraqis, including Shiite Muslims, who follow the same kind of Islam as Iranians, generally reject such interference.
A more militant Iranian posture may increase friction with Iraq, and will inspire more anti-American violence.
In short, the outcome of the Iranian elections is dangerous, even if its potential will depend on the actions of Ahmadinejad and the degree of power that will Khamenei give him.
In addition, dealing with such an openly extremist Iran - even radical according to the criteria of an already harsh regime -- will be a challenge not only for the United States, but also for Europe.
Will the European countries continue to claim that the militant rhetoric and provocations of Ahmadinejad do not count and that it is possible to find diplomatic solutions to Iran's nuclear ambitions?
With Rafsanjani, a real agreement, or at least the appearances of cooperation, would have been easy to maintain.
But, with Ahmadinejad, it will take a huge dose of conciliation to maintain even the most minimal diplomatic procedure.
Some reformists and Iranian exiles welcome the election of Ahmadinejad, because they believe that his administration is more likely to show the true face of the regime and crush any hope of compromise in the West.
But it may also symbolize the success to escape a quarter-century of unhappiness caused by radical Islamic rule.
Whatever the consequences, the victory of Ahmadinejad means for the West that everything in Iran will become even more sensitive.
Take from the poor, give to the rich
President Bush seems about to destroy the US budget for the coming years.
When President Bush took office, there were forecasts of anticipated budget surpluses for as long as one could see.
Today, thanks to a mixture of irresponsible tax cuts initiated by Republicans, an economic slowdown, the burst of the stock market bubble and a massive increase in military spending, the fiscal outlook is dominated by large deficits.
The worst is yet to come, because the Bush administration and congressional Republican majority are preparing to worsen the fiscal mess.
Their havoc will likely weaken the U.S. and increase instability in the international economy.
Usually, America's Republican Party called for balanced budgets.
That changed with the Reagan administration, when conservative Republicans were in favour of tax cuts, even when it was done achieved large budget deficits.
President Reagan announced to the American people that he could enjoy both tax cuts, the strengthening of the Army and the continuation of their favourite spending programs.
The result, unsurprisingly, was a series of significant budget deficits which took several years to eliminate.
President George Bush senior and president Bill Clinton had to raise taxes in order to bring order to the Reagan era's chaos.
These tax increases have probably contributed to the defeat of George H. W. Bush by Bill Clinton in 1992.
However, Clinton valiantly decided to finish the process of restoring fiscal balance, in part to protect long-term funding programs for Social Security.
When Clinton left the presidency in 2000, the fiscal situation was the best it had been in decades.
Then came President George Bush's son, ready to act as Reagan with significant tax cuts, a considerable increase in military spending and the continuation and even the development of popular spending plans.
The result was predictable.
In January 2001, the cumulative budget projections for the years 2002 to 2011 anticipated a budget surplus of $5.6 billion.
Mid-2002, these anticipated surpluses had evaporated.
In the light of these new economic conditions, and in the shadow of the war against Iraq, one might expect that the Bush administration and the Republican Congress be careful in defence of new tax cuts.
But far from it, their main priority is to set up more tax cuts which will mostly benefit the wealthy.
At the same time, the government calls for significant increases in military spending.
With the coming of the presidential election in November 2004, one can be certain that no significant reduction in spending will come in the non-military programmes.
So it seems that the massive budget deficits are destined to continue.
If domestic spending just stays constant, at a fraction of national income, it appears that the cumulative budget next decade will result in an overall deficit of 1.5 trillion dollars.
But this figure could be very optimistic, because it doesn't truly take into account the cost of a likely war against Iraq, nor another tax cut package, nor the risk of rising interest rates for the coming years.
Why do Republicans seem so little concerned by this problem?
Some Republicans are more concerned about tax cuts for the wealthy than about anything else.
Others believe that the deficits will lead by force to significant reductions in government spending at home, thus reducing State participation, which is their most cherished hope.
The problem with this analysis is that most taxpayers are attached to the social programmes and will not easily support large cuts in spending.
The most intriguing question is as to why Americans vote for such policies when they should know that it will probably result in problems.
One of the possible answers is the fact that many voters do not see the budgetary problems coming.
A better answer is that most Americans have not actually voted for these policies.
The turnout of the election in 2002 was only 40% of voters, and only around half of these 40% voted for Republicans, that is approximately 20% of people entitled to vote.
Of course, the outlook need not be so bleak.
The war against Iraq could perhaps be avoided.
Tax cuts could be either modest or dismissed.
But I predict huge budget deficits for years to come and a growing sense of unease within the USA and abroad about the macroeconomic situation of America.
Foreign investors could decide to reduce their funding from the government budget and leave the current deficit on better footing.
The dollar may weaken, and the fear of inflation could become even more pronounced.
All that will make people lose confidence in political decision makers of the United States, which will then be less flexible in their responses to economic shocks.
The poor, in the United States and abroad, could suffer the most, since President Bush and Congress say to the American people and the world that there is no funds available to address the question of poverty, health and education, because of the huge budget deficits.
If the average American does not open his eyes to these taxation risks, the wealthy could benefit from another gift of several billion dollars while the country and the world bear the harsh consequences for the coming years.
Lessons to learn from America's tax heedlessness.
George W. Bush did far more to destroy the economic policy of the United States that all the other presidents in American history, surpassing even his mentor Ronald Reagan.
In only three years in office, he destroyed a fragile political consensus that demanded ten years of effort and may require another decade to be rebuilt.
In doing so, Bush has risked the economic and social stability of America in the long term.
Given the budgetary challenges in the long term that manage the US with an extremely awkward way are not the only existing challenges, the Tax blunder of America offer important lessons to other countries.
The main problem with fiscal policy is that politicians can easily be temporarily popular by lowering taxes and increasing government spending while accumulating massive public debt and leaving their repayment to the future elected representatives.
This strategy may take a few years, but emerging budget deficits and growing public debt impose a painful policy.
Yet a cynical politician can buy his re-election and perhaps be away on retirement already when the crisis comes.
One might think that, after decades of similar episodes of political irresponsibility throughout the world, voters would have a negative reaction to this sort of stratagem.
However, Bush is doing it again today by buying popular support through distributing massive tax cuts while simultaneously increasing spending on the military, education, and health.
The budget deficit reached amounts to more than 5% of GDP.
Worse, the long-term budgetary outlooks of America were already worrying before Bush begins to enforce its policies foolhardy.
The U.S. population is aging, so much so that the share of pension and health care costs financed by public funds will increase dramatically.
Detailed calculations show that the income that will be available thanks to the fiscal policies advocated by Bush are likely not to go as high as the dozens of trillions of dollars represented by the costs of pensions, healthcare and other fiscal spending expected by the population.
At some point in the future, we will need to greatly increase the recovery of taxes, drastically reducing public spending, or both, to compensate for the actions of Bush.
So why the population support his policies?
Because she understands little about these long-term consequences or is not very concerned about them, even if these consequences will eventually have an impact on the majority of Americans.
The richest taxpayers are of course happy because they have enjoyed the bulk of tax cuts.
As surprising as it may seem, the 5% richest U.S. taxpayers had received about half the tax cuts, and those rich taxpayers clearly expect the other 95% (middle class and poor) majority to bear future spending cuts and tax increases.
Meanwhile, Bush has convinced many poor- and middle-class voters that they should be happy with their lot, without telling them they must pay for their tax cuts with small reductions, turning to substantial cuts in future services if the government policies of his administration prevail in the long term.
If the Americans had a memory, they would realize that they have already climbed this "roller coaster" tax over the last 20 years.
Ronald Reagan also came to office promising massive tax cuts and large increases in military spending.
That ended in an enormous budget deficit in the mid-1980s.
The Reagan tax cuts were extremely popular and allowed him to be re-elected in 1984.
It then took a decade (from the second term of Ronald Reagan until the mandates of George Bush Sr. and Bill Clinton) to return to a budget surplus.
Of course, this result required the approval of new tax increases, which cost her re-election to George Bush Sr. and led to the polarized politics of the 1990s.
History is likely to repeat itself.
Some right-wing ideologues in the Bush administration predict that the current budget deficits will bring on ultimately a drastic reduction in the social expenditures of government.
They hope to dismantle programmes such as Social Security and Medicare.
But the American people strongly support these social programs.
Thus the strategy that first cuts taxes in order to lead to further cuts in social programs is doomed to failure and will inevitably increase tax rates.
Other Bush administration ideologues argue that tax cuts play a crucial role in getting the US out of the recession.
This argument is also wrong.
America's economy could recover without tax cuts, and perhaps even more solidly.
In all cases, It is a huge mistake to base long-term fiscal policies on the short term economic cycle.
The other countries have two key lessons to learn from this situation.
The first is that the imminent budget deficits in the US will sooner or later limit the international power of America.
Americans supported the war in Iraq only because they did not have to pay for higher taxes.
When the Americans are forced to choose between foreign adventures and higher taxes, they will be much less inclined to support expensive  military operations abroad.
Indeed, the US will be deeply split internally as the population will be grappling with the fiscal mess left by Bush.
The second lesson is that countries need to plan their budgets according to fiscal costs congruent with an aging population.
The long-term budgetary ramifications are rarely taken into account by the taxpayers or parliament.
Governments should be asked to submit budget estimates for the long term along with their annual budget proposals to reduce the tendency toward political manipulation in the short term budget.
The US can play the role of an alarm to the other countries.
The White House should give the other countries the same advice as the one given by magicians on television to their viewers: "Do not try to do this at home."
The politicization of the securities markets
Many economic and financial analysts complain that the securities markets in emerging countries are often heavily manipulated by their governments and are more political than economic.
In contrast, a primitive economic force regulates the securities markets in advanced countries, and to predict their performance is tantamount to predicting the growth of trees.
This description of the securities markets in emerging countries is not wrong, just partial, because the same description applies to the securities markets in advanced countries.
Indeed, the best analysts know that to predict the performance of the securities market of any country is basically to predict the extent to which the government wishes that the investors in securities markets be involved in the current political environment.
Take the securities market in America, by far the biggest in the world.
The government leaves companies alone, and thus returns on investment in U.S. securities markets reflect the fundamental forces of a strong capitalist economy.
This partly explains why the US attracts portfolio investors worldwide.
But the investment returns that make the U.S. securities markets so attractive reflect a delicate political balance.
In particular, tax rates which affect securities have varied over time along with changes in political pressure.
During the second world war, for example, the political support for big fortunes had dwindled and the government has sharply increased taxes on capital gains, dividends and high incomes in general.
When the second world war helped to improve significantly the economy weakened by the Great Depression of the 1930s, President Roosevelt and Congress have introduced a tax on the windfall profits to ensure that shareholders do not bring a benefit too big.
By contrast, in 1980, when there was no war but the securities market was down, American voters elected Ronald Reagan, a man considered by many as too far to the right to be president.
He asked for, and obtained, tax cuts on capital gains, dividends and income.
Political interference in the securities market is not aimed only at taxes on capital gains, dividends and income.
Property taxes, excise taxes, import duties, and sales taxes, which are paid, directly or indirectly, by companies, can have a magnified impact on corporate profits and therefore on the securities market.
It is no coincidence that wherever securities markets develop, governments ensure that these taxes lower corporate after-tax profits.
Indeed, the policies of the securities markets are not limited to taxes.
Instead, almost every activity of the government affects corporate profits and, subsequently, the securities market.
After the crash of the securities markets in 1929, the American government suspended a large part of the antitrust activity that allowed companies to gain a monopoly which would increase their value.
This policy delayed the recovery from high unemployment, but not enough to control the political forces deployed to support the securities market.
Similarly, one of the most important actions taken by President Reagan was to destroy much of the American unions' remaining power, which competed for their share of the industrial pie.
The victory won by Ronald Reagan during the strike of air traffic controllers in 1981 was a major turning point for the American trade union movement, and also for the securities market which launched its spectacular market rise in 1982.
The American government has been particularly hard hit to support the stock market of shifting values since the culmination of the illusion of share prices in 2000, and particularly to cut interest rates repeatedly.
Of course, this measure was publicly justified in terms of stimulating the economy, and not in terms of support for the securities market.
But it is very revealing the extent of the American market for securities that one of the most important factors weighing on the economy is the falling price of shares.
Indeed, the response of the authorities was not limited to a monetary stimulus.
The national accounts of products and income from the United States show that the effective tax rate on corporate profits (the percentage of profits actually paid to the government in the form of taxes) rose in Crete to 33.7% during the first quarter of 2000 (a record in the securities market and economy in general) and has dropped to 20.2% during the fourth quarter of 2003, when the market was low.
A large part of this decline reflects the tax relief measures passed by Congress and the perception among businesses that in the current economic and political environment, they can be more aggressive about avoiding paying taxes.
Moreover, after the crash of the securities market, the maximum tax on dividends on securities has fallen from 35% to 15%, providing a new, substantial benefit to investors on the long term and intensifying the combined effect of the reinvestment of dividends after tax.
Again, this tax cut was justified to stimulate the economy which can, of course, apply to virtually every measure to support the securities market.
But it is the balance of political forces that determines the credibility of this kind of justification.
Arguably, the same variables, including hostility to high taxes and a weak labor movement, have operated in the United States over the past 200 years and should continue to operate in the future, producing high returns on securities markets and attracting substantial foreign capital inflows.
Those who believe that investment in the US market securities will follow the same higher growth trend for decades could well be right.
But it is very important to be clear on what we predicted.
The forecasts are primarily not only on the economy but also on policy, even on the cultural values, that are shaping the political and economic performance.
The housing market at a global scale
There is no investment more local than investing in property. The residence you are buying is rooted in a specific location, like a tree, and flourishes or languishes in keeping with local economic conditions.
The whole world parades across our television screens, but the housing market, made up almost exclusively of local amateurs, rarely crosses geographical boundaries.
Soon, however, this could change.
In a month, the Chicago Mercantile Exchange (CME), in collaboration with my company MacroMarkets and with Fiserv and Standard & Poor's, will launch the options on contract term in house prices in 10 cities in the États-unis.
The contracts will be based on the S&P/Case-Shiller home price indexes, established in terms of speculative research that my colleague Karl Case and I carried out 20 years ago.
We have long been campaigning for a housing futures market, but no exchange, until now, wanted to use these indexes to create such a market.
Futures markets for home prices will allow investors worldwide to invest indirectly in the U.S. real estate through market intermediaries.
A buyer in Paris, Rio de Janeiro or Tokyo will have the opportunity to invest in homes occupied by their owners in New York, Los Angeles and Las Vegas, among others.
One of the fundamental principles of financial theory -- diversification and risk-spreading -- means that interest in these new contracts will be strong.
Businesses and residents of New York, for example, are overexposed to local property risks. However, by selling their homes, they should be able to reduce these risks.
Investors in Tokyo will assume some risk by buying housing futures in New York if the price is right.
New Yorkers will continue to live in their homes, while diversifying their investment risk throughout the world.
A real futures market for single-family residences has not been tried since 1991, when the London Futures and Options Exchange (now called Euronext.liffe) missed the launch of such a market.
This experiment has never generated large volumes of transactions.
The stock market launched a concept that didn't convince anyone.
The UK markets of Paris diversified on house prices, like some online retail markets, did not bring much either.
Will it be different this time?
Of course, the launching of a new market is still uncertain. People become interested in an idea if it has already attracted lots of other people; if no one is captivated by it, it won't attract any more.
The same goes for the markets. If there is no investors interested, there will not be enough business to generate profits to attract others.
However, like all good ideas, we never know very well why they attract. Also, we cannot predict the launch of this new market, but we know that sometimes the success is here.
Original indicators suggest that the growing interest in term transactions as regards house prices, especially because of the current speech on the "housing bubble", stresses the importance of risk diversification.
After the announcement of the CME, one of its competitors, the Chicago Board Options Exchange, unveiled its project to create options on futures in the largest American regions, based on average real estate prices published by the National Association of Realtors (National Association of Estate Agents).
However, in addition to the strong public interest in real estate investment and cover the risks, another thorny issue must be settled for the futures markets work well: prices must be publicly disclosed and investors should understand its meaning.
I believe that there are great opportunities because eventually these markets lead to a drop in the prices in certain American cities.
It will be a matter of "offset", as traders say. Today, the term price on the market is lower than the price of property.
Presumably, the deport will not appear the first day of real estate transactions, but it should happen within a few months.
We may need to offset if some of these markets actually fulfill their duties.
Everyone knows that these cities have experienced a huge real estate boom in recent years (besides, this is a widespread global phenomenon).
International investors do not seem very keen to invest in those cities, without the prospect of falling prices, based on the futures markets. The inhabitants of Tokyo have learned this to their expense.
Therefore if the offset is important enough, even the investors who believe that the US housing market is declining can still expect a good return on home prices, because they already have a lower price on the futures market.
However, New Yorkers will need to make some adjustments to cover their own property investments, if they want to sell futures and, of course, lower prices.
They will get the impression that the market has already anticipated this decline and that they cannot prevent the possibility that it will decline further.
In fact, such adjustments in our way of thinking will certainly occur if we closely watch future market prices.
Until now, the development of housing prices has mainly been the result of diverse opinions.
When the markets will create an international consensus on house prices in all the major cities around the world, it would be easier to manage the risks they face in stabilizing both their economies and our own standards of living.
But what moves the markets?
Since the 10th of May, most of the global markets have shown strong cumulative declines, particularly in the two weeks around the 23rd of May, with on average prices continuing to decline.
Are concerns for the global stock markets synonymous with concerns for the global economy?
Let us consider the more pronounced reductions.
Among major countries, the biggest crash was India's, where prices fell 16.9% between May 10 and May 22.
The debacle of the other side of the world has become almost as important. There, the ups and downs were only a few days apart from those of India: in Argentina, prices have fallen by 16.1%, in Brazil by 14.7% and Mexico by 13.8%.
The European markets have also suffered big losses.
In Sweden, prices plummeted by 15.2% between May 9 and 22; over practically the same period, they were down 9.7% in Germany, 9.4% in France and the United Kingdom, and 9.3% in Italy.
In Asia, prices fell by 11.5% in Korea, 9.3% in Hong Kong and 8% in Japan within roughly the same period.
Many commentators are trying to link these events to the situation in the United States.
However, the Americans have only owned up to a drop of 5.2% between May 9th and May 24th.
China does not appear to be behind this global downturn since the prices have risen there during this period.
The standard explanations of the economists concern monetary policies.
In the wake of the great fear of deflation in 2003, central banks worldwide have cut interest rates, causing speculative explosions in the housing markets and the stock market.
But today, if one believes this perspective, interest rate increases will begin to bite, which suggests further declines in asset prices.
There is certainly an important element of truth in this argument.
The Federal Reserve has increased its interest rates on the 10th and its chairman, Ben Bernanke, has indicated that further increases could happen in the future.
On May 17, a worsening in US data was detected, which suggests a future hardening of monetary policy.
Economists like to think the world is logical and manageable, which means that they understand what is happening there.
But by doing that, they often overstate the role of central banks.
Indeed, the increase in American rates was just another one in a series of rate increases -- the 16th in a row.
No other major central bank has increased its rates after the start of the decline in stock markets in May until around the 7th or 8th of June, when several did (the European Central Bank, India, South Korea, South Africa, Thailand and Turkey).
Another factor: the price of oil, which has increased by 24% between March 22 and May 2, beating all records.
That would undoubtedly be a major event capable of influencing the markets worldwide.
Rising oil prices  are the culprit in almost all economic recessions since World War II.
And yet the sharp rise in oil prices does not correspond to the moment when the stock market fell the most, in mid-May.
To argue that these increases have led to the market declines assumes a lag of several weeks.
But the stock markets are not very logical, and a mistimed answer to the oil price shock might be possible.
As with all stocks in any financial market, an increase always attracts attention.
When oil prices are rising rapidly, people watch the news on it and discuss among themselves these increases, thus creating a greater sensitivity to these news.
The crisis in the Middle East is tied to oil prices, which dominated the news during the month of May.
Signs of doom and the strong language used by various political figures were amplified in investors' minds by increases in oil prices.
On May 8th, Israeli Deputy Prime Minister Shimon Peres, in response to hostile statements by Iranian President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad, struck back, saying that "The Iranian president should remember that Iran also could be wiped off the map."
Similarly, around the beginning of the fall of the stock market in May, Ahmadinejad visited Indonesia, the country with the greatest number of Muslims in the world, and newspapers reported on 13th May that he had received a standing ovation from students of two of the best universities in the country.
This story might have been interpreted as evidence that Ahmadinejad's strategy of brinkmanship in the nuclear field reaped him political dividends, fueling a perception that the tense situation in the Middle East could lead to further increases in the price of oil.
These articles in newspapers can seem far more remote from the stock markets than the monetary policy.
But the public reaction that they spark, and the recent increases in oil prices, could go a long way in changing market psychology.
Attitudes towards risk change over time, and events like the remarks of Ahmedinejad and Peres can precipitate those changes.
So, although these events are difficult to quantify, perhaps the analysts also should pay as much attention to the words of Ahmadinejad as to those of Bernanke when they try to understand the direction of the stock markets worldwide.
Economists do not perhaps enjoy concentrating on the mentality of the public and how it interacts with price fluctuations, world news and the dynamic of speculation.
This would mean that economic events are less predictable (and economists less omniscient) than they might like to imagine.
However, from an intuitive point of view, it would be logical to do so.
What are investors really thinking ?
Ahmadinejad is a charismatic figure, not Bernanke.
Ahmadinejad is embarking on an adventure, not Bernanke.
And perhaps the most important, Ahmadinejad has a destabilizing influence, not Bernanke.
Whatever their final cause, the world's stock drops in mid-May indicate an instable market psychology.
Hard to believe that they were only linked to opinions relating to potential monetary policies, and not to broader and deeper issues, especially as regards energy and political tension, which are the foundations of the global economy's performances.
Why pay more for fair trade?
Marks & Spencer, the chain of supermarkets and clothing, owner of 400 shops across Britain, has just announced that it would convert its full range of coffees and teas including 38 different products to the "fair trade" label, the marketing symbol of "ethical production".
The chain already sells only tea and coffee bearing this label in its 200 "Cafe Revive" coffee shops.
It also encourages the purchase of shirts and other goods made from fair trade cotton.
The announcement took place during the "Fair-trade Fortnight." During these two weeks of products promotions, presentation sessions were held with producers in developing countries to explain to Britons how this form of trade has helped their communities.
The movement toward more ethical consumption has also enjoyed a significant advance in the United States. Consumers are turning increasingly to organic or locally produced food, such as eggs from free-range chickens.
In the UK, a study has shown that more than 50% of respondents recognised the symbol of fair trade and understood that products bearing that label complied with more working conditions for producers of the developing world.
Currently there is no study comparable to that of the United States, but the reported data and the discussions I have had with my own students suggests that the figure would be not as high for Americans.
Traders willing to obtain fair trade certification  must pay producers a price covering the costs of a sustainable production and a living wage.
For example, the minimum price for a pound of coffee is $ 1.26, regardless of the declining level of the market price.
If the market price goes beyond that figure, the relative tariff on fair trade will increase and remain higher than 5 cents/pound.
For small producers, they should organize themselves into cooperatives, or other types of groups that allow for democratic participation.
The plants and factories can claim the label "fair trade" if they offer a decent wage to their workers, if they comply with standards for health, environment and safety, if they allow unionism or any other forms of associations for workers, if they provide accommodations worthy to workers who are far from home, and if they use neither forced labor nor child workers.
However, not everyone supports fair trade.
Brink Lindsey, Director of the research centre for trade policies at the Cato Institute, a pro-market institution, believes that the campaign for the Fairtrade-labelled coffee is a "dead-end paved with good intentions".
He justifies himself by saying that the real cause the collapse of coffee index does not arise from the realisation of excessive profits by multinationals, but from the enormous increase production of coffee in Brazil and Vietnam, combined with new technology that enables the coffee culture to work less and therefore at a lower cost.
In Lindsey's perspective, if we want to help the coffee growers, we need to encourage them to abandon coffee and turn to more profitable crops -- he insists here, rightly, on trade restrictions imposed by rich countries and on the subsidies that are obstacles to be removed -- or to products with high added value, such as the special coffees that can bring a higher price.
What is strange in Lindsey's argument, however, is that the campaign for fair-trade coffee seems to do exactly what he recommends, which is to say that it encourages the coffee growers to produce special coffees for which they can charge more.   (or "for which consumers will pay more," if you prefer)
Pro-market economists do not object to companies that use the appeal of luxury to promote their products.
If people are prepared to spend $48 for a pound of Jamaican Blue Mountain coffee, because it is the coffee preferred by James Bond, economists do not, in this case, consider that the market is distorted.
So why be so critical of consumers who want to pay $12 for a pound of coffee that they know he has been grown without pesticides, under shaded trees favourable to the survival of birds, by producers who can now feed and educate decently their children?
Economists might respond to that that if you want to help people to feed and educate their children, it is possible to buy a pound of fairtrade coffee with an identical taste for $10 and to give the remaining $2 to a charity, which distributes food and helps school poor children.
This is indeed a possible strategy. But, fair trade has very real advantages.
Producers know that they must produce a coffee appreciated by consumers not only for its flavor, but also for the way it is grown.
If their coffee sells well, they are proud to have made a product that is wanted all around the world.
From the perspective of farmers, receiving a premium by selling a Fairtrade product is preferable to receiving a charitable handout that they would receive anyway, whether they work or not and regardless of the quality of their production.
Paying more for a product with a fair trade label is no more "anti-market" than spending more to buy a product of the Gucci brand.
Moreover, this label reflects better ethical priorities.
It is not only a grant by governments, its success dependent on market demand and not the politics lobby.
Fortunately, in Europe, this demand is growing rapidly.
Lets hope that it will quickly reach such levels throughout the developed countries, where consumers can decide on their own how to spend their money.
Calves, pigs and American democracy.
Among the headlines on the return of the Democratic majority in Congress after the November elections, the result of an important vote has gone largely unnoticed.
Although it has highlighted the shortcomings of the American political system, it has also led me to believe again in the compassion of ordinary American citizens.
In Arizona, citizens can, if they have gathered enough signatures, submit a bill to the popular vote.
This year, one of the questions submitted to a popular vote was a law to forbid that pigs or calves reared for meat be tied down or confined in such a way that prevents them from turning around freely, lying down or extending their legs.
Those who do not know the methods of intensive farming will perhaps be surprised for the need for such legislation.
The traditional kennel method, as it is practised around the world there are 50 years ago, and in some countries still today, allows the animals to move and stretch.
But today, nearly 90 percent of breeding sows - the mothers of pigs raised and slaughtered for meat, bacon, and ham - spend most of their lives in cages that measure about 60 centimeters by 2.2 meters.
They can not turn around, nor extend their legs when lying down, nor walk forward or backward more than one step.
They are sometimes tied up to restrict their movement.
Similarly, calves are confined throughout their lives in individual boxes where they cannot move around, go to bed or stretch.
Essentially, these methods are designed to save on labor costs. They facilitate the management of animals and will employ fewer and less qualified workers.
They also prevent animals from wasting energy by moving around or by fighting amongst themselves.
A few years ago, following protests from animal welfare organisations, the European Commission asked for a report to the standing committee of the EU on intensive farming methods.
The report's conclusions indicate that the animals suffer from the inability to move and from the boredom of having nothing to do for days.
Of course, common sense can reach the same conclusions.
Following the report, the EU has set the dates from which the confinement of farm animals will be banned.
For the calves, on January 1st, 2007.
Individual stalls for sows, already outlawed in the United Kingdom and Sweden, will be banned starting in 2013 throughout the European Union.
Measures to improve the welfare of battery hens, raised in banks of wire cages with not enough room to extend their wings, are also being applied progressively.
We foresee nothing of the sort in the United States.
Earlier, when my European friends asked me why the United States evidenced such a delay in animal welfare compared to Europe, I did not know what to answer.
If they had insisted, I would have had to admit that one possible explanation was that the Americans cared less about the animals than the Europeans.
Then, in 2002, animal protection organizations succeeded in getting a proposition banning individual stalls for sows in Florida submitted to a popular vote.
To everyone's surprise, the proposal was accepted by 55 percent of voters.
Last month in Arizona, despite generously funded opposition by the food industry, a ban on confinement boxes for calves and pigs was also approved by 62 percent of voters.
Neither the Florida nor Arizona are particularly progressive states -- both voted for George W. Bush against John Kerry in 2004.
The results of these two popular votes strongly suggest that if all Americans should decide on the maintenance of the pregnant sows and veal in containment, a large majority would be against it.
Ultimately, it seems that Americans are as concerned as Europeans about cattle's living conditions.
To explain the difference between the welfare of animals in the US and Europe, it is certainly necessary to compare the political systems.
In Europe, voters' concerns with animals' living conditions have resonated among the members of national parliaments and the European Parliament, with the adoption of national and EU directives to improve their lot.
In the United States on the other hand, those same concerns have had no visible effect on the members of Congress.
There is no federal law on farm animal welfare and virtually no legislation on the state level.
In my opinion, the tens of millions of dollars from the food industry pocketed by officials seeking to be re-elected means something.
The animal's rights movement, despite a strong popular support, does not have weight in the arena of lobbying and political donations.
In the American electoral races, money counts more than the views of the voters.
Party discipline is weak, and congressmen must themselves raise the most money for their re-election - in this case, every two years for members of the House of Representatives.
In Europe, where party cohesion is strong and the parties, not candidates, finance election campaigns, money plays a smaller role.
In the United States, a country proud of its democratic tradition, calves and pigs are not the only losers by any means.
Any news on the new army made up entirely of Afghans?
The assassination of the Afghan Minister of aviation by a mob (perhaps encouraged by members of the interim administration of Afghanistan) shows that Afghan society remains deeply divided.
The first reforms of the Afghan army will only accentuate its divisions.
The minister of defence of the temporary administration of Hamid Karzai in Kabul has already appointed the senior officers of this new army.
The Minister, General Mohammed Fahim, is a Tajik from the Panjshir district in the north, who three months ago became the head of the forces of Northern Alliance that captured Kabul after U.S. bombers  paved the way.
As a group, his affectation  is a direct challenge to the goal of reunification of the country of Mr. Karzai.
Afghanistan is a multi-ethnic nation, the largest group being the Pashtuns, who represent two fifths of the total population.
The Hazars and Tajikis make up a respectable fifth of the population.
Of the 38 officers elevated to the rank of general by Mr. Fahim, 37 are Tajiks, the thirty eighth is an Uzbek.
If, on the 15 to 17 million Pashtuns in the country, some are recruited as soldiers, they will serve under a command structure almost entirely composed of Tajiks.
The language of the Pashtuns is, however, different from Tajik as much as Spanish is from English, and millions of Pashtuns reach the age of military service with at best only a few notions of Tajik.
The geographical profile of the new military authority is as limited as its ethnic composition.
35 of the 38 senior officers are from a small area north of Kabul, that includes the province of Parwan (where Bagram airport is ) and the Panjshir Valley, along the Northern Alliance's stronghold.
In other words, the native potential leaders from 27 of the 29 provinces of Afghanistan were excluded from the new military leadership in their country.
Such a small group might overcome the impression that its members are a closed clique if they represented a broad cross-section of the dozens of political parties in the country.
But this is not the case.
Eighteen of the 38 senior officers come from one party, the Jamiat-e-Islami, the Islamic faction that has long been led by Mullah and former professor of theology Burhanuddin Rabbani.
This was the party that governed Kabul briefly in the mid-1990s, creating the bloodshed and chaos that led most of the Afghans to welcome the arrival of the Taliban.
The Communists practically equalled the number of members of the Jamiat in the military hierarchy.
Sixteen of the thirty-eight officers have long aligned to this party whose tricks in the late 1970s led to the Soviet invasion of 1979-89 which cost two and half million lives in Afghanistan.
Most Afghans now see the Communists with the same degree of sympathy that the Czechs and Poles had for the National Socialists of Hitler.
It is true that some Afghans, as elsewhere, joined the Communist Party for different reasons and that they were in no way all hardened ideologues.
But in the case of General Fahim's generals, six were professional Communist Party workers and continued to serve the party after the Red Army's invasion.
These six men, plus three Communisst who served as officers in the Afghan army, have actively collaborated during the Soviet occupation of Afghanistan, which lasted a decade.
Imagine how the French would have reacted if a quarter of the French officers corps of the post World War II era had been on the side of the Wehrmacht while it was occupying their country.
In Afghanistan, news travels quickly by word of mouth.
The Nationalists Afghans (i.e., almost all Afghans) will discover soon the political reasons for members of the innermost circle of General Fahim, if not already done.
Even this overwhelming evidence of bias and prejudice in the training of the high command of the new army could be undone if the generals included in their task a professionalism and commitment to the patriotic values of armed forces that were truly national.
Unfortunately, only 10 of the 38 officers promoted by Fahim were trained as professional military officers.
An eleventh served as a pilot.
By contrast, twenty-four of thirty-eight generals (the training of the remaining four generals remain unknown) are civilians, who had a profession, coming from the offices of the Communist Party or in one case, which were mullah.
What do all of these statistics mean in terms of everyday reality?
They mean that when the heads of international peacekeeping forces in Afghanistan, as well as official military and diplomatic American officials meet with the Afghan defence deputy minister, they will meet with Abdul Rashid Dostum, a warlord and a notoriously brutal and corrupt communist, who remains in contact with old friends of the Red Army still on duty in Moscow.
This means that the head of the armed forces in Afghanistan as well as the head of operations and the head of Army intelligence are also communists, men whose loyalty remains uncertain and whom many Afghans mistrust.
Is this team likely to unite an Afghanistan torn apart by war?
Is the presence of troops in Kabul able to instill confidence in the three-quarters of the Afghan population who are excluded from the military high command?
Or this list constitutes rather the harvest of an approach "all for the winner" of the government that is required (at some point in the future) to unleash another bloody national reaction  by those whose legitimate interests have been cynically trampled on?
The UN and European and American politicians must ponder these questions before agreeing to a thoroughgoing takeover by a small unpopular minority.
Celebration of the irrational
Hooray for the new winners of Nobel Prize in Economics: Daniel Kahneman of Princeton University and Vernon Smith of George Mason University in Virginia.
As many Nobel Prizes, these rewards not only recognise the key work undertaken by M.M. Kahneman and Smith, but also the schools of thought that they have helped to develop.
Mr Kahneman, a psychologist, has shown that individuals consistently behave in a less conventional way than what traditional economists believe.
His work shows not only that people sometimes act differently from standard economic theoretical predictions, but also that they do it regularly, systematically and in a manner which can be understood and interpreted through different assumptions that compete with those used by mainstream economists.
For most market participants, and in fact for most ordinary observers, that doesn't seem not to make much of a difference.
The traders on Wall Street that traffic with actions that they know to be bad exploit the irrational that mm. Kahneman and Smith have shown.
Much of the enthusiasm that led to the swelling of the markets was rooted in exploiting investors' behavior.
In fact, this irrationality is not new to economists, either.
John Maynard Keynes described once the stock market as not being based on the fight of rational individuals to discover the foundations of markets, but rather as a beauty contest in which the winner is the onewho best guess what the judges will say.
The Nobel Prize this year celebrates the criticism of a simplistic market economy, just like last year's (that I received with two other colleagues).
Last year's winners were focusing on the fact that the market players have different information (and mistakes), and that this asymmetry of information has a marked impact on the functioning of the economy.
Specifically, last year's winners implied that markets are not effective; that governments have a great role to play.
The invisible hand of Adam Smith, the idea that free trade leads to the effectiveness as guided by an invisible hand, in part because it does not exist.
This, too, is not new for those who work every day with the markets (and make a fortune by taking advantage of this information asymmetry and exceed).
For more than 20 years ago, economists were passionate about these so-called ‘ rational ’ forecast models who assumed that all players have the same information (albeit imperfect) and are perfectly rational, that markets are perfectly efficient, that there has never unemployment (except when it is caused by the unions eager or minimum wages imposed by the governments), and that there has never any rationing of funding.
Such models are predominant, particularly in postgraduate courses in the United States, despite evidence to the contrary that demonstrate the triumph of ideology over science.
Unfortunately, students of these higher education programs are now the decision-makers in many countries and they are trying to implement programs based on these ideas, that are today known as the market fundamentalism.
Let me be clear here: the rational expectations models have contributed significantly to economic theory; the rigor that their supporters have impressed on economic thinking has helped to highlight the weakness of its many underlying assumptions.
Any good scientific thought is able to recognise it's limits, but the prophets of rational expectations generally have shown little modesty.
Vernon Smith is one of the leaders of the development of experimental economics, the idea that you can test many economic proposals in a laboratory.
One of the reasons the economy is a complex issue, which also explains many disagreements among economists, is that economists cannot conduct controlled experiments.
Nature throws off balance the full-scale experiences, but in most circumstances, so many things can change so quickly that it is often difficult to disentangle the causes from the consequences.
In principle, a laboratory can conduct controlled experiments, and thus generate more reliable inferences.
Critics of the experimental economy worry that the subjects apply to experimental contexts, ways of thinking that are determined outside of the experiment, and that the experiments and inferences are not as detached and clear that in the physical sciences.
However, the economic experience provide some knowledge on an important number of issues, such as the improved concept of auctions.
Above all, irrationality of market participants, the main issue of the work of Mr Kahneman, has been repeatedly verified in the context of laboratories.
One of the most amusing speculations raised by experimental economics is the takeover of egoism from altruism.
It seems (at least in experimental situations) that the experimental subjects are not as selfish as economists believe, with the exception of one group: the economists themselves.
Is it because economics is a discipline that attracts people who are, by nature, selfish, or because the economy allows individuals to change so as to make themselves more selfish?
The answer, certainly, is sure to contain a little of both.
There is no doubt that experimental research and future work will help resolve this issue of the relative importance of these hypotheses.
The Nobel prize demonstrates how important it is to study the individuals and economies such as they are and not as we want to see them.
It is only by understanding real human behavior that we can hope to develop policies that will also allow us to better run our economies.
Bush and his bad-faith energy policy
An episode of the most surreal quality happened this year during the World Economic Forum in Davos. Experts from the oil industry have explained that the melting of polar cap -- far faster than all of the earlier forecasts - -- is in fact not actually a problem, but in fact an opportunity, since  huge new quantities of oil will now be accessible.
Similarly, these experts have acknowledged that the refusal of the United States to sign the Law of the Sea, the international convention which determines access to sources of offshore oil and other maritime mineral resources, poses a risk of international conflict.
However, they also stressed the benefits: the oil industry, in its relentless pursuit of new reserves, has no need to beg Congress to get the right to plunder Alaska.
President George W. Bush has a strange ability of not understanding  important messages.
For years, it has become increasingly clear that its energy policy is wrong.
Some members of his party refer to a former energy bill drafted by the oil industry, as being very beneficial for all the lobbyists.
In praising to the skies the virtues of the market economy, Bush's only objective consists of giving enormous subsidies to the oil industry, despite the increasing deficits the country is facing.
But the market is not working properly when it is a matter of energy. The government should be totally opposed to what the Bush administration has proposed.
The fact that Americans do not pay the price of pollution -- and especially that of their huge production of greenhouse gases -- resulting from their energy wastage leads to a devaluation of energy prices and consequently, excessive consumption.
The government should encourage energy savings. Its intervention on setting prices, primarily through energy taxes, is an effective method to do so.
But instead of favoring saving energy, Bush insisted on a policy of "first draining America" of its own resources, making it in the future even more dependent on external oil resources.
It doesn't matter whether strong demand is raising oil prices and creating a windfall for many Middle East countries, which are not the best friends of America.
Now, more than four years after the terrorist attacks of September 2001, it seems that Bush has finally taken the measure of the growing energy dependency of America. It had become difficult for him not to see the consequences of the rapidly rising oil prices.
But, once again, the faltering moves of its government will only worsen the issues in the immediate future.
Bush is still refusing to act in favor of energy savings and spending very little money to support his continued prayer of salvation.
What to make, then, of the recent declaration of Bush on his commitment to reduce, within 25 years , American oil dependency in the middle east by 75%?
For investors, the message is clear: Don't invest anymore in the new reserves in the Middle East, which are by far the cheapest oil in the world.
However, if there is no new investment in the Middle East reserves, the unbridled growth in energy consumption in the USA, China and elsewhere means that demand outstrips supply.
And on top of it all, Bush's threats of sanctions against Iran could lead to a disruption in the supply of one of the largest producers in the world.
With a global oil production almost at its peak and prices that have almost doubled since the war in Iraq, this heralds prices even higher and more profits for the oil industry, the only real winner of the policy of Bush's Middle East.
However, nobody should blame Bush for having acknowledged that there is a problem.
But, as always, his proposals are nothing more than a small trick of his administration.
Besides his refusal to admit global warming, to encourage energy savings or to allocate sufficient funds to further research, Bush's great promise to reduce America's dependence on Middle East oil does not mean much.
With only 20% of America's oil extracted in the Middle East, Bush's aim could simply be achieved by increasing modestly supplies from other parts of the world.
The Bush administration must absolutely realise that oil benefits from the global market.
Even if America were completely independent of oil from the Middle East, the reduction of energy production in this region could have devastating effects on world prices and even more so on the American economy.
As is too often the case with the Bush administration, there is no clear explanation of the official policy.
Is Bush playing with the policies to change the public's view to be an anti-arab and anti-iranien America.
Or is it yet another example of incompetence and confusion?
According to what we saw these past five years, the right answer is certainly more than a bit of bad faith and pure foolishness.
The road map of China
China is poised to adopt his 11th five-year plan, setting the stage to extend what is arguably the most remarkable economic transformation in history, while improving the well-being of almost a quarter of the world's population.
Never before has the world known such sustained growth; never before had there been such a reduction in poverty.
The explanation of the long-term success of China lies partly in its unique combination of pragmatism and vision.
While much of the rest of the developing world, according to the Washington consensus, is engaged in a quest to increase GDP worthy of Don Quixote, China has once again made clear that it sought sustainable and more equitable increases of the real living standards.
China is aware that it has entered a phase of economic growth imposing huge demands on the environment that cannot last.
Unless we change course, living standards will eventually be compromised.
It is for this reason that the new five-year plan places great emphasis on the environment.
Many parts of China among the most backward grew so fast that would be a wonder if other parts of the country were growing even faster.
While this phenomenon has reduced poverty, inequality has risen, with growing disparities between urban and rural areas, and between coastal and inland regions.
This year's World Bank's World Development Report explains why inequality, not just poverty, should raise concerns as China's 11th Five Year Plan attacks the problem head-on.
The government calls for a more harmonious society over several years, and the plan describes ambitious programs for achieving this goal.
China also recognizes that what separates the least developed countries from the most developed countries is not only a difference of resources but also of knowledge.
So it established bold plans to reduce these disparities and created a basis for independent innovation.
China's role in the world and in the world economy has changed, and the plan also reflects the situation.
Its future growth will be based more on domestic demand than on exports, which means an increase in consumption.
Indeed, China suffers from an unusual problem: excessive savings.
The people save in part due to weakness in social government insurance programs: strengthen Social Security (pension), public health and education will reduce the social inequality, will increase the sense of well-being of citizens and household goods.
If it did (and, until now, China has almost always outstripped even its own high expectations) these adjustments may impose enormous pressure on a global economic system already destabilized by the United States' enormous fiscal and commercial imbalances.
If China starts to save less, as announced by its representatives, and goes on with a more diversified investment of its reserves, who is going to finance the trade deficit of more than $2 billion a day of the United States?
This is an issue to address another day, but this day is perhaps not so distant.
With such a clear vision of the future, the challenge will be in the implementation.
China is a big country, which could not have succeed so well without extensive decentralization.
But the decentralization poses its own problems.
Greenhouse gases, for example, are global problems.
While America claims that it can not afford to do anything about it, the most senior Chinese officials have acted more responsively.
Within a month after the adoption of the plan, new ecological taxes on cars, petrol and timber products have been imposed: China is using market mechanisms to resolve its environmental problems and those of the world.
But the pressures on leaders of local governments to create economic growth and jobs will be enormous.
They will be very tempted to say that if America is not capable of producing in a way to protect our planet, then how could they do it?
To translate this vision into action, the Chinese government will need strong policies, including significant increases in taxes on the environment.
While China has been transformed into a market economy, it saw develop some problems that are the scourge of developed countries: special interests obscuring the personal interests under a mask of ideology.
Some will mention the trickle-down effect: do not worry about the poor, everyone will benefit from growth.
And others opposed the policies of competition and the strict laws of corporate governance: Let Darwinism operate its wonders.
Arguments for growth will be promulgated to counter strong social and environmental policies: for example, that increasing taxes on gasoline would kill our nascent auto industry.
Such so-called pro-growth policies do not only fail to provide growth, they also threaten the entire vision of China's future.
There is only one way to avoid it: the open discussion of economic policies in order to unveil sophistry and to provide the means to implement creative solutions for the many challenges China faces today.
George W. Bush has shown how dangerous it is to abuse secrecy and restrict the decision-making process to a close circle of sycophants.
Most people outside China do not realise how its leaders, conversely, have been engaged extensive deliberations and consultations (even with foreigners) when they struggled to solve the problem with which they were faced.
The market economies are not self-regulated.
They can not simply be left on autopilot, especially if one wants to ensure that their benefits are widely shared.
But dealing with a market economy is not easy.
It is a balancing act, which must constantly respond to economic changes.
The 11th five-year plan of China provides a road map in this direction.
The world opens its eyes, full of hope and of fear, while the lives of 1.3 billion people continue to be transformed.
The lessons on democracy by Tocqueville
Because of the war in Iraq, 200 years after the birth of Tocqueville, the world debating the nature of democracy.
Tocqueville is rightly famous for having rejected the nostalgia reactionary, given that democracy is our destiny, warning, however, on the dangers it presents for freedom.
Should we share his concern?
Tocqueville did not consider democracy first as a political system, but primarily as an intellectual property that shapes the customs and traditions of society, awarding him a sociological and psychological dimension.
Tocqueville believed that democratic systems guide the course of our thoughts, our desires and our passions.
In the same way that there has been the renaissance man and the twentieth century's Homo Sovieticus, "the democratic man" is a form of human being.
For Tocqueville, the systemic effects of democracy can lead people to abandon their ability to reason.
They can only pretend to judge the events and the values by themselves, when in fact they simply repeat the reductrice views  of the majority.
Which Tocqueville called the stranglehold of the "social strength" on the opinion is doubtless stronger in the democratic systems - a view point that left to presage the level of demagoguery and of manipulation by the media in the modern world.
Tocqueville believed that over the long term, nothing can really object to this trend.
Neither local democracy, nor small groups within society, nor the counterweights, nor civil rights can prevent the decline of critical thinking that democracy seems to engender.
The school is at best an enclave away from the irresistible influence that society exerts on the mind.
Similarly, Tocqueville believed that a religious faith or the search for virtue in the ancient manner could sometimes elevate the soul, but that both were incompatible with the democratic ideal when imposed by the authorities within the framework of public life.
In this sense, the Neo-Marxist theorists of the Frankfurt and Hannah Arendt schools who feared above all the disappearance of reason in modern societies are the heirs to the thoughts of Tocqueville.
It can also be noted that the French philosopher Marcel Gauchet has called one of these recent books democracy against itself.
For these authors, the democratic way of life tends to eliminate any original thinking and prevent the emergence of a culture of good level, yielding to a mediocrity that leave people vulnerable to the enemies of democracy.
If history abounds with murderous regimes supported by cowed and deceived masses, the largest democratic country is likely to push its citizens into apathy and limit them to short-term thinking and myopic interests.
The past - despite rituals aimed at the commemoration of historical events - is masked by dependence on the present moment and the latest thing.
Even the supposedly educated ruling class is a victim of this grip.
The main problem with the democratic mentality lies in its lack of historical awareness.
As proclaimed Tocqueville, are the shortcomings of democracy make resigned pessimism  the only realistic path – but unacceptable - which is open to us?
I don't think so.
There are ways to combat what might be called the "Democratic stupidity" that is spreading today.
The first of these means is to develop an education system which forms of real critical minds, particularly through the teaching of largely neglected subjects (nowadays) like literature, history and philosophy.
If we want to create citizens who are well informed and able to think for themselves, which is essential to the functioning of a democracy, our schools need to stop running after the latest styles in courses and begin to develop the analytical skills of the pupils.
Because of their tendency to cultivate superficiality and distraction, the mass media are the main obstacle to such an education.
Today, many people spend more time during their lives in front of a television than in a classroom.
The passivity induced by mass media is the exact opposite of the active engagement of citizens that is necessary for democracy.
But it is hard to imagine that the mass media (other than quality newspapers) would, of their own volition, become a means of enhancing citizens' critical thinking.
This focus on the mass media does not come from an elitist disregard for popular culture.
It is not just a matter of popularity- Mozart was popular in his time and Shakespeare's plays attracted the poor as much the rich- but of the refusal of mass culture to challenge and provoke.
The result is indifference and widespread public passivity.
For a long time, a global media culture is growing increasingly unable to generate any criticism or to improve feelings.
Because of its lack of interest in these matters, it is a culture that threatens democratic freedoms, because it doesn't create in any way a sense of duty to society, history or the community.
Is it too late to defend oneself against a culture that blunts the spirit to that point?
Tocqueville scorned the elites of his time because of their complacency about the dangers of democracy of the masses.
Will the short-sightedness of our leaders help achieve the realization of his alarming prophecy?
A Europe for all
Long time members of the European Union seem to doubt the future of the European Union, but the Ukrainians are looking at the European Union with certain hope and admiration.
The fundamental objective of our foreign policy is to integrate European progress, because Ukraine has discovered that nationhood is not an end in itself, but merely a beginning.
Indeed, European unity is indivisible: when a nation is a victim of ostracism, no nation is free.
We are, in Europe, all linked by a bond which we cannot escape, connected by a single destiny.
All the aspects of the culture we share, without mentioning the century of suffering that we have just shared, confirm this.
Everything that affects a European directly affects us all indirectly.
We can never again allow ourselves to live with strict notions of two Europes, a Europe of haves and a Europe of have-nots, of chosen people and outcasts.
Anyone living on the European continent today cannot, in fact must not, be regarded as a foreigner in his Union.
The great Pax Europa of today, as as well as the current pan-European prosperity depends on it.
Some would say, of course, that Ukraine is not part of Europe.
They should come to Kiev and meet its inhabitants, young and old, the workers, the wives of farmers, lawyers and doctors and teachers who stood up and remained on their feet in the cold and snow for weeks to defend their liberties last winter.
Are they not united with those who gathered around General de Gaulle in the French Resistance?
Do they not make one with those who died in battle for the defence of the Spanish Republic in the 1930s, those who freed Budapest in 1956 and put an end to fascism in Spain and Portugal in the 1970s?
Are they not motivated by the same spirit as Poland's Solidarity movement and the peaceful masses that started the Velvet Revolution in Prague in 1989?
This is the true soul of Europe and no doubt can destroy it.
For all those who consider that Ukraine is too far behind to become a member of the Union, I say this: They should visit my country and see the mothers who stay until late in the office to teach their children how to use the computer in their office.
Let them come to language classes in every village and city where young people getting ready for Europe by learning French, German and English.
Those who doubt Ukraine's European vocation should understand that Europe is not a simple question of equipment and motorway: it is the craving for freedom, prosperity and solidarity.
I believe that our future is as promising that Europe's past is proud, and that our destiny is not a land border forgotten in a troubled region but an influential part of peace and unity of Europe.
Self-determination is no longer synonymous with isolation because sharing in the national independence of our times simply means returning to the world stage with a new status.
The new nations can build the same kind of successful relationships with their former occupants as France has established with Germany : a relationship based on equality and mutual interests.
That is the type of relationship my government wants to establish with Russia. That is the way we can help extend the area of peace in Europe.   or  This is the type of relationship my government wants to establish with Russia. This is the way we can help extend the area of peace in Europe.  (It depends on the context.)
It is premature, of course, to go beyond the indication of the utmost importance we attach to the possibility of entering the European Union.
We know that our role in this great structure will not come about in one night.
We know that the great works of European unity is not confined to the documents and statements but are rooted in the innovative designed to improve living standards and provide security to all Europeans.
Building a Ukraine to join the European Union will not be easy, fast, or without effort.
But as the European Union itself, it will be built and it will happen.
We know that the challenge is great, but worth the trouble, and Europe must understand that this is our goal.
The renovation of Ukraine depends in part on innovative warfare to end a century-long nightmare in which fascism and communism, ideologies born at the heart of Europe, fought for power.
Throughout cities in Ukraine, a few months ago still, parents and children confronted armed troops, snarling dogs and even death.
Just a few years ago a young journalist, Georgi Gongadze, seeking to inform the public about the corruption of our former regime, was assaulted and beheaded by the henchmen of the regime.
Our Orange Revolution, last winter, has proved that Ukraine and its people can win.
And, despite the doubts and difficulties, I still have an unfailing confidence in Europe.
I refuse to accept despair as the final response to the ambiguities and horrors of the history of Ukraine.
I refuse to accept the idea that Ukraine is so tragically condemned to live at the heart of the night without stars from the Communist legacy to the point of never being able to see peace and a real European unity.
When the European Union citizens look at Ukraine's place in Europe, they will have to look closely and beyond the face that we will show them.
See above the devastated areas that has caused communism, beyond the poverty and social divisions through which our former leaders today repudiated sought to extend their grip.
They must gaze close up on the face of our president, Viktor Yushchenko, ravaged by the poison he was administered in the election campaign last year, and remember the words of the great Frenchman André Malraux, for whom "the most beautiful faces are those of the wounded."
The Muslim Civil War
Is the gap between Sunnis and Shiites in the Middle East far deeper than the current conflict between Israel and the Arabs?
One might think so given the reaction of some Arab governments to Hezbollah's decision to attack Israel.
While Israeli bombs fell on Beirut and Tyre, Saudi Arabia, perhaps the Arab Muslim state's most conservative of all, openly condemned the actions of Hezbollah who initiated the conflict against Israel.
Never before in the history of Arab-Israeli conflict has a country that considers itself the leader of the Arab Muslim peoples backed Israel so openly.
In addition, Saudi Arabia's separation from Hezbollah is not a unique case.
Egypt and Jordan have also roundly condemned Hezbollah and its leader, Sheikh Hassan Nasrallah, for their adventurism.
What's behind this stunning development?
Are we undergoing a fundamental shift in relations between Arab nationalism and Islamic sectarianism?
Does the Sunni government of Saudi Arabia's fear and anxiety over Shiite Islam push it to be more involved in the Arab unity and the Palestinian cause?
The denunciations of Hezbollah by Arabs suggest that the Muslim sectarian divide, already evident in the daily violence in Iraq, is growing and intensifying across the Middle East.
The will of President George W. Bush destroy societies frozen in the Arab world was sentenced to draw up the forces of modernisation against the elements of traditional Islamic and Arabic societies.
It seems instead to have released the most atavistic forces in the region.
The opening of this Pandora's could have given birth to an era of even more terrible violence, which can be described without a doubt as a "Muslim civil war."
The Shiite-Sunni gap has existed since the dawn of the history of Islam, but the geographical and ethnic isolation of non-Arab Shiite Iran, as well as the dominance of their Shiite minorities by Sunni Arab countries, has generally left this rivalry in the background.
Those tensions have further receded during the wave of "Islamisation" created by the Iranian revolution, because in its wake the sectarian Sunni identity of the Arabs has been further put back in the background as a broader 'Islamic' assertion appeared .
That all changed when Al Qaeda, a Sunni terrorist group that draws heavily on the ideology of Saudi Wahabbi, launched its attacks against America in September 2001.
A special branch of Sunni militant Islam was underway.
When the United States launched wars against both the Sunni Taliban in Afghanistan and Iraq's Sunni regime, this enboldened radical Sunnis.
Sunni Arabs in the region, who have now gained confidence, see Israel and the West as a single threat, the other one comprising the so-called "Shia crescent" -- the arc of land that stretches from Lebanon to Iran through Syria and Iraq, populated by the supposed Shia heretics.
The leaders of Saudi Arabia, as keepers of sacred sites of the Muslim faith such as Mecca and Medina, feel this threat perhaps most acutely.
To Sunnis, Shiites are not confined to dominate the oil-rich regions of Iran, Iraq and the regions of the East of Saudi Arabia, they are also trying, by the actions of Hezbollah, to usurpate the role of 'protector "the dream of all Arabs, the Palestinian cause.
It is because the Saudi royal family derives its legitimacy from a strict form of Sunni Islam and casts doubt on the loyalty of its Shiite population that the kingdom is moving away from Hezbollah.
The irony of the thing is that America, protective for a long time of Saudi Arabia, made the responsibility of Shia in toppling Saddam Hussein and giving the Shiite parties the power in Iraq.
The Bush administration seems to recognize what it had done, as the Shiite arc rises in the east of the Arab Muslim world, the United States is trying to strengthen its protection of the Sunni arc - Egypt, Jordan and Saudi Arabia - in the west of the region.
Israel, once an implacable enemy of the Arab cause, now seems to be  inside this defensive structure .
But such a defensive position is necessarily unstable, simply because of the pan-Arab sentiments.
Today, ordinary Saudi citizens are hooked on Al Jazeera and other Arab TV networks via satellite to follow events in Gaza and southern Lebanon.
They see Arab (not Shiite) bloodshed, and Hezbollah alone responding.
For them, Hezbollah has become a heroic model of resistance.
This is causing the Saudi state to widen the Sunni-Shiite schism.
After the official denunciation of Hezbollah by the kingdom, the Saudi state asked its official Wahhabi clerics to issue fatwas condemning Hezbollah as heretical and deviant Shiites.
Such sentences can only exacerbate sectarian divisions within Saudi Arabia and the surrounding region.
Faced with the worsening of these antagonisms, will Sunni Muslim regimes end up believing that they need their own Hezbollah to fight in their corner?
If they reach that conclusion, they will not need to look far away, because the fighters of this kind have already completed a training - given by Al Qaeda.
Why Europe can no longer ignore Georgia
The era when Europe could rely on America to make war and restore peace and democracy in its own backyard is over.
Consequent with the European Union enlargement and, as demonstrated by the recent Russian gas crisis, the court now includes not only Ukraine but also Georgia.
Indeed, in Georgia, as in Ukraine, democracy is tested and Europe cannot afford to ignore it.
Georgia was the first country in the post-Soviet zone to put into practice its "Revolution of Colour" and by this to demonstrate, with dignity and maturity, the choice of its people in favour of democracy and European values.
The flags of the European Union that fly over all Georgian public buildings since then show the natural connection, as old as the history of this country which, for the ancient Greeks, was an integral part of the world of the time.
Prometheus, Medea, the Amazons, and in neighbouring Armenia, Noah's Ark, are all signs that the Europe of our myths starts here.
Through its history, its civilization, its traditions, but also its more recent past, Georgia was different from other republics of the former USSR, for its critical, independent, and even rebellious aspects, Georgia is probably still the place where this democratic streak is strongest.
So it is even more worrying to see threatened the democratization of the country.
Everything seemed to have started well enough.
Because of the launch without striking a blow of a policy of reforms, privatization, of fight against corruption, the research of new and therefore free of appeasing the previous regime, the implementation of a foreign policy marked by return to Europe in the game in Georgia.
The totalitarian mindset has resurfaced in these leaders who, proclaiming themselves the representatives of the majority, have been grabbing ever more powers.
This is a caste which, like the thousand-headed Hydra, never ceases to die and be reborn from its ashes.
They and their methods of power that the "rose revolution" in November 2003 wanted all at once expunged were reintroduced into the heart of power, using their networks, with contacts including outside the boundaries, the enormous financial burden, their ability to intrigue and manipulation of the political and electoral appliances.
This is a power that does not sufficiently respect the essence of democracy which is not in the polls but in the separation and balance of powers.
Every day, the government interferes in the legislature, the vast majority of laws are written by the presidential chancellery; the parliament wants to control the daily exercise of government policy, including, in my case, the appointment of ambassadors and their day-to-day operation.
Finally, and this is the most serious, the judiciary power has still not managed to break away from the guardianship of the executive and does not constitute any longer, or not yet, in the eye of the citizen or the investor, the guarantor and protector, without which there is no rule of law nor economic freedom.
This is a society which while democratic in its thinking, is not yet so in its actions. It is still reluctant to engage in politics, thus leaving the political stage to those who have been occupying it for too long.
Because this democracy is in danger of collapsing, but because it is still there, strongly implanted in the population, in the civil organisations, in a press that is searching for itself without losing its faculty for criticism...
It is time for Europe to save democracy in order not to destroy all its hopes.
The United States has already done what it can, since independence, and they are right beside the stability of Georgia.
The stability was certainly not identified with the democracy under Eduard Shevardnadze, Former Soviet foreign minister whom the Rose Revolution had resigned from his post of Georgian President.
But the Americans have invested very generously in the survival of Georgian elites and their learning of democracy.
The critic of the Soros initiatives, now in fashion, seems to me to be most injustified: the November revolution was not created from scratch by the Americans, notwithstanding the propaganda of the Russian nationalists too accustomed to the intervention to be able think differently, but the democratic substrate which enabled it has certainly been fed, encouraged and supported by supporters of the Soros Foundation.
The course Georgia must take is to withdraw - this time for good - its evil totalitarian, but that is a step that would require another kind of support that Europeans are not as likely to provide.
The models that must be proposed for the balance of power, the institutions of a state of law, the operation of the judiciary or local democracy must be inspired by the European forms that are closer to reality in Georgia that the Anglo-Saxon model, with the American variant.
If Europe today rejected this task, it will be betraying his fundamental duty torward this country, small, Mediterranean, flexible, of long tradition, where democracy has much better chances of success than in Ukraine, which is both great and always very Soviet in his mind, without referring to Central Asia.
Not to help Georgia is to accept that democracy and stability are so long to come not only in Tbilisi, but even more in Kiev, Minsk, to say nothing of Moscow.
It is above all taking a very serious risk.
Moscow, with ups and downs, endless dithering, an internal systems, began to resign itself to the idea of the inevitability of democracy, at least around it, not without having to abandon its imperial dreams and their instruments of power could suddenly revise its perception.
This hesitant resignation, this acceptance of normality in its relations with its neighbors, which was in its infancy, can be washed away by a sudden, irrational eruption of Russian power of the infamous "derjava" which is unable to resist the lure of weakness, the feeling of emptiness, the temptation again to not be equal, but the strongest.
This explains the recent Russian gas crisis.
Any sign of democracy's retreat, of the weakened democratic wave, will be taken by Moscow as a vain hope of reversal where Russia gradually became accustomed in not believing it.
It is Europe's responsibility to convince Russia that it is wrong to place its hope in a return to past.
Europe has the responsibility for itself, for its future energy independence. It also has the responsibility of demonstrating that there are also strong European values -- freedom, democracy, justice between peoples.
For that Europe must provide the tools of his policy: a large public private foundation for Europe and democracy, a university to train the executives of tomorrow of democracies that seek again, a police, an army of judges and magistrates who live models close to the companies we want to convert.
Europe especially needs conviction.
If Europe itself does not agree that it is interested in the fate of its neighbors, its democracies, and the future of its values and their diffusion, who will believe in it tomorrow?
Berlusconi beleaguered
Silvio Berlusconi, who will become president of the European Union on 1st July, is a wise man who once loved to take risks and whose commercial bets prove profitable. In the 1960s, he was the first to see that Milan, then a traditional Italian city where people walk to work, would become a modern metropolis, surrounded by American style suburbs.
Then he built his fortune in the real estate boom.
Fifteen years later, Mr. Berlusconi realized that the monopoly held by the Italian state television would not survive and he set up what will become the first private media group in Italy.
But he would not have achieved anything in television or in real estate, if he had not had the appropriate political connections.
In both cases, Berlusconi prevailed over his rivals, siding with the Socialists, then the rising stars of Italian politics.
His long association with Bettino Craxi, the most influential politician in Milan in the 1970s and prime minister of Italy during most of the 1980s, began early on.
On the other hand, political connections are not enough to become a politician.
Indeed, allowing trade to be decided by politics was certainly not part of the wishes of Berlusconi.
His media group, weakened by excessive diversification (the decision to enter the retail distribution virtually destroyed it), encountered problems in the 1990s.
Almost simultaneously, former Premier Craxi runs away in Tunisia, pursued by the Italian courts in the context of an investigation of corruption mani pulite conducted in the vast network known as Tangentopoli (Bribesville).
The flight and exile of Craxi caused Berlusconi a sense of loss by depriving him of the solid political support he needed.
He thus decided to become his own political sponsor.
As has often been the case in Italy's history, Berlusconi's decision to form a new political party (Forza Italia) a few months before the elections of 1994 paid off.
Silvio Berlusconi's lack of political experience resulted in the fall of his first government six months after.
Any other man as rich as Berlusconi would probably have given up.
But he persisted and presided over the opposition for six years ago.
In 2001, his determination was rewarded with a resounding victory and, most important, an apparent mandate to focus on change.
Once again, Berlusconi probably had no choice: in the late 1990s, his association with disgraced Socialists continued both politically and legally.
His only hope was to push the judges control the Parliament and to introduce new laws to stop the series of corruption trials that awaited him, a strategy that allows him to escape prosecution until his term to take end.
Unfortunately, while Berlusconi's government is invariably never short of speech, the legal provisions put in place to suspend his trials are among the few laws that were passed during his two years in power.
The achievements of Berlusconi in government combine good intuition (for example, the attempt to reform pensions Italian in 1994) and inadequate implementation (mainly by lack of courage, as surprising as this appears to be).
In 1994, during his first term, he realized early on that Italy should overhaul its pension system and introduced courageous legislation.
But one general strike proved enough to undermine his reformist zeal.
Recently, he has bravely sided with the United States in the war in Iraq, against the majority of the country and his own political coalition.
But he soon afterward frightened by his own courage and thus became an almost invisible ally.
Despite his rhetoric, Berlusconi didn't attend (or was not invited to)  the summit with President Bush in the Azores, in which the final decision to go to war was taken.
As regards social reform, he fought the unions, but not delivering the good fight: The infamous "Article 18" of Italy, which allows courts to reinstate an employee working in his job if a judge finds he was fired unfairly.
But while article 18 is important in principle, it is almost irrelevant in practice.
It only served to provoke a confrontation with the unions and to distract the government from far more important social reforms.
Contrary to what happened in 1994, Berlusconi's current government is still standing, but those who expected a revolution in support of the free market will be disappointed.
No significant tax cut was passed and the reform on pensions is still waiting.
Berlusconi's powerful Finance Minister, Giulio Tremonti, speaks often and naively about the need to renew government intervention into the economy; no action is undertaken to prevent strikes in the public transport sector.
The moderate right-wing voters, who wanted an Italian version (i.e., a somewhat diluted version) of the Reagan/Thatcher era, are disillusioned.
Berlusconi is trying to mask his inactivity frightening its voters, by repeating again and again that the election of the moderate left would be tantamount to signing a pact with the devil (i.e., the communists).
The Italians seem more intelligent, as was clearly demonstrated by the results of the administrative elections in June.
Why the courageous vision of the 1960s and 1970s it has lost its lustre?
This is partly due to the fact that we are no longer in this context; Berlusconi is 40 years old and during the past ten years he has lived in the world of Roman politics.
It has learned the art of political (and personal) survival, but he has lost his vision and his taste for risk.
Fill up the technological gap between the United States and Europe.
In the second half of the 1990s, the average annual growth rate of productivity in Europe rose 0.7% while the United States posted a rate of 1.4%.
However, if we distinguish between the industries that produce information and communication technologies (ICT) and those who simply use these technologies, then the gap in productivity growth appears to be almost entirely due to the weakness of the ICT European production.
Annual productivity growth in sectors that use the ICT technology has averaged 0.63% in the US between 1995 and 2000 against 0.41% in Europe.
This situation confirms a well-known fact: Europe is less effective than the US at conducting research leading to innovations, either because Europe allocates fewer resources to research, or because the available resources are used in a less effective way, or both.
It is certain that the total spending on research and development are lower in Europe than in the US, but not by much.
In the 1990s, the United States spent 2.8% of their GNP on research and development every year, versus 2.3% for Germany, 2% in the UK, and 1.9% in France.
As usual, the European governments continue to complain about the lack of financial resources to support research and development (a far-fetched argument, given the minuscule portion of expenditures that is allocated to research in the huge European budgets); and each time the European Commission authorizes them to, they subsidize innovative companies or those which, according to them, are most likely to invest in research and development.
France and Italy, for example, have demanded that the limits imposed by the Stability and Growth Pact on the budget deficits of Eurozone members exclude public spending allocated for research.
Similarly, the French government has decided to get out Alstom, a company which has developed several high-tech products, including the TGV, the French high-speed train, out of trouble before it became bankrupt.
But it is highly unlikely that these tactics will help develop the European high-tech sector.
Why?
Because the weakness in research is not, at least not primarily, a matter of funding.
The subsidies will not create efficient high-tech companies.
First let's deal with the question of research.
Europe is lagging behind the U.S. in each area: the number of patents, the number of Nobel laureates, and the number of researchers in other countries it can attract.
But the funding is only the noticeable portion of the problem.
A euro spent on research in Europe is less productive than a dollar spent in the US for this purpose, and this for two reasons: the motivations and the demand for technology.
We are afraid that additional spending not followed by a change of archaic university rules will only serve to produce more waste and not more discoveries.
They would increase the power, prestige and resources of steadfast pressure groups composed of established university professors that often prevent access and competition in their university.
The application of technology also plays an important role.
It allows us to focus the research, impose deadlines, sift through the results of research, and allows us to evaluate the patents according to market prices.
Without the reasons given by the beneficiaries of these research findings, research is likely to drift, often without clear direction.
We must recognise that this situation does not apply to all areas: the study of fragments of ancient Greek is precious, even if it rarely meets a demand.
But it is important in areas, both theoretical and practical, which could provide a basis for the emergence of new technologies: physics, biology, chemistry, technical, etc.
But it is defense spending which is the main motivation behind the demand for research.
Most of the technological advances in the post-war period (the micro-puces to the Internet until the new batteries for mobile phones developed for the US Army in Iraq) have had at least at the beginning, a military application.
Cell phones, tracking by satellite and high resolution cameras are expensive, but fortunately for industries that use them, their development costs have been partly borne by the government.
A key reason for the superiority of the US in terms of research is explained by the size and makeup of defence spending.
The Pentagon budget is not only important: it represents more than half of all American Government spending on research and development; in France, defense spending is only a quarter of the total expenditure.
In 1999, U.S. spending on defense research and development totaled 0.45% of GNP, whereas the UK and France have reached only half that number, with 0.26% and 0.22%, respectively.
As suggested by the Alstom case, the French have a different model in mind.
Instead of supporting research and development with the big defense budgets, they prefer to do so directly by subsidizing high-tech companies in France.
The official justification points to the national defense budgets being too low to create the demand needed to support research and development in high-tech sectors, while there is still no European budget for defense.
This is not a coincidence: if it is awarded in a spirit of competition, such a supranational budget would designate winners and losers.
But many European countries still refuse to accept that some of their high-tech companies could not be up to it: they think it is better to preserve these companies thanks to generous subsidies and to avoid, meanwhile, the consolidation of the European defence budgets.
By integrating its defense expenditures while increasing their importance, Europe would kill two birds with one stone.
It would be more credible when it needs to be heard at the tables of international negotiations, particularly about America, and it would boost scientific research.
To achieve this, it should not maintain larger deficits, which simply imply higher taxes, but reduce spending in other areas of the budget.
In other words: a short term sacrifice for a long term gain.
Debt the American way.
After nearly 15 years of unprecedented growth, with only a short downturn in 2000 / 2001 - the US is heavily indebted abroad,at nearly  25% of GDP.
With a current-account deficit which is now 5% of GDP, the external debt of the United States is growing quickly.
Yet no country can accumulate debt forever, and this situation must come to an end sooner or later.
At the beginning of the year 1985, when the current-account deficit the US had reached $120 billion - equivalent to a third of the current deficit - the rest of the world stopped the fund.
The dollar was brutally devalued, 50% compared to the deutschmark.
Europe has no interest in renewing this experience.
In reality, the world does not have the resources for a sudden disappearance of the current-account deficit of the United States.
Without exports to the United States, the sluggish growth that Europe experienced during the past year would vanish.
The process may have already begun: the value of the euro - between $1.20 and 1.30 dollars in recent months - was enough to freeze European growth for the end of this year.
Before the fall of the dollar, exports of the 25 EU member states have increased by 6.5% per year, against 2% for consumption and 3% for investment.
In Japan, the recent recovery was almost totally pulled by exports.
But the yen gain value and growth there also seems to be suspended.
While the world's central banks are full of dollars and trade imbalances are worrying, there are three possible solutions.
First, an increase in government savings in the United States.
It is unlikely, at least in the near future, given President Bush's ambitious plans on tax matters and the continuation of war in Iraq.
American savings are also slightly negative, and an increase could lead to a slowdown in activity in the short term.
Secondly, a more pronounced devaluation of the dollar, well above its present value compared to the euro and yen.
A revaluation of the Chinese yuan would also be a good thing.
Thirdly, an upturn of growth in Europe, which would cause a rise in exports from the United States.
For that to happen, European companies would have to reduce their costs and increase their productivity.
As always in that case, it promises a whole range of "structural reforms", but none will probably be implemented soon.
So, what to do?
One possibility would be to increase working hours without a proportional increase in hourly wages.
In the early 1970s, we worked the same number of hours on both sides of the Atlantic.
Today, in France and in Germany, we work on average 50% less than in the United States.
This is partly due to a higher European taxation, and on this level nothing is possible: one cannot force a person to work if they believe that their after tax earnings are not worth it.
But the relative decline of working time is also due to the success of unions, which have attained mandatory holidays.
A reform in this area, with longer working hours, would not reduce the total income of employees, but would reduce the costs of production.
This idea is beginning to be addressed in the press and, hopefully, behind the scenes among politicians and union leaders.
Meanwhile, the rest of the world has an interest in the United States retaining an unprecedented current-account deficit, at the cost of $500 billion per year.
This allows the Chinese to maintain the stability of their currency against the dollar, to remain extremely competitive, and to gradually shift 200 million workers from agriculture to industry, the aim of authorities for the next decade.
In Europe, the American exterior deficit is the only source of growth.
But this cannot continue.
One day or another, Europe will have to stop thinking that the United States can save its economy and start relying on its own resources.
But it is no surprise if the United States and the devaluation of the dollar are blamed for the next downturn in the European economy.
A scapegoat is always helpful.
Abba Eban, Voice of Israel.
For nearly two generations, Abba Eban has represented the voice of Israel by acting as a messenger close to the Conservatives and the powerful nations and the Jewish people worldwide.
Since his first appearance alongside Dr. Chaim Weizmann in the late 1940s during the struggle for independence and Jewish sovereignty, only a very few people have expressed the Zionist Jewish viewpoint so clearly and with such eloquence and conviction.
With his Churchillian prose and his Shakespearean cadences, his melodious utterances and his grandiloquent voice conveyed for decades the message of hope from a people who could have lost all hope and faith in humanity after the horrors of the Second World War.
As ambassador to the United States and the UN, then as Minister of Foreign Affairs, he represented Israel as a liberal fantasy with which the world could identify.
The largest and most powerful nations send a powerful spokesman, and his speeches became classic examples for men of state and diplomats from distant countries.
His books, that he found time to write despite the hectic demands of diplomacy, were composed with a unique combination of colossal erudition and crystal-clear intelligibility.
His university formation and his gift for rhetoric complement each other to form a unique whole.
Rarely has a small country been represented by a statesman of such stature: only Thomas Masaryk and Jan Smuts can stand up to such a comparison.
He was a true patriot in the old sense of the term: proud of his people without, however, being ethnocentric, a man of the world but deeply rooted in the Jewish cultural heritage, focused on the plight and the tribulations of the Jewish people but never losing sight of the universal horizon of humanity.
In a word, He was a modern Jew in the best sense.
It has often been claimed that the prime minister Levi Eshkol spoke seven languages, all in Yiddish.
You could say that Eban spoke ten of them, and all with an Oxford/Cambridge accent.
However, which were on the outside world was not always an advantage at the heart of harsh and the collapse of Israeli politics.  However, what pleased the outside world did not constitute an advantage to the harshness and collapse of Israeli politics.
Eban was doubtlessly too refined, too academic and too much a man-of-the-world to "hoist himself up to the top of a greasy pole," as Disraeli so well expressed it.
Accompanied by Golda Meir and Moshe Dayan, he was obliged to leave the government in 1974 after the Yom Kippur war.
He could hardly be held responsible for the hubris that triggered the avalanche of 1973, but nevertheless these events led to his downfall.
He was never able to return to power and when he was facing the new policy of primaries and populism, he felt defeated because he could not cope with this new style.
In the international arena, the pen of Eban took the place of the sword for him and his speech was his lance.
He was less adroit with insider political battles in Israel.
He could prove a hard fighter on the turf, but it is fairer to say however that he could have fought harder to defend his moderate and dovish convictions in the post-1967 government, in which he partipated.
It is not clear whether he would have prevailed, given his lack of an independent political base, but his prestige and his reputation at the international level could have give him a chance if he had chosen to take up the gauntlet.
He never did it.
The silence of Eban over the course of recent years wasn't only caused by his disillusionment with Israeli politics or by his declining health.
In a period when public debates in Israel are torn between pseudo-religious nationalist fanatists and anti-Zionists who are posing as post-modernists, the moral certainties of Eban, driven by good manners, can seem superficial.
But to build a country, it is essential to have a certain moral force, and Eban offered such a force in abundance to his people and the world.
Although several years have passed since I spoke to Eban, I never once doubted that he would have been extremely sad to see how the events turned out after the failure of the Camp David talks and Taba in 2000-2001 and the conduct adopted by the Israeli policy would seem like a bad omen to him.
However, in all likelihood he would have been even more disappointed by the inability of the Palestinians to reach an agreement on the existence of the Jewish state.
As a pro-Arab by training, in the culture of Arab and Muslim culture, he has always hoped that the past Arab glorious could be become younger, a growing Arab and Muslim tolerance could triumph of fanaticism and extremism.
Such was the basis of his hope for reconciliation between Jews and Arabs.
That this Arabic renaissance, to use the expression of the great Palestinian academic George Antonius, has not seen the light of day could have been Eban's biggest disappointment.
Despite the image of a man of the world that Eban gave, he was extremely vulnerable: what some might regard sometimes as pride could result from his humble origins.
While expressing himself in very careful English, Eban was not born in a castle: he came from a fringe of Anglo-Jews.
He was, in the truest sense, a "self-made man", whose courage, ambition, dynamism and deep faith in his fate have led to the top.
His spirit were sailing in the high-sphere.
In this, Abba Eban was a true representative of the people he was so gloriously representing.
A Practical Handbook to the Israeli Hawks
The announcement by Prime Minister Ariel Sharon stating his willingness to dismantle Jewish settlements in the Gaza Strip and some West Bank settlements has shocked and surprised the Israeli nation and the nations of the world.
Many have denounced Sharon's plan as a subterfuge.
But this surprise was crazy since the beginning.
Despite the appearance that they give to foreigners, the debates in Israel on the future of the occupied territories have never been reduced to a simple story of hawks and doves.
As anything else in Israel, the process is more complex, particularly where the hawks are concerned.
Overall, there are two species of Israeli hawks: the ideological and the strategic.
The ideological hawks view the occupied territories as part of the historic land of Israel, the homeland of the Jewish people.
For them, the territories represent a Jewish patrimony, which explains their insistence on calling the West Bank by its historical Hebrew name: Judea and Samaria.
The ideological hawks are not all religious, although there are those who may base their claims on divine promises and prophecies.
But many ideological hawks are secular nationalists and their jargon is similar to the Nationalist types of Eastern and Central Europe.
The former Prime Minister Menachem Begin and Yitzhak Shamir belonged to this category.
The ideological hawks generally belong to the National Religious Party and to Likud.
They are inspired by an ideology associated with nationalist Vladimir Jabotinsky, who founded "revisionist" Zionism  to challenge the more moderate version adopted by the Founding Fathers of Israel, including Chaim Weizmann and David Ben-Gurion.
Then came the strategic hawks.
For them, given the form geographically close and vulnerable to Israel and the hatred of Arabs, control of the West Bank and Gaza is not an ideological imperative, but responds to safety concerns.
For them, the Jewish settlements in the territories are not a return to the historical land, but are strongholds of security destined to prevent (or to push for a place more strategic) an attack on the heart of Israel.
This assessment of the situation may be right or wrong, but it is certainly not ideological.
Ariel Sharon, who has a military background (he grew up in a social environment where ideas resembled more those of the Labour Party than those of Jabotinsky), is a strategic falcon.
For ideological hawks, compromises are treasonous: how to undermine the historical heritage of the Jewish people without mentioning God's promise to Abraham?
The strategic Hawks are however open to negotiation and practical compromises, if the circumstances are appropriate and if the safety concerns justify it in their eyes.
It is in this context that the measures taken by Sharon must be considered .
He was elected on the promise that he would bring peace and security.
He got neither.
With the defeat and disappearance of Saddam Hussein, the danger of an 'eastern front "against Israel has weakened.
Without a Palestinian partner, and because of the Palestinian terrorism continued as the actions of Israel's persistent, fail to quell the measures taken by Sharon this ideas for the strategy: build an effective barrier, to shift some of the settlements and strategically unsustainable, and wait.
Sharon's statements during the previous year seem to follow a well defined model.
First, he admitted that "sooner or later" a Palestinian state would make its appearance, an idea unthinkable for the ideologically pure hawks.
A few months later, he shocked his supporters at the Likud Party conference by declaring that the occupation was unacceptable and untenable, another shock for those who had always talked of "liberated" territories rather than "occupied territories."
Last December, he explicitly stated that Israel was facing a cease-fire that would inevitably lead to the unilateral "relocation" of some settlements.
Although these statements once again come to nothing but simple verbiage, they still constitute a new language for someone like Prime Minister Likud.
Sharon's latest statements however have explicitly named the settlements that need to be evacuated, the director of the National Security Council, General Giora Eiland, was appointed chairman of an interdepartemental rehousing committee responsible for making plans to evacuate the settlements and to provide compensation for the relocated settlers.
All of this has radically altered the political map inside Israel.
Some of the ideoligical hawks of Sharon's government have threatened to resign; Shimon Peres has announced that the Labour party would give Sharon a parlementary safety net; there is also mention of the Labour Party joining a national unity government.
The test is obviously not about planning, but the implementation of the withdrawal, and the road is long and bumpy.
Sharon's choice of time may have been guided by the problems he encounters following police inquiries about his alleged corruption.
However, anyone who would want to predict the future of Sharon should remember that, as opposed to Begin and Shamir, Sharon has a military history and that for him, security, not ideology, comes first.
His apparent pragmatism shouldn't therefore be surprising.
Iraq: Victors' justice
Saddam Hussein is dead, but not all Iraqis are rejoicing.
Instead, how different ethnic and religious groups have reacted to his execution is emblematic of the difficulty in maintaining the cohesion of Iraq.
For the Shiite majority, long brutally oppressed by Saddam and all previous Iraqi Sunni regimes, Saddam's death symbolizes their attainment of political hegemony.
Moreover, their expressions of triumphalist jubilation are a cruel reminder of how the oppressed, once freed, can easily become oppressors themselves.
To the Sunni minority, which was ousted from power by the American invasion and which expresses its frustration by daily attacks against the Shiite population and its holy places, Saddam will remain a hero for a long time.
The Kurds -- as Shiites, have suffered the wrath of Saddam Hussein for decades -- discreetly cling to their independence, while making what is needed to ensure that they will never again be subject to an Arab regime.
The Iraqi Prime Minister Nouri al-Maliki, who represents the Shia and Kurdish coalition in power, has expressed his hope that the execution of the dictator will allow the overcoming of sectarian divisions.
But even if his words seem sincere, the reality leads in the opposite direction, and the offensive verbal exchanges at the time of the execution will not help to forget that it was the justice of the winners -- not the United States but the Shiites.
These events do not bode well for the future of what we should get used to name"ex-Irak."
To be honest, the current debate in Washington on stabilizing Iraq is inappropriate because we cannot stabilize something which no longer exists -- in this case precisely, Iraq as a sovereign state.
Under the guise of constitutional amendments inspired by the United States, the Shiite majority has managed to capture almost absolute power.
It is that what appeared to be in Washington, a few months ago, a successful transition to a representative government is a farce: as under Saddam, the authority depends on the arms control. The difference is that today the government no longer has the monopoly of violence.
Each of the militia, each ministry, each Shiite political faction has its own weapons, its wholesale arm and death squads, while the Sunnis continue to use stockpiles of weapons accumulated under Saddam Hussein for fighting a rearguard action against the new order, apparently legitimized by the elections.
Except for a new violent dictatorship, no authority is able to bring Shiites, Sunnis, and Kurds into a single political entity.
The pipe dream of the U.S. government - democratized overnight a deeply divided society accustomed to violence and coercion - has unleashed a terrifying array of political demons.
In these circumstances, the ensuing Debate about the Baker-Hamilton Report in Washington has little bearing on the future of Iraq, although it remains essential to the future of power, prestige, and status of the United States in the world.
Iraq's future will be decided by the Iraqis, but by the bullet and not the ballot.
The US and all of the international community are completely unprepared to confront the Middle Eastern version of Yugoslavia and its regional consequences.
And unlike broken states of Yugoslavia, which aspire to Europe, the absence of a legitimate Arab democratic model makes it harder to establish a democratic order.
Some Europeans and others can mock the failure of the US in Iraq, and the ineptitude -- or worse - of their desperate policy following the occupation.
And yet the underlying reasons for this failure go back much further, to the creation of all parts of Iraq in the 1920s by the British imperial authorities, who joined three disparate provinces of the conquered Ottoman Empire into a state which has never had any coherent identity.
The foundation of Iraq itself is based on justice winners: the British Empire, having defeated the Ottomans, has given the power to the Sunni Arabs in a country where they were a minority.
Today, this arrangement is falling apart following a new round of victor's justice
The consequences of this shift of power are not yet clear.
But it is certain that a coherent Iraqi state, if it were unified, federally or confederally, could emerge from a party that considers Saddam Hussein both a bloody dictator as well as hero and martyr.
Wars always have unintended consequences and cruel ironies.
In Iraq, it is now becoming apparent that some states cannot be saved without being destroyed.
The battle of the European Union for Turkey.
When the conspirators behind the suicide bombings in Istanbul launched their human bombs against synagogues and British office buildings, they had different audiences in mind.
The citizens of the European Union, which the Turkish political class is under pressure to join as early as possible, represent one of these audiences, possibly the most important.
The battle within the EU about Turkey's entry will take place on many fronts: in the country itself, where the government is undertaking significant reforms to qualify for entry into the European Union at the negotiating table as soon as the European Council in December 2004 authorizes the Commission to open formal negotiations for accession to the European Union and among the public in the existing member countries.
Of these three fronts, the last is the most demanding.
Most of the European Union citizens are uncomfortable today with the idea of Turkey's entry into the Union.
Those responsible for the Istanbul atrocities may have calculated that Islamic terrorism could increase this malaise.
Traditionally, Europeans have always accepted new members hurrying to the front door to join the club as he passed the group of six countries of origin for the 25 countries that will gather in Union Europe in 2004.
Once a purely Western community, the union has pushed its borders out in all directions.
From next year, it will stretch from Northern Finland to Cyprus and Malta in the south, to Ireland in the West to the Baltic States in the East.
While the people who make it up have often feared that the newcomers would take their jobs and their subsidies, in the long run they have always agreed.
But the case of Turkey is different.
The 10 new countries joining the union next year, and even the Balkan countries that are now being offered the possibility of membership in the future, are all included in a traditional definition of Europe.
None of them is big enough to disturb the current balance in the EU.
None of this applies in the case of Turkey.
Apart from a narrow strip of land, its territory belongs to Asia, and not to Europe, its culture is Islamic, and not Christian, and if it had to join the Union in 2013, for example, its population will be far more important and the youngest of all EU member countries.
Moreover, because of the Turkish borders with countries such as Iran, Iraq and Syria, Turkey would bring to the European Union a disturbing neighbourhood: a part of the world unable to develop a regional peace of its own, an outpost of fundamentalism and Islamic terrorism, a patchwork of fragile states full of nationalism, an area of conflict for militarisation, for nuclear power even, a region where the United States remain strategically involved and where Israel will always be the focus of anti-Western feelings.
Upon Turkey's entering the union, the EU will become part of a wider Middle East agitated and disturbing, the most provocative region in the world today.
And yet, it is precisely because of these implications that the potential benefits of the entrance of Turkey into the EU outweigh the risks that it represents.
Above all, the possibility of future entry into the Union is the most powerful force for the modernization of Turkey, and a modern, democratic and prosperous Turkey, is essential to Europe, whether it be inside or outside the Union.
Moreover, to introduce in the EU a kind of moderate Islam as the one now present in Turkey will be of importance to the integration of Muslim minorities of European countries, that are already large and growing even without the input of the population of Turkey.
Finally, with the opportunities that Turkey -- with its Islamic traditions, its regional contacts,and  resources and geography -- the EU will be better positioned to exert a stabilizing influence on a region that will inevitably affect the security of Europe.
These are powerful arguments.
The big question is if they are powerful enough to influence the skeptical, European public.
It would take only one of the 30 countries represented in the EU, perhaps in 2013, to prevent the accession of Turkey.
Some countries, without doubt, will want to let their people speak through a referendum that will leave the decision to the people, not only to parliament.
Even in Germany, where the constitution does not allow referendums, people are calling for a referendum in the case of Turkey's entry, and an opposition party has already announced that it will make this a central issue of next year's election campaign for the European Parliament elections.
Once the public unease with Turkey can reach a point of focus on the referendum for the entry if the country in the EU, there will be little chance that it can enter.
At the end of the negotiations, it seemed that perhaps Turkey is ready for Europe but that Europe is not yet ready for Turkey.
This is why the battle for the entry of Turkey has already started and what the terrorists of Istanbul appear to have understood.
Those who believe that the EU will be beneficial for Turkey as well as for Europe must also engage in the battle to defend their ideas.
There would be nothing worse for Turkey and Europe that European governments welcome Turkey without convincing their populations.
The terrorists will undoubtedly continue to stir up the fears of timid Europeans against an Islamist Turkey.
Let's hope that at the end, the attacks against innocent people in the crowded streets of Istanbul do not feed the Europeans' fears but rather a sense of solidarity with this dynamic and moderate country against a common enemy.
High fences make bad neighbors in Europe
Good fences make good neighbors, as the poet Robert Frost wrote.
Unfortunately, the European Union seems to take the poetic fantasy of Frost as an important political order.
Indeed, how the EU is preparing Does to welcome the citizens of the ten countries joining in May?
They simply slammed the door in his face and implemented protective legislation to force him out before everything.
In fact, the union is even worse.
Since there is no agreement at the European level on which regulations are applicable to new EU citizens, each member country sets its own rules without any coordination.
Some of these regulations in development are draconian.
Austria and Germany - until now the two largest recipients of migrants from Eastern Europe, welcoming four-fifths of them - announced last year that they will restrict migration from new Member States for the entire duration of the seven-year transition period.
France and Belgium will restrict immigration of new citizens from the EU during the at least the first two years of the transition period.
Sweden appeared to have adopted a liberal position for the first time, but will now open its borders and could reduce the access of immigrants to social programs.
The Danish government almost collapsed in January when the Ministry of Labor proposed to open the labor market to all new EU citizens who can prove they have found employment.
Greece and Italy have remained silent until now, which probably means that they will retain the current restrictions on the new  member States: they will effectively be treated the same as every immigrant outside the EU.
Thus, all countries bordering the new member states will be closed to migration from the "New Europe".
All these dams reflect the general concern growing among the citizens of the new States members to take advantage of generous welfare systems.
Not surprising then, that the most spectacular falls of popular support for the expansion recorded by the European polls happened in the EU countries benefiting from the services of social care the most generous.
But support for enlargement is fading across the threshold of the entry of new countries.
Meanwhile, closing the door of the Union on its more recent citizens will not solve the problem of access to social services and will certainly harm economic growth.
In labor markets of the European Union that are characterized by their low mobility, such as those in Western Europe and Southern Europe, migrants can play a very important role.
By increasing the average productivity, they contribute not only to boost growth, but also to achieve a higher per-head income.
In fact, because of distortions in the definition of wages - often set without any real correspondence with the levels of productivity in the local workforce - the immigrant workers even contribute to reduce the unemployment rate in western and southern Europe.
Moreover, closing the door will not solve the problem of access to social support, since illegal immigration is a worse threat than legal immigration; it uses the resources available without contributing anything in return for social aid even though the bulk of immigrants are young and work.
The best way to deal with the fear of immigration as a source of abuse to social systems would be to adopt a common transitional quota rather generous in terms of the EU as a whole, then remove them quickly if are not met.
Migration quotas are preferable to any other kind of restriction because they allow at least some of the potential benefits in terms of welfare gains from migration to be realized.
The Quotas could be determined according to the historical periods of strong immigration- according to an annual flow of 400,000 people for the European Union.
While these transitional restrictions  are implemented, the reforms must be taken to address the issues behind the public's fears about immigration.
The root of this fear, of course, lies in the vast differences in income that exist between the citizens of Lithuania, for example, and those of most EU countries.
Of course, economic convergence is a long term matter.
Thus, the redistribution policies of the European Union should be reformed to discourage citizens from poorer countries to shop for welfare benefits.
Here the problem remains the incompatibility of the social benefits on the one hand, whereby the received aids are based on contributions made, and on the other hand on social support programmes, which involve transfers in cash.
All the European Union countries as well as new members must be encouraged to adapt their social support programes (which are also present in the new member states), so that they all meet all to certain basic requirements.
A coordination of these minimum incomes guaranteed at European Union level must gradually be set in place with the intention, in the long term, of setting up a safety net throughout the European Union and forming one of its institutional pillars.
The challenges of Calderón
Mexico has finally found a new president last Friday, in cirecumstances of really bad omen.
Felipe Calderón was sworn in, braving the anger of his left-wing opposition, and thereby showing himself more clever than the Democratic Revolution Party (PRD) and its leader, Andrés Manuel López Obrador, but without, however, avoiding paying a high price.
Television news broadcasts around the world all had the same headlines on display: "The New Mexican president comes to power in the midst and violence."
The Mexican institutions have resisted in the attacks of a left-wing opposition virtually insurgent, hounding in vain to prevent the appointment of Calderón, and the bitterness of a Revolucionario Institucional Party (PRI), decided to leave Calderón take power, before fail miserably.
If Calderón impressively overcame seemingly insurmountable obstacles that dotted the path to his presidency, then the struggle to govern and transform Mexico has only begun.
Most Mexican journalists believe that it should be relatively easy for Calderón to do better than the failure in large part auto-infligé of outgoing President Vicente Fox.
Mexico needs a growth around two times faster than the one it has known under Fox (a small 2% per year).
If Calderón can maintain law and order and use his considerable political capacities to reach an agreement with the PRI on structural economic reforms, he will succeed.
But it is a simplistic vision.
Fox's term, as well as president Ernesto Zedillo's last four years, have not really been a failure.
Mexico had not experienced economic stability, low inflation, low interest rates, stable currency and steady though mediocre growth for ten years in a row since the 1960s.
For the first time, mortgages, auto loans and consumer credit became accessible to sections of the lower middle class: This year, it has built and sold more houses and bought more cars than ever before.
Similarly, although one can blame Fox for not silencing the protesters and an extremist and disruptive opposition, he has never resorted to a bloody crackdown which made the majority of his predecessors famous.
Furthermore, it took Mexico from its archaic cocoon in terms of foreign affairs and has pushed immigration and human rights at the center of the New Mexican international program.
Calderón also doesn't think that negotiating with the PRI will be an easy task, and he fails to arrive at a coalition government, which he believes to be the solution to the deadlock in which Mexico finds itself since 1997.
Whatever the benefits of a cabinet comprised solely of members of his National Action Party (PAN), this is not what Calderón was looking for.
Similarly, it proved impossible to reach any agreement with the opposition regarding the inauguration ceremony, where the chaotic scenes were depressing as members of Congress tried to fight in the House while Calderón was ushered in through a back door for a quick ceremony.
Mexico's economic problems might be similarly more intractable than many seem to think journalists.
Mexico experienced a sharp economic opening under former president Carlos Salinas from 1988-1994, a delayed but successful political opening under President Zedillo from 1994-2000 and, finally, a rotation of powers under Fox.
But the foundations of the old PRI-corporatist system created in the 1930s remained intact, and they represent the most significant obstacles to the growth and success of Mexico.
The first pillar of this system is formed by the public and private monopolies that dominate the country.
The oil (Pemex) and electric (Comisión Federal de Elecricidad) companies managed by the state have no competitors.
The private monopolies of telecommunications (Telmex), television (Televisa), cement (Cemex), the manufacture of bread's and tortillas's ( Bimbo and Maseca respectively) and the banks (Banamex / Citigroup and Bancomer / Banco Bilbao) perhaps have to compete abroad, but not on a national level.
These monopolies are stronger than ever, and what suffers as a result is prices, supplies, service and quality.
The second pillar is formed by the unions who control the workers' movement in Mexico since the 1930s.
They have powers to hiring and firing workers non-syndiqcated, elect leaders by acclamation, receive mandatory contributions without transparency and a huge political power.
The Union of Teachers is the largest in Latin America, the Union of Oil Workers is the richest and Social Security employees have thwarted any attempts to reform pensions or health for years.
The third pillar of the system is political monopoly.
For 70 years, the PRI has completely controlled the Mexican politics; today they are three parties to do it, and nobody else can enter the political arena or have access to the huge public subsidies -- more than $500 million last year -- without their consent.
The main parties write their own antitrust's, vote for their own subsidies, and choose their own elected figures.
The absence of consecutive re-election at any level whatsoever strengthens the power of party machines: they pick candidates, and voters merely ratify them at the polls.
The challenges of Mexico are to release the movement of workers, break the private monopolies and open public monopolies to competition, and to lower barriers to entry restricting access to the political arena.
This may not be sufficient conditions for success, but they are certainly needed.
Calderón has to strengthen his presidency from the beginning.
To take possession of power is perhaps the only way to achieve that, even though it may seem risky.
Elected with only 35% of the vote, without a majority in Congress, and with a takeover on the eve of an economic slowdown in the U.S., things are very difficult.
Given that roughly one-third of the electorate think he mistakenly won, and given the uncertainty of the rule of law in the country, the position of Calderón is even less enviable.
Caution and patience probably wouldn't be his best advisers.
The Challenge of Mr Chávez
The recent parliamentary elections held in Venezuela have confirmed the trend that has placed the country on the front page of every newspaper in recent years.
President Hugo Chávez has demonstrated once again that he enjoys broad support among the poor and desperate, and that he was miles ahead of his opposition in terms of political skills, shrewdness and ruthless character.
However, we are also noticing a drop in attendance at the polls as every new election organized under the mandate of Mr. Chavez and the regularity of questionable elections has become more and more visible.
It is certain that the withdrawal of opposition  few days from the election was rather like the proclaimed Mr Chávez, a symptom of his own weaknesses rather than the problems of electoral process.
And it is almost certain that this same weakness is part of the progressive stifling of some aspects of traditional Venezuelan democracy.
Even so, the mistakes of the opposition were significant, ranging from supporting the failed coup d'État against the democratically elected Mr. Chávez in April 2002, to the attacks without result against PEDEVSA, the national oil company of Venezuela, in early 2003.
Nothing is more dangerous in politics that failure during direct confrontations.
In such circumstances, Mr. Chávez can afford to be bold, despite his political failures when it comes to acting in favor of his electoral base, the 50% or more of Venezuelans who live in poverty and despair.
Poverty has increased since Mr Chávez came to power in 1998: the budget of the State and the balance of trade are even more at the mercy of oil revenues today that this was the case in the past, and, apart from the Cuban literacy programs and close to the services of the "naked feet doctors " the whole public health of poor people has stagnated, if not worsen.
It is highly likely that the future will not bring any major changes.
Mr. Chavez will be able to change much of the constitution at will and parachute his men into the judicial system and the electoral authorities.
He will continue to distribute subsidies from the oil revenues in the well-worn tradition of Marcos Pérez Jiménez and Carlos Andrés Pérez.
So, Mr Chávez can get elected again next year and could well stay in power until the end of the following decade.
But if this is what the Venezuelan people want, so be it.
It is, after all, in their jurisdiction to decide who will govern, and how, as long as human rights are not systematically violated, or the democratic institutions suspended indefinitely, and the international standards of conduct of business are respected.
According to this last point, at least, Mr Chávez has perhaps been further than should be allowed.
For years, he has been accused of taking the torch from Fidel Castro in supporting a radical and anti-imperialist, we could even say revolutionary, rhetoric throughout Latin America.
Perhaps it is time now for the nations in Latin America and the international community to take these allegations seriously.
Chávez is giving oil to the Caribbean island nations and Cuba, and buying Argentine debt to support the policies of President Nestor Kirchner.
In Mar del Plata, Argentina, last month, he openly participated in a rally against the Free Trade Area of the Americas (FTAA), with, among others, Evo Morales, the Bolivian leader leaf growers coca, which could become the next president of Bolivia.
Similarly, Mr. Chávez openly supports Daniel Ortega, the perennial Sandinista candidate, in the Nicaraguan presidential elections and Shafick Handal, another perennial candidate of the FMLN, in El Salvador.
His former ambassador to Mexico has openly and vehemently participated in some evenings of the presidential election campaign of the mayor of Mexico City, Andrés Manuel López Obrador.
It seems that the foreign policy of Mr Chávez follows a main theme: the provocation of a major confrontation with the United States.
The danger is, of course, that when this confrontation will happen, if it occurs, whether Bolivia, the FTAA, human rights, or freedom of the press, it will be too late to control it.
The challenge is thus to prevent the confrontation that Mr Chávez clearly intends to provoke.
Unfortunately, the government of George Bush has never been very keen to prevent conflict.
The other nations of the hemisphere have a direct interest to prevent a fight that would force them to take sides and could even threaten their economic interests and national security.
Although many positions of Mr Chávez has received some support from several nations in South America, the division he created in South America, with the help of Cuba's Castro between left and right, between the defenders of free trade and the "bolivaristes" between the pro- and anti-American, is essentially artificial, but certainly not impossible to overcome.
Certainly, many Latin American leaders tried to appease and control Mr Chávez, without result.
It could be very expensive no to try anymore.
The last time revolutionaries were opposed to the United States, in Central America, in the 1980s, everyone lost.
New divisions in the hemisphere created by a leader steeped in oil revenues would prove much more catastrophic.
Should we reaffirm the positive discrimination?
Equal rights for all citizens is a fundamental principle of the liberal order.
Such rights provide the opportunity to participate in political life and to express oneself freely.
They also open the door to economic participation and participation in social institutions such as education.
The constitutional guarantee of these rights represents a dramatic success for the citizenry in the long battle which has marked the past two centuries.
Yet such guarantees in legalese of these rights are often inadequate.
And even the right to vote has little meaning for someone who is totally dependent on other institutions and other people.
Equality before law remains a meaningless promise for those who cannot afford to use it or who simply do not know how to use it.
The civil right of an education to the maximum intellectual capacity of each one should be encouraged in the best way.
Thus, major themes of social progress remained in the last century to give life to abstract concepts of equality of rights by the creation of social content.
That meant to actively encourage these actions by information and political education, for example.
As relates to the world of education, that often meant committing financial aid resources intended to go to students in the form of subsidized loans or scholarships.
However, despite these realisations, certain tenacious obstacles are still opposed to an equal participation for all.
Large segments of the population remained underrepresented in the social circles of the distinguished citizens.
This was particularly the case for women and some cultural minorities,  especially in cases where when these minorities displayed characteristics that were not a matter of choice such as skin colour.
Few leaders, ministers, teachers, doctors or lawyers were found in  populations of these groups, thus raising questions about the invisible barriers that prevented these minorities from gaining access to such positions.
The advocates of entrenched institutional cultures may have fought against women and blacks.
Wanting full citizenship for all involved the need to realize more than legal guarantees, the dissemination of information, and even financial aid that had been offered.
It was a courageous step, conducted by the United States in the first instance, that to decide for a time at least that new policies were needed to address these long-established injustices. Affirmative action, or positive discrimination, as it was called, consisted in establishing a whole range of rules to reserve a percentage among the political candidates, students and teachers, police and the armed forces, and in any other group, for persons belonging to disadvantaged minorities.
The US supreme court became the guardian of affirmative action.
Wherever it was seriously established, positive discrimination was undoubtedly a success.
This is the case in countries that previously had a homogeneous population and that must now take account blacks or Muslims or identifiable citizens as belonging to an identifiable and neglected minority.
And it was at the very moment when other countries were turning towards the US as a source for a political model that political discrimination was called into question as the result of three key issues.
First, do we not encounter the risk of reversed injustice by which the tradtionally privileged classes find themselves destitute?
The Supreme Court of the United States had to answer this question when it considered for the first time a case of a white student who had been denied admission to medical school despite his superior academic credentials.
In Britain, children in private schoool must now fear being in an unfavorable position because of pressure on the universities to admit a greater number of students from public schools.
This brings us back to the stale and dyspeptic question of whether we can be both equal and excellent?
Then, is equal representation at all levels really what we're all asking for and what we all need?
After all, the "feminization" of the workforce in many countries has had no negative effect.
Many countries have benefited from the spirit of the business entrepreneurship of their Jewish or Chinese minorities.
Are we not too mechanically chasing ideals in which the absence of privileges and obstacles becomes confused with the lack of diversity?
Finally, doesn't positive discrimination in some cases produce a new form of fragmentation that destroys the real civil society that it's seeking to put in place?
Are women, for example, always the best advocates of women's interests?
The same question remains for members of religious groups and ethnic minorities, and even some social classes.
One shudders to think of high courts where the principal criterion for admission would be belonging to a poorly represented group as a form of positive discrimination.
In some countries the democratie fails to put Å to an imaginative and effective governance because the main purpose seems to être to take into account all the major groups.
To resume an idea developed above, affirmative action has always been and still is a decisive and brave last step in the fight for universal civil rights, not only on paper but in daily life.
However, affirmative action must not become a lasting principle of the liberal order.
If there is a set of legal rules which needs a "clause of extinction" to implement the study of the results produced after a specific limited period of application, it is the positive discrimination.
The flexibility of the US supreme court in this area is exemplary.
Moreover, it is probably best to introduce to local legislation a provision for the expiration of affirmative action after a period of five or ten years at most.
Such a clause could be renewed, but there is nothing more effective than a firm deadline to force close examination and reflection.
The state-nation revisited
Now it is fashionable to say that the nation state has lost its place.
Globalization, it it said, means that nations can no longer control their own affairs.
They must unite with others, as in the case of the European Union, ASEAN or Mercosur, and as always with the international institutions like the United Nations, World Bank and the World Trade Organisation.
Such a point of view is risky.
Besides, when we look at it more closely, it is suspect, or simply wrong.
The nation-state, with its strengths and weaknesses, is alive and well.
To begin with its strengths, the nation-state remains the only political space in which freedom will succeed.
The democratic credentials of organisations such as the EU are dubious, and totally absent in the case of United Nations and other global institutions.
In addition, despite the frequent search for new identities, European, Latin American or some other, and despite numerous references to a new cosmopolitanism, or even a "global civil society," most people feel at home in their own country, the nation-state of which they are citizens.
Migration is usually directed towards other countries.
Many countries are currently debating the integration of immigrants.
What is needed to become British, German or American?
Such debates about immigration make sense only if we recognize that citizenship is defined by and for nations.
That is, for most people, the positive side of the nation-state.
The nation-state has been for over two centuries -- and continues to be -- the benchmark for social integration and civic involvement for most people.
This is the context in which we see our freedoms protected or destroyed.
Countries freed from communism in 1989, must have felt that restoring national sovereignty and regain freedom were closely linked.
But there is, and there has always been, another more despicable aspect of the nation-state: it is nationalism.
The nationalist impulse can be aggressive or defensive, directed against others or internally oriented.
In both cases, it corrupts all attempts to create an international community of open societies.
That was the problem in Iraq: a nation-state became a troublemaker in the region and beyond.
More recently, a less violent but equally worrying phenomenon is gaining ground: the revival of national protectionism.
The Doha round of trade talks is stalemated because the developed countries refuse to open their markets to cheaper products from developing countries, which in turn are trying to protect their fledgling industries.
Many prefer privileged relations to open trade.
In this area, the EU has often been helpful.
But today, the nationalist virus has even infected the European Union.
France, Spain and Poland have tried to keep their main industries in "national hands".
Suddenly, the European single market is forgotten, and a return to the fragmented markets takes root.
Let's consider, for example, the "services directive" from the European Commission.
Although the workers' freedom of movement is one of the "four freedoms" of the single market, many EU countries are trying to protect their domestic labor markets by suspending this freedom for as long as possible.
Germany, in particular, argues that the high unemployment rate resulting from the reunification in 1990 forces it to close its labor market to the new eastern member-states.
Such trends are dangerous.
Historically, protectionism has often led to economic clashes, which can quickly degenerate into more serious conflicts.
Signs are not good, even in Europe.
A recent summit of EU leaders focused on energy policy -- a field where cooperation is not only very desirable, but necessary.
But even the German Chancellor Angela Merkel, clearly pro-European, went to the meeting with the explicit intention to put a brake on the creation of other European powers in this area.
The Germano-Russian accord regarding the construction of a gas pipeline bypassing Poland and Lithuania, with former Chancellor Gerhard Schröder as orchestrator, has already contributed to the deterioration of relations between Poland and Germany, not to mention with other European countries.
For a time, the pendulum of public opinion has been dangling too far from the nation-state and its role.
This is one reason why so many people felt detached from their political leaders.
But it would be unfortunate and even dangerous, as the pendulum back towards the old-fashioned nationalism.
Nation states are welcome, they are important elements of a liberal world order.
But they must be open to cooperation and coordination with others.
We must take care to resist the birth of a trend that recalls the events of the first years of the twentieth century, a trend that can only result in a global disaster.
Is Gordon Brown eligible?
Obviously, Gordon Brown wants to succeed Tony Blair as British Prime Minister.
It is less clear is that he is ready to do what's necessary to lead the Labour Party to victory in the coming parliamentary elections.
Indeed, he absolutely has to disavow Blair's legacy, which at least means promising to get Great Britain out of the Iraq war.
Brown has coveted the office of Prime Minister since May 12, 1994, the fateful day when John Smith, the Labour leader in opposition, died of a heart attack.
Two weeks later, on May 31, Blair and Brown met in a small restaurant in North London and discussed who should take over the party leadership.
At the end of their discussion, they reached a double agreement: Brown would stand aside and would support Blair, who promised in return to yield the position to Brown later on.
The fact that they have not agreed on the timing or circumstances of the transfer of power was as inevitable as it was decisive.
They could not predict that Blair was going to win three successive elections in 1997, 2001 and 2005, unprecedented for their party, and keep Labour Party in power for a period which was likely to last 13 years.
The key challenge for New Labour (according to the makeover by Blair who used his characteristic gift for manipulation) was the management of the British economy.
Since the Second World War, much of the British government tried to manipulate the economy to promote parties in the short term, reaping disastrous results in the long term.
This lamentable tradition was common to the Conservatives and Labour, and yet, as unfair as it may seem, it is Labour that has been most marked by a reputation of incompetence in economic management.
Brown has changed this reputation decisively.
It was undoubtedly the Minister of Economy who was most remarkable in British history, which is not per se due to inspiration or genius, but simply the fact that he established a new tradition of giving priority to low inflation, with low interest rates and stable public finances.
Brown understood that these priorities were essential, not just for the British economy, but also for the long-term objectives of the Labour party in power; and he promoted the program by giving the Bank of England independent responsibility to keep inflation low.
The result was that Britain experienced a decade without precedent, marked by low inflation and relatively high economic growth, overtaking in this area many of its European counterparts.
However, despite the economic success, it has become increasingly clear that Blair was over.
Voters have gradually become disillusioned when faced with the inevitable flaws of a too-familiar government, and the party is increasingly unhappy with a leader who abused its hospitality.
Initially, Blair thought he could claim the right to stay in power for a third five-year term.
But the pressure he has suffered to leave has continued to grow, so that he has promised to leave summer 2007.
Nobody knows exactly when or how Blair will give up his place.
If a formal competition for the leadership of the party is organized, it seems likely that several candidates will be running for office.
That said, almost all the authoritative observers in the matter seem to agree in designating Brown as by far the most likely to become the next Labour prime minister.
That's the easy part.
From here on out, nobody seems to be certain that Brown knows what to do or has the capacity to conduct and win new legislative elections for Labour.
His reputation for command and control of the economy is unmatched, but he has given almost no indication of what he thinks of other government policies.
He remained cold and almost silent, visibly anxious to get his inheritance, but gave absolutely no clue what would change when he did.
If there is something he cannot promise, is to continue the policy of Blair.
If Brown chooses continuity, he will lose.
After ten years of Blair, he must offer one or more policies that will mark a clear divide.
The most obvious choice in policy change concerns Iraq: if Brown want to win an election as leader of Labour, he must abandon Blair's politics and announce the quick withdrawal of British troops.
In tactical terms, it is as simple as it is obvious: whatever spurious reasons and illegal data may have been presented at the beginning as excuses to invade Iraq, everyone now knows that this war was a political, strategic and moral disaster.
Everyone knows that it cannot be "won", if it means anything, and Brown knows that both war and the slavish submission of Britain to the Bush administration are deeply unpopular in the country.
This is a problem that must be addressed immediately, but for now, none of the major political parties has dared to touch it.
Over the past three weeks, the Labor party, liberal Democrats and Conservatives have all held their annual conference.
Everyone was focused on national politics, no one dared bring up the subject of Iraq, because they all knew that would raise the issue of the withdrawal, which in turn would provoke a major and possibly explosive debate about relations between Britain and the United States.
Will Brown be brave enough to confront the issue of Iraq?
Probably not.
He may very well decide that it is too difficult, in which ase he will only be an interim prime minister, condemned to lead the last three years of Labour government without any hope of winning the next elections.
This is not what he had planned in passing his deal with Blair in 1994.
The latest innovations in the economy
The Great Depression propelled John Maynard Keynes onto the scene of economic thought.
According to Keynes, private investment is inherently unstable because of the trends and passing interest among investors, changes in the "Animal Spirits" businessmen or because falling prices may disrupt the economic system.
Keynesians believed that prudent monetary policy (central banks raising or lowering interest rates to reduce fluctuations in private investment) could participate in stabilizing the economy.
But they believed that the government should agree to be directly involved, with generous tax policies, to maintain the overall level of spending in a stable economy.
Such a policy, they thought, forever banish the specter of mass unemployment on a large scale, as was the case during the Great Depression.
It could eventually also guarantee full employment in an effective way.
They expected that near full employment would raise the threat of inflation.
After all, why should workers and unions reduce their salary demands if governments support spending every time the danger of unemployment is menacing?
A important restriction of the requirements for high wages (the fear of being made redundant when unemployment rises) had also jumped.
What can replace it?
For the first postwar generation, the prevailing response was that corporatist social democracy would replace it.
The unions were giving way to the demands of the government to rein in their own demands for wage increase and the governments would give way to the requirements of the unions on public spending and social benefits.
Keynesian thought assures us that the Great Depression can never happen again.
But his solution to the problem of rampant inflation didn't have staying power, and and it utterly collapsed in the 1970s.
Following the first inflationary crisis of the 1970s in the major industrialized countries, the predominant economic thinking in these countries turned toward the "semi-monetarist" approaches.
Milton Friedman's victory was never as comprehensive as the Keynesians'.
However, in the mid-1980s, politicians of the world match on the following points:
Central banks should engage in a credible way on price stability in the long term.
Central banks should accept that the average rate of unemployment is determined not by "cyclical" factors but by structural factors that they should not try to resolve.
Announce and try to maintain a monetary growth goal is an easy way for the central bank to disclose its main intentions, to gain credibility and to give outsiders a way of checking whether sound policies are followed.
Monetarism was nothing but the mirror image of Keynesianism.
It seemed to ensure that the inflation of the 1970s could never happen again.
But it offers no solution to the structural unemployment problem that has appeared in Western Europe.
The last 15 years have shown that monetarism is poorly equipped to handle the challenges of falling prices in the context of companies and banks heavily in debt, as the Keynesian solution was not made to handle the challenges of inflation.
In the 1970s and 1980s some, including myself, blamed the failure  of social democratic systems to control inflation on wrong decisions.
Politicians had not understood that the increase in social benefits was the price to pay inevitably for lower wages, while the trades union leaders had not understood that if the corporate social democracy is not limiting inflation, the political power would be right and rising unemployment would be used to limit it.
Today, we still blame other bad decisions for the current alarming economic conditions in the heart of the industrialized world (more than a decade of stagnation in Japan accompanied by deflation, deflation which is also present in Germany accompanied by recession).
The European and Japanese central banks have not lowered their interest rates enough nor early enough: regulators of the banking sector have turned away from the vagaries of speculative lending and politicians have refused to extend adequate fiscal policies.
But politicians and central bankers cannot always be considered capable of making the right decisions. Good policies must be designed to operate despite a lack of vision and good advice from leaders.
Inflation in the 1970s was nothing but a normal failure of Keynesian political economies.
Deflation threatens Japan, Europe and perhaps even the United States a long period of irreconcilable between potential output and actual output is a failure of normal semi-monetarist orthodoxy that has dominated macroeconomic policies at the heart of the industrialized world since the early 1980s.
We are going around in circles.
Without forming a coalition, no government would allow another collapse of liquidity, as happened in the 1930s, or the failure of banks and companies on a scale that would put the entire economy in danger.
This is an increasing spiral.
The macroeconomic problems in the world are real but will not lead to another Great Depression, largely because politicians remembers the first great depression.
We need a new revolution of economic policies in a Keynesian and semi-monetarist fashion, a revolution that will not (quite) lose sight of the successes of the previous revolutions, but will eliminate their intrinsic failings.
Where could this revolution be coming from?
Perhaps of Ben Bernanke, the new governor of the Federal Reserve, whose long career has always been concerned in the price of assets , of the role of adverse selection on the credit market and the need for central banks in trouble not to only limit the current operations in the short term on the markets open.
He firmly believes that banks should try to pave the way for long-term investments in action.
Bernankéisme you said?
The fate of mankind / The hopes of humanity
For some time now, and certainly since the terrorist attacks against the USA on 11 September 2001, as when we saw the massacres of Kosovo, Sarajevo, Srebrenica, Rwanda and Congo on our televisions, the news no longer talks of more than war or threats of war, violent deaths or threats of violent deaths.
Throughout the world, we are all very clear about the power of our weapons.
From missiles with nuclear warheads to trucks full of fertilisers or explosives worn on a belt, we have used our technological capacity to develop largely the dark side of our violent biological nature in the role of predator.
I certainly do not intend to minimize or reject this aspect of human history or current events.
I do not want anyone to forget that during the last half of the previous century, one-tenth of the men on this planet have been killed by shooting, gassing, stabbing, burning or starving, either because of the First World War or the famine that followed Mao's Great Leap Forward.
However, it is not a complete overview.
In fact, the human slaughterhouses of the twentieth century — and the various slaughterhouses diverse communities are readying as of today — may not appear in the future to be the most important part of our experience and our human condition, nor to be what our descendants will regard as their history.
For them, the most important features of our experience will perhaps be:
.
.
Overall, the 20th century remains in many parts of the world desperately poor because of one or several reasons: (1) a criminal governance; (2) a lack of machinery, useful and productive in the global economy out of subsistence agriculture and industry under qualified services; (3) a public education system absent, which could make the public education and skills needed for the use of these machines; (4) barriers (legal and physical) to prevent people, where demand is low, to sell the product of their work where demand is high.
However, towards the end of the twentieth century, these four main causes of poverty have generally been reduced.
The governments such as that of Kim Jong Il in North Korea are very rare these days.
Almost all countries in the world are no more than a generation away from nearly universal literacy.
The speed of technological progress has created a cornucopia of inventions and innovations open to all regions where a student of engineering may be sent.
And above all, the customs barriers preventing goods produced in Mauritius, Mozambique and Mauritania from being sold in New York or Berlin and Santiago or Tokyo are falling quickly.
The enormous cargoes that have appeared on the seas recently have revolutionised world trade in a generation.
New information technologies used in the management of inland transport and distribution will probably have the same impact.
Moreover, the advent of the Internet and technology fiber optic cable will support both the global services trade side that made the introduction of steamships iron hull hundred and fifty years earlier for international trade in agricultural and industrial products.
Certainly there will be a generation for whom these changes are felt throughout the world.
However, at the heart of the industrialised world of rich countries, people are already worrying about these revolutions that are appearing on the horizon.
In fact these concerns will be strengthened and sharpened as fears of the citizens of these rich countries when the barriers of international trade will fall and the redistribution of wealth, the social order and the political world of the industrialised world will be insensitive to their foundations.
For the whole world, however, the next two generations are those that will provide extraordinary opportunities for economic growth and international prosperity.
There very well may be a treasure chest at the end of history, after all.
The defeat of Argentine neo-liberalism
In the 1990s, Argentina implemeted policies that belonged to almost 80% of neoliberal program.
It opened its economy to international trade and international capital; it sought to ensure low inflation and a stable currency.
It strove to improve its legal system so that its decisions are consistent with international laws to generate some confidence as regards compliance with contract law, with or without bribes.
This did not work.
However, nobody can say that the 1990s were catastrophic, despite their consequences that led to the dreadful summer of 2002.
Life was far more difficult during the Dirty War of the 1970s, when an Army stripped of all honor threw the women out of helicopters in the South Atlantic Ocean and the urban guerrilla shot the people because... because... well, simply because!
The 1980s were hardly better.
Opening by a debt crisis at its peak caused by a massive rise in the US interest rates and of the dollar's value, the decade ended with hyper-inflation generated from within, which caused a decline of 10 years in Argentina, lagging behind the leading global economies.
During the 1990s, by contrast, GDP per head in Argentina increased by 25%, with highs and lows, only to lose all the profit of that growth over the last four years.
Until the end of last winter, the problems of Argentina seemed to be little more than unpleasant but temporary, just like the crisis of the Mexican "tequila" of 1994-1995 or even the crises of East Asia in 1997-1998 turned out to be mere temporary interruptions and not turning points.
Such optimism is impossible these days, and there is little hope that this country's recent stock market crash would only have temporary effects.
The opinion of institutions, like that of the Under Secretary of the US Treasury John Taylor, is that the collapse of Argentina is due to nothing more than its political class.
I only partly share this view.
The leaders of Argentina were warned repeatedly that maintaining a constant exchange rate and pegging the peso to the dollar could cause a recession if the dollar's value rose.
The Argentine politicians were also warned that their peso policy could not be sustained without the ratio of the national debt to the GDP falling.
However, during the boom years, between 1993 and 1998, public spending  exceeded tax revenues enough to increase the debt-to-GDP ratio from 29 to 44%.
When the dollar rose and the recession had gone, politicians of little worth were unable to balance the government's budget in time and have not shown enough courage to balance the budget when the situation hardens.
The final blow was dealt when the government decided (in full crisis) to keep the bank deposits fixed rate in dollar and putting the debt from banks in pesos, putting it into bankruptcy, the entire financial system of the nation by a stroke of a pen.
The position of the ruling class is simple: if any of those three disastrous measures had been taken, Argentina would not have entered a crisis or, at worst, suffered a mini crisis of the Mexican type.
Argentina's neoliberal program in the 1990s was foolproof, according to this view, but the Argentine politicians gave the image of a large community of astute imbeciles.
There is, however, another way to see the Argentinan tragedy.
If one considers that the country's political system has long been very predictable, consistently producing governments that promised more than they could implement.
Who promise to the wealthy oligarchs not to levy high taxes.
That promises a generous social insurance system to workers and consumers.
Promising rapid economic development, infrastructure spending generous of low-binding and enjoyable for those with political connections, etc..
Overall, these promises indicated that any view on the national product always exceeded the total of 100%.
Popular demand requiring that the government meet them all can never be satisfied.
Add to it an unfair distribution of wealth and income, the lack of social commitment between the middle class and the working class, and a long tradition of political violence, and you get the perfect cocktail of a policy where everyone opposes everyone.
The basic political battle over distribution of wealth in Argentina remains to be resolved.
Any political force that tries to manipulate elections is doomed to fail.
Thus, in Argentina, the big budget deficits are a law of nature, an unshakable fact.
In that way, the Argentinian interest rates cannot fall and be affordable except for short and rare periods of time.
Everyone knows that the Argentine political system generates a chronic deficit, and we know that this only indicates that the interest payments on debt were doomed to explode.
Considering the fact of the absolute lack of stability of the dynamics of Argentinian debt, indexing the exchange rate on a strong currency could not continue.
Free access to international capital markets and bank accounts in dollar implies that when the index for the exchange rate come into conflict with the logic of Argentine politics producer of deficit, the result could only be catastrophic.
If the current crisis has been skillfully manipulated, if Argentina had experienced another decade of rapid growth, the conflicts born of the redistribution of wealth would have been moderated.
After all, Europe before the second world war was proof of the worst politics worldwide: the riots of right-wing gather in France to general strikes in Britain through the civil war in Spain and fascism in Italy, without mentioning the aggressive consolidation of power in Germany by the Nazis.
And yet, Western Europe's postwar never encountered any problems of public order which found a solution while maintaining a strong currency and growth.
I only partially share this point of view, however.
Yes, the Argentine government has made serious mistakes, its politicians have sinned against the gods of the cash economy.
But the punishment should be so sharp and severe?
The false promises of private pensions
One of the most bizarre statements made during debates on social insurance that are bothering the richest countries in the world today is that pension schemes funded by governments and whose payouts are fixed (such as the Social Security system in America) are outmoded.
These programs were enough, according to this argument, at the time of the Great Depression and of the post-Second World War era, when the economy was based on industry, but they have become obsolete in light of the high-tech, networked, post-industrial present.
Defenders of this argument propose a different model.
The companies agree today to support the employees pension  by contributing to their private savings and current governments should offer (or demand) to help the private savings.
The value of these accounts varies according to the market and is not based on a system of set benefits that guarantees a real fixed amount of resources, available at the time of retirement.
This argument is strange because it takes the economic situation the wrong way around.
When many companies offer their employees of pension with fixed long-term benefits, the government has no interest in establishing a parallel retirement system with fixed benefits and to ask employees to participate.
After all, in that context, employees who attach great importance to defined-benefit pensions can go to work for companies that offer them.
The key advantages of a system where the government requires employees to participate also to a national social security system are combined for employees who should really attach great importance to a fixed benefits pension system to determine their real preferences.
They also accrue to employees who have no bargaining power to induce bosses to offer the pensions they want and they really need.
Few companies today are willing to offer long-term pension benefits.
One reason is that businesses today are much more aware of their own fragility in the long term than they were in the years following the Second World War.
Even IBM in the United States, which prides itself on its stability, do not take the risk to provide retirement benefits.
The risk posed by defined-benefit pensions was normally offset by two benefits for the companies that offered them.
First, the fact that leaving the firm usually implied the repayment of this savings with a depreciation, increased employees fidelity
Then, the optimistic assumptions of accountants, complacent about the benefits of retirement reserves, associated with the ability of large companies to take greater risks, improved the balance sheet that companies could submit to their investors.
Today, the risks are seen as much bigger and the benefits as much less.
Because of this, fewer employers are offering what would look like fixed benefits pensions.
This reduction of the fixed benefits systems in all the rich countries of the global economy is not a good thing, because the configuration of the prices of goods suggest that young and middle-aged people  attach great importance to the benefits.
Historically, the gap between the profits expected on goods at a lower risk such that the Treasury or the good investment and property at high risk such that the actions or real estate was generally very high.
In sum, as some economists say, including Harvard's Robert Barro and mathematicians like Benoit Mandelbrot, this may be due to the fact that risky investments are actually far riskier than suggested by theories and standard financial techniques.
In my opinion, at least, this is partly due to the memory of the 1930s and 2000, when the stock market had suffered greatly, which occupies too large a place in investors' minds.
Employees and other asset holders place great value on security and predictability, so fixed retirement benefits are extremely valuable.
But in the today's world, only national governments are big enough to implement such systems and ensure that pensions will genuinely be available when employees will end their activity.
I am still social-democrat enough to believe that if there is an economic service or an advantage in which people attach great importance and that only the government can offer, then it is its duty to provide it.
We economists all know there are many disadvantages to pushing the government out of its basic role, which is to provide real public services such as defense, security and justice, while offering people incentives to offset the effects of the real failures of the market.
Where the private market has the flexibility of two hands, the government bureaucracy has no more than that of two thumbs.
But the collection of salary taxes on tens of millions of salaries and the writing of tens of millions of retirement checks is part of the semi-automatic, routine tasks the government can carry out so well.
When private companies are pulling out of fixed benefits systems, it is even more important and valuable that the government understands it, while our post-industrial society enters an era of networks, than it was in the past.
Islamic movements and the paradox of democracy
The wave of anger that is stirring up the Arab world after the publication in Denmark, a few months ago, of cartoons representing the Prophet Mohammed, the victory of Hamas in Palestine and the increasing radicalization of the Iranian regime are the reason why "political Islam" is a fundamental problem on the international scene.
But there can be a single answer to all the issues that arise.
We must abandon the idea that there is a monolithic Islamist movement.
Islam has various forms that have emerged as the main alternative to the secular Arab nationalist regimes whose legitimacy, based on the national liberation struggle, has disappeared due to their inability to solve the economic and social problems, establish state law and ensure fundamental freedoms.
In Palestine, for example, Islamists have prevailed over Fatah because they have suffered for years under his bad governance while enduring the trials of Israeli occupation.
For a long time, America and Europe have shared a deep-seated fear of "The Islamic alternative" to the secular and nationalist leaders such as those of Fatah and thus defended the status quo.
But the Monarchs and secular Arab dictators crushed any opposition, making mosques the only place from which any political commitment was possible.
Today, political Islam can no longer be contained, because we cannot build democracy by pushing parties who have strong social support underground. This is what the example of Algeria tragically illustrated 15 years ago.
The only alternative to authoritarianism is to achieve a transition that allowa the Islamists to participate in political life, while encouraging them to accept unequivocally the rules of the democratic game.
In many countries, the Islamist parties, which are more or less conservative, are ready to play the game.
It is no accident that they are represented in the parliaments of all the countries that have initiated political reforms, whether in Lebanon where Hezbollah is now within a democratically elected government, Jordan and Morocco.
In Egypt the Muslim Brotherhood has become a force to be reckoned with in parliament, despite the limits imposed on the participation of Islamist groups in elections last year.
In Iraq, free elections have revealed the huge influence of Islamic movements.
In Turkey, the democratic transition brought to power an Islamist party, the party of justice and economic development.
Under his leadership, the Turkish government has undertaken various important democratic reforms and has begun negotiations regarding the admission of Turkey into the EU.
The Islamist parties have nothing to do with Al Qaeda, even if some of the most conservative elements within them hold ideological positions that may be close to it.
The risk of a political transition that will lead the victory of the Islamist parties is a paradox of democracy that Europe and America must accept if they want to encourage a policy that includes all the political sensitivities – in other words to the exact opposite to the imposition of democracy as it has held in Iraq, under occupation of foreign troops.
One of the most negative consequences of intervention in Iraq was to reinforce the notion of a "clash of civilizations" between the West and Islam, which creates a climate conducive to Islamist movements.
The Muslim world moved to make political reforms well before the "war against terrorism," and the Muslim reformers did not wait until the EU gained political weight before they acted.
Such movements have not been created in the United States or in Europe after September 11th, and they do not expect a signal or help from them to act.
The success of Muslim moderates may nevertheless depend on EU and US attitudes toward them.
It is not necessary to show that democracy is the best route for Palestinians if they want to succeed in creating their state.
That largely depends on the direction that the new government of Hamas will take, which will or will not turn itself into a democratic power, respectful of the law, democracy and international law.
But that will also depend on Israel and the international community, who should do everything in their power to encourage the emergence of a future Palestinian state with Jerusalem as capital.
Promote democracy among the Palestinians will not prevent the international community to ask Hamas to definetely renounce terrorism, to demilitarise, to comply with the Palestinian constitution and recognize Israel's existence.
But it does not mean that we should impose sanctions on the Palestinian people after they expressed themselves democratically.
If you want to strengthen the recent Palestinian democracy, it would be a terrible mistake that would have a negative impact in the other Arab countries seeking to reform themselves.
Similarly, to recognize the right of nonviolent Islamist parties to participate in political life does not mean renouncing political and ideological struggle to overcome ultra-conservative and sometimes totalitarian conceptions of society.
Fighting racism, defending tolerance and respecting the religious feelings of others does not presuppose questioning freedom of the press or accepting the censorship Islamic militants call for, even if valid religious feelings are hurt, as in the case of the Danish cartoons.
Islamist conceptions of society that violate individual rights must be rebutted politically.
This political challenge is one of the paradoxes of democracy because it allows all ideas to compete freely with each other.
Political Islam is a risk, but we can reduce that by developing an appropriate strategy, adapted on a case-by-case basis, that promote democracy, but not by minimizing the value of democratic choice.
The war against "democratization"
The wars in Lebanon and Gaza pose a serious threat to democratic reform in the southern Mediterranean.
They are inflicting heavy penalties precisely on the people of the region who have led free and fair elections, and they undermine the legitimacy of democracy of Israel.
Last year, the "Cedar Revolution" made Lebanon an example of democratization in the Arab world.
The enthusiasm with which the international community welcomed these changes has fallen flat. The elections that recently took place in Palestine -- another long-standing international requirement -- are experiencing the same scenario.
The message is clear: it is preferable that Israel, the only country in the region to meet the State of law, is surrounded by authoritarian regimes where the election results are predictable, rather than Democratic States where Islamists are likely to gain power.
It happened in Palestine and this could well happen in Egypt if elections are conducted in free and fair manner.
The Arab nationalist governments could justify the resistance to political reforms and the repression of any internal opposition, in particular, growing Islamic movements.
It is now clear to everyone that democratization in the southern Mediterranean can not exclude Islamist movements and the success of the process depends largely on the degree to which participation of these movements is provided in the policy arena.
Of course we still need to renounce violence as a means of accession to power.
Containing political Islam, or attempting to "erase" Islamists militarily without regard to national political processes (not to mention human lives) is not a solution, because voters do not turn away from Islamist movements.
The efforts of reformist governments in the region to integrate these movements in the public circle have received a severe blow.
Democracies have long known that extreme and indiscriminate punishment -- which, by definition affects friend and foe, fighters as well as civilians -- is a serious violation of international law, as has been observed by Louise Arbour, UN High Commissioner for Human Rights.
They also know that such actions are stirring up radicalism and have the impact that we know only too well today.
Hezbollah is, after all, a child of the resistance of Lebanon to the Israeli invasion in 1982. The "Party of God" is trying to gain ascendancy at home and in the region by presenting itself as the defender of the Arab-Islamic cause, particularly in Palestine.
Any strengthening of its power will in fact weaken Lebanon and the democratic forces in the region.
The extended absence of a real active engagement of the United States in the Middle East peace process is partly responsible for the current slump.
For nearly six years, they have not taken to diplomatic initiative weight to resolve the Palestinian issue, nor to follow the Syrian track (Israel is still in the Golan Heights).
Moreover, even as we begin to think that the tragedy of Iraq has shown the limits of unilateral disarmament and preventive military strategies, the Bush administration encourages the Israeli military action -- this time against a country painfully trying to consolidate its democratic reform and to reaffirm its sovereignty from Syria.
Bush most promising initiative, to promote democracy throughout the Middle East, was paralyzed by the intervention in Iraq and by the civil war that followed.
As of now, this project is crushed under the weight of the American inability to protect Lebanon's fragile democracy and of Palestine's  experience with democracy.
The weak response of the European Union to the conflict raging in Gaza and Lebanon has wavered between understanding and condemnation of the outspoken response of Israel (not "eye for an eye", but "ten eyes for an eye," according to the Finnish Presidency of the EU), bringing to light how the EU depends on the United States to put an end to the violence.
If the present conflict does not encourage Europeans to speak with one voice, it means they have learned nothing from disunity, and thus weakness, which harmed them during the war in Iraq.
It would need a European initiative backed by credible military deterrents, combining the strengths of the EU, Turkey and the Arab countries, to be dispatched in Lebanon and Gaza under a UN mission.
Europe must not only demand an immediate ceasefire and end the interference of Syria and Iran in Lebanon, but it must also have the means to translate its requirements into practice and provide massive aid for the reconstruction of Lebanon.
The EU must support ending the embargo on Palestine and the pressing need for the creation of a Palestinian State.
A common European front could persuade the United States to give enough time to Lebanon and Palestine to consolidate their democratic processes, and to thus isolate the radical elements of Hamas and bring Hezbollah to dissolve its private army.
With the American project in ruins, a credible European policy  delegitimizing the war and supporting democracy in the region is crucial.
The economic environment
No economy is a closed world, independent, governed by law independent from laws, moral or politics.
The most interesting economic issues tend to be on the border between neighboring disciplines.
This cannot become more clear than in the interaction between economic processes and the environment.
The particularity of this exchange is not to be governed by the laws of mechanics, but by those of thermodynamics, particularly the law of entropy that the amount of free energy that can be transformed into mechanical work decreases with time - an irreversible process culminating in "the heat death."
At the initiative of Nicholas Georgescu-Roegen - whose work on the relationship between economic processes and physics was pioneering - many researchers tried without success to formulate a "entropic" theory of the economy and society, especially during the 1970s.
The entropic point of view assumes that because of their multiple interactions with nature, economic processes produce irreversible consequences.
We draw in the stocks of non-renewable natural resources (oil and mineral resources, for example) and deteriorate or modify quality of other resources (for example, water and agricultural land) by imposing an exploitation rates higher than their ability to regenerate.
The exploitation of non-renewable resources sets the "speed" of economic growth free from ecological rhythms, which contributes to the deterioration of the biosphere, especially by irreversible climate change.
The law of entropy reminds us that we will pass along to future generations an environment less and less suited to their needs than that which we inherited.
Unfortunately, there are no easy solutions.
According to what principle could one ask China and India to limit their economic growth to reduce their demands on the planet's natural resources?
The slower growth in developed countries is not the consequence of voluntary self-restraint, but rather our much higher standard of living and our inability to solve our own economic imbalances.
We cannot impose the ecological rhythm on the poor when it is the fact of having broken free of it ourselves that has made us rich!
For a similar reason, the decrease or even stagnation are no longer a solution in the developed countries: this would involve either making do with inequalities, or imposing a regime of redistribution aiming to an equal repartition of resources.
This would be the choice between an unsustainable cynicism and an totalitarian utopia.
But, fortunately for us, our evolution depends not only on the entropy, but also on the increase of knowledge and technical progress -- a process as inevitable as the decline in reserves of non-renewable resources and environmental degradation.
Thus the economy is rather entropic as regards resources and historic for production, organisation and dissemination of knowledge. The prospects for a sustainable development in economic and environmental terms in the area developed between these two dynamic processes: the chosen level of growth should be based on a level of knowledge sufficient to ensure the survival of the system.
But nature and knowledge are public goods that require the intervention of the state to be "produced" in sufficient quantities.
The only solution to the problem of the finiteness of our world is to maintain as much space as possible between entropy and history by investing in education and research in the hope of increasing renewable energy resources, reduce consumption energy related to our standard of living, and slow the pace of exploitation of natural resources.
Such a strategy may seem pointless if it only makes us withdraw to allow others to enrich themselves more quickly.
But conceived as stemming from the knowledge of two dynamic processes, the solution of the ecological constraints could be a growth accelerator.
The race to embryonic stem cells continues
Scientific research is generally undertaken to improve our lives, but it is also an industry, an industry that represents a huge investment on the part of governments and companies.
The stakes and the potential benefits of a small number of research subjects are exceptionally high, and this is why the recent announcement that the Korean scientist Hwang Woo-suk falsified the results of his research on stem cells received such a response.
The episode highlights the continued international medical research competition that is unfolding in the field of stem cells.
This is probably one of the biggest challenges in all medical history that is accessible to everyone, and everybody, truly everybody could win the jackpot.
The last great scientific race of this type dates back to the time of the human genome project, which promises to radically change the future.
This study was launched by the United States from discoveries in the track of Japan nuclear bombing on the understanding of the scope of genetic damage in the long run.
The research effort done on embryonic cells and their potential is just as important because it will allow a full medical revolution just as important.
An embryonic cell is special because it can reproduce a form different from itself.
So when a skin or liver cell, for example, cannot replicate more skin or liver, embryonic stem cells, which are most robust at the beginning of human development, are "prototype"cells.
When a fertilized egg turns into an embryo and then a fetus, these original embryonic cells somehow show the cells they produce how to turn into skin, liver, eye, or bone.
We need to find out how this transformation is unleashed.
Such knowledge would lead to enormous progress that could give rise to patents.
Strong attention is focused on genetic diseases, including Alzheimer's, Parkinson's, and muscular dystrophy.
In these cases, stem cells would be used to repair nerve tissue.
This would also benefit patients with brain or spinal damage, any patient having suffered paralysis.
This would also spill out to parallel fields, such as gene therapy.
An embryonic cell changes of identity via a process of "triggering", a signal that literally activates the liver cell gene in the embryonic version of the cell.
When researchers understan how to activate these switches, it may be possible to introduce embryonic stem cells in the human body and to activate the replacement of the damaged tissue.
It is not surprising, given its huge potential, that teams of researchers have rallied almost everywhere to engage in research on stem cells.
This race has gained some momentum since the main player in research, the United States, are available, because of the influence of religion on the politics (even if the State of California has decided not to deny and recently approved a subsidy of $3 million for research on embryonic stem cell).
The potential is so great, science having little need for massive infrastructure. Many small countries have rushed to profit from the void created by the United States.
Any competent medical research centre can put itself on this path, be it in Mexico, in Ethiopia, Indonesia or in Yemen.
The winner can bring to his country's economy the equivalent of a Saudi oil field.
But even if everyone can win, science, at this level, is not just a simple "eureka" or in a single breakthrough that would end this race.
The findings are progressive, and, because this is science, each step is announced and tested.
This is how institutions that participate in research can gain momentum, how leaders attract talent, resources and prestige in an intellectual environment that is not easy.
They have found themselves in the overall competition with many other small players, which are scrambling to produce rapid and impressive results.
In May 2005, the research centre of Hwang in Seoul achieved a first result of importance.
They claimed to have developed a technique wherein new embryonic stem cells in perfect condition could be cloned from ordinary cells.
It was big news, because they implied that a sufficient number of embryonic stem cells could be created without controversy, thus allowing everyone to do quality research while avoiding what US President George W. Bush has described as "the use of a life to save a life."
In addition, the Koreans are then switched to a stage commun in our days and have called for the patent rights of the process.
It was almost plausible for a time that South Korea would become the world superpower on global health issues.
We now know that the Korean researchers made the whole thing up.
The inquiry conducted by an investigative panel of Seoul National University concluded that "cloned" stem cells were actually created by in vitro fertilization.
The fraud has stunned the scientific community, particularly the fact that the Korean researchers' statements were so clearly false.
Why did they even put their careers and reputations at stake?
Medical research has always faced many challenges, even when the scientific pursuit is one of discovery.
Today, the challenges are complicated by policy, market forces and national interests.
With embryo research, vast fortunes depend on the group which will take the lead, wherever its laboratory may be.
While competition is heating up, we must await stunning developments, and no doubt other subterfuges in terms of public relations.
Islam and Asian Chinese diaspora.
When the Prime Minister of Malaysia, Dr. Mahathir Mohamed, recently announced his intention to resign, Malaysians of Chinese origin banded with Mahatir's Malaysian Loyalist Party to beg him to reconsider.
When Mahathir agreed to stay, even just for 16 months, the sighs of relief from the Malaysian Chinese were the most audible of all.
The fact that Malaysians are ethnic Chinese rallied on the side of Dr Mahathir marks a quiet revolution in the political malaise that shows how nationalist image of relaxed Mahathir during his 22 years in power.
It also shows how the ethnic Chinese have changed their opinion on the nationalist movement, which previously seemed hostile.
At the time of the overthrow of colonial leaders of Southeast Asia four decades ago, the ethnic Chinese often fled nationalist movements fighting for independence.
Some movements saw the Chinese natives as outsiders or as intrinsically disloyal people for having disproportionately benefited from years of imperial rule.
The anti-Chinese mob violence was widespread in the region.
In the decades that followed, most Chinese have continued to be wary of political parties linked to former national liberation movements.
That fear is waning in Malaysia.
Chinese citizens of Malaysia now consider the prime minister Mahathir as a bulwark against a new form of violent extremism: the threat posed by Islamic fundamentalism.
Such a barrier is needed for members of the vast Chinese diaspora throughout Southeast Asia, not only in Malaysia, where Islamic extremism is still a small threat, but also in Indonesia, where thousands of Chinese have been killed and injured in riots in recent years and thousands more have seen their property damaged or lost.
Most of the ethnic Chinese in Southeast Asia admired like a precioius stone the presence of even a hint of allegiance to an age-old distinction between faith and the state in a Muslim ruler.
When this distinction exists in Islamic believers like Mahathir, evidence of a secular tolerance represents a rare sign of modernity and commitment to progress.
Dr. Mahathir has always been a cool-headed modernist.
He has recently begun to acknowledge that the "Malays first" policies that have been promoted since 1969 have failed to give rise to the Malaysian political elite necessary for a new modern economy.
Mahathir calls on young Malays to work harder, even though he is fully aware that such an appeal is unpopular.
A large part of this new tone in the ethnic policies of Malaysia went unnoticed because of the uproar surrounding the efforts made by Mahathir to discredit her former member, Anwar Ibrahim.
This campaign against Mr Anwar has cost the party of Mahathir, the United Malay National Organisation (onmu), much of its support among ethnic Malays.
Indeed, in the national elections of 1999, Mahathir retained power only thanks to the Chinese voters.
The non-Malays hope that from now on he will reconsider the idea of special treatment for ethnic Malays.
Such reform still figure like anathema among the Malays.
The ethnic Chinese of Malaysia are also impressed by the clever response of Dr. Mahathir to American demands to fight terrorism.
The Prime Minister has used this opportunity to soften his image of man against the West by reaffirming his modernist and secular position against all those who sympathize with Islamic extremism.
In so doing, it has revitalized the multicultural base of the National Alliance that has led Malaysia since independence was proclaimed in 1957.
All this enabled him to win the Chinese community in Malaysia over to his side.
Contrast this situation with the Chinese in Indonesia, a country where everything that is ancient and modern is associated with a political and cultural compliance with the nation state.
For 30 years, former President Suharto consistently established racial discrimination against the ethnic Chinese while favoring a few privileged comrades who allowed his family and his fellow military men to make huge profits which were improperly acquired.
In the eyes of the indigenous majority remained poor, such favoritism has depicted the Chinese as corrupt and greedy unscrupulous.
Despite the memories of the massacre of Chinese during the anti-communist purges of the 1960s, the Chinese in Indonesia were not prepared to confront the immense hatred set loose during the riots in May 1998, when arson and looting and the rape of a number of Chinese women ravaged the Chinese community.
Such violence casts a shadow on the ethnic relations in Indonesia.
The successive Indonesian governments led by Presidents Habibie, Abdulrahman Wahid and Megawati Sukarnoputri all encouraged the Chinese to play their usual leading role in commerce.
However, Indonesian officials are reluctant to ensure Chinese that they will retain equal rights as citizens and they have allowed various forms of discrimination to prevail.
Current tensions between secularists, religious believers, and various Muslim extremist groups in Indonesia have rejected the Chinese in the shadows, allowing many of them to resume their economic role amidst increasingly uncertain times.
But the personal safety that they want and that the Malaysian Ethnic Chinese are going to get still remain as distant as ever.
Indeed, it is highly unlikely that Indonesia would produce a leader on whom they could count in the same way that the Chinese in Malaysia are now counting on Prime Minister Mahathir.
Football and philosophy
Gooooal!!!
Divine serenity, or hell burns, depending on which team scores: ours or theirs.
How can the trajectory of a ball be responsible for either happiness or pain?
I have spent weeks sitting in front of my television watching the World Cup.
My wife threatens to divorce me and to take other disciplinary measures.
What is the source of this attraction, of this magic?
The world of the game is our perennial garden of Eden.
You can abandon our reality at any time for freedom, innocence and the happiness of play.
Football and the Garden of Eden?
What do they have in common?
Each one defines a sacred sphere of freedom and order, of innocence, spirituality and justice over against our day to day world of chaos, slave-trading, unfairness and blame.
The chess board, the tennis court, the football pitch: in their confines, we feel free, because in these places we decide the rules without being subject to the iron laws of the outside world.
You feel innocent, too, because the sports world is also a world of innocence: a Garden of Eden before the fall.
Here we can be childish and selfish, we can satisfy our need for success, power and domination, and all this without any guilt.
In the game world, freedom is generated, paradoxically, by the restrictions.
In soccer, the basic rule is simple: the ball should move from the central point towards the net of one of the two goal cages.
If the ball had been heading directly toward the goal, its path would appear to be totally predetermined and therefore pretty boring.
To create a degree of freedom, the settlement occurs in how the ball managed to complicate the move.
First, two teams of 11 players are placed on the ground with the objective of placing the ball into one of the goals.
Then, they are asked to put the ball in the goal cage of the other side.
Thanks to 22 players with their own skills and their own will, thanks to various movements of confrontation and cooperation, the number of possible combinations is almost infinite.
After this, there is just one more factor to create a true world of happy surprises, freedom and happiness: the ball.
Balls are the most important element in the "creation of freedom" in our lives.
A ball, it is freedom personified.
It could bounce back in any direction.
It seems to be equipped with a will of its own.
It is an object, and yet, it seems to be free.
With the introduction of an element of chance and unpredictability into the game, the ball changes a bitter, down-to-earth human battle into an epiphany of spirituality and freedom.
According to his quick movements, chance and men will interact, dance, and do somersaults with one another.
The ball errupts from here, from there, full of carefree irresponsibility, between the desire of men and chance, freedom and restriction, success and failure, hope and despair, to then bounce back in the world of hope.
He has his own universe.
He moves into the sphere of the sacred.
But the sacred does not exist without the secular.
The football field is marked and delimited from its environment.
The experience and sacred ceremony would be incomplete if the tension between the field and the stands did not exist.
The pale emerauld field and the freedom of the game must be in opposition with the howling crowd in the dark gallery, the red burning torches and the sudden travelling between joyous ecstasy and infernal misery
In our daily lives, reasons and passions mix.
Soccer (as in other sports) separates these two areas and opposes them.
All the passions, emotions and instincts are forced onto viewers.
They rage and burst out, storm around and explode, to attain catharsis in the end (if their team wins) or go through hell (if their team loses).
At the same time, they watch, seeing and experiencing the platonic platonic or Apollonian freedom of a game taking place on the ground.
Yes, the players move in a world of spirituality.
They act according to clear, sacred rules.
When they play, they are expected to act as rational beings, who leave behind them the passions and the emotions, the fears and the intimate wishes of their daily lives.  (The context is missing. Play? Act? Speculate? Gamble?)
They move in a world of morality and pure justice.
The world of the player is a world full of justice and complete fairness; perfect equality in opportunity, that we never usualy get.
Even the direction of the wind is controlled.
The two teams change side at half-time.
Where and when do we see the privileged and the poor switch sides in the real world?
The players, too, are not supposed to depart from the rules.
If they do, they are punished, and if they do it again, they are ejected from the game
They are excluded from the sphere of spirituality and we see them disappear into the frozen hell of the changing room.
The definitive expulsion from Paradise only occurs when the holiness of the game has been desecrated, if the fate has been broken: with the players robbed of their angelic role and embarking on a fight on the ground, with a cheating referee, with a public understanding that a match was arranged, with spectators invading the pitch.
Such events affect the public and the community for a long time.
It is a bitter shock to realize the fragility of our world of freedom, spirituality, dignity, and then waking up again (as we do when the winner of the World Cup will be known) in our world, nothing less than hostile.
Egypt needs a president, not a pharaoh
A heated debate on the current political reforms is shaking up Egypt.
Stemming from all opposition parties and civil groups, it focuses on a request to amend the 1971 Constitution and end the state of emergency declared in 1981 after Sadat's assassination.
These claims are nothing new.
President Mubarak and the ruling National Democratic Party have been stonewalling since the mid-1980s.
But, given the alarming turn of events in Egypt, in the region and beyond, the need for reform is now a compelling character.
On the blueprint, the 76 years of President Mubarak and his state of health are a source of concern.
Rumours about this have been spreading for years, but they were only confirmed officially in November 2003, when it was no longer possible to hide the situation.
While he addressed parliament, Mubarak fainted before the eyes of millions of viewers.
Although he returned an hour later to finish his speech, the Egyptians started demanding more transparency, regarding the president's health as well as the functioning of the State.
At the same time, the deteriorating economic situation, high unemployment and widespread corruption have led to despair of youth.
More than half of the population of Egypt was born under the presidency of Mubarak.
According to a recent UN report, half of young people between 15 and 30 years old dream of emigrate to Europe, North America and Australia.
Every week, reports talk about Egyptians drowning in the Mediterranean sea while trying to illegally cross into Europe.
A few weeks, several young people died of suffocation while they were returned to Egypt in freight trucks crossing the Libyan desert.
The incident caused an uproar that forced the authorities to arrest, interrogate, and prosecute the Egyptian police officers in charge.
The situation in the region and in the world has made the opposition more daring, not only to demand reforms, but also to amend the articles of the constitution relating to the presidency.
According to persistent rumours, Mubarak, who has already been re-elected four times, would seek to obtain a sixth term or to establish some kind of "hereditary Republic". He would be grooming his son Gamal, 41 years old, to his succession, in the image of the Syrian President Hafez al-Assad and his son Bashar.
The battle cry of the opposition is no, no to the re-election of Mubarak and no to Gamal to succeed him.
Many Egyptians have nothing against Gamal Mubarak as such, but they are mortified at the idea that, after being subjected to the father for 24 years, they risk being inflicted by the son for the same length.
Out of 211 articles of the current constitution dating to October 1971, 30 relate to the presidency.
The nomination of the president by a two-thirds majority of the People's Assembly is then ratified by a popular vote in which one can only answer yes or no.
The presidential term of six years, obtained by simple majority, is renewable indefinitely in the same way.
The laxisme of these procedures clashes truly with the extent of presidential power.
The president is both head of state and commander-in-chief, he presides over the Supreme Council of the Judiciary, the police and the Council of Ministers. He can, at his discretion, appoint and/or dismiss one or several vice-presidents.
He appoints the prime minister and key ministers and approves the appointment of other ministers, some ambassadors and some senior civil servants.
He can call for general elections, declare war, declare emergency rule and enact decrees that have the force of law.
There is not one balance of power.
An article states that "the president can be impeached for high treason or any other criminal act if a motion submitted by at least one-third of the members of the People's Assembly is approved by two-thirds of them."
The president is then suspended from duty and replaced by the Vice-President until the conclusion of the process.
But Mubarak has never promulgated the law needed to implement this article or even appointed a vice-president, despite repeated requests from all sides.
This has resulted in a de facto "imperial presidency" with Mubarak in place of the pharaoh.
No other head of state in modern history has ever had so much power in his hands.
In Egypt, he is more readily compared to Leonid Brezhnev, who presided over two decades of stagnation and decline of the Soviet Union.
Similarly, the position of Egypt as a regional power has collapsed under Mubarak.
On the economic front, the flow of foreign investments has plummeted from 3 billion per year in the mid-1990s to some ridiculous 300 million in 2003.
The demands for reform now focus on the election of the president by universal approval with at least two candidates and the prohibition of more than two consecutive terms.
But he should also reduce presidential powers wherever they are abusive and create effective mechanisms for all government officials without exception to be accountable for their actions.
If Mubarak and his government are doing nothing to support that the constitutional amendments are adopted, more and more Egyptians will defect from regime and risk their lives to seek salvation elsewhere.
Bush should no longer play in the Gulf
President Bush urged Americans not to "play politics" in this period of terrible national disaster.
But, to ask the awkward questions to the leaders of our nation is exactly what is democracy, when the government's response to Hurricane Katrina is widely regarded as "a disgrace."
Katrina announced its arrival at least two days in advance, but the authorities delayed launching an evacuation order.
No means of transport was available for those who had no money or car; the welcome and care facilities for the refugees were inadequate, the necessary forces were not in place to deliver the supplies that were absolutely essential or to maintain order, and the number of boats, helicopters and other equipment needed to rescue those who were stranded was far enough.
Hampered by the National Guard, of whom 40% are in Iraq, the speed of military mobilization to the most affected areas has been unusually slow.
For four days, there was simply no clear central control and orders.
Consequently, numerous victims have suffered and died.
This failure is largely attributable to the policies of the Bush administration, which has effectively eroded the powers of the Federal Emergency Management Agency, whose primary mission is to manage disasters.
Obsessed by the war against terrorism and by the ideology of privatization of government functions, the administration has systematically undermined the ability of FEMA to avoid disasters in the long term or at least soften the blows while prevention is still possible.
FEMA has been restricted and demoted from its Cabinet position, before being placed under the auspices of the Department of National Security.
Its mission of planning and preparation for disasters has been completely sidelined, for the benefit of the fight against terrorists.
Its leaders have no experience in disaster management.
The previous director was one of Bush's Texas political cronies, and the current director's qualification include the task of judge's commissioner and of security staff for the International Arabian Horse Association, where he was forced to resign for "lack of supervision."
Since 2001, billions of dollars have been transfered from aid to disaster management to national security and the war in Iraq.
The key programs for disaster relief have seen their budget melt like snow in the sun and the federal funds have been cut in half.
The budget of the Army Corps of Engineers for the constrction of levees in New Orleans was looted, particularly the funds specifically allocated to urban flood control  in southwest Louisiana.
Prevention measures aimed at protecting the population and property have not been implemented, despite the conclusions of FEMA as far back as 2001, specifying that a major hurricane that hit New Orleans was one of the three "most probable and most catastrophic disasters which could hit this country."
Convinced that the FEMA was a "disproportionate social program" and that "the government's job is not to provide services," the first director of the FEMA of Bush has set up the requirements of supply outside under a major effort of privatisation.
This phenomenon has led to a brain evasion because many managers of the FEMA are geared to the private sector.
The privatization has also put the states and the poorest communities in a particularly vulnerable situation.
As funding was drying up and federal programmes were put in the hands of private companies at higher rates, only the richest and politically important states and communities had the means to claim the rare federal benefits to pay for services.
For example, Florida (which has 16 more votes than Louisiana and where the governor is the President's brother) has received the funding required to protect its wetlands.
In contrast, Louisiana, which has more needs (with his incredible poverty rate of 24%), has seen in 2004, denied his request to fund to prevent floods.
Given that the ability of Louisiana to protect itself was weakened and that the management of disaster was undermined, the inadequate response of the government and the unnecessary destructions were almost inevitable. And the poor are those who paid the price.
But the reasons for the failure of this administration surpass the diversion of resources and chronic voluntary programs to protect people from disasters.
Despite scientific evidence proving that the intensity and increasing frequency of hurricanes are linked to climate change, the Bush administration rejects any participation in international programs aimed at climate preservation.
Rather than enforce the ban on wetlands development instituted by previous administrations, the Bush administration chose to ignore it.
The erosion caused by urban development has taken approximately 30 kilometers of the Gulf of Mexico and compared to 1965, hurricanes are capable of concentrating their force and causing increasingly faster and stronger wind and waves.
Similarly, the reduction of wetlands was threatening levees in New Orleans, built on the principle that 60 to 80 km of protective wetlands would play the role of a buffer between the city and the Gulf of Mexico.
Despite all the major studies showing that a large-scale coast rehabilitation programme and construction of higher dams was necessary to protect New Orleans, the government allowed federal agencies to stop protecting 8,000 hectares of swamps and promoters to drain hundreds of acres, and in 2004 it cut by over 80% funding designed to hold back the waters of Lake Pontchartrain.
New Orleans has sounded the alarm bells for America.
The ideologies of privatization, which prevent effective governance and allow the privileged to save their skins while poor people must climb up onto their roofs, must now be called into question.
This disaster is a reminder of what happens when government fails to protect its citizens, and it is imperative that the Americans are asking accounts.
The officials who have not done their work must be sent home, and the elected representatives whose policies have aggravated the devastation caused by Hurricane Katrina dismissed.
We owe it to the dead and the survivors.
The Comandante' autumn
Only Gabriel Garcia Marquez would find the right words to describe the expectations of the death of Fidel Castro.
His novel, The Autumn of the Patriarch, perfectly captures the moral poverty, the political paralysis, and the fierce boredom that buried a society awaiting the death of a longtime dictator.
The departure from power of Commandante Fidel is only a matter of biology, and the rare photographs of him which have appeared since he fell ill last year clearly show nature at work.
When the end comes, the change in Cuba may well be as large as any of the changes that greeted the end of the great dictators of the last century.
Stalin, Franco Tito, Mao: their ways and means are all similar.
The way they left the scene has often been very different, however, and these differences model the societies for years and decades after their death.
Take the example of the Soviet Union.
On March 9, 1953, from the Gulf of Finland to the Bering Sea, everything stopped, in Warsaw, Budapest, Prague and East Berlin.
In Beijing, Mao Zedong himself bowed in front of a huge effigy of Joseph Stalin.
Huge crowds in mourning, bereaved, almost hysterical, poured out in the vast empire which Stalin had ruled.
And yet, in a few days, the word Stalinism was removed from a new Soviet dictionary.  Three years later, my grandfather, Nikita Khrushchev, denounced Stalin's "cult of personality" in his famous "secret speech" in the 20th congress of the Communist Party.
The thaw that followed was short-lived, but for the first time in the Soviet history the possibility of change had been considered -- a possibility that Mikhail Gorbachev seized en 1985.
The death of Marshal Tito Josip Broz provoked the reappearance of another kind.
For decades, her reign had imposed a false sense of unity on Yugoslavia.
After his death in 1980, this artificial state began to disintegrate, culminating with the genocidal wars in Bosnia, Croatia and Kosovo in the 1990s.
But not all long dictatorships end up in disintegration and chaos.
The death of Mao allowed the return from exile of Deng Xiaoping, who had been disgraced.
Deng quickly started to throw the heirs of the "Gang of Four", and in some years ago, opened the Chinese economy, feeding a capitalist revolution that transformed China more completely, and with more success that the socialist revolution of Mao had never done.
Of course, the Communist party remains in power, and Mao's portrait is still on the Tiananmen Square.
But both are mere relics of ideas and ideals that in reality have been consigned to the trashcan of history.
Spain also has escaped violent dissolution when the fascist dictatorship of Generalissimo Francisco Franco collapsed on his death.
The old dictator can claim credit for this success, since by restoring the monarchy of King Juan Carlos just before dying, he gave Spain a foundation upon which to rebuild.
Franco was far from imagining that Juan Carlos would, with the help of an intelligent and young bureaucrat during the France Era named Adolfo Suarez, build the modern and democratic Spain of today.
It is no coincidence that the communist countries were (and still are) generally run by geriatrics, and the democracies by younger men and women.
This difference is important.
Old leaders can successfully preside over countries where everything is working peacefully, and which do not require further examination of their policies and their objectives.
There are exceptions to this rule, of course -- Churchill, Adenauer, Deng, Reagan -- but states cannot count on luck to give them an exceptional leader.
Younger leaders are more likely to be able to manage the multiple changes of difficult times.
Political competition means that all politicians, whatever their age, have to stay alert, to anticipate problems, and to remain open to new ideas.
Nobody can keep himself ensconced in high office do nothing but death or own boredom.
The one party systems, dictatorships playing on the charisma of one man or a mixture of both, as in Tito's Yugoslavia, are a guarantee of sclerotic minds and governments' inertia.
What will become of Cuba after the death of Fidel?  or  What will Cuba be like after the death of Fidel?
Many observers describe Raúl Castro, the youngest brother of Fidel and his designated successor, as a pragmatist -- the "practical Castro."
When the Soviet largess have continued in the early 1990s, Raúl has understood that the regime survival depended on economic reforms and has lobbied to allow the private agricultural markets are reopened to boost production and avoid a possible famine.
However, he is the same man who, as the head of the internal security apparatus of Cuba, has represented for many years the iron fist of the regime, and who is directly responsible for the imprisonment, and often torture, of thousands of dissidents.
So perhaps the best that one can hope for is a Russian-style situation in which liberalization is quickly stifled by the nervous old guard of the regime.
In addition, with support from oil-rich allies like Venezuela's President Hugo Chavez - and with the recent discovery of oil reserves off the Cuban coast, the introduction of reforms could become less urgent.
In this case, Raúl could try to cling firmly to the fossilized system he helped create and maintain with such brutality.
But Raul Castro is himself an old man, we can only hope that a Deng or, better yet, a Suarez, will emerge from the wreckage of Castro.
That said, for now, the youngest Communist Cubain representatives, as Foreign Minister Felipe Perez Roque said, remain ideological hardliners whom many Cubans as "los Taliban."
If they take over the power and keep their finger on the trigger, Cuba could have to face a new and very long biology lesson.
The ECB is now an anchor station in Europe.
The time had come for the European Central Bank to build a reputation.
Barely a month after the rejection of the constitutional treaty of the European Union in France and Holland, the recent European Union summit in Brussels ended in a aggressive orgy of national egoisms, without any agreement reached on the EU budget.
With Europe in turmoil, the ECB should present itself as a stabilising anchor.
Europe suffers from a profound crisis of confidence which is hampering its economic recovery.
Consumers, lacking confidence in their political leaders' ability to resolve these multiple problems, save for the bad days they believe to be very near, while businessmen are reluctant to invest because they do not trust governments to implement the necessary economic reforms.
As the shameful summit in Brussels shows, this lack of confidence in the political leadership of the EU is quite justified.
Instead of acting effectively and in a constructive manner on Europe's problems -- the reform of the state systems for expensive medical care for a better overall competitiveness -- the European political leaders are hiding behind false arguments on the "models" Anglo-Saxon ultra-liberals budget rebate, the British and high interest rates, as if the economic weaknesses were due to the mistakes of the ECB.
To undermine the independence of the ECB, European finance ministers are seek to weight in on more of the bank's decision-making.
Jean-Claude Juncker, Prime Minister of Luxembourg and President of the Eurogroup, testifying before the Economic and Financial Affairs Council of the Parliament of the European Union, said that euro zone finance ministers needed to be more forceful in the expression of their positions vis-à-vis the ECB. He called for "open and frank" discussions  between the ministers of the Eurogroup and the ECB.
Who needs these talks?
By common accord the Euro zone finance ministers want to talk about lowering interest rates, which will not help economic recovery in Europe.
The ECB has already extended the period of monetary stability through Europe with interest rates at their lowest in years.
Can we really believe that consumers refuse to spend -- and that business people put off their investments -- until the next decrease of interest rates?
To paraphrase Mr Keynes, one cannot force a donkey that isn't thirsty to drink
"The last thing Europe needs now is a reduction in interest rates," said an influential member of the ECB board in a candid assessment of the current situation. "Giving in under external pressure is in no way a no good definition of a 'stabilising anchor.'"
The Euro would collapse and the ECB would lose all credibility as a central bank.
In addition, the chief economist of the ECB, Otmar Issing, predicts that interest rates will go up longterm, rather than fall, because inflation expectations are rising.
Thus, reducing interest rates would not only be an error, it would be, more than anything else, madness.
But the ECB will not reduce its rates, even though it argues that this would be possible to keep the political wolves at bay.
The ECB continues, and in so doing, it proves to European citizens that there is at least one European institution in which they can place their trust.
This is extremely important.
History has shown that political unrest leads to inflation, which in turn increases political turmoil.
The Europeans can bet their last euro on the ECB: it won't let its young common currency be ravaged by inflation because political leaders who have failed in their task now fear losing their appointment.
Indeed, the courage shown by the ECB by remaining true to its principles should serve as a model for future European politicians.
When they would have understood that we cannot force the BCE to decrease interest rates in a unnecessary and destructive fashion, European leaders will then be the courage to govern, which, after all, is why they were elected.
The rush to the succession of Arafat
To understand what the Palestinian cause will look like without Yasser Arafat, consider the various titles that it currently holds.
Arafat is president of the PLO executive committee, president of the Palestinian National Authority, commander in chief of the Palestinian forces and leader of the Fatah movement.
The PLO embodies Palestinian national aspirations for independence and the desire to become a state.
It is the highest political body for all Palestinians, both those living in Palestine as refugees as well as other Palestinians in the diaspora.
Arafat's successor will have to juggle between negotiations with Israel, which will require concessions on the "right of return" of refugees to Palestine, and the hopes of more than three million Palestinians who wish to return to the homes from which they were expelled during the wars of 1948 and 1967.
Arafat's successor to the presidency of the Palestinian National Authority will be linked by the Oslo Accords, which created an interim government, currently led by Prime Minister Ahmad Qurei, which is responsible for the daily lives of Palestinians living in the West Bank and in the Gaza Strip.
Palestinians must decide if the president of the PNA will occupy a solid position or one that is merely symbolic, as is the case now.
The second option would make Qurei an empowered prime minister, fulfilling the wishes of many Palestinians and many others.
The position of the commander of Palestinian forces supposedly place the various military, Palestinian security and intelligence units in the hands of one leader, who is supposed to uphold the law.
But those forces are now in complete of confusion, the majority of the Palestinian uniformed security organizations must be reorganized after four years of intensive efforts by Israel to crush them.
The major factor of the internal security lies in the local paramilitary units.
These units, most of which are not controlled by the central management of the ANP, are more loyal to the leaders of the camp and PNA officers in uniform.
Local leaders of Fatah such as Marwan Barghouti have tremendous power over the nationalist armed units that are loosely organized under the title of al-Aqsa Martyrs Brigades.
Barghouti had advocated and tried to implement internal elections within Fatah when the Israelis detained him.
As a grassroots leader elected president of the student council at Bir Zeit University, he gained legitimacy by being chosen by his peers.
When the Oslo process began, he refused to accept any official position with the Palestinian Authority, choosing instead to remain close to the local Fatah.
Whoever will take the place of Arafat must ensure that these troops are satisfied with their status, their requirements, and that their leaders are respected.
Indeed, the struggle for power, which will be held in the post-Arafat era, will center ultimately on the Al Fatah, the hub of the PLO.
A worldwide assembly will choose the revolutionary council of Fatah, which is composed of 100 members and which, in turn, will elect a central committee of 20 members, in which most of the struggle for power will be concentrated.
Many young grassroots leaders will insist on an emergency meeting of the revolutionary council, or even on holding the sixth general assembly (which will be the first since 1988).
The events of recent months show that the Martyrs' Brigades of Al Asqa forced even Arafat to take their demands into consideration.
Most of the struggle for power will take place in the nationalist camp, however we must not forget the Islamist camp run by Hamas and Islamic Jihad.
Although it is unlikely that Islamists will interfere in the post-Arafat power struggle, they will not sit idly if the new leader moves in the wrong direction.
Of course, the new leader must reach an agreement with the Islamists on the ground rules, both at home and toward Israel.
Without this agreement and if the new leader is hard against the Islamists, a violent civil war could break out.
More importantly, to consolidate his supremacy, the next Palestinian leader will have to make tough decisions and get concrete results quickly.
The experience of the first Palestinian prime minister, who resigned in large part because of his inability to bring improvements to his people (especially in terms personal and collective security, law compliance and the end of the chaos that reigns in some Palestinian areas), remains fresh in the memory of the population.
At the same time, the freezing of settlement activities, the release of Palestinian political prisoners, including Marwan Barghouti, and the removal of hundreds of checkpoints between the Palestinian cities would revive a sense of hope, without which no Palestinian leader can negotiate what the world wants: a peace agreement.
The problem is that no Palestinian leader, no matter who he may be, can bring about these changes.
They represent a direct challenge to the Israeli occupiers, neighboring Arab countries, and the international community, led by the United States.
The mystery of 2008 Moscow
Usually around this time, people are obsessed with what the new year is going to bring them.
In Russia, the real uncertainty concerns 2008, not 2007.
Indeed, Russian policy can be distilled into a single question: Will President Vladimir Putin stay on as president after 2008, despite his repeated assertions to the contrary?
And if he is giving way, who shall he train to succeed him?
Will his successor be part of one of the enemy factions of the Kremlin?
Or will he choose a "foreigner"?
Unless Putin retains its position of ultimate arbitrator and decision-making skills , there are large risks that a fierce internal fighting rage.
In an environment where power and property are inseparable and all government institutions are emasculated, a transfer of total authority could lead to violent redistribution.
Resolving these issues is therefore vital for the Russian political elites anxious to preserve their current benefits and gain others.
Regarding the public, the vast majority seems resigned to accept any solution arranged by the power.
Some 45% of Russians believe that Putine will appoint her successor, and that this person will become the new president.
Almost a quarter believe that the constitution should be amended so that Putin can have a third term.
One way or another, it is almost universally acknowledged that the transfer of universal authority is settled at the summit and endorsed at the ballot box.
The balance of forces in the legislature will be, too, determined by the Kremlin.
In recent years, the configuration of political parties and the law on the elections have been changed several times to adapt to the interests of the ruling elite.
Therefore, undesirable forces have no chance in the parliamentary elections next December.
Alienated from politics, ordinary Russians are indifferent to everything that does not affect them directly, and do not attempt to hold anyone accountable.
They were not disturbed by the recent murder of journalist Anna Politkovskaya, nor by the assassination of Andrei Kozlov, vice-president of the central bank, nor by the implications of the poisoning of Alexander Litvinenko (a majority of respondents in a poll said that he had been killed by his "business partners.")
This alienation between the State and the people has a long tradition in Russia, just like public apathy.
But these days, the apathy is cemented by improving living standards.
Thanks to the windfall from oil and gas, Russians live better than they ever did in the Communist era.
We can argue that history has never seen such a large proportion of Russians having a decent standard of living.
As a result, people have become even more docile with a government that is more and more autocratic.
Of course, there are many reasons to complain, and people do grumble, but they will not unite to oppose the status quo.
Marginal political groups and figures who participate in protests are faced with political suppression, even harassment, which makes for even greater reason for the public to turn its back.
As the election result is played in advance, it may be that many will simply not vote.
In fact, Russia today has almost no reason to actively build support.
Instead, public participation is seen as an obstacle to the objectives pursued by the bureaucracy: self-sustaining and expanding control over lucrative assets.
If members of the Russian elite ever harboured modernizing ambitions, they have abandoned them, because without public participation, modernization is an illusion.
Instead, the Kremlin is relying more and more on the conservative, Soviet-style electorate as the basis of its power, while distancing itself from the more advanced, the entrepreneurs and the better trained.
Stephen Jennings, president of the Council of Renaissance Capital, a group of investment which has a decade of experience in Russia, recently noted the "conflicting trends" of the country: the emergence of "middle class booming" next to a "highly centralized government, raising a new class of oligarchs to État and bureaucracy to the rapid growth."
The problem is that the best and brightest elements of Russia, which Jenning praises for "big management capabilities, professionalism, productivity and social and economic ambition" don't seem to regard as a concern their remoteness from political decision-making.
They may regret the economic policies of the Kremlin, but they accommodate the rampant corruption in Russia and its shameful ranking  in the indices of competitiveness, just as they accommodate the general erosion of democracy, the manipulation of the judicial system and the weak law enforcement.
Just as their less advanced fellow countrymen, they do not seek to demand accountability in government or to call for changes.
For now, life is quite beautiful as it is.
Therefore, if the smooth transition of 2008 is threatened, or if there is a risk of destabilisation, it can only originate from conflicts at the top, and not in public.
The optimists hope that one day the growing Russian middle class will take responsibility for the future of Russia and will demand a radical improvement in governance.
But what will be able to trigger a shift from passive docility to active public participation?
If a prosperous era leads to political apathy, and bad policies lead to socioeconomic decline, the best and brightest Russian elements could find themselves overtaken by populist forces.
The fight against drugs: A change of strategy is needed.
Once again, Russia and Ukraine are victims of an illusion.
Since the end of communism in 1991, the use of illegal drugs has increased dramatically in both countries (and in many others).
They responded with draconian measures in line with the simplistic policy aimed at the complete elimination of drugs adopted by the UN.
These measures today contribute to the explosion of AIDS in many developing countries.
The UN conventions which govern the political fight against international drug does not take into account recent findings on drug use and dependence.
Most of these conventions were established well before the appearance of AIDS, which is spread mainly by the use of intravenous drugs in the former Soviet countries and in many Asian countries.
Thus, internationally, it is in Russia and Ukraine that AIDS is spreading the fastest.
The number of people infected has increased 18-fold during the past five years.
It is estimated that 1.5 million Russians and 400 000 Ukrainians are affected, and at least 85% of them are IV drug users .
In a misguided attempt to comply with UN conventions, the Russian and Ukrainian governments use the bulk of their drug fighting resources for repression.
Drug users are victims of police abuse, and are rejected by the health services even for vital medical care.
And meantime, drugs continue to flood the market.
In terms of drugs, the crackdown has never managed to eliminate the demand.
The repression doesn't takes into account neither the social and economic factors, nor the public health issues related to the use of banned substances.
Locking up the drug users is not a solution; in Russia, it is even easier to buy drugs inside prison than outside it.
In a climate of repression, drug users who escape arrest tend to be subject to discrimination, which does not encourage them to protect their health or that of the people they come in contact with.
If the company offers no hope for addicts and shows no compassion towards them, drug addiction and the AIDS virus can only develop quickly.
Russia and Ukraine are not the only ones to deal with the increase of intravenous drug use and the spread of AIDS that comes with it.
If they continue this type of policy, Pakistan, Iran, China, Central Asia, and all countries that are in the same situation will face the same public health disaster.
Many works around the world show that in the fight against drugs, action in the domain of public health is the most effective way to reduce HIV infection and its associated costs.
The British medical journal Lancet estimates that the US would have saved at least $500 million if they had set up a needle-exchange program on a national level during the 1987-1995 period.
A survey conducted at the international level indicates that HIV infections fell by 5.8% in the cities where there is a needle exchange program, but it has increased 5.9% in the cities where there is not.
There are no significant studies that highlight a correlation between the existence of a needle-exchange programme and an increase of drug addiction.
Studies carried out in the USA, Australia and elsewhere show that if the number of drug addicts who benefit from treatment does not decrease, it is because the participants to the needle exchange programmes have easier access.
The UN agencies such as the Commission on drugs or the United Nations Office on Drugs and Crime (ONUDC, ex-PNUCID) have no mandate to prescribe a specific strategy to fight against drugs.
However, their narrow conception of the fight against drugs has a strong influence on the policy and measures taken by the member states.
Many governments, obsessed with the observance of UN conventions, cannot or will not take into account the negative effects of strict enforcement of laws against drugs on public health policy.
In the 1990s, when AIDS started killing millions of people in Africa, contaminating more of a quarter of the population of some countries, international institutions looked away.
For similar reasons, this terrible epidemic will soon hit the countries of the former Soviet Union, amongst others.
Have we learned nothing?
It is not too late; policymakers at the national and international level can still reconsider their strategy.
Despite the UN conventions, some countries have adopted a more pragmatic approach to drugs and AIDS.
Consider that this is primarily a public health problem can combat much more effectively the AIDS epidemic.
The following measures will be able to prevent this.
· an anti-discrimination law to ensure the civil liberties and human rights of drug users and people affected by HIV.
· acknowledge that the use of drugs is a public health problem and not of respect of the law or law enforcement and implement a policy that reflects this.
· Legalize needle exchange programmes and treatment by methadone and other alternatives.
Establish national programs to reduce risky behaviors that are useful and accessible to all. This requires education, drug substitution treatment, drug treatment programs, and needle exchanges.
· both nationally and internationally, involve drug users and their supporters in the development of the policy on drugs.
To refuse to reconsider the goals of the fight against drugs and the chosen strategies will only worsen the AIDS epidemic and contribute to the death of millions of vulnerable people.
The abandonment of the Lisbon resolutions.
Upon taking office as president of the European Commission, Durao Barroso - former prime minister of Portugal - will have to urgently focus on restoring order and refocusing the economic policies of the European Union.
The thickest issue that awaits is the Lisbon agenda, an ambitious program approved in 2000 by the Heads of State and Government of the European Union in order to make Europe "the most competitive and dynamic economy" by 2010.
The primary economic fields are addressed: innovation and entrepreneurship, reform of social systems and social inclusion, skills and employment, gender equality at work, the liberalization of employment and property rights, as well as sustainable development.
It is certain that these are worthy ambitions, but belong to the sphere of national political decisions.
In effect, according to European treaties, the Union has no authority to implement legislative policy in these areas, nor the power to enforce it.
However, the Council of Europe, encouraged by the European Commission, has invented a new political approach - called "open coordination" - to be able to affect these areas.
Open coordination involves the determination of common aims at the EU level, voluntary compliance on the part of the member states and internal control of the results in the Council of Europe.
Evidently, open coordination has failed to keep its promises.
Furthermore, the illusion that the Council of Europe can somehow command growth and productivity has confused national politicians who do not want to promote nationally unpopular decisions.
So I suggested to Mr. Barroso, as a first step, to get rid of the Lisbon agenda.
This is the only thing to do to make clear that national responsibilities remain in the hands of national politicians on economic performance.
This leads me to the macro-economic coordination at the EU level.
The Maastricht Treaty was considering a simplified policy framework for the economic and monetary union.
Monetary policy was centralized and entrusted to an independent central bank, while tax policy remains the responsibility of the member states.
National governments were subject to a dual constraint, according to the excessive deficit control procedure aimed at preventing fiscal deficits of more than 3% of GDP and budget deficits of more than 60% of GDP (or at least in the neighborhood of this figure).
Subsequently, the stability and growth pact added an additional criterion, in the medium term, so that national budgets are "almost balanced".
It was, essentially, to prevent reckless fiscal policies after the launch of the euro, while leaving enough space for cyclical swings of deficits less than 3%.
The credibility of this package of measures was badly damaged by the public controversy in November 2003 between the Commission and the Ecofin Council on the application of the procedure for control of excessive budget deficits in France and Germany.
What does not mean that it must be abandoned.
Instead, a common external constraints on the behavior of stimulus is necessary to safeguard together against a build-up of public debt not viable, which could affect financial stability and inflation across the European Union - an increased risk by the impact of aging populations on pension systems.
Such a constraint also offers an anchor for the national decision-making in the States members whose political systems are less strengthened.
But the system must be reviewed.
I will not listen to those who defend the exclusion of investments in fiscal deficits: it would only offer a new incentive for creative accounting and an accumulation of unsustainable debts.
Instead, we must focus on sustainable debt levels rather than on annual deficits.
The debt criterion, for example, could be accompanied by a limitation on (the trend toward) the increasing rate of public spending, which would be held below the rate of nominal GDP.
The power of the Commission to start the movement when there is risk of excessive deficits should be strengthened - until, of course, the Commission never forget that the monitoring of national policies is a task that requires a political sense and not can be left in the hands of managers and lawyers.
Finally, we must make European integration the main priority so that the Union has at its disposal a powerful legal instrument to force open markets and increase competition.
The best therapy for boosting growth must be both direct, by increasing competitive pressure, and indirect, by triggering the need for flexible policies on employment, social welfare, and education.
This is a long-term job.
State subsidies benefiting companies in a slowdown remain ambiguous, and common laws designed to ensure the free movement of goods and services are not fully respected by the member states; public markets and energy are the best examples.
In addition, most of the service markets – trade securities, the distribution of wholesale and retail, services to businesses and local public services - remain protected from competition and regulation of free trade.
The evidence is there to show that these distortions of the services market, which represents two-thirds of GDP are responsible for most of the lack of productivity that affects the EU compared to the United states
In recent years, the Council of Europe has not been paying enough attention to these tasks, which imply a total and never-ending commitment from the Member States to transpose and implement EU directives.
Too often, the commission has favored the introduction of new legislation and the creation of new spending programmes to the management of what is already in place.
So, Mr Barroso should forget the platitudes of the Lisbon resolutions and concentrate instead on the implementation of the single market and put in the fiscal policies of states members.
We must allow local governments to take responsibility for the economic performance of their country.
Emotional culture shock
Throughout the so-called "war against terrorism", the notion of "clash of civilisations" between Islam and the West has often been excluded as politically incorrect and intellectually obtuse.
The most common interpretation in place is that the world has entered a new era of a conflict "inside" of a civilization, namely Islam, with the Muslim fundamentalists in war against the moderates as much as against the West.
The strategic conclusion derived from such analysis was clear, ambitious and easily summed up: democratization.
If the lack of democracy in the Islamic world were the problem, bringing democracy to the "wider" Middle East would be the solution, and it was the historic duty of the USA, as the most powerful and moral nation, to make this necessary change.
The status quo was untenable.
Getting democracy in place, with or without regime change, was the only alternative to chaos and the rise of fundamentalism.
Today Iraq is perhaps at the edge of a civil war between Sunnis and Shia.
Iran, governed by a new and more radical president, is moving ineluctably toward developing nuclear weapons.
A free electoral process brought Hamas to power in Palestine, and the unfortunate episode of the Danish newspaper cartoons illustrated the almost combustible nature of relations between Islam and the West.
All these developments pave the way for new interpretations.
Rather than a "clash of civilizations," we could be faced with many levels of conflict, which interact in ways that increase global instability.
Indeed, it appears that the world is witnessing a triple conflict.
There is a schism within Islam, which, if the violence in Iraq spreads to neighboring countries, could cause regional destabilization.
There is also a clash that should not be regarded as between Islam and the West, but between the secular and growing religious worlds.
At a deeper and atavistic level, there is an emotional conflict between a culture of fear and a culture of humiliation.
It would be a gross simplification to evoke, as some do, a clash between civilization and barbarity.
In reality, we are facing a gap that is broadening the role of religion, which stretches between the West (with the role of the U.S. being a complicated exception) and most the rest of the world (the most notable exception being China), particularly the Islamic world.
This gap reflects how religion defines an individual's identity within a society.
At a time when religion is becoming increasingly important elsewhere, we, Europeans, have largely forgotten our religious past (violent and intolerant), and have difficulty understanding the role that religion can play in the daily lives of others.
In certain aspects, "they" are our own past life and, in a combination of ignorance, prejudice and above all else, fear, "we" are afraid that "they" can define our future.
We live in a secular world, where freedom of expression can easily turn into insensitive and irresponsible mockery, while others see religion as their ultimate purpose, if not their last hope.
They have tried everything, from nationalism to regionalism, communism to capitalism.
Since all has failed, why not try God?
Globalisation may not have created these levels of conflict, but it has increased these differences by making them more visible and palpable.
In our globalized era, we have lost the privilege, and paradoxically, the virtue of ignorance.
We all see how others perceive and react, but without the historical and cultural basic tools needed to decipher these responses.
Globalisation has created a world dominated by the dictatorship of emotions and ignorance.
The emotional shock is exacerbated in the case of Islam.
In the Arab world, in particular, Islam is dominated by a culture of the humiliation suffered by the peoples and nations who regard themselves as the main losers, the worst victims of an international system new and unfair.
From this viewpoint, the Israeli-Palestinian conflict is exemplary.
It has become an obsession.
It's not that the Arabs and the Muslims are really concerned about the Palestinians.
Instead, the Islamic world has left the Palestinian without real support for decades.
In reality, for them the conflict has come to symbolize the anachronistic perpetuation of an unjust colonial order, to represent their political unrest, and to embody the impossibility they see of ever becoming masters of their fate.
In the eyes of the Arabs (and some other Muslims), the strength and resilience of Israel is a direct consequence of their own weakness, their divisions and their corruption.
The majority of Arabs may not support al-Qaida, but they are also not opposed to it with all their hearts.
In is place, the temptation is to treat Osama bin Laden as a kind of violent Robin Hood, whose acts, officially unforgivable, have helped to restore a sense of pride and dignity of the Arabs.
That's where, perhaps, the true clash of civilizations is: in the emotional conflict between the European culture of fear and the Muslim, and particularly Arab, culture of humiliation.
It would be dangerous to underestimate the depth of such a wide emotional pit, and acknowledging its existence is the first step to overcome it.
But it will be difficult, because to transcend the emotional clash of civilisations requires an opening to the "other" that none of the two sides is perhaps ready to consider.
Globalization and anti-Americanism.
Anti-American feelings are developing everywhere in the world.
American Democrats argue that the policies of President Bush have damaged the attractiveness of America.
Republicans respond that America is doomed to be unloved because of its size and its association with globalisation.
According to them, anti-Americanism will persist because some view America as a threat for culture.
Personally, I think that these positions are lacking historical perspective.
Unlike the conventional wisdom, globalisation is not a factor in the homogenization and Americanization of world cultures.
Although the United States is on the front lines of the current information revolution, which makes it possible to develop similarities in cultural and social behaviours (such as watching TV or using the Internet) which are attributed to Americanization, even if correlation is not causality.
To understand why, imagine a country that introduced computers and speedy communications in a world where America did not exist.
One would expect important social and cultural changes as a result of such modernisation.
Of course, because of the existence of the United States and its presence at the forefront of the information revolution, there is a degree of Americanization, which is likely to diminish in the twenty-first century, thanks to the spread of technology and modernization of local cultures.
The historical evidence that globalization is not necessarily uniformity is in Japan, which has deliberately isolated from the world during the first wave of globalisation.
In the middle of the nineteenth century, Japan became the first Asian country to welcome globalisation and to engage with success with the world without losing its uniqueness.
During the Meiji Restoration, Japan searched broadly for tools and innovations that would allow it to become a strong leader rather than a victim of Western imperialism.
He sent his children to study in Western societies.
Its delegations went around the world in search of scientific, technological and industrial innovations.
In the political field, the reformers Meiji were very aware of the philosophy and American institutions, but they chose to turn to the German model that they found more appropriate to a country ruled by an emperor.
The lesson Japan gives the rest of the world does not depend on just the fact that an Asian country can be competitive, but that after a century and a half of globalisation, it remains possible to adapt while preserving a unique culture.
Above all, the image of an America as a factor homogenisation reflects an incorrect static vision of cultures.
Efforts to show local cultures as immutable often reflect reactionary political strategies rather than a description of reality.
As Peruvian author Mario Vargas Llosa said, those who defend cultural identities against globalization betray a restrictive attitude towards culture as seen outside of any historical dimension.
Do we know of a culture that has remained unchanged throughout time?
To find these cultures, one must seek out small, primitive communities, magical-religious, populated by people who ... due to the their primitive condition, are increasingly vulnerable to exploitation and extermination.
Fertile cultures are in constant transition, borrowing from other cultures without these borrowings always being made by the United States.
Thus, a large number of countries have turned to Canada, rather than the US as an example for their own constitution in the years following the end of the Cold War.
Globalization is also a double-edged sword.
In some areas, not only is the backlash felt against American cultural imports, but some efforts are being made to change American culture itself.
A majority of Americans are probably in agreement with the death penalty nowadays, but the death penalty is seen as a blatant violation of human rights across Europe, in fact almost everywhere in the world.
The American positions on the environment and climate change or GMOs raise the same criticism.
In a more subtle way, the opening of America to immigration enriches the American culture as much as it modifies it.
Finally, globalisation and the information revolution could strengthen rather than reduce cultural diversity.
Some French commentators express fear that the world of global marketing of the Internet that would leave no room for a culture that cherishes hundreds of different types of cheese.
Instead, the internet enables dispersed consumers to gather in a way that encourages niche markets, even to the point of hundreds of websites devoted exclusively to cheese.
The Internet also allows people to establish groups of more diverse political communities.
The use of Welsh in Britain or Gaelic in Ireland is greater today than it was half a century ago.
Britain, Belgium and Spain, among other European countries have given greater powers to regions and local elected officials.
The worldwide age of information could well strengthen rather than weaken local cultures.
The economic and social globalization does produce superficial similarities in logos T-shirt or soft drink brands, but there will always be a major underlying cultural diversity.
The American culture dominates the world today, and contributes to the attractiveness of America, this is its soft power, in many areas, but not in all.
At the same time, immigrants, ideas, and events outside American borders change American culture within the borders of the United States.
While globalization develops technological capabilities, information technology allows us a wider participation in global communications, and because of this domination by the economy and by American culture could well be weakened.
Less dominance could well mean a little less anxiety about Americanization, fewer protests against American arrogance and a decreased intensity in the backlash of anti-Americanism.
The United States may have less control in the future, but could find itself living in a world more compatible with its basic principles of democracy, free enterprise, individual freedoms and human rights.
Why America must join the world
The September 11, 2001 terrorist attacks on New York and Washington changed the United States profoundly by shifting the order of its priorities on foreign policy.
The Bush administration's new national security strategy, drawn up in September 2002, identifies the combination of terrorism, rogue states, and weapons of mass destruction as the primary threat to America.
Most citizens agree with the new direction taken by American foreign policy, but are contesting the method used.
Is the threat is so great that America should act alone or should the United States have to act only with the support of international institutions, even if it hinders them?
The events in Iraq illustrate this debate, but the latter takes its inspiration from something deeper.
During his presidential campaign in 2000, George W. Bush said of America: "If we are an arrogant nation, that's how they will see us, but if we are a humble nation, they will respect us."
He was right, but unfortunately too many friends in America have seen his administration during the first eight months after his election, concerned with limited interests of America, focused on military power and disregarding the treaties, standards and multilateralism.
The peremptory announcement by the administration declaring that the Kyoto Protocol on global climate change was "dead" has led to a reaction from other countries which has cost the United States their headquarters to the Commission on Human Rights.
September the 11th allegedly has changed all that.
Congress has finally paid off the debts owed by America to the UN, and the president has concentrated his efforts on the formation of a coalition against terrorism.
But the rapid success of the war in Afghanistan has led some members of the administration and some commentators to conclude that unilateralism works. Journalist Charles Krauthammer, for example, advocates a "new unilateralism" in which America refuses to play the role of "good international citizen" and pursues its own objectives without any qualms.
The new unilateralists make a mistake by focusing too heavily on military power alone.
It is true that America's military power, supported by a budget that equals those of the eight most powerful countries after the United States combined, is essential to global stability and plays a major role in the response to terrorism.
But the metaphor of war should not blind us to the fact that getting rid of terrorism will take years of patient, unspectacular civil cooperation with other countries in areas such as the sharing of information, police work, the traceability of financial flows and cooperation between customs authorities.
The military success in Afghanistan has resolved the most simple part of the problem.
Al Qaeda maintains cells in about 15 countries.
Rather than proving the point of view of the unilateralists, the partial success in Afghanistan illustrates the continued need for cooperation.
In the same way, it was much easier to win the war in Iraq that to win the peace.
The problem for the Americans of the 21st Century is that a greater number of problems and forces than ever are beyond the control of the even the most powerful government. The attacks of September 11th demonstrated that revolution and globalization of information have changed world policy in such a way that the Americans cannot attain all their international objectives acting alone.
The United States lacks the necessary international and national preconditions adopted by other societies which are necessary to resolve conflicts and to monitor and control the cross-border transactions that threaten the Americans even in their own country.
In several of the current major problems, such as the global financial stability, drug smuggling, the spread of diseases or climate change, military power is ineffective.
Indeed, his appeal may prove counterproductive.
America must instead use international coalitions to deal with these threats and these common challenges.
The spirit of cooperation from other countries depends in part on their own personal interest, but also the attractiveness of the American positions.
This attractiveness is what I call "soft power."
This means that that other countries want what you want and need to use sticks and carrots to get others to do what you want is less present.
A strong power derives from the military and economic strength of a country.
Flexible power is the product of the attraction represented by the culture, the ideals and the policies of a country.
Hard power will always be essential, but soft power will become increasingly important in the treatment of transnational issues whose resolution requires multilateral cooperation.
It is certain that no major country can afford to be strictly multilateralist, and the US must sometimes take the lead, as was the case in Afghanistan.
But in Iraq, President Bush should have followed the example of his father and represented a broad international coalition.
Now, while his administration returns to the UN to seek a new resolution that will allow other countries to provide troops and resources to maintain peace and reconstruction in Iraq, he pays the price of his method of entry into war.
Yes, multi-lateralism can be used by smaller states to restrict America's freedom of action, but that doesn't mean that it would not, as a general rule, be in America's best interest.
By integrating US policies into multilateral structures, the US can make its disproportionate power more legitimate and more acceptable.
Even well-intentioned Americans are not immune from Lord Acton's famous dictum, which said that power tends to corrupt.
Learn to listen to others and to define the American interests more broadly to include the global interests will be crucial to the American soft power, and the vision that will have the rest of their dominant position (something healthy or not).
The paradox of American power is that the most major power since Rome cannot attain a large number of its objectives unilaterally in the era of worldwide access to information.
America must pay more attention to a flexible power and to a multilateral cooperation.
Such is the real lesson of September 11th.
Socialism or worldly separation?
For the first time in our history, we have the knowledge, technology and wealth needed to conceive a different world.
We have the means to "send poverty in the dustbin of history" (Make Poverty History).
Although we have the power to change the world, we do not take appropriate action.
In 2000, many governments around the world have adopted the Millennium Development Goals under the auspices of the UN aimed at halving poverty by 2015.
The international community does not, however, show the necessary  political will to respond to these basic responsibility towards humanity, leading to a loss of confidence in politics by the people.
If we do not act, our people will lose hope in the power of democracy and wallow in extremism, fundamentalism and violence.
In order to restore the confidence of people not only in policy but also in their own potential, our policies must ensure a responsible government and institutions operating responsibly in the interest of citizens.
The Socialist International, the largest political organization in the world, can, in that way, join the citizens of the world around a new world programme designed to achieve these goals.
Our first challenge will be the democratization of globalization.
We must redefine globalization from the ground up and include the two thirds of humanity that are currently excluded from the process, in terms that reflect the socialist principles of inclusion, of cultural diversity, and of sustainable development.
How can we engage citizens in a democratic economic development when the IMF and World Bank work on the principle of "one dollar, one vote?
Democracy cannot thrive in a world where capital and power are heavily concentrated in the hands of only a few, where the multinationals question the power of democratically elected representatives, where organized crime can afford to buy police, justice and politicians, where monopolization of the media is eroding fundamental freedoms.
The democratization of globalization will take time.
However, we can speed the process by strengthening regional cooperation and integration.
It calls for the creation of new channels of cooperation with progressive forces in other parts of the world, in China, the USA, India and the Arab world.
To respond to global problems, we must strengthen and democratize our international institutions, notably the United Nations.
However, we must go beyond the reform of the Security Council and begin to create a global democratic architecture for globalisation to serve the people and not the markets.
Today, the main priority of the Socialists is to restore the balance between economic productivity and social justice.
While we have benefited from previous successes, notably the Nordic model, it remains difficult to achieve this balance in some countries.
The capitalist markets caving to large commercial networks and the market economies turning into companies, governments and the unions are still more restricted in their freedom of action.
It has paralysed and divided our fellow citizens.
Citizens of developed countries are feeling increasingly objectified by consumerism, while citizens of developing countries are struggling daily to survive.
In both cases, but in different ways, people feel poorer.
Surely we belong to different societies, but we must also deal with new forms of inequality.
The lack of labor standards in some parts of the world undermines the social welfare of workers from other parts of the world.
The migration the poor countries' masses has fueled feelings of fear and xenophobia in rich countries, particularly among the working class.
Similarly, free trade has sent back to back the farmers and employees of the service sector of the developed and developing countries.
Environmental issues have become one big blame game.
The developed countries fear the despoiling of vital resources if they are shared with developing countries, which in turn accuse rich countries to destroy the environment in their quest for profit.
To fill these divisions, we need to rethink the nature of jobs in this world economy ever more automated, decompartmentalised and mobile.
When capital is globalised, core Labour standards must also be globalised.
The forced and child labor, as well as discrimination in hiring, must be removed.
We must equally democratize our own policies.
We must fight against exclusion in our political parties as we are fighting exclusion in our societies.
This means welcoming immigrants and minorities, creating greater opportunities for women and the disabled, and empowering the people through education and participation.
Empowering the people means giving them the power to decide and the ability to decide with full knowledge of the situation.
At the Greek socialist party PASOK, which I lead, we have undertaken far-reaching reforms in this direction.
It is similar within the Socialist International, which seeks to create a world governed not by free markets, but by free people.
The Chinese hare and Indian tortoise.
"India is everywhere" was the theme of the World Economic Forum this year.
In the western world, a great importance is attached to the achievements of China, so that those of India will come to mind only afterwards.
To emphatically underline the fact that political stability must triumph in the long run, Indians have covered all the Swiss buses with the banner "India, the fastest emerging democracy in the world."
The Indian media's intensive campaign was a huge success.
In Davos, speaker after speaker promoted the idea that even if China is ahead now, over the long term, the race between the two Asian giants will play heads-or-tails.
At least for a few days, the emergence of India as a superpower, compared to China, was an accomplished fact.
But what is really going on in the race between the two economies that each relate to over a billion people?
Apparently, China has a comfortable lead over India.
Twenty-five years ago, at the dawn of the current globalisation movement, national production in India and China were roughly the same.
From this point on, whatever the economic indicators, China is twice as rich as India.
But the real difference is not so much that the best Chinese perform better than the best Indians.
The Indian elite is made up of hard-chargers. The bold offer of $22 billion made by Lakshmi Mittal to buy the French steelmaker Arcelor demonstrates this.
The real difference -- whether we admit it or not -- is the fact that the Chinese Communist government has managed to globalize a larger portion of the population that the democratic government of India has been able to.
However, it is impossible to say that wealth is evenly distributed in China.
It is only along the coast, where roughly a third of the Chinese population lives, that people seem to really have entered into the 21st century.
Much of rural China remains very poor and 150 million rural Chinese do not have jobs. In the countryside, health and education are often reminiscent of the past centuries.
Nevertheless, the figures relating to exclusion due to the caste system are even worse in India.
It may be that only one in five profits from the globalised economy.
For every employee in the call centers, there are countless Indians who are barely getting by.
While some 450 million Chinese are participating in the global economy, only 200 to 250 million Indians benefit.
More than anything else, this is the difference that separates the two economies.
What can India do to fill this gap?
Its biggest flaw is the lack of roads, bridges, ports and other infrastructure. On this level, the contrast with China is striking.
If Indian products cannot find access to the global market, how could India capture it?
Over the past five years, China has multiplied its road infrastructure by five.
Its 50,000 km of new roads were built to accommodate larger aircraft, which were incompatible with some airstrips in Indian airports.
This is not just a matter of money: cash flows to the Indian central bank that has mainly invested it in foreign treasury bonds with low yields.
The real problem is that the Chinese authoritarian system has no real opposition when it decides to level a shantytown in the way of a new airport.
The Indian government, however, has neither the power nor the desire to trample over poor people to make the rich richer.
Unfortunately, without infrastructure, the 800 million Indians who have not yet succeeded in life have little chance of doing so.
India will never be able to create enough jobs in the services sector alone, it must be able to become competitive in the manufacturing of low priced products.
Without a better network infrastructure, the majority of Indians will remain outside of globalisation.
Could the Indian economy in this way succeed one day in outstripping the incurable romanticism of the Chinese?
Not necessarily. The areas in which India excels, services essentially, offer potentially higher margins than industrial production.
On this point, the Chinese, crippled by a largely inferior legal system, will struggle to compete.
Western companies have more confidence in Indian companies in terms of sensitive financial data or patents, than they have in China.
Foreign companies know that if they outsource their high technology projects to China, they might just as well publish their proprietary technical information directly on the Web!
India also has a much more developed financial system than China, an asset of increasing importance as these two economies evolve.
The command and control of finances (directed loans, as they are called by economists) are effective when it comes to building bridges. They are not as effective when it comes to choosing which companies deserve to be saved.
The challenge for the Indians and for other emerging economies (Brazil, Russia and Mexico) is to find new ways to develop their economic sectors that are doing well without choking them off.
If India managed to catch up with China, it should include a greater number of its citizens in gobalization by offering them better education, more efficient health care facilities and greater network infrastructure.
It is only at this price that "India will be everywhere."
The G8 in the black gold country
Poor Russia, though rich in oil.
It is deploying so much of its efforts to finding its place in the bosom of the elite Group of Eight countries which are taken seriously.
President Vladimir Putin, who may be hoping to raise the presidential debate at the summit in St Petersburg in July, has simmered an ambitious programme.
He plans to lead his colleagues in erudite conversations about education, infectious diseases and, to be sure that nobody falls asleep, "energy security."
And what have Putin's efforts gained him?
Not much.
The Bush administration, represented by Vice President Dick Cheney (but with the explicit approval of the boss) has recently accused Russia of backsliding into old habits of the "empire of evil."
Putin hit back by qualifying the United States as "Comrade Wolf", ready to ponce on any nation that shows signs of weakness.
How will Bush and Putin welcome each other at the meeting in St. Petersburg? The suspense remains.
The European, are still on the brink of nerves, so great is their fear of becoming once again caught the gas argument between Russia and Ukraine, which has drained their pipelines for several days earlier this year.
For them, talking about "energy security" with Russia devolves into chatter about water safety with comrade crocodile.
Obviously, if we want to be mean one can always point to the absurdity of Russia's membership in a club that includes the giant economies of the United States, Germany, Japan, Britain, France, Italy and (to a lesser extent) Canada.
Why was the Chinese President Hu Jintao, whose country has the second largest economy (measured according to global prices), not given the Putin's place at the table?
After all, even with all its energy resources, and despite the current surge in gas and oil prices, the national product of Russia is little more than that of greater Los Angeles.
Perhaps Putin should stop submitting to all these criticisms and go on the offensive.
He could begin by pointing out to his smug democratic counterparts that he is probably more popular in Russia that any of them in their own countries.
In fact, it could probably honestly win an election tomorrow ( that said, no way shall he ever know this).
There are few leaders who could say as much without laughing.
Of course, Putin's success in recent years in eliminating anything more or less approaching a free press (and when a former KGB man "eliminates" the Free Press, it is not a figure of speech) has contributed to silence any open opposition.
That does not, however, prevent Putin from enjoying a great deal of popularity among a public which demands a leader able to trim the sails of the ship of state without sinking it.
Putin may also argue that the fiscal position of his country is far more solid than that of the other G8 members.
Certainly, the fact that Siberia has proved to be a giant oil well most of whose income is absorbed by the government has been very helpful.
Venezuelan President Hugo Chavez is also balancing the books of his country, for now.
But to be honest, oil is not everything.
Most economists recommend the rich countries to replace their old, complicated fiscal codes by a simple and low tax, to a flat rate, and deplore the fact that so few countries have tried.
Putin has put in place this style of politics a few years ago, and the results were nothing short of miraculous.
Of course, it is possible that the other G8 leaders are less excited about some Russian practices in the field of solving fiscal problems.
Most of the countries of the G8 seem incapable of achieving the political consensus needed to take the necessary measures, such as increasing the retirement age or the significant reduction of indexing benefits on inflation.
Russia herself has virtually abandoned her pensioners after having increased the amount of their income.
In fact, many elderly Russians are forced to ensure their survival by growing potatoes on the tiny plots of land that the government allows them to cultivate.
It is, if they survive: since the fall of the Berlin Wall, male life expectancy fell from 65 years to about 60 years.
It seems that the stress from the transition is the leading cause of death, even before the big killers in post-Communist Russia such as alcohol, crime, and AIDS.
Should Putin say to his colleagues that they too could balance the intergenerational accounts of their countries by starving out the oldest of their people?
In fact, Putin would probably be well advised not to insist on the achievements of his country.
Perhaps it is better to let the vodka flow and hope for smiles in the family photo.
Nevertheless, when Putin announces to his guests that they have to pay for Russia in order to increase their own "energy security," he will perhaps finally get the respect that he so longs for.
The economy of fear.
The world economy seems to walk on water, brushing aside to shrug its shoulders of rising oil prices, the political paralysis in Europe, the unsustainable deficit of the United States, and record prices of real estate.
Could it be because, as the G8 leaders would have us believe, investors are optimistic, confident in the direction their leaders are giving to the global economy?
Or are we governed by a disease of fear, fed by certain events, such as the recent terrorist attacks in London, which maintains the long-term interest rates low, masking a whole set of latent problems ?
The role of the extremely low (after adjusting for inflation) long-term interest rates, which hide a multitude of weaknesses in the world economy, is all too apparent.
The rise in property prices across the world is sustaining the demand in many countries, and, according to a recent study of the International Monetary Fund, continually falling interest rates explain two-thirds or more of the international rise in prices.
Europe has less benefit, but its savings would have a worse if long-term interest rates were back to their average of 25 years ago.
Similarly, Latin America is experiencing a boom in recent years, despite the burden of debt and a mixed political reform.
The weak long-term interest rates have allowed the region to manage its debt, while demand has helped drive up the price of its commodity exports.
Why did the surge in oil prices not bring the global economy on its knees, as was so often the case in the past?
Once again, the answer lies in low interest rates.
Usually, a sudden surge in oil prices translates soon as expectations of high inflation, followed by the rise in interest rates for all the dates.
But this time, the Federal Reserve continues to push up its short-term lending rates to control inflation, and the long-term interest rates, which are far more important, have declined as if by magic.
Indeed, America is the single biggest beneficiary of this cycle of low interest rates, where everyone borrows money as if soon there would be none.
Property owners, supported by rising housing prices, accumulate debts.
The federal government has thrown all fiscal prudence out the window.
The country as a whole absorbs an incredible three-quarters of world savings.
But, as long as interest rates remain low and growth stays high, the Americans can laugh in the faces of those who predict that their excesses are planting the seeds of their downfall.
But if weak long-term interest rates help so many economies walk on water, why are the rates so low and will this situation continue?
The situation is perhaps more fragile than many politicians would have us believe.
People perhaps feel less, not more secure, about their long-term future, either because they fear terrorism, a global pandemic or a set of severe financial crises.
I do not say that investors are hysterical, but simply that they have become a little more concerned about the long-term prospects.
Therefore, they rush on stocks and mortgage securities that they perceive, rightly or wrongly, as safe.
We have no other convincing explanation.
It is certain that emerging markets have a unusual savings , reforming their reserves and improving their balance the budget, but nobody expects that to continue indefinitely.
Even the director of the US Federal Reserve, Alan Greenspan, the Oracle of Delphi on interest rates, says about the current situation that it is a "mystery".
History suggests that the technology boom has not completely finished playing its role, and with U.S. productivity gains likely to radiate the world, raising growth rates everywhere.
Usually, a rapid global growth is reflected in interest rates to rise for the long term, unless, of course deep down, people have become concerned.
Let's suppose that investors are mindful of the possibilities of disaster in five to ten years.
(According to experts on nuclear terrorism and pandemics, the risk is real.)
Suppose that investors believe that growth will probably remain strong, but maybe -- just maybe -- the situation will disintegrate.
In this case, it "SetPoints" quite possible for low interest rates to coexist with strong growth.
It is true that some economists refer to the halcyon days of the 1950s and early 1960s, when Europe, the United States and Japan, prospered, but interest rates generally remained well below the rate of economic growth.
This period representing the golden age of global growth, why worry if we are experiencing the same phenomenon today?
What optimists forget is that these paradise-like years represent equally a period of great insecurity.
Many were those who feared the outbreak of World War III, and rightly so, according to many historians.
In that time, the specter of the Apocalypse helped keep the loans at an affordable rate.
Fortunately, the worst fears of investors have not come to pass, and we can only hope for the same thing today.
But if uncertainty is one of the main reasons that interest rates are low, then the G8 leaders should be less quick to congratulate themselves.
The fragility of collective psychology of investors is well known.
If they do one day calm down, interest rates will rise again and this could lead to ferment the latent imbalances in the world economy.
Political earthquake in Israel.
The political world of Israel is going through the most impressive changes it has seen in 30 years.
The realignment of parties and leaders is particularly worthy, given the unexpected nature of recent events: Ariel Sharon's decision to leave the Likud, the defeat of Shimon Peres as head of the Labour Party and the withdrawal of Labour members of the grand coalition government of Sharon.
It is even more important to understand the significance of these changes for the future of Israel, of the region, and of the Arab-Israeli conflict.
Basically, the Israeli political system is approaching the end of its second era.
From independence in 1948 until 1977, the Labour Party dominated until giving way to an opposition coalition of conservative, nationalist, and centrist parties allied in to the Likud bloc.
Since that time, the two parties have succeeded in power in turn, sometimes in the framework of large coalitions and sometimes in partnership with smaller parties.
On the surface, the rivalry between the parties played between "left" and "right," or "hawks" and "doves."
The truth, of course, is more complex.
Social class and economic problems, in the shadow of more persistent existential anxiety, such as physical security and sustainability of the state, have played a far lesser role in Israel than in other societies.
Here, the political divide could be defined as the clash of "optimists" and "pessimists."
The first, Labour, believed that one day a force would take root among Arabs and Palestinians ready to make peace on reasonable grounds, while the latter, Likud, were more circumspect.
For some years, the discussion was abstract, a debate on what could happen in the future, until the Oslo accords with the PLO in 1993 put the opposing views to the test.
Since 2000, when the PLO leader Yasser Arafat rejected a political agreement and in its place launched a five-year terrorist war, few optimists remain.
The intellectual realignment that resulted in Israel gave birth to a new national consensus.
It is now widely accepted that, as has always stressed the left, Israel must be prepared to withdraw from West Bank and Gaza and accept the existence of a Palestinian state in exchange for real peace.
But it is also widely accepted that, as the right has always said, none of the partners is really ready to make peace.
In this context, Sharon has won two landslide election victories as a radical applying a moderate policy, including a total withdrawal of the Gaza Strip.
That is where Israel is today, facing a political upheaval fueled by two new elements.
First, Sharon has moved the Likud to the centre, and has made the hegemonic party, while destroying all the stereotypes on his personality, its methods and his vision of the world.
It is for the same reason that many members of the Likud party see Sharon, who helped found the party, as a traitor.
Sharon must now institutionalize his reforms, even if he needs another party to do it.
Secondly, the Labour Party has proved its bankruptcy, since its only viable leader was Shimon Peres, aged 82 years, and that his anachronistic optimism for the dove has become ridiculous.
Accordingly, and due to low turnout in the elections, party primaries were won by Amir Peretz, an outsider and a populist who wants to revive the Labour Party in highlighting the social and economic problems, which means the withdrawal of the national unity coalition with Likud.
Although he will have to form a new party, Sharon will win the next election, which he has scheduled for February.
Peretz's strategy may attract voters from other left-wing parties, but Labour will surely lose centrist voters (and those for which the national security is a priority) to Sharon.
Paradoxically, it will have a huge impact in principle, yet perhaps very modest in practice.
While Sharon has strong public support for moderate policies, Israel will be more ready than ever to reach an agreement with the Palestinians, Syria, and the Arab world in general to find a diplomatic solution to global conflict.
However, given the chaos and the paralysis that increasingly characterise Palestinian politics, this opportunity will not be seized.
The growing power of Hamas, who speak openly of their strategy to increase acts of terrorism and destroy Israel, only strengthens this trend.
You can say the same of Syria, whose radical government is turning to a dangerously risky militarism.
Sharon could decide the partial withdrawal and the dismentling of West Bank settlements.
But it is today widely acknowledged that such changes are a reaction to bleak prospects for real progress toward peace.
Hanging on to land to the challenges of a bargaining has much less sense if there is no one with whom to bargain.
Israel will, rather, continue to give priority to its own security, strengthening its defenses against terrorism and consolidating its control over the relatively small portions of the West Bank that it intends to reclaim as part of a possible diplomatic accord.
As a secondary consequence of this strategy, coupled with Palestinian attacks, international sympathy has only grown towards Israel.
This phenomenon could persist if the current political realignment lasts, enabling Sharon to advance his centrist or even centre-left programme.
Nothing is assured, of course.
Benjamin Netanyahu, who remains popular, may well become a powerful rival to his right, and Peretz may well make the Labour Party a strong contender to his left.
Nevertheless, the national consensus has changed, shaking all assumptions about Israeli politics.
The February elections will put these certitudes to their toughest test in decades.
K dohodě O změnách světového klimatu pomohla věda  -Phrase Tchèque , non Française-
Ensure the future of the Evian Summit.
The paradox of our time is that the world's richest countries have the power to do good, but they seem to feel obliged to miss all the opportunities in this direction.
The United States is a typical example par excellence: a country that spends $450 billion per year on its defence budget and spends only $12 billion per year on development aid to poor countries.
They can bomb Somalia, Afghanistan, and Iraq, but they seem ill-equipped to help these areas develop.
Europe does not lie in a better position, as she is paralyzed by internal divisions and budget deficits.
At the G8 summit next week at Evian, France will have a chance to start anew.
For the billion people represented at the G8 summit, life is proceeding relatively well compared to that of the rest of the planet, with average incomes of $25,000 per person and a life expectancy of around 80 years.
For about three billion people in the world at present, including China, most of India and the East Asia, economic development continues relatively well, even if it has many ups and downs (most recently, the shock of the Severe Acute Respiratory Syndrome epidemic).
Economic trends are also emerging in Brazil and Mexico.
But for the remaining two billion, life is hopeless.
For around a billion of them, their survival is precarious.
Millions of people die each year from lacking access to medicines, food, clean drinking water and basic hygiene.
Their life expectancy is often less than 50 years and fall in many areas.
The G-8 could end the suffering of billions of the world's most impoverished people if it took realistic steps to solve their problems.
He doesn't do it, because he is not just greedy but also fearful.
He believes that world poverty is inevitable and too expensive to eradicate.
But it can solve the problems of the poorest individuals with comparatively less effort and without significant negative impact on its own standard of living.
The most important problem areas concentrated in sub-Saharan Africa, in the Andean region and Central Asia.
Other pockets of extreme poverty in China and India are on the way of improving thanks to rapid economic growth of these two giants.
But the problems in sub-Saharan Africa, in the Andes and Central Asia do not solved by themselves.
These regions are trapped in poverty.
Africa is by far the most affected.
The U.S. government believes that these countries can only blame themselves for their poverty.
But it is about the ignoring arrogance of a rich country that does not understand the situation in the field.
Africa is trapped in poverty for deeply rooted reasons .
It suffers from endemic malaria, which resembles an epidemic of severe acute respiratory syndrome that would last for centuries, not for a few months.
It suffers from a climate prone to massive drought and the soil nutrients have been exhausted.
It suffers from the fact that most of its population lives in rural areas, without paved roads to reach the ports and to facilitate access to international trade.
Apart from a West African countries, it is suffering from a serious shortage of energy (coal, oil and hydroelectric power).
The United States have never been grappling with problems of the scale of those occurring in Africa.
Ultimate irony, these problems can be solved, whatever the cost.
This is where the G8 should intervene.
The only commitment that must take the G8 leaders at Evian is to follow their previous promises that have not been kept for years.
Over the past three years, world leaders have promised to take concrete measures to reduce global poverty by half by the year 2015, in a series of commitments known as the Millennium Development Goals.
But only small measurements were taken.
The United States have increased aid to $4 billion per year while they have increased military spending to $150 billion a year and cut trillions of dollars in taxes.
It is clear that America has the means to do more on a very large scale to help poor countries around the world, if only they would plan for it.
The G8 leaders should commit specifically to provide financial support to the Global Fund to Fight AIDS, tuberculosis and malaria, to increase food productivity in Africa through a new green revolution, to ensure that all poor children can go to school and that all poor peoples of all countries have access to safe drinking water and sanitation.
The total cost of this problem would be markedly less than 1% of the annual income of rich countries.
For the first time in history, the rich are so rich and the poor so poor that the rich could put an end to enormous suffering with little effort.
The summit in Evian would clarify the situation and whether the greed, ignorance and grandiloquence of war have completely shut the eyes of the USA and if Europe and Japan will look within rather than outside.
Good reasons to slow population growth.
The global talks on demographic policies are disturbing.
On one side, people claim that the growth of human populations threatens our environment and our prosperity.
Earth, water, energy and biodiversity all appear suffer from more stresses than ever, and population growth appears to be largely responsible.
On the other hand, the debate, mainly in rich countries, on households and their small numbers of children, insufficient to take care of their aging parents.
Those who worry about population growth have the best arguments.
The questions which Europe, Japan and to a lesser extent the United States, along with some middle income countries, must face in terms of an aging population are manageable.
Moreover, the benefits of slower population growth outweigh the costs.
On the contrary, if the world populations continue to grow rapidly, the pressure on global resources will become more acute.
Governments should therefore refrain from putting in place pro-natalists policies, even where birth rates are low.
The confusion of the public debate partly reflects various demographic trends in different parts of the world.
The most rapid population growth occurs in the poorest regions.
Poor people, particularly the agricultural populations, tend to have a greater number of children (often up to six per woman) and thus have the highest population growth rates.
Poor farm families rely on the children for the farm chores and the care of parents when they get old.
Poor families lack access to contraception and family planning.
Finally, poor families have many children as to insure themselves against high infant mortality.
Because the birth rate is very high in Africa, the United Nations Population Division predicts the doubling of the African population by 2050, increasing from 900 million today to 1.8 billion.
Populations with rapid demographic growth are also young populations because of the large number of children in homes.
In Africa, the average age today is 19 years and it is predicted that it will be around 28 years in 2050.
In Europe, the trends are reversed.
The United Nations predicts a decline in population, which will fall to around 630 million in 2050, compared to 725 million today.
With fewer children and a higher life expectancy, the population has risen sharply in these forecasts from 39 year old in 2005 to 48 year old in 2050.
For the whole world, the population is supposed to continue to grow by 2.5 billion between 2005 and 2050.
The full amount of this growth will happen in the developing world: 1.3 billion extra in Asia, 900 million more in Africa, and the rest in Latin America and in other regions.
Increasing the global population by 2.5 billion human beings will increase pressure not only on the societies where the population growth is taking place but also on the planet as a whole.
Overall energy consumption is soaring, reflecting the combined effect of increased per-capita income (and thus increasing energy consumption per-capita) and population.
The high consumption of energy is already changing dangerously our climate.
furthermore, the tensions created by the global population growth coupled with higher incomes lead to a rapid deforestation, the loss of fisheries, to soil degradation and loss of natural habitats and the extinction for a number of animal and plant species.
Population growth in developing regions, particularly in Africa, India and in other parts of Asia, must slow down.
Public policy can play an important role by improving the services of access to family planning for the poor, extending the social systems of care, reducing infant mortality, thanks to investments in public health and improving education and access to employment for women.
Part of the European public, noting the threat of declining European populations, wants to turn things around and promote the return to large families.
This would be a mistake.
The defenders of accelerated demographic growth in Europe are worried about the lack of young manpower to ensure public pensions.
But this concern can be handled by greater savings by young and middle-aged people preparing for their retirement and working beyond the age of 65.
These workers will gain greater benefits if they live in societies with stable or slightly decreasing population.
Their direct household expenditures on children's education will be less important.
They also save on infrastructure investments such as new roads, power plants, schools and other public services.
They also benefit from less congested cities and fewer environmental pressures through the campaign.
The European economies will have less cost to take over the limit on greenhouse gases due to the energy consumption, which will lead to more effective control of climate change.
In short, the quality of life will improve with the decline in the European population in coming years.
There is nothing radical here to call for the slowdown of population growth.
For tens of thousands of years, the human population has tend to increase and decrease without really showing a trend set in the long term.
It is only over the last centuries along with the rise of modern economic life that the world population soared, passing from a billion people in 1820 to 6.3 billion today and a projected 9 billion in 2050.
This explosive growth has been made possible thanks to the huge advances in science and technology.
But this unprecedented growth has also put a strain on our planet.
We should intensify our efforts to slow population growth voluntarely, and we should recognise that the stabilisation of the world population would bring a plus for human happiness and increase the sustainability of the environment for the future.
Are foreign investors still welcomed?
Global flows of foreign direct investment (FDI) have soared over the past twenty years from $40 billion in the early 1980s to $900 billion last year.
The total stock of the FDI reached nearly 10 billion dollars, making it the most efficient mechanism for delivery of goods and services to foreign markets: sales by foreign affiliates amounting to roughly 19 billion dollars, compared to world exports of 11 billion dollars.
Meanwhile, the liberalisation of the FDI in virtually every country is a major force for trade between the companies, the vital source of emerging system integrated production and international already about a third of global trade.
But is this beautiful time coming to an end?
If the FDI can provide many benefits, it also has many costs.
In the 1970s, when the transnational corporations (STN), which started such investments have been noticed, many governments believed that the costs of FDI exceeded their profits and have therefore controlled it.
The pendulum, held by developed countries, began to wave in the 1980s.
Once regarded as part of the problem, the FDI has become a solution to economic growth and development.
Nothing illustrates it better than the changes in the national systems of FDI.
As the UN Conference on Trade and Development reports, among the 2,156 changes that took place between 1991 and 2004, 93% were aimed at creating an environment more hospitable to the STN.
But the risk that the pendulum is set to swing back in the other direction is real, resulting in a decline of this process of liberalization.
The FDI in developed countries (and increasingly in emerging markets) often takes the form of cross-border mergers and acquisitions.
The resistance to such steps is becoming more frequent when they involve companies that politicians regard as a "national champions' or play a role in national security, economic development or cultural identity.
The growing involvement of private equity firms in the activities of mergers and acquisitions raises other controversies, because such transactions are typically considered purely speculative.
In the name of "economic patriotism," security and other considerations, resistance to mergers and acquisitions is being codified in an increasing number of countries.
For example, a US Senate committee recently tried to block the project for the liberalisation of the rules for foreign takeover for airlines, and Europe has set up more restrictive laws on takeover bids.
In addition, governments are applying stricter regulatory provisions concerning the regulation of takeovers by foreign companies.
This answer is linked to a defensive reaction to the growing role of STN emerging markets, the "small new ones".
The STNs already well established, and their country of origin, will have to adapt to this new constellation of strength and its implications for the global market.
Like other contexts have taught us, it is not easy to adapt for newcomers: compare, for example, the reaction to the rapprochement between French Alcatel and Lucent, an American takeover of China National Offshore Oil Corporation by Chevron or that of Mittal for Acelor.
Another type of defensive reaction, this time toward the FDI, may well arise once the outsourcing of services has picked up speed.
All indications are that the offshoring has achieved a level and that this phenomenon is to be speeded up through the FDI.
If the countries of origin don't put in place adjustment mechanisms to adapt the rapid revolution which makes service sector jobs negotiable, a political backlash against one such as FDI toward the exterior will be inevitable.
The growing unease with FDI is so far largely confined to developed countries.
Some signs indicate, however, that it extends to emerging markets.
In the case of large-scale projects, some of the host countries raise questions on contracts that define their relationship with the transnationals, and governments review such contracts because they think (rightly or wrongly) that they have not received a fair market.
Of the 219 cases of international arbitration known for investment projects, some two thirds were initiated during the past three years.
The approaches of the FDI have changed in the past, and they can still change in the future, according to how governments see the balance of costs and benefits.
This balance involves not only economic factors, but also considerations such as safety and the desire to control a country's economic development.
The concept of "twenty-first century nationalization," introduced by the Peruvian presidential candidate Ollanta Humala, reflects the "economic patriotism" of French Prime Minister Dominique de Villepin.
The reservations against the FDI (as with everything that is alien) are in all groups of countries, and when politicians are at the forefront protectionism is not far away.
It would be ironic that the developed countries, who led the wave of liberalization of FDI in the past twenty years, start an opposite movement.
Hope that the movement of dé-libéralisation which is taking place in the developed countries can be monitored before it spreads to other parts of the world and have undesirable consequences on all.
The energy culture.
From global warming to the volatile price of oil, everything indicates that a global energy crisis is about to happen.
To meet this challenge, humanity cannot afford to ignore the abundant organic materials that the sun provides each day through photosynthesis.
Solar energy allows plants to absorb carbon and so produce not just  oxygen, but also the material that the animal kingdom uses to feed itself, and that our machines can use to obtain energy.
Since the Neolithic, humans are growing this biomass to feed themselves.
In our time too, its energy potential is ignored.
From the industrial revolution, humans sought energy from coal and later oil and natural gas, which leads to depletion of resources that are not renewable.
the alternatives for diversifying energy production are limited.
Nuclear power has a number of objections, particularly in terms of security and radioactive waste.
Hydroelectric power is already widely used, and as for wind and solar energy, they are by their very nature sporadic and unevenly available.
Biomass, on the other hand, has several advantages.
It is widespread, in large quantities, around the world.
In addition, we have long mastered the technology needed to convert it into energy, including high yield burning, gasification and liquefaction into synthetic fuel.
This technology widely used during World War II, has experienced considerable progress since.
The biomass energy, however, is a victim of unfair competition from fossil fuels.
Oil prices reflect its extraction, refining, and distribution costs, but not those of the creation of raw material.
Millions of years and 200 tons of plants are required to produce a liter of petrol, while it takes 15 kilos of plant material to produce a liter of compact fuel.
When oil was flowing at less than US $20 a barrel, the interest in developing energies from biomass fell and only interested "green" militants and those interested in basic science.
But the potential is huge.
The biomass of the planet: the forests, grasslands, the savannas and crops, is a productive capital which generates a "yield" of 10% each year.
In the image of a battery that is empty and is recharged thanks to the sun, this energy is indefinitely renewable, as long as it is properly managed.
The yield on this capital is currently estimated at 60 billion tonnes, and yet only two billion tonnes are used for food and 10 billion tonnes for energy purposes.
Increasing the responsible use of this source of energy would help the fight against climate change by reducing the amount of carbon in the atmosphere and by reducing the amount of fossil fuel needed to produce energy.
In addition, its abundance in the South promises to facilitate their economic development.
Regarded as "energy of the poor" until now, biomass could become a source of wealth, provided that it is grown and used with the support of the international community.
Thus, "energy crops" could be developed to produce biofuel.
The remnants of forestry, agriculture and agro-industrielles could be collected and converted.
The six million tonnes of waste produced each year by Niger could theoretically be used to satisfy the energy needs of this country.
Growing energy would surely crate competition for food crops in many countries.
Long-term estimates predict that 50 years from now, most arable land in the world should be used to produce food and to protect forest resources.
Therefore, areas dedicated to energy production, particularly to biofuels, may not achieve the level companies would wish.
But in that such a competition reveals new global shortages, it could lead to price increases, thereby encouraging producers to increase their yields and productivity.
It's true that the energy culture would create new constraints, but it would also open new opportunities for many economic players.
Farmers and foresters could invest in the market, the interest in minor crops, the banker in plant, etc..
It is necessary to implement new policies in the north and south, in terms of agriculture, water management and the Earth, protection of biodiversity, taxation of fuel, information and public awareness, to prepare for an increase in energy crops.
The ancient Egyptians and the Incas practiced a religion of the sun, because they thought he was the source of all life on Earth.
Science has agree with them since.
Today, when it has become more important than ever to use renewable resources, we should use the sun to grow our energy, like our ancestors did for their food.
The culture of entrepreneurship
The world's governments want to encourage the creation of businesses.
Even though many start-ups will become ever more significant, every small business is an experience, and we need much to give birth to one that could transform the economy of a nation, or even just to gain international dimension.
In short, entrepreneurship is an incubator, also essential to long-term economic success.
Nowadays, to explain differences in terms of company creations between countries, we consider the divergence in attitudes and national policies.
But it must also take into account the great differences within the country.
Residents of Shanghai are said to have a more entrepreneurial point of view than those of Beijing.
The inhabitants of the Ukrainian city of Kherson are more that way than those in Kiev.
In a recent study, Mariassunta Giannetti and Andrei Simonov of the Stockholm School of Economics show differences in the prevalence of entrepreneurship among Swedish cities.
They define the entrepreneurs as people who declare resources coming from the companies they control and in which they work at least part-time, and see that the proportion of business leaders in the population differs substantially in the 289 cities they have studied, varying from 1.5% to 18.5%.
What do these differences say of the real causes for the creation of company?
The variations policies at national level can justify the variations identified by Gianetti and Simonov.
In the 1980s and early 1990s, the central agreements on the threshold of wages were dissolved and the Swedish government reduced income taxes and business taxes.
Consequently, the number of start-ups has doubled in the country, but success has been very different from one city to another.
Why?
The cultural variables seem to take up a large part: half of the variations are due to religion and municipal politics.
Cities tend to have more entrepreneurs if they have a high proportion of retired members of the Church of Sweden (the official state church until 2000) and a right-wing electorate.
In addition, there is a phenomenon of cause: the cities that have the most entrepreneurs tend to create even more.
Once a culture of business creation takes root, it spreads to the extent that people know more about it in the business world and start to feel attracted -- even if the benefits are not immediately perceptible.
Indeed, Giannetti and Simonov established that the average income of CEOs is lower in those cities where the most companies have been founded than in those which have fewer of them.
Similarly, studies from other countries show that entrepreneurs often earn less initially and saw their incomes grow more slowly than if they were employees.
These studies suggest that differences in terms of entrepreneurship may be due less to better economic opportunities (the supply side of the entrepreneurship equation) than to cultural differences that make creating business more personally rewarding (demand).
This assumption is highlighted by Giannetti and Simonov, who believe that the differences of prestige of entrepreneurs in the various cities can justify the disparities.
In some boroughs, business leaders enjoy a high social status, whether they are successful or not; elsewhere they are not considered and other activities are more admired.
The idea that prestige is important is not new.
In his book Morals and money, the sociologist Michèle Lamont compared definitions of success in France and the United States.
She asks the inhabitants of the two countries what does it mean to be "a person of value."
In fact, she consult with them on what they consider important in life and on their sense of identity.
Lamont's study confirmed the conventional wisdom that for Americans, success in business is important, while the French place greater importance on culture and quality of life.
Similarly, the opened contempt opened of "tough and greedy" businessmen and the competition is more often expressed in France than in America.
But while Lamont focuses on the differences between the French and the Americans, his most interesting research finding is that on the significant differences between various regions of France.
She compares Clermont-Ferrand, administrative center of Auvergne in central France, and Paris.
The Auvergne has a reputation for thrift and discipline and, despite recent progress, for a relative dearth of culture.
Lamont found that both Parisians and Clermontois tended to express have contempt for greed.
On the other hand, the people of Clermont admire simplicity, pragmatism, hard work, and strong will, while Parisians relate more to vigor and talent.
It concludes that, in many ways, the people of Cleremont are closer to the Hoosiers (the inhabitants of the American State of Indiana, in the Midwest) than to Parisians.
His research suggests that in Clermont-Ferrand, the intrinsic demand for business creation is higher than in Paris.
Almost all countries are amalgamations of local cultures that differ in how they motivate people and shape their identity.
The differences in the ways these cultures define a person of value, and in how this value manifests itself, probably explain a lot about the variations of creativity levels in different companies.
Economists are not alone in often considering countries in groups, and to try to determine the key factors, such as attitudes and policies, that encourage or discourage entrepreneurship.
But, in fact, national success in this area depends on the evolution of local cultures and their interaction with national policies.
Enthusiasm for entrepreneurship can take root in any culturally vibrant region of any country; once economic barriers against it are lifted, it is is a self-nourishing enterprise.
University investments
Yale University, where I teach, has been entrusting its funds portfolio to only one person, David Swensen for over 20 years ago.
During this period, this portfolio has risen from just over 1 billion to $18 billion -- an average yield of more than 16% per year, which is the highest of all the major universities.
And it shows no sign of weakness; at the last fiscal year ending in June, the yield was 22,9%.
If the presidents of Yale succeed one another, Swensen remains.
He has done more for the university than any other president, or than anyone else.
In a university, ideas are worth more than money, but $18 billion can create a favorable environment to many new ideas.
With 11 500 students, it is more than 1.5 million dollars per student (not counting the buildings of the University or its collection of art, worth several billion dollars each).
How has this been possible?
How could Swensen make so much money?
Everyone is asking that question -- including us, at Yale.
Indeed, many here teaching the "efficient markets hypothesis," which claims that the world's financial markets have become so competitive that it is impossible to obtain a return on investment above normal.
Anyone who breaks the market has just a stroke of luck.
The studies seem to confirm this phenomenon.
For example, a 2004 study by Brad Barber and Terrance Odean of the University of California and Yi-Tsung Lee and Yiu-Jane Liu of the National Chengchi University collected transaction by transaction data on individual day traders in the Taiwanese stock market.
The study revealed that only 1% of day traders reaped a profit -- after deducting transaction costs -- during both periods of six consecutive months, and that the average profit valued little for such an effort: $4,000.
It is easy to conclude that it is futile to try to beat the market.
But then we think about people like Swensen.
Can the consistency of its good results really be attributed to luck?
Robert Kiyosaki, author of the successful book series on investment Rich Dad, Poor Dad, bases the titles and the themes of his works on a comparison between his highly qualified father and his friend's father, who dropped out in middle school.
According to Kiyosaki, his wise but impecunious father tended to be pessimistic about the possibilities of anyone's achieving anything in real life, and had discouraged his son from trying.
However, the father of his friend loved to try to do great things.
Is the fact that he became rich a coincidence?
Kiyosaki is perhaps trying too hard to be inspiring, but I often think of him when I hear finance teachers pronounce on the efficiency of markets and how absurd it is to earn money through transactions.
It may be that many academics find it difficult to take action in the real world -- and I have not yet met another Professor claiming to have read Kiyosaki.
But Swensen is a professor with a Ph.D. in economics.
It is surrounded by academics.
All this talk about efficient markets has not discouraged him from trying his luck to get there.
There seems to be a model.
Two similar universities, Harvard and Princeton, have practically known the same success.
The endowment of Harvard, under Jack Meyer, increased its average annual return of 15.2% over the last ten years which compares to 17.2% of Swensen, and Princeton's endowment, under Andrew Golden, earned an average of 15.6% per year.
In fact, Golden has worked under the auspices of Swensen at Yale in 1988 and 1993.
Swensen wrote two books on investment, one for professionals and one for the public.
In closing them, I did not have the impression of being able to do what he did.
But some elements are imposed on me.
One of them is its long-term vision.
Yale lets Swensen invest in the very long term, and does not bother him with quarterly results.
Perhaps it allows him to focus more on long-term foundations, and to make investments that don't necessarily have a good return in the short term.
But it has always had good results both short-term and long-term.
Part of the success of Swensen is "the absolute return," a term now widespread in the investor community, which he invented to describe unusual investment strategies involving things like arbitration on mergers and acquisitions and difficulties (distressed securities).
It has also invested in non-traditional assets, such as real estate, oil, timber, private equity, venture capital, and leveraged buyouts.
These assets are not generally followed by many analysts, and are not easy to understand, which was giving him a greater advantage by leveraging his intellectual capacity and the know-how of his entourage.
In this sense, Swensen is completely different from day traders, who invest in the short term and trying to beat the most liquid market of listed securities.
But I also think the phenomenal success of Swensen and his peers reflects the environment that Kiyosaki criticizes.
The problem comes from a defeatist attitude, not from scholarship.
When an analytical mind, a mind trained to rigorously pursue the truth, is part of a community of such people free from self-doubt, it can produce amazing things.
I know David Swensen, and I can attest that this is not a solitary day trader trying to beat the market.
He knows how to listen, to support people in whom he has confidence, and he is surrounded by several people with numerous and varied qualities.
And he has nothing of a defeatist.
A moral food
According to forecasts, global consumption of meat will double by 2020.
But in Europe and North America, there are increasing questions about the morality of how meat and eggs are produced.
Veal consumption has fallen since it became commonly known that to produce "white" veal meat (pale pink, in fact), newborn calves are separated from their mothers, purposely rendered anemic, deprived of fiber and packed into stalls so small that they cannot walk or turn around.
In Europe, mad cow disease shocked many, not just because it discredited the image of safe and healthy beef, but also because the public learned that this disease was caused by feeding cows the brains and nerve tissue of sheep.
People who naively believed that cows ate grass, discovered that the herds meant to become our food could eat anything, from corn to fish, from the litter of chicken (excrement included) to the waste from slaughterhouses.
The concerns raised by our way of dealing with farm animals are far from being restricted to the small percentage of vegetarian or vegans, those who do not consume any product of animal origin.
Despite the strength of the moral arguments in favor of vegetarianism, it is not yet the prevailing opinion.
The most common position is that our consumption of meat is justified when the animals are living a decent life before being killed.
The problem, as Jim Mason and I describe in our last book, "The Way We Eat", is that industrial agriculture denies any chance to animals to live a decent life.
Tens of billions of chicken raised nowadays never go outdoor.
They are conditioned to have a fierce appetite so they grow as fast as possible, to be then raised in hangars which can contain more than 20,000 animals.
The level of ammonia in the air, due to their accumulated droppings, stings the eye and burns the lungs.
Killed at only 45 days, their immature bones can hardly support the weight of their bodies.
Some are crumbling and, unable to reach water or food, are quick to die. Their fate is insubstantial on the economic scale of the entire undertaking.
The conditions are worse for egg-laying hens crammed in iron wire cages, so small that even if they were one hen per cage, they would be unable to open their wings.
But they are usually packed with four, often more.
In such conditions of overcrowding, the more dominant and aggressive hens can peck to death the weakest of the cage.
To avoid that, the producers cut off the tip of the chickens' beaks with a hot blade.
The beak of a chicken is full of nerve tissue. It is, after all, her principal means of communicating with her environment, but no anesthetic or analgesic is used to relieve pain.
Pigs are perhaps the most sensitive and intelligent animals we are used to eat.
When they rummage through a rural village, they can use this information to explore their surroundings and its diversity.
Before giving birth, sows use straw or leaves twigs to build a safe and comfortable nest where they can care for their litter.
But in current intensive farming, pregnant sows are cooped up in pens so close together that they cannot turn around, or even take a step forward or backward.
They are on the concrete, without straw or other form of litter.
The piglets are removed from their mother as soon as possible si it can fall pregnant again, but they never leave the hangar before being led to the slaughterhouse.
Advocates of these methods of production argue that they are regrettable but are necessary to meet the food demands of a population that continues to grow.
Instead, when we confine animals in intensive farming, we need to produce food for them.
The animals burn most of the energy provided by the food just to breathe and heat their bodies, therefore in the end we get only a small fraction, usually no more than a third, and sometimes only a tenth of the value of food that we give them.
However, cows that graze in the fields are eating food that we cannot digest, which means that they add to the quantity of food that is available.
It is tragic that countries like China and India, as they get richer, adopt Western methods and put animals in huge industrial farms to supply more meat and eggs for their booming middle-class.
If this continues, the result will be animal suffering greater even than currently exists in the West, more damage to the environment and an increase in heart disease and cancer of the digestive system.
This will also be completely ineffective.
As consumers, we have the power and the moral obligation, to refuse to support methods of farming which are cruel to the animals and bad for us.
fear and freedom on the Internet
We learned earlier this month that at the request of Chinese leaders, Microsoft had closed the website of a Chinese blogger hosted on a Microsoft service called MSN Spaces.
The blogger, Zhao Jing, published details of a strike of the journalists at the Beijing New, who followed the removal of the editor libre-penseur newspaper.
Microsoft's action raises a key question: can the Internet really be a force for freedom that repressive governments can not control as easily as newspapers, radio and television?
How ironic to think that the founder and leader of Microsoft, Bill Gates, has been an enthusiastic supporter of this point of view.
Last October, he rightly said: "There's really no way to wider, repress information today, and I think it's a wonderful advance all rejoice ... C ' is a means of communication with an opening and a total freedom, and that's what makes it so special. "
Despite these sentiments, Microsoft is doing its best to help the Chinese authorities censor information.
A spokesman for Microsoft said that the company had blocked "many sites" in China, and it is known for several months that the tool used to make Chinese blogs filters words like "democracy" and "human rights" when they appear in the titles of personal sites.
The defence of Microsoft is that it must "comply with the local and global laws."
But the sites of MSN Spaces are hosted by the American servers.
The relevant local laws in this case are those of the United States, and discussions of Zhao Jing on strike Beijing journalists does not violate any of them.
Neither is there a global law preventing the Chinese from discussing events that their government would prefer not to see them address.
The New York Times, for example, is free to publish articles on the strike, even if it is broadcast on a website that all Internet users with free access can consult.
If the Chinese government does not want its people read a foreign newspaper, it is up to them to find a way to block access.
The newspaper had no obligation whatever to do so on his behalf.
The defence of Microsoft has therefore a long life.
We can only guess the real reasons that led him to close the site, and fears of an impact on his commercial interests in China could be a major factor.
Admittedly, a company can and should limit the use of its services.
The line absolutist, which is to allow complete freedom to prevail, collapses in the face of troubling examples.
According to Gates, Microsoft could prevent the use of its services if they were used to broadcast instructions to manufacture a nuclear bomb, to send the Nazi propaganda in Germany, where it is illegal, or to spread the child pornography.
Are these examples truly valid?
In its classic defence of freedom of expression, On Liberty, John Stuart Mill said that the most important reason to allow freedom of expression is to promote competition between the broadest possible ideas, and that debate without hindrance constitutes the best way of testing them.
Protecting the ideas of criticism, the government turns them into rigid dogma and lifeless, whether true or not.
If we agree with Mill, then one example of Gates corresponds to the category of expressions that need to be protected.
Recipes for making nuclear bombs are techniques, not ideas.
Child pornography is also not an expression of ideas.
So we can reduce both without contradicting the thesis of Mill.
(On the other hand, an essay arguing that there is nothing wrong with adults taking a sexual interest in children, and that such conduct should be permitted, expresses ideas, and so vile that 'they can strike us as such should not be censored.)
The most difficult of Gates' three examples is the one of pro-Nazi statements on a site aimed at Germany.
That Germany wants to ban such views, is easily understandable.
The laws of many countries ban incitement to racial hatred, which can be justified, in agreement with Mill's defence of freedom, if such laws focus closely on incitement to hatred rather than on the removal of ideas, harmful as they may be, that appeal to the intellectual capacity of people.
A defender of the supression of Nazi ideas could argue that they have already been tried, and that they have failed in the most appalling way imaginable to produce a better society.
Nevertheless, the best possible sign that would show that Germany has overcome its Nazi past would be to focus its laws specifically on racial hatred, rather than on Nazism as such.
In all cases, the crackdown in China in respect of straightforward reporting and discussion of events taking place in this country is not in the suppression of a discredited political ideology, but that of a open political debate and argument.
If Bill Gates really believes that the Internet should play a role as a liberating force, he should ensure that Microsoft is not doing the dirty work of the Chinese government.
The Weaknesses of a Strong Dollar
It is always dangerous to write an article about exchange rates.
If the exchange rate of a currency falls, it can very well be on the rise by the time the article appears.
The continuing question is of how to think the exchange rates and their proper management.
The issue here is not only the falling dollar, but rather what American officials intend to implement in that respect.
Paul O'Neill, the very direct U.S. Finance Minister, suggested that the U.S. can not and will not intervene to support the dollar.
His remarks have been criticised by some who see it as an abandonment of the strong dollar policy that characterize the Clinton administration.
One of the responsibilities relating to economic leadership is to dispel myths, certainly not to create them.
The politics of the "strong dollar" is a particularly egregious example of the economic myths that can develop. This myth suggests that the Treasury could, and would like to, maintain a strong dollar, and that a strong dollar would be beneficial to the United States.
When I led the White House Economic Council, I was often asked if I supported the strong dollar policy.
I always said that I supported the policy of the "balanced dollar."
In other words, exchange rates are no different from others.
As for the price of apples or oranges, they should be fixed by the market.
Anyone who declares to prefer a policy of "strong orange" would be immediately laughed at.
And yet, many appear to have the utmost confidence in the market and see that the exchange rate is governed by laws, other than those of the mainstream economy that would say a word or even a simple glance from the finance minister could raise or lower the currencies.
The foreign exchange markets are of course very irrational.
One day, Keynes described the stockmarket as a beauty contest where the aim was not to choose the most beautiful person, but rather to choose which person the others would crown most beautiful.
The aim of a foreign exchange market, in fact, is often to guess what others think.
And even if government policies can affect the exchange rate in the short term, in the long term, it's only the market rules that count.
The government can find a legitimate role to play in limiting the market volatility, but if the basic rules of the market does not lead the charge of exchange rates, where does our confidence in the market?
Adhering to false notions inevitably leads to greater misunderstanding.
One day, a journalist was interviewing the US Treasury Secretary on the negative effects of the strong dollar in terms of exports (at the time, cars sales and other export products were suffering from the strong dollar).
He replied that a strong dollar meant that the economy was strong and because of that, exports were strengthened.
Despite everything, even the Ministry of Finance, as strong as it is, cannot undo the laws of the market economy.
The levels of demand are flagging; thus, when prices are high, American products are less sought out, and a strong dollar means that American products are more expensive.
The strongest counterpoint to the strong dollar policy is that it encourages precisely this conflation between the dollar and a strong economy.
We should not develop a sentimental attachment to exchange rates any more than to any other prices.
A high exchange rate discourages exports, and faced with the unemployment of its work force, a country can see its economy to go from bad to worse.
In addition, a high exchange rate may also help lower inflation, as import prices fall.
If inflation is the first concern, then a higher exchange rate could prove beneficial for the economy.
The strong dollar policy reeks of economic nationalism that stands out in an era of globalization.
If the dollar is strong, then the euro and the yen are weakened.
And so what are the reactions of political leaders of other countries?
Will they simply comform to the strong-dollar policy, even if it implies a policy of a weak yen or euro?
It is necessary to create conditions for a debate with the United States, as the strong dollar policy leads to an unusual situation: the richest country seems unable to live up to its means and must continually borrow hundreds billions of dollars from abroad to finance its huge trade deficit.
The strong dollar fueled the bilateral deficit with Japan more than Japanese protectionism did.
He also contributed to the protectionist policies of the United States that we see at work today in the price of steel.
It is time that the stupidity of the strong dollar policy be abandoned.
Paul O'Neill should be praised for his efforts in this area.
Maybe we could now start seriously thinking about the creation of an international economic system taking account of the devastating effects of the market volatility of the main currencies for the least developed countries in order to ensure greater stability.
We have for too long accused the victims.
It has only served to avoid seriously considering the system itself.
Has China mistaken her world?
Cheating.
How, says the United States, could China undercut U.S. producers in all areas?
For decades, America has seemed to dominate production such that American officials have focused on the liberalization of trade for manufactured products.
They spent little effort to establish an equality for farmers because they knew that America could not compete on the agricultural level.
China now outshines other countries, capturing huge trade surpluses with the United States.
The US Treasury Secretary thus accuses China of keeping its exchange rate deliberately low and asks it to let market trends determine the value of the renminbi.
The IMF chief economist, Ken Rogoff, who is leaving his position, warns that trade surpluses threaten global stability.
For those who recall the crisis that occurred in East Asia five years ago, all of this seems to go against what was said at the time.
China had been urged not to let its currency float.
Until the collapse of the Argentine peso, fixed exchange rates were ideally suited.
The US Treasury had welcomed the government intervention in the markets of exchange rates and had encouraged the IMF to support such interventions with the méga billions of dollars to countries in crisis.
If China had left its currency float again, it would have devalued and would thus have intensified the crisis.
The countries have received a warning: avoid trade surpluses and accumulate reserves because these are the main line of defense.
The East Asian countries followed this advice, for a good reason: they had already seen the consequences of a lack of reserves.
The governments of East Asia knew then that the policies of the IMF would serve only to worsen the economic downturn, but they found themselves unable to resist it.
The IMF had the money they urgently needed.
China and Malaysia, lucky enough not to have to turn to the IMF or brave enough to follow their own course of action, have acted as they should: they have conducted expansionary fiscal and monetary policies.
China's economy has continued to grow by 7%; Malaysia has experienced the shortest and most superficial economic downturn.
To understand the stakes of this fight, it is necessary to explain a few fundamental economic concepts in detail.
First, international trade is based on the principle of comparative advantage; the countries export goods in which they have a relative advantage on and bring those in which they have a relative disadvantage .
Overall, America currently has a relative disadvantage in terms of manufacturing, while China has a relative advantage.
China should export manufactured goods to the United States.
Secondly, if a country invests more than it saves, it will be forced to borrow and will therefore experience a trade deficit.
The burgeoning trade deficit is the result of America's unprecedented mismanagement of the Bush Administration.
The tax cuts that America could hardly afford turned a huge fiscal surplus into a massive deficit, rather than encourage savings, the U.S. government borrowed, much of which from abroad.
It is this bad management, and not China's exchange rate policy that is the culprit.
In fact, the overall trade surplus in China is currently low (about 1% of its GDP).
Of course, the Bush administration wants to lay the blame on others, but neither China nor any other country should be duped.
This situation recalls the events of 20 years ago, when President Reagan had drawn up huge tax cuts which were supposed to rectify the situation, but which actually resulted in huge fiscal deficits, which in turn led to huge trade deficits.
At that time America held Japan responsible for its deficiencies.
The truth is that neither the IMF or the Bush administration does  truly believe in free markets.
They hinder the markets when they find it in their interest.
The Bush administration has bailed out airlines, given agriculture unprecedented subsidies and protected the tariffs imposed on steel.
The IMF is right: there is a real risk of global instability, but the underlying cause of this threat lies in the massive borrowing undertaken by the US abroad, which began under President Ronald Reagan.
The US has thus become a debtor country with enormous debts.
If one day, the creditors of America decided to be reimbursed, they could trigger large movements of exchange rates and thus cause a global instability.
Why has the IMF not severely criticised these deficits?
Why should the world's richest country live beyond its means while the IMF reprimands the poorest countries for their less important transgressions?
This problem is compounded by the global reserve system which welcomes the demands of most countries requesting US dollars, but only penalises them more.
The system requires that the country that holds the reserve currency (in this case, the US) is piling up debts until the other countries do not trust it anymore.
But to solve the deeply rooted problems in the global financial system, we must overcome the complacency which has long since taken over the G-7 and the unilateralism that defines the current American administration.
China was right to ignore the demands of America.
The fluctuation of the exchange rate would have exposed the country to instability that would have led to a host of other problems, which would particularly hit the country's precarious banking system.
A higher exchange rate would have shaken the process of job creation and contributed to deflation, which China is currently not experiencing.
China has the chance to have the freedom necessary to pursue its own objectives.
Its huge foreign reserves allow it to ignore the IMF and the US treasury Department.
Finally, this freedom could be the most compelling reason why China must continue to maintain trade surpluses.
Once again, China has shown its mastery of the basic economic principles.
The other countries in the region lament not having done likewise.
Will Italy survive Berlusconi?
If history seems to place Silvio Berlusconi in the category of second-rate Italian prime ministers, he will at least leave behind him the memory of an out of the ordinary prime minister, one of the most bizarre ever.
Making one promise but keeping another has been more a principle of government action than a weakness.
Given its unpredictability, it is hardly surprising that since the 2001 election, which brought it power, the center-left coalition, the Unione, has won all subsequent elections (administrative elections, regional and European).
But the success of the left in the next election is not assured, and the fate of Berlusconi has not yet been sealed.
Given the country's economic situation, one would think Italy ripe for change.
For the past four years, the average income has risen by only 0.3% per year, whereas it has increased by an average of 1.5% in the European Union, and for the past two years the public debt has started growing again.
The strategy of Berlusconi's center-right coalition, Casa della Alliance, has consisted of doing nothing until the European economy recovers, instead of addressing the structural problems in Italy.
This is why it is not only the unions who criticize the government, but also the Cofindustria employers' organization, which had put all its weight behind Berlusconi in 2001.
One must also reckons with the incessant conflict of interests between Berlusconi, the Prime Minister, and Berlusconi, the press tycoon, who holds licenses in the television field that give him a position of semi-monopole for advertising in the media and on television.
During his term, his personal fortune has increased threefold.
The parliamentary majority voted many laws in favour of his personal interests and has flattened some of the legal obstacles that were in his way. However, at the beginning of March, Berlusconi was once again accused of corruption and tax fraud.
The conduct of its ministers has been scarcely improved.
Two of them, Roberto Calderoli and Francesco Storace, have been forced to resign a months appart.
The first, a leader of the Northern League, the third party in the governing coalition in order of importance, caused riots in Libya by wearing a T-shirt with the infamous cartoons of the Prophet Muhammad.
The second, former health minister and one of the leaders of the National Alliance, the second party of the government coalition , is suspected to be the source of spying, a political Watergate to the Italian.
Despite this catastrophic result, both from an economic and ethics standpoint, according to polls, the Union shows a four-point lead, too little in terms of the number of undecided voters to predict the election result.
Why is it that Berlusconi and his coalition are still in the race?
Above all, Berlusconi's election campaign, like that of Bush in 2004, aims at mobilizing its supporters and attracting the increasing number of non-voters.
For this, he has not hesitated to use his semi-monopoly on television to tout the supposed wonders performed by his government.
His campaign rhetoric is based on anticommunism that had not been seen in Italy since 1948, coupled with a defense of family and values cherished by the establishment of the Roman Catholic Church, despite the fact that the Church had not drawn from the far left in the campaign.
The coalition of Berlusconi is also benefiting from the weakness of the Union.
Its leader, Romano Prodi, has won extraordinary popular support, with more than four million votes cast in primary elections, the first of its kind in Italy.
Even without a party, he continues to be the leader of too many parties.
The cohesion of the Unione has increased: the two main parties (Democratici di Democratic Party and Democrazia e alliance - the Margherita) gathered behind the emblem of the tree, the other parties have agree on a program for the government detailed in a document of 280 pages and the Left Party Partito Della has given signs of moderation devoid of any ambiguity and loyalty to the coalition.
Nevertheless, to the voters, the coalition remains fragile.
Finally, uncertainty about the elections' result does not reflect the attitude of voters more than a change of the electoral system.
During the last decade, the Italian electoral system was based on a majority vote with one turn with a dose of proportional representation.
With this system, Casa della Libertà has succeeded in 2001 in transforming a small electoral advance into a parliamentary majority.
But, fearing that this system no longer benefits the Union, the centre-right parliamentary majority changed the electoral rules only a few months before the end of its term.
This is reminiscent of the military strategy which is to defeat looming on the battlefield, poison the well before retreating.
A proportional system without a chance to choose individual candidates results in the party secretaries, rather than the people, choosing the delegates, and, in the absence of a real electoral threshold, parties are proliferating.
The voting papers will be 40 centimeters long to include all the logos of the old and new parties, but one wouldn't find the name of any one candidate.
But more serious is that the majority-rule electoral system for the Senate could lead to a majority opposed to that of Parliament, leading to a political deadlock.
And that's not all, the mandate of President Carlo Azeglio Ciampi will end at a time when Parliament will be dissolved, so that his successor will be elected by the new members may have to appoint a government with a different majority in each House.
Berlusconi and Prodi have ruled out a grand coalition of the kind  which exists in Germany, a highly-unlikely result after a campaign in which each of the two candidates made clear that the other didn't have a legitimate right to govern.
And one more election would not solve the problem of the electoral system.
The headache of the political survival of Berlusconi reflects a wider problem at the European level.
Many Europeans, and not only the Italians, are worried and do not know where the continent is heading towards.
It is therefore not surprising that an opportunistic and a charlatan like Berlusconi continue to hold the hearing.
The Italians must decide for the future of their country if they want a leader who has the necessary stature.
The game of trans-Atlantic criticism
As if the diplomatic spats about Iraq were not enough, relations between America and Europe are slowly poisoned by divergent economic policies.
Indeed, the differences between the economic strategies on both sides are as sharply as they have been over two decades.
At first sight, the depth of this "political divide" seems surprising.
The economic outlook for the rest of this year and in 2004 have recently improved in both the US and Europe.
In addition, the US and Europe are facing a similar challenge: promoting economic recovery.
But the actions of their government (or rather the lack of action) seems to indicate that neither of the two sides can see the problems faced by the other.
During the introduction of the euro, most of the EU members (Germany, in particular) have looked forward to manage their economic policies with greater autonomy and less American pressure.
Thus, the current structure in the euro zone, with its unique mix of common monetary policy and national responsibility for fiscal policy, was not built to facilitate macro-economic coordination with the USA.
But the perception of many Americans was different.
They considered the central involvement of the euro as a way to force Europe to be stripped of its supposed "free-rider" role on the international economic scene, a role that has left the United States to shoulder the burden of political adjustments to promote global growth.
Europe will inevitably be forced to coordinate its policy with America.
These two views were destined to come into conflict and that is what is happening today.
The tensions overshadowed in the long boom of the Clinton era were revealed in 2001 when America tried to cope with the decline of its economy by releasing its monetary and fiscal policy.
When the huge budget deficits surfaced, the European scepticism about the viability of the external deficit in America and the strength of the dollar returned.
Meanwhile, American critics have seen the euro zone as too cautious when it undercut slowly interest rates and maintint fiscal constraints the stability and growth.
Originally, the Europeans had underestimated the economic slowdown which they were facing.
Later, they were constrained by the limits imposed on their fiscal responses, limits set by the Maastricht Treaty; the major economies of continental Europe had not reached a sufficient budgetary consolidation during the years of continuous growth.
Monetary and fiscal policies have facilitated growth but Europe has not done much to redress the exterior imbalance of America.
Of course, the euro zone is so large that it can no longer abdicate responsibility to stimulate global growth in America.
But the American efforts to encourage people to adopt their discretionary and pragmatic approach to economic policy lead inevitably to the frustration: the problems faced by the European economies unlike the one in the United States, like the perceptions of the challenges.
In fact, the main reasons for the wholesale change in American public finance (from a 2000 surplus to a deficit of over 4% in 2003-04) have very little relationship to stabilisation.
In addition to the costs of the war in Iraq and other security issues and shortcomings in the previous spending controls, tax cuts in the United States obey structural and distributional objectives rather than short-term goals.
A short-term stimulus would not have given the most significant benefits to the richest people, whose expenses are less affected by taxes.
The tax cuts need to support private demand this year and next year, but at the cost of the postponement of improvements in economies and the private debt.
Although the dollar has already been depreciated for a year, continued growth in domestic demand will probably increase the current accounts deficit to 5% of GDP.
While the deficit increases even further, it is highly likely that the dollar would depreciated yet again in spite of the rather sluggish performance of the world's other major economies.
Is the United States will accept a prolonged slowdown after 2004, and could Europe offer a greater contribution to global growth?
It is probably not.
The equivalent of the emphasis placed by the US on independence rather than on direct public assistance is represented by the desire to maintain employment at high levels, whichever party in power, while most European countries have been prepared to accept unemployment rates of 8% or more.
The US should then opt for growth.
Despite three years of weak growth, the gap between the potential yield and the real return in the major economies of continental Europe is now lower than in the United States.
The reductions in income taxes to stimulate demand for labor and investment are desirable given the existing high rates in major economies of Europe.
But the tax cuts that should be soon cancelled because of population pressure exerted on pensions and public health care are unlikely to stimulate demand, consumers lose confidence in the government's ability to control the deficit.
Europe needs structural reforms and a more rigorous fiscal management, not inflation.
The EU countries are finally starting to accelerate their implementation of structural reforms, but the starting point has become less favourable and political resistance too firmly anchored, as is illustrated by the recent conflicts on the French pension reforms and on the German labour market.
Further depreciation of the dollar and slower U.S. growth would undermine the Eu's exports, the only relatively successful component of demand in Europe.
The discrepancy between policy and its time line will be concealed by the prospect for improved growth in Europe and the US for the next year.
But the medium-term perspective is that of a transatlantic showdown that could create as many divisions that conflicts on the war in Iraq.
If this is true, the Doha round of world trade talks, currently being held, could be the first to suffer.
It will be more difficult to resist protectionism on both sides of the Atlantic.
The US cannot afford a continued massive drain on the demand through an external deficit while complaints relating to the loss of competitiveness have intensified in the EU.
The thought that the coming macroeconomic confrontation could calm down quickly or quietly tests the imagination.
A multilateral engagement in favor of energy security
The countries of the world are linked just as much by their common need for energy security as by the global network which takes care of distributing this energy.
A failure in a part of the network, and we are all affected. Local interests and persistent conflicts that stand, especially the unresolved issue of the supplies to Ukraine and Europe in Russian gas, remind us once again that energy can be used as a means of political pressure.
Energy security is one of the key parts of the G-8 meeting, that President Vladimir Putin is hosting in St Petersburg.
The G-8 was able to identify the essential economic issue, namely energy interdependence, and it is time today to make specific multilateral commitments in this area.
For some countries, those that are fortunate to have vast reserves of oil and gas, it is tempting to use exports to reward friends and punish enemies.
But these days, such a strategy is likely to destabilize both friends and enemies, and to damage the producing country.
Embargoes generally do not carry the expected results.
The price increases triggered by the OPEC actions in the 1970s were not tenable and have encouraged the economies of consumption and the development of production in countries not members of OPEC.
This has caused a fall in global oil exports from the OPEC in the twelve years following the 1973-1974 embargo.
Experience has taught us that transparency and stability of prices are in the interests of all.
It is essential, in order to increase the potential of global economic growth, to hold onto these principles while encouraging the development of international markets.
When Russia sought earlier this year to quadruple the price of its gas exports to Ukraine, it argued that it was merely the market price.
It seemed right, and for some time certain politicians and investors who were not up to date on the situation allowed themselves to be convinced.
To be clear, measured and gradual increments in prices were never challenged; some adjustments were necessary for Ukraine.
But, unfortunately for Russia's neighbours, this is not the market which determines the price of gas from Russia or its transportation: this is the company Gazprom and its President Dmitry Medvedev, also first deputy prime minister.
The price asked by Gazprom is different for each country neighbouring Russia, and determined largely by diplomatic the relations of those countries with the Kremlin.
The prices depend more on the political situation than supply and demand or transport costs.
Ukraine was threatened with seeing its gas bill immediately increased fourfold -- or its supply interrupted -- because it had just become independent from Russia during the Orange Revolution.
Georgia, which had attracted the ire of Moscow with the Rose Revolution, was also in danger of being subjected to significant price hikes.
But Belarus, always very close to the Kremlin, continues to benefit from major subsidies in the energy sector.
Of course, Ukraine was not the only country affected by these intimidation tactics: some suppliers, such as Turkmenistan, whose geographic location necessitates transporting the gas through Russia, suffer from them too.
As for the consumer countries in western and central Europe, rising prices and fears of a disruption of supply have had significant consequences for them.
It is probably the multilateral action of the European Union and the United States that prompted Gazprom to open the floodgates.
Natural gas is perhaps the most vulnerable of the raw materials to the vagaries of policies.
The fixed, interconnected pipelines lock producers and consumers in a nearly absolute relationship.
The diversification of the delivery of natural gas is a cross-border project in the long term, which requires considerable investment and political engagement.
Many solutions are being studied: new gas storage devices, greater efficiency, development of the national production of oil and gas, and other energy sources such as methane coal.
In addition, the market of liquefied natural gas (LNG) is growing rapidly.
It is easier to diversify the supply chain, albeit incrementally, by importing gas from distant producers and suppliers of either neighboring monopoly.
All these initiatives should make it possible to absorb shocks and to create greater energy self-sufficiency.
But we must go further.
First, G-8 leaders should consider implementing standards for transactions in the energy field, and require open and transparent contracts that comply with the best commercial practices.
It is essential to minimize the impact of global behavior of lazy local politicians who simply follow their own personal interests.
We can see this type of problems in businesses in South America, with political instability in Africa, tensions in the Middle East or even with some opaque brokers, as the dubious contract signed for gas between Ukraine and Russia, under the name of street (RosUkrEnergo).
Ultimately, energy security for us all in Europe is based on the recognition of our interdependence.
This is why it would be useful to create an "energy alliance" between consumers and suppliers, in which European countries would supply each other in case of major unrest.
The energy charter, which focuses on market access and transparency, is a commendable effort, but it is inadequate in time of crisis. Our markets are not yet sufficiently equipped to manage supply interruptions.
The Energy Charter could serve as a basis for a collective energy security, provided they are deeper and wider.
It is our duty, as leaders, to find a future path to energy security.
If some tolerate today suspicious transactions because of political expediency, we will all pay for it some day.
When the inevitable conflicts arise, public confidence, political credibility and market forces are sacrificed needlessly. This is obviously what happened with Russia and Ukraine.
The threats to energy security must be countered and resolved multilaterally with the participation of all stakeholders.
Our interdependence requires us to adopt a multilateral approach.
Our future is at stake.
Reform or revolution in Iran?
Lebanon in danger of manipulation
In recent weeks, Lebanese politicians from groups as diverse as Hezbollah and the Lebanese Forces Christian meet from time to time as part of a "National Dialogue".
Their first goal is to forge a consensus on the future of Lebanon after the withdrawal of the Syrian army, which took place last year.
But this dialogue has shown above all that Lebanese politics continues to play itself out outside of Lebanon.
The Syrian regime of President Bashar Assad El retains an enormous influence on the Lebanese state, in particular as regards security issues, the Secret Service, the army and police, not to mention its alliance with the powerful Hezbollah militia.
The Syrian soldiers have left Lebanon a year ago, but the regime of El Assad has never accepted its withdrawal from Lebanon and it is seeking to regain some form of hegemony over the country.
The Syrian position is made more difficult by the UN investigation, which accuses it of being involved in the assassination of former prime minister Rafiq Hariri, on February 14, 2005.
Syria's Lebanese allies want to improve ties between the two countries, but surely the assassination of Hariri won't allow them this victory.
For the moment, the Lebanese parties have agreed not to allow the country to act as a base for threatening in any way the Syrian regime.
Meanwhile, Egypt and Saudi Arabia wanted at any cost to prevent the collapse of El Assad's regime.
Officially these two countries are in favour of the UN investigation, but in private, their leaders have strongly pushed the Lebanese government to relax pressure on Syria.
In Lebanon, opponents of Syria have resisted this requirement, but the position of Egypt and Saudi Arabia shows that the Arab leaders do not want the fall of other despots of the region.
The attitude of Egypt and Saudi Arabia differs of the two Western powers very influential in Lebanon, the United States and France, which support the UN investigation wherever it leads.
Nevertheless, these four countries agree that Syrian influence in Lebanon must be contained, and they are in favor, at least in theory, of the disarmament of Hezbollah as called for in Security Council Resolution 1559, even if their views differ on how to accomplish it.
Another regional problem, the unending cycle of violence between Sunnis and Shiites in Iraq, also marks the Lebanese domestic policy.
The Lebanese Sunnis and Shiites - the two main groups in the country because of the sizes of their populations and the support they have in the region - are far from being at this stage, but for a little while now the political tension between them has been palpable.
Hariri was the main Sunni political leader, and after his murder, the two communities have taken diametrically opposed positions on Syria.
The gap between Shiites and Sunnis in Lebanon reflects the much wider regional differences between the majority of Arab countries (notably Saudi Arabia) who are Sunnis and support Saad Hariri, the son of the assassinated prime minister, and Iran, which supports Hezbollah.
In Saudi Arabia, Shiites are concentrated in the east which contains the bulk of its oil, and the Saudis fear that discord between Shiites and Sunnis in Iraq will spread throughout the Arab world and reach them.
This is why Riyadh encouraged Hariri not to break off dialogue with Hezbollah, the main power within the Shiite community in Lebanon.
Apart from this concern, Saudi Arabia and Egypt are afraid that if Iran manages to possess nuclear weapons, it might lead to a domination of the region by Shiites.
Added to this is the tension between Iran and the US, fueled by the controversy over the nuclear program and the conflict in Iraq.
The Arab countries are sandwiched between the two, like the Lebanese, who fear paying the price in case of an American or Israeli attack against Iran's nuclear facilities. For Hezbollah could then attack Israel from southern Lebanon.
Hezbollah interprets the resolution calling for its disarmament as a plot of the Bush administration to weaken it and demonstrate American supremacy in the region.
He is refusing to disarm to what he calls the "Israeli threat", but he has changed the definition he gives this threat so many times that one wonders whether he will ever give up arms.
He recently agreed to place this issue on the negotiating agenda of domestic policy, perhaps because Iran does not want it to become a source of tension in the country, but it is unlikely that they will lead to a real disarmament, at least in the short term.
Finally, the Lebanese must not only manoeuvre according to regional and international policy considerations , but they must also take account of American domestic politics.
Regardless of the opinion one has on the Iraq war, one must agree that the American presence in this country has helped Lebanon to foil Syria's attempts to set foot in Lebanon, and those of some Arab countries to compel Lebanon to deal with a regime that does not accept its sovereignty.
If the United States is pulling out of Iraq, it risks becoming indifferent to the situation in Lebanon.
In this case, who else besides Syria and Iran would benefit from it?
Such an outcome might be satisfying for parts of the Lebanese society, in particular Hezbollah.
But the vast majority of Lebanese want a Lebanon in peace, free from the isolation and militancy that are the hallmarks of Iran and Syria.
Unfortunately, Lebanon has always been buffeted by its environment and once more, against the will of the Lebanese, it could serve as an arena for regional conflict.
At the end of trade, the stock market in Prague fell in the red.
After Tuesday morning's fall, the Prague Stock Exchange rectified its losses.
The transactions with ČEZ shares rose to almost half the usual daily exchanges.
On Tuesday, from the start of trade, the stock market of Prague resumed its fall from the day before, when it lost nearly six percent.
This time, the drop is due to the fall of Wall Street stocks.
The reaction of the market with the outcome of the vote by the American House of Representatives, who refused to adopt the plan to stabilise the US financial sector, is equally visible at home.
Stocks fall in Asia
Asian stock markets dramatically declined on Tuesday, even though indices managed to erase some of the losses during the course of the day.
Hang Seng index of Hong Kong Stock Exchange lost four percent during the exchanges, but later it deleted partially its losses and reduced the drop to almost 2.5 percent.
The Hang Seng China Enterprises index following the movement of the Chinese actions of Hong Kong stock exchange lost 3.8 percent, the markets being closed in Shanghai.
The shares of the Sydney stock exchange were losing more than five percent, but ultimately managed to reduce the losses at 4.3 percent.
According to its index, Taiwan stock exchange lost 3.6 percent.
"The hesitation about the rescue action in the USA will influence the financial markets in the entire world," observed Joseph Yam, the head of the monetary office of Hong Kong.
Although Hong Kong is part of China, he sets his monetary policy himself, meaning independently of the Chinese central bank.
Interest rates in Hong Kong are at the same level as in the United States.
According to Australian Prime Minister Kevin Rudd, American legislators should quickly resume negotiations and adopt the proposal of supporting the financial system.
Otherwise, we would risk that other countries suffer the effects.
The bloodbath of American equities
On Monday, the US House of Representatives rejected the plan to support the financial system, to which it would have had to allocate up to 700 billion dollars (nearly 12 billion Kč).
Thus the legislators deny the appeal for support of President George Bush's project.
According to Bush, the project should clear up the main causes of the financial crisis and help stabilize the entire economy.
The American shares lived, on Monday, a bloodshed and the main indexes of shares knew the biggest fall of the past 20 years.
The Dow Jones lost nearly seven percent, having known such a fall of that scale for the last time in 1987.
The index was already losing during the vote, but when it became apparent that the proposal was not adopted, it was plummetting.
The Congress gave up: the US government can inject $700 billion into banks
The Congress leaders and the President George W. Bush government agreed on a larger form of the financial aid agreement to the US financial system.
It will be subject to vote early next week.
US legislators did a major change in the negociations about the adoption of a rescue plan shaped as a financial assistance of $700 billion (about 12 billion kronor), given to the US financial system.
Success is not necessarily sure.
Indeed, before being able to publish the final version of the law and submit it to vote, the Congressman must work out certain details of the agreement.
The plan for supporting the financial system will be examined on Monday in the House of Representatives.
Barney Frank, president of the House committee of banking and financial regulation, said on Sunday to the Reuters news agency.
According to sources, the plan should a priori be submitted to the Senate for a vote on Wednesday at the earliest.
According to economists, the announcement that the rescue plan will be adopted should be a first major psychological factor to revive the financial markets.
But, given the complexity of the mechanisms by which aid to the markets may be effected, "disillusionment" will follow.
Paulson: The plan has to be efficient.
"We have made great progress.
We have resolved our differences of opinion concerning the form the package of measures to stabilize the market should take," Democrat Nancy Pelosi confided to the Bloomberg Agency.
According to her, the final vote could be done by Sunday.
During the night between Saturday to Sunday, representatives of legislators met the US Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson, to give the government's substance a final form.
It should buy, from financial companies, the unmarketable real estate assets which cause financial firms huge losses and threaten the stability of the entire system.
"We are about to agree on a plan that will work and which must also be efficient on the market.
We still need to continue this plan of recovery of the markets, but I think we are there," Paulson said.
A signal for Asian exchanges
The global financial crisis has a significant impact on the share markets that are falling.
According to the Democrat Senator Harry Reid, legislators are working so that Congress could reach a final agreement by Sunday.
They thus want to calm investors before the start of trade on the Asian financial markets, which are located in the first time zone, where the decision of Congress could influence the exchange on Monday.
For now, it is impossible to say with certainty when both houses of Congress will proceed to a vote, or whether the negotiations may be blocked, at the last minute, by one problem or another.
Lawmakers are hoping that it will be adopted during the coming days.
However, the law will still see many changes.
The total amount to help the system has to be divided into two parts.
The first $350 billion, as President George Bush wished, must be available as soon as possible.
But, if Congress will have the impression that the program does not meet its function, it has the opportunity to block the granting of the remaining amount, in two stages: First 100 billion dollars more, then, finally, 350 billion dollars.
Mr Bush saluted the progress of the negociations.
Although the president can veto the decision, Congress has the opportunity to put it in a minority.
Despite these changes, the main idea of the program, which was to obtain financing to buy up bad mortgages, whose value plummeted because hundreds of thousands of Americans are unable to pay off their mortgages, was maintained.
"All the work is done.
The House of Representatives should be able to proceed on Sunday to vote for the law, and the Senate on Monday," indicated the Republican Senator Judd Gregg.
American President George Bush himself is pleased with the progress in the negotiations.
His spokesman Tony Fratto said that Mr Bush was pleased with the progress made on Saturday and appreciated the "bipartisan effort to stabilize our financial markets and protect our economy".
Limitation of the golden parachutes
The Senate Banking Committee Chairman Christopher Dodd, chief negotiator, said that lawmakers have agreed on the responsibilities of the financial programme, the protection of taxpayers against losses, the agreement on tax relief, the implementation of the plan over time.
The new law also plans to limit the so-called golden parachutes for the directors of companies participating in the programme and it sets up a committee, which will ensure the monitoring of the fund.
The last should be managed by the Ministry of Finance.
"We have worked very hard on the issue and have made important progress towards an agreement that will work and will be effective for the market and for all Americans," said Paulson.
The plan also includes aid for homeowners, who have problems paying.
The Government should be negotiating new advance payments for mortgages that it will buy, while reducing payments of debtors and allowing them to keep their homes.
Marek: a psychological assistance.
According to the chief economist of Patria Finance, David Marek, the proposed plan is a good idea, but its achievement will be very difficult.
"And that is because we do not know what the arrangement and the purchase price of the assets will be.
This point will be crucial to decide on the share of losses between the financial sector and the government," said Marek this week to the Ihned.cz server.
Whether the plan will be adopted now, or early next week, is not, according to Marek, so important.
"It is much more important that the congressmen find an agreement, this week, that they support this plan and consign it as soon as possible.
This psychological meaning of the agreement, providing for the adoption of the plan, is the most important at this time," Marek emphasized.
A fight pushed to the extreme: MP3 players against mobile phones.
We will advise you how to choose.
While almost all mobile phones can read MP3 files, no MP3 player is able to place a telephone call.
It seems to be clear that it is better to buy only a phone.
Even though there are enough reasons to get a separate reader.
The choice is entirely dependent on the specific use and requirements of the future owner.
It would be absurd to buy for home a expensive premium gramophone to put on the new album of Maxim turbulenc.
On a first hand, such musical products are not issued on vinyl record, and, in terms of quality, there is no objective reason for that to happen.
If there are vinyl records with rock, jazz or blues music stacked on your shelves, you probably dream of having such a phonograph.
So is the case for on-the-go music, that is to say compressed music, or simply put - music on MP3.
Again there are also categories depending on the price and quality.
For one person, it may be unacceptable to spend eight thousand kroner for a reader, in the same way a fan of Pink Floyd would have a hard time buying headphones being marketed for 20 kroner.
Here are two extremes, between which there is enough room for everyone.
The choice is wide.
The long lasting of batteries is also crucial
Some high-end music players are capable of much more than simply playing music, but these are unknown functions, of course, in most of mobiles.
No current device is as universal as the telephone.
In addition to the primary functions, telephone calls and sending text messages, it is able to read music and films and record them, it has a camera of varying quality and can, for example, even serve as a GPS. 
And if we take smartphones and pagers into account, you end up with a small computer in your pocket.
Given that no cold storage can grill meat and no television will take photographs, we are practically witnessing a miracle.
But the universal aspect of the mobile is not without flaws.
More the number of functions you use is high, more the interval between two reloading will be reduced.
And the reading of music is one of the most important energy guzzler.
There are few mobile phones that are able to play music for ten to twelve hours, in most cases, this number is significantly lower.
Regarding this matter, music players (especially the most basic ones) are much more efficient.
In the case of cheap mobile phones, you can expect that they will only play music for a few hours.
If, furthermore, you happen to call from time to time, you should get, to be on the safe side, a second charge for work - and this is true even for more expensive devices.
This should be no problem for MP3 players, which, following a recharge, are capable of continuous operation for at least 9 hours, including the less efficient ones.
Another problem occurs in the mobile, during the music recording.
Unfortunately, only a limited part of the devices has a universal USB connector, especially as not all can be directly connected to the computer, without a special software.
We can clearly save music directly on the memory card, but few card readers know how to do it without reduction, given the tiny dimensions of memory cards used in mobile phones.
Concerning the readers, you do not need, apart from exception (iPod), any software.
It is enough to fill, via the USB connector, the musical instrument originating from the computer.
Most of the mobile phones and readers will themselves create a media library indexed by the name of the performer, the title of the album, the style, or according to the user's preference.
Some devices only display an index with a tree structure, like Windows Explorer, others are capable of both (iRiver, Samsung, Sony, Cowon, smart phones with operating systems).
Readers are easier to manipulate, mobile phones have more expertise
While choosing a device, you should take a special interest in the battery lifetime, in the volume of the memory, the quality and the kind of sound output and, of course, the usability.
If music is essentially background noise for you, and if during the day you are only going to listen to it for a limited time, for example when you are on the bus, you only need any mobile phone that reads MP3s.
Almost all mobile phones are now able of doing this.
You do not even have to pay too much attention to the music file extensions that the mobile or the reader is able to read.
All are able to read MP3s and the vast majority of music which will get to you will have exactly this format.
It is one of the most prevalent formats and apart from it, the vast majority of devices can also read WMA format music.
The AAC (format used by the Apple company and its iPods) is less common.
For example, high-end mobile phones also allow you to buy music online.
Since the advent of the mobile phone, one can just visit the web pages of the related site owner (or those of another vendor) and buy the song or album in question.
This service alone should be a convincing reason to get a musical cellphone.
The offer from the operators is unfortunately wretched and it is limited, in most cases, to rapidly built radio tubes.
Prices are not that low.
However, we usually see this way to buy music (either by GSM, or by the Internet, or wireless Internet) will dominate the music industry in the future.
Most people are always wearing their mobile phone on themselves.
Whenever you want to listen to something, you only have to take the mobile out of your pocket, while you have forgotten your MP3 player at home.
Yet, it is also important if you always wear headphones or a handsfree with connection.
If it is not the case, you can use the included speakers, that almost all mobile phones have, but a minimum of MP3 players.
For many, the main advantage of music mobiles is their price.
The cheapest ones normally cost less than three thousand.
For a price of three to four thousand kroner, you can have an already very good Walkman .
However, in most cases, you will be limited by the absence of output for ordinary headphones.
The price of the best phones and better equipped, also provided with an entry for ordinary headphones, does not exceed fifteen thousand.
The readers, however, have the advantage of having an easy control.
Really anybody manages to ensure the control of the most rudimentary readers - which do not necessarily correspond to the less expensive (see our choice).
A minimum of functions; and the resemblance of the command with the one of a tape player, commonly used in the past, or of a gramophone, is obvious.
There is no risk of a bad connection in the form of an internet mobile phone connected by accident, followed by an invoice for an immense amount of data transmission.
Which device to choose
Even the cheapest mobile phones, (e.g. the Vodafone 527) generally have a slot for exchangeable memory cards (M2 type, microSD, etc.).
Even taking into consideration the additional purchases of such a card, you will not exceed two thousand crowns.
But be careful.
The basic models as a rule support only cards with a maximum capacity of 2 GB.
Only the most expensive ones fare even with 8 GB memory cards.
If you already have a mobile and want to buy a cheap MP3 player, get a Cowon, a Creative, a Sony, Samsung, an Emgeton, or a iRiver.
Depending on the capacity (max. 2 GB), you must not spend more than 1,100 kronor.
If you're among the most discerning listeners, choose rather a specialized mobile-walkman (Sony Ericsson, Nokia and some Samsung).
These appliances are equipped with independent buttons for MP3, thus the ease of use is closer to that of a stand-alone MP3 player.
Sony Ericsson, whose Walkman series of mobile users have the same menu as MP3 players sold separately, is the one who went furthest in this area.
The same service, in the same price category, but with a memory capacity (up to 16 Gb) and a longer battery life (normally 15 hours, up to 35 hours), is offered by an MP3 player produced by one of the trademarks mentioned above.
The first virtual operator will win the rights to the Czech Republic this very year.
Maybe
The mobile market is relatively advanced in the Czech Republic, our operators offer virtually the same services as their partners in Western Europe.
Despite this, there is still something missing - a virtual operator, which would force the traditional operators to reduce prices.
It is possible that he won't miss for a long time.
We have already mentioned many times on Mobil.cz the fact that Czech operators are among the most expensive in Europe.
The CTU (The Czech Telecommunications Office), who indicated that the price of an SMS was higher here than in the rest of the Union, has confirmed it as well.
This is how, following the latest steps of the European Commission in the area of regulation of roaming charges, a paradoxical situation could happen - SMS sent from abroad will be for some customers of Czech mobile phone operators cheaper than in their own country.
How is it possible that prices in Czech Republic are still so high, compared with Europe?
The answer is simple, it misses a competition that would really wish to get into the struggle.
This may seem paradoxical, given that we still have three mobile networks  and a penetration far greater than 100%.
On the contrary, mobile operators like to complain that the Czech market is extremely competitive.
In this, Pavel Dvořák, President of the Council of the Czech Office of Telecommunications (ČTÚ), who has repeatedly said that there was no more room in the Czech Republic for another operator, agrees with the operators.
It is probably true that a classic operator with its own network no longer has much chance apparently (moreover, now, it would only find frequencies with great difficulty).
However, there is still a possibility - a virtual operator.
It is precisely the entry of virtual operators into the mobile phone market that has led to a substantial reduction in prices, which traditional operators subsequently had to respond to.
However, even before the entry of killjoys such as Tesco Mobile and Virgin Mobile into the market, voices similar to those we now hear in our own country began to be heard in Great Britain.
However, it appeared that there was room left for such operators and that they could have a real success.
Moreover, we do not have to look too far to find examples.
In the month of February we had informed you of the launching, in Poland, of the Mobilking virtual operator.
In just six months, this operator has managed to win more than 100 thousand customers and to become the fifth operator of the country.
Let us add that behind Mobilking, there is the financial group Penta, which owns, among others, U:fon in Czech Republic.
The advantage of virtual operators being the ability to concentrate on a more specific target group.
For their operation to be effective, they really need far fewer customers than a traditional operator.
They are, indeed, exempt from the relatively high construction, operation and maintenance costs of the mobile network.
And so, all over the world, virtual providers present themselves as low-cost operators - offering cheap calling and text-messaging rates that are often counterbalanced by a limited range of services.
For example, Tesco Mobile, in Britain, offers text messaging at least 50% cheaper than its competitors.
But, as the example of Mobilking in Poland shows, to bet on an unusual target group can also constitute a good publicity stunt.
Indeed, this operator speciafically set his sights on men.
"Real men choose Mobilking - an operator who they like and trust," said David Seibert, CEO of Mobile Entertainment Company, developing this virtual operator.
It is difficult to say, if such a concept would also work here.
Miroslav Čepický, the spokesman for Vodafone, in doubt: "The Czech market is relatively small for a segmentary approach, on which most virtual operators are based.
Especially as it is relatively saturated from the point of view of the supply of services. "
No chance in the Czech Republic, say the mobile phone operators.
However, it still seems almost sure that if they get a virtual operator in the Czech Republic, it will not be Mobilking.
"We are discussing the expansion of this successful project, but in the Czech Republic, negotiations are not very well sponsored.
The entry of Mobilking will actually take place in other countries in our area," said Jana Studničková, spokeswoman for the financial group Penta in a telephone interview on behalf of Mobil.cz.
She has thus indirectly confirmed that operators in the Czech Republic were not in any event favorable to this idea.
Instead, they are trying to do their utmost so that a potential competitor shall not appear.
The GTS Novera group, which wanted to take a step forward in order to become real competition for Telefonika in the area of corporate clients, has not, for a long time now, been hiding its intention to launch a virtual mobile operator.
"We would very much like to be able to offer our clients not only telecommunications services for landlines, but also mobiles.
And the sooner the better.
We have already held talks about this possibility on several occasions with all the Czechs mobile phone operators.
We managed to make progress in the negotiations with some, said the group spokesman Pavel Kaidl.
The future may thus be promising.
According to unofficial information, it seems that perhaps we could already host the first virtual operator by the end of the year.
But for now, its creation is accompanied by a total silence.
"At this moment, we do not believe that there is a place on the Czech market for a virtual operator, as such.
The Czech market is unique in comparison with others.
For the moment, no subject with a complex and serious project in this area has contacted us," Vlastimil Sršeň from the press department of Telefonika O2 said, in his statement to Mobil.cz.
Other operators also relate to the specificity of the Czech market.
The spokesman for T-Mobile Martina kemrová says in a rare agreement with the declaration of O2: "We have not recorded for the moment of viable project and bilaterally advantageous, which could be used."
And she adds: "It is practically impossible for a virtual operator to appear in the T-Mobile network by the end of the year."
To operate in such a limited time period, we should have now a tangible agreement."
Vodafone is rather directing its attention to the fulfilment of the requests to get its own 3G licence.
Miroslav Čepický said about this: "We are open to negotiations with potential online operators, and especially in the area of shared expenses and infrastructures.
This is what, in our opinion, is most beneficial from the point of view of our customers.
The main strategy of Vodafone in this area is finding a partner to establish a common network for high-speed mobile internet."
The responsible authorities: lies with the operators.
The stance of the mobile phone operators is easily understandable, the entry of another operator would mean an increase in competition, would have led to lower prices and therefore to a decrease in their profit.
What good is there in facilitating the advent of such a competitor?
When it comes to their interests, operators can be as thick as thieves. The harassment accompanying the creation of the U:FON also is an example.
The greatest apparent pressure on the ČTÚ, at the time of creation of the U:fon, has been that exerted by the company T-Mobile.
Witness of this is the publicly available information extracted from the Web pages of the ČTÚ.
Today, however, U:FON is ready to serve as an argument for not accepting a virtual operator.
Martina Kemrová noticed on this subject: "The competition on the cellphone market has been, most recently exacerbated by the coming of a fourth cellphone operator on the market.
Given the nature of the mobile market in RT, it is obvious that the entry of an additional player would submit it, and especially its services, to high expectations."
But given the attitude of the mobile operators here, the indifference of the Czech regulators seems disconcerting.
It is not just the attitude of the ČtÚ, which, unlike Britain and other developed countries, has unfortunately not, in the Czech Republic, the power to intervene in the economic competition.
This one belongs exclusively to the Office for the protection of economic competition (ÚOHS).
However, the latter adopted, faced with this problem, his typical position.
"The entry of a virtual operator into the mobile phone market would be possible following the signing of an contract between a mobile phone operator and the virtual operator in question concerning the rental of the necessary infrastructure.
No such agreement has been reached for the moment, because the offer from potentially interested parties originally did not hold sufficient interest for traditional operators," Kristián Chalupa of the Foreign Relations Department of the ÚOHS (OPC) said in response to our question.
A statement worded like that would not be surprising on the part of the operators' representatives.
But coming from an office, which must represent the interests of consumers and, among other things, be careful that no-one will take advantage of its position on the market, such a statement is baffling.
Especially since Kristián Chalupa adds: "Abroad, where there are usually virtual operators, you can see that their entry into the market has helped to lower prices of mobile phone services."
However, pressuring toward a honest running of the market and a lowering of prices is apparently not part of the interests of ÚOHS.
What is really shocking is almost touching harmony of the three mobile operators, which stems from their reactions.
The question whether this is really a chance, naturally arises.
Similarly, a strictly equal price of petrol in all the petrol stations is surely due to random and competitors battle.
"The office did not identify, about this matter, evidence of anticompetitive behavior, it therefore has no reason to intervene in one way or another.
None of the operators has a dominant position, therefore none has a corresponding responsibility for his behavior in the market.
The tools necessary for the opening of the mobile market to virtual operators are probably the same as those for the telecoms regulators," Chaloupa said in his statement.
The interpretation of the dominant position on the market is one of many points of contention.
Of course, there is an analysis of the relevant markets drafted by the ČtÚ that telecommunications form a single market in terms of economic competition.
None of the Czech Republic operators have a dominant position on such a market.
However, some law experts offer a different view of things: in order for the creation of a virtual operator to be possible, one must obtain, each time, the consent of the network operator.
And the mobile operator has fairly logically the monopoly on its network.
That's how he necessarily plays a dominant role in a certain segment of its activity.
But even without acknowledging this argument, it should be at least worrying for the ÚOHS that three mobile operators are clearly proceeding in a similar manner.
However, complaints of many involved people (including the already mentioned society Novera GTS) show that they face similar constraints in the negotiations with all the operators.
Placing responsibility on the ČTÚ is a fairly common act in communications, through which the ÚOHS washes its hands of the affair.
We have already seen this kind of attitude in several similar cases.
Unfortunately, they did not manage to get into the new version of the law on telecommunications, recently adopted, a broadening of the powers of the ČTÚ in the area of economic competition in telecommunications, although many specialists promised an improvement in the situation.
This, the representatives of the Úohs must know it very well, but their interests are apparently elsewhere.
When nobody is watching, it can works
That said, the operation of a kind of pseudo-virtual operators, numerous in the Czech mobile networks , remain undetected.
It is about businesses publishing their own price-list of mobile phone services, but these are only partially public.
In most cases, it is a matter of firms handling the multi-level marketing.
Particularized mobile telephone services are being proposed by Amway, Bohemia Telecom, Starlife and many others.
The price lists of these firms are generally known only by members.
The magic trick is in the fact that, to the operator, the company looks like a traditional business client which is ordering a large quantity of SIM cards.
As an important client, she gets price offers (and other) special.
The problem is that business conditions of all mobile operators Czech prohibit such a resale.
"If what you suggest were to happen, we could be looking at a breach of contractual terms which could lead to a halt in collaboration with the company in question," Martina Kemrová said in answer to our question on this issue.
However, it is rather unlikely that an echo of such an activity would not have reached officials from the mobile operators.
Especially in the case of the three companies mentioned it can be thousands of customers.
No operator, however, opposes such a procedure.
Indeed, the activities of these firms bring them significant profits, and, at the same time, by opposition to genuine virtual operators, these do not threaten them with their own official marketing.
Miroslav Čepický points out the potential problems: "The law allows such speculation, however, the services of these companies are only used by a negligible percentage of customers.
In addition, they are forced to admit that the SIM cards in their phones are not recorded in their names, so they cannot use them fully the same way regular customers of mobile operators can.
Yet, this is precisely what should seem strange to ČTÚ.
Moreover, there is another question for the ÚOHS.
If the mobile phone operators are turning a blind eye on such a procedure, why are they blocking the creation of a virtual operator?
It should be added that the ÚOHS has relatively broad powers to be able to reveal such an activity, and if it will not wish to be satisfied with the explanations of the operators, who affirm not to have any idea that would occur, their contractual conditions prohibiting it.
When we will not be the most expensive country
As we have already mentioned several times, the entry of virtual operators on the mobile market has created a significant drop in the price of services.
However, in almost every country where virtual operators appeared, the traditional operators were attempting, sometimes more, sometimes less, to prevent their creation.
The arguments used by these were practically the same - too small a market, even too saturated, problems with the quality of services, etc.
It is precisely at this level that intervened, in developed countries, regulators, who did not defend the interests of the mobile operators, but those of their clients.
As well by formal action as by an informal pressure, they ended up getting the creation of a first virtual operator, followed by others.
Unfortunately, regulators Czechs organisms treat this issue in the manner of a hot potato that get rid off by passing it to a near target.
Following the experiences that we have, we cannot get rid of the impression that the confusion in the skills is in these cases more than profitable for him.
But do not throw in the towel.
If the backstage rumors are true and a virtual operator will soon be here, the Czech mobile phone market will perhaps become active again.
If one of the operators has accepted the creation of a virtual mobile operator, the ÚOHS will only hardly be able to remain impassive in front of the rejection (discrimination) of other interested parties.
And we may cease to have more expensive calls than the rest of Europe.
The new Czech anthem has four new versions.
Choose the best
Listen to the four realizations of the new version of the Czech national anthem.
On Sunday, during the Day of the Czech nationality, Prime Minister Mirek Topolánek solemnly presented the new recordings of the national anthem Kde domov můj (Where is my homeland?).
The anthem was once again recorded by the National Theater Orchestra under the direction of Jiří Bělohlávek.
We have four versions - with a male or female solo singing, a chorus and an instrumental version.
Singing is performed by Kateřina Kněžínková and Adam Plachetka.
Otakar jeremiáš and Jaroslav krček are the authors of the anthem's arrangements.
You can listen to the four new versions on the ihned.cz server.
Bělohlávek considers the Czech national singing as one of the finest anthems.
As he had already confided to Český rozhlas (the Czech public radio), he has chosen, for the interpretation of the solo versions, singers with young and representative voices, which are marked and appreciated.
"Since the beginning, I was trying to take care that the two singers and chorus had a good diction, so that we could understood the words well, that they sing simultaneously," he said.
The Czech national anthem will celebrate, next year, its 175th anniversary.
The Kde domov můj song resounded for the first time in 1834, on the stage of the Stavovské divadlo (the State Theater) in Fidlovačka (the Cobbler's Fair), an original piece by the Czech Josef Kajetán Tyl, accompanied by the music of František Škroup.
It became popular and people have spontaneously appropriated it.
After the creation of Czechoslovakia in 1918, the first couplet naturally became an integral part of the national anthem.
It remained one of the seven national symbols even after the creation of the independent Czech Republic.
How does the 'new' anthem sound
The public transport (MHD) of Prague will introduce, on Wednesday, the chip in their system of ticketing
Wednesday, October 1st 2008 will go down in the history of Pražský Dopravní Podnik (the Prague transport agency) as the date on which, in the metro and trams and buses, the first passenger will get on who, instead of having a paper ticket, will have in his pocket an electronic coupon.
At this time, the latter is available for about a hundred thousand people, owners of the Opencard smart card.
Passengers can buy a coupon for 30 days or 90 days (it will apply from January 1, 2009) and at the same time register their smart card at information booths or the offices of the Dopravní Podnik (the transportation agency), located in the Muzeum, Můstek, Nádraží Holešovice, Anděl, Roztyly, Letňany, Kobylisy, Rajská Zahrada, Kačerov and Luka metro stations.
From yesterday, there is also the possibility to buy the vouchers via Internet on the Web pages of the Dopravní podnik: www.dpp.cz.
More than four hundred people enjoyed the service during the morning.
Those who begin to use the online store can completely forget the ticket windows in the metro stations, where up to now they had to mark time in long lines in order to get paper tickets.
Indeed, they will buy their coupon via the internet and will record it on their Opencard card in one of the 13 městská knihovna (municipal libraries).
"At these contact points, a counter with trained staff are available to passengers , which will help them with the Internet purchase and save the voucher that they purchased on their card," said spokesman Martin opatrný project.
In addition to the library, it will also be possible to register the electronic voucher on Opencard in the vending machines installed in the vestibules of several underground stations.
What do these dispensers look like ?
They are red, are reminiscent of the ticket punching machines and passengers may have already noticed them in the underground stations of Roztyly, Budějovická, I. P. Pavlova, Florenc and Vltavská.
"Today, the city has five of them, but by the end of the year, there should be 80," added opatrný.
A robot will check the coupon instead of the driver
The vending machines that will operate starting tomorrow are easy to use.
It is sufficient to introduce the  Opencard smartcard and the coupon purchased  earlier will show itself on the map.
The electronic vouchers are valid from tomorrow, not only in the capital, but also around the town.
Namely in suburban trains and bus lines 300 to 499, are mainly used by the inhabitants of the Central Bohemia to access the capital.
"In the trains integrated in Pražská integrovaná doprava (Prague Integrated Transport), the controllers are equipped with card readers, which whom they establish the temporary and zonal validity of vouchers," explained the vouchers control Filip Drápal of Ropid organisation, which designs Prague public transport schedule.
Peri-urban buses are equipped with card readers integrated to the cash register of the driver.
When boarding, you not only have to show the smart card to the driver, you must also put the Opencard in the slot indicated on the side of the box.
This is how the driver controls the validity of the registered voucher.
"In the event that the passenger would need to verify the validity of the registration coupon, there is nothing simpler than to request this information from the driver," Drápal finished.
Passengers who are not taking city limits buses and will not remember their voucher's expiration date, can rejoin new vending machines, originally used to register vouchers on the map.
It's here, on the screen of the machine, that the information on the validity of their document will display.
The Sudetes demanded a referendum in the U.S.
The Sudeten Germans asked in 1945 to include Šumava to the United States.
That stems from a letter filed in the collections of the Jihočeská Vědecká Knihovna (The Scientific Library of Southern Bohemia).
If we cannot be part of Germany or Austria, we want at least to live under the patronage of the United States of America.
In 1945, certain groups of Sudeten Germans were supposedly addressing themselves to the US President with such a desire.
This results among other from a letter preserved in a private archive, which is now filed in the collections of the Jihočeská vědecká knihovna.
Germans from Český Krumlov in the letter beg the US president not to allow "šumavská župa '(area of forest in southern Bohemia) - annexed by Hitler under the Munich agreement - to be returned to Czechoslovakia.
"We have understood well the situation and want to be really sure that the words proclaiming that the American troops are coming on the German territory not as oppressors and enemies, but as liberators," is written in the letter, signed "People that the fate of the Šumava take to heart."
Given that the rallying in Czechoslovakia is only allegedly promising, knowing the Czech National character - that of brutality, of a spiteful attitude, of a lack of understanding, of oppression and of servitude, the authors of the letter beg the American president to take over the Šumava Protectorate for now and forever.
"We cannot believe, that you would give this territory to a foreign state, that oppresses and destroys minorities and has contributed nothing to the victory of the Allies without taking into account the opinion of the quarter million people who live there," is written in the letter.
The supposed reason why the authors can not sign the letter is fear of the desire for revenge by the "Czech oppressors".
If the US president were doubting the opinion of the Šumava Germans, he would only have to hold a referendum in the region to establish whether its people wanted to be part of the USA or live under the patronage of the United States, according to the authors of the letter.
Although the text contained in the letter can, given the current knowledge of post-war history, seem somewhat naive, according to some survivors, it illustrates well the expectations of Sudeten Germans at the time.
While the German Czechs at the very least had to foresee that the issue of their expulsion from the republic would come up, very few of them admitted such a possibility.
Some were waiting for America and Britain to get some sort of autonomy for the Sudeten.
Others believed that they would simply stay in Czechoslovakia.
The famous Austrian journalist Gustav chalupa, born in České Budějovice confirms this.
During the war, he was, as a German from České Budějovice, engaged in the Navy in the Baltic countries.
When, at the end of the war, he was captured by the English and placed in a POW camp in the Holstein region, dozens of Czech Germans came to speak to him so he could teach them the Czech language.
"They believed that once back home, the Czech language would be beneficial to them," Chalupa said.
None of the captured Germans who lived in Czechoslovakia before the war thought, according to him, that he would be expelled from the Republic as a consequence of the Beneš Decrees.
You do not consider - you pay!
An emotional campaign will attack drivers.
The most expensive action road safety in the history of the Czech Republic.
A way of describing the emotional media campaign that intends to launch, on Wednesday, the ministry of transport.
The office of the minister Aleš Řebíček believes that she will discourage drivers of having a dangerous driving behaviour.
This campaign costing 150 million will appear on television, on radio, in the movies, on the Internet, and also in leaflets.
It should discourage drivers from speeding and from and drunk-driving.
But also remind them to take the belt before starting.
It is mainly designed to reach the conscience of young drivers, bikers, pedestrians, without forgetting the professional drivers.
What will appear in the commercials?
Above all personal stories that are going to attack the emotions.
For the entire campaign, "bloody" was also reflected in the slogan.
You do not consider - you pay!
The phrase " You do not think" is included in capital letters on the license plate.
Then, in a puddle of blood, there is the phrase "You will pay."
What must symbolize that we can pay with our life a moment of insufficient attention.
The spots are going to "haunt" viewers until 2010.
The ministry was inspired by similar campaigns in the Anglo-Saxon countries, where one commonly sees dramatic images of accident victims.
He believes that this will lead to lowering the rate of accidents and the number of deaths on roads in the Czech Republic.
The spots were prepared by the Euro RSCG agency.
The carrot and stick strategy against the drivers
"What works with drivers, is the system of carrot and stick.
To them, for example, it really seems sweet to gain time when they run a red light.
The Whip, it's the threat of a fine or an accident.
The risks have to be reminded to drivers," said Martin Kořán, the psychologist of transports of the Na Homolce hospital.
This is how we need information campaigns in the press and especially negative advertisements, believes the psychologist.
The signs pointing out the danger to the drivers are, according to him, already less effective.
"When a static panel, which warns against a danger is installed, it will probably soon merge with the environment and drivers don't see it anymore" said kořán.
Olmert would give back in exchange for peace almost all occupied territories
Ehud Olmert, president of the Isreali provisional government, has ruled in favour of the return of almost all the territories occupied in 1967, including the West Bank, east Jerusalem and the Golan Heights, in exchange for peace with Palestine and Syria.
He made that statement in an interview published on Monday in the daily newspaper Yedioth Ahronoth.
"We need to reach an agreement with the Palestinians, which means that it will be necessary to give back almost all the territories (occupied), maybe all," Olmert told the journal.
"We will keep a certain percentage of the territory, but we will give the Palestinians a similar percentage (of Israeli territory), because without it, peace will not happen," he added.
He admitted that the possible restitution would include East Jerusalem.
"Anyone who wants to be safe in Jerusalem, and particularly does not want tractors and bulldozers to crush his feet, as happened to one of my best friends, will have to relinquish parts of Jerusalem," noted Olmert alluding to the two attacks in the city, in July, during which several people were killed and dozens of people injured.
According to the prime minister, it will be necessary to find "a special solution for the Temple Mount, the sacred and historic sites" located inside the Old City.
"Anyone who wants to maintain Israeli sovereignty over the whole city will have to integrate 270,000 Arabs.
"That will not work," he emphasized thereafter.
Withdrawal from Golan Heights
Olmert also ruled in favour of the retreat of Israel from the Golan Heights, which is, according to him, an indispensable condition for a peace agreement with Syria.
It also would require some efforts by Damascus.
"I do not propose to make peace with Syria only on the basis of a retreat from the Golan Heights," he said.
"The Syrians know very well what they will have to give up to get the Golan Heights.
They are going to abandon their current relations with Iran; they are going to abandon their relationship with the Hezbollah (Shiite movement); they are going to abandon the ongoing support they give to the terrorist activities of Hamas (Shiite movement) and al-Qaeida (terrorist network), as well as that given for Jihad (holy war) in Iraq, the prime minister said.
Questions that arise after the accident: Are stewards inside buses illegal?
The law is ignoring them; walking in a long distance coach is forbidden.
In the context of the tragic accident of Student Agency coach near Padua, Italy, the question has arisen of whether the crew and passengers can move around inside the bus during the journey.
"If we wanted to respect the law strictly and formally, the activity of a steward is contrary to the traffic law," said the spokesman of the Department of Transportation Karel Hanzelka.
The accident, during which a 22-year-old hostess was killed, was apparently caused by a truck driver who crossed the road in front of the bus.
The girl was at this time unfortunately seated next to the driver, on the most dangerous seat of the vehicle, although she has available two other seats.
But the coach can have an accident or even slow down suddenly, also at the time when the steward is serving coffee or distributing newspapers.
What matters is whether the bus satisfies its technical requirements by being equipped with standing room space or not.
If this equipment for standing places is not approved, passengers must remain seated.
Student Agency long distance coaches do not have standing seats; that was confirmed by the company's director Radim Jančura to Aktuálně.cz.
"It is an issue that we have dealt with the ministry and, at the beginning, it prohibits any movement of the passengers.
Then they cancelled it and we arranged for passengers to be able to go to the toilet during the journey on condition that they have their own seats," he said, revealing his position.
The law ignores the steward
"There is no clear legal interpretation of the role of Steward - no legal regulation deals with this role.
On the other hand, no legal requirement prohibits a carrier from offering services.
The laws relating to highway transport only contain the term recipient of vehicle; they do not define his/her rights and duties," spokesman Hanzelka adds with further ambiguity.
Josef pokorný, the Head of the Road Transportation Department, believes that, at the contrary, the law tackles the issue well enough.
"It all depends on whether the coach had in his approval permission to offer standing places.
Everything lies in this," he says.
Buses are divided into urban ones, where there is standing room and a maximum speed limit, inter-urban ones with standing room and a higher maximum speed limit and long-distance buses with no standing, the highest maximum speed limit and seats fitted with seat belts.
As in the plane, says an expert
Jaroslav Hořín, an expert at BESIP (highway traffic safety) in transportation safety, does not see removal of on-board stewards as a major problem.
"With a regular circulation, there is no danger. The situation can be compared to the service in aircraft.
There neither is it sure when there will be a turbulence and the air hostess can bang her head."
"However, in the case where the coach would have slowed down briskly, the laws of physics would obviously be valid.
In the same way as in a city bus or streetcar.
The carrier needs to manage the safety of stewards by internal requirements, "he says, and he also believes that from a juridic perspective, the problem is not settled.
Jančura is ready to surpress these services
Student agency is the only coach carrier that offers services from stewards
He hires two hundred of them.
Even after this incident, the Director does not consider their profession a hazardous profession.
"However, once I have the impression that it is a risky profession, I will suppress it.
Passengers can receive their coffee and newspaper upon boarding.
That would also decrease the costs," he says.
Security concerns are the reason given by the Director of the Asiana Alexei Litvine for the absence of stewards on its ships, which results in a very reduced number of lines in comparison with SA.
"We have no receptionists. We are opposed to it since the beginning.
Sooner or later it will end by a fatal accident," he said to Týden.cz a year ago.
A great tragedy happened
A young stewardess from the Plzeň region, who had been working for the company for two years, died during the accident on the line of Naples.
A Slovenian lorry probably left the emergency stopping lane without using his turn signal and blocked the path of the coach.
The driver of the latter one tried to avoid him by using a rushing manoeuvre, but he brush against him by the right side.
Jančura denies that the two seats reserved for stewards rest were sold.
"In the case of long distance lines, it is not possible to book these places, they are blocked."
The company intends to sue the driver of the lorry.
About the compensation of the girl's family, the agency will not wait the judgment of the court, but as regards financial compensation, it also counts on the culprit.
A change in the law?
Not in sight
A modification in the law, which is being developed, for more than a year, by a group of thirty experts from the Ministry of Transportation, could provide further details regarding the stewards' shifting aboard the bus.
"However, it has not resulted in any conclusion on this point.
As a matter of fact, it has no particular interest in buses, but rather in the points system, the maximum speed on the motorway and the use of mobile phone while driving," the expert Hořín said.
"The transport ministry does not consider the activity of the stewards as something that would basically endanger the safety of passengers," concludes the spokesman Hanzelka, stating that the safety control of cars is under the power of the police and the security office at work.
The hopes of the inhabitants of Düsseldorf rest on Frankfurt.
Big words were plenty in the letter sent by the steering committee of WestLB to the employees of the company.
By a union of the entities the Financial Institute of Düsseldorf with the Deka-Bank of Frankfurt, "the central institution of financial markets of the financial group of the Sparkasse" could be formed, according to the letter made public Monday.
The WestLB would bring a "block of competence" doubled with a durable productivity in such a case.
All in all, such a relationship could be the decisive kick-off for other groups in the Ländesbanks sector.
That is what it looks like when a committee board wishes to demonstrate it's ability to act in difficult times.
Because the WestLB, injured, is still under a lot of pressure.
It is not only the European Commission, but also the Federal Authority of the Supervision of Financial Services, which only recently, made clear to the government of North Rhine Westphalia that time was running out in search of a future solution.
Nevertheless, it has been an issue for some time already - on Frankfurt's part also - of some form of relationship between the Deka Bank, which is familiar with savings bank clients because of their investment funds, and West LB.
Certainly the chief executive of the Deta-Bank, Franz Waas, made it known during the presentation of the six month figures in late August that he could see no sense in the merger of the House of  Mainzer Landstrasse with a Land Bank, whether it be the Helaba or WestLB.
However DEKA's board which each half is borne by the Länder banks and by the savings banks groups, has instructed the steering committee to conduct talks with the WestLB, for common commercial activities.
It might then be the flow of the financial market, or parts of it.
The talks, however, have only just started, one says in the financial centre.
This is not the first time that the Deta-Bank, which with its 3,000 employees counts as one of the largest employers in the financial district of Frankfurt, comes into play when there is talk of consolidation in the savings bank sector.
In 2003 it was believed for a moment that the Deta-Bank could merge with the Bank of Rhineland Palatinate and the Halbab.
However nothing has come of this threesome.
The plans had barely been made public when the government of the Land of Hesse said it was against any participation in them by the Hellaba.
Thereafter, the two other houses did not join either.
Rhineland Palatinate Länder's bank was joined to the Bade-Würtenberg Länder's bank in Stuttgart.
But there were always new negotiations on the merging of DekaBank with the Landesbanken.
Finally, Günther Merl, president of the steering committee of the hellaba, had however spoken against any commercial strategy to merge with his bank.
Regardless of this, the feeling seems to spread that the regrouping the different institutions of the public sector is especially urgent.
Now that the parliamentary election of the Land of Bavaria has occurred, a union of BayernLB with the bank of the Land of Bade-Wuttenberg could materialize imminently.
For the Helaba, this is not particularly a good news.
If the pressure that requires new mergers should increase, the potential partners are escaping him gradually.
In the South, she would now be a junior partner, although she has so far better withstood the crisis than the banks in Munich and Stuttgart.
The grouping of savings and transfers banks of Hesse-Thuringe, which owns 85 percent of the capital of the Helaba, has instead pushed a barrier at the beginning of the year on any union with the WestLB.
Would remain if necessary the NordLB.
However such geo-strategic thoughts reflect only one of the facets.
Another facet raises the question of how different business models of each of these banks can match.
In June, Merl stated that the crucial issue, determining by what business model the future capacity of Ländesbanks should be insured, had not yet been resolved by the German Association of Savings and Loans.
Eventually, a carve-up of WestLB could take place, carve-up which here is obviously not wanted.
It is also what is the matter in the established executive Committee letter: in any case, a 'global solution' for the establishment would be aimed at.
How will all this be lumped together with the association of certain entities with the Deta-Bank still remains to be seen.
The second weekend of the beer fest is also known to be the weekend of the Italians.
For Elena, it is the first time, for Luca already the third or fourth time.
But this time, Elena accompanies him as a girlfriend, and therefore everything seems different, he says.
Behind them, next to a five-litre barrel of Kaiser brand beer, stands a bearded well built man who shows to about 200 visitors of the beer festival, what deep sounds his throat can make.
Elena hit Luca first, then she kisses him.
From Bologna, they came up to Verona.
From there, from the bus station near the Puorta Nueva station, four buses leave this evening at 11:45 p.m., 'destinazione Monaco, festa della birra', arrival at 6:30 a.m.
Three buses are reserved in priority for the Italians, in one of the buses Brasilians travel exclusively.
In a corner of the parking lot, the South Americans are already singing alongside their flag; they already celebrated last night.
And also noisy, explains Marco Guarda, this is not for Italians.
The busses belong to Marco, who wears a long coat lined with fake fur and a pair of large glasses with a silver frame .
During five years, they have gone to the beer festival, already travelled three times this year.
They go there at night, remain the day at the festival, and come back at 10.30 p.m..
Spending the night there would imply unnecessary costs, Marco explains.
The trip costs 75 euros, including the welcoming drink with a Kaiser beer brewed according to the Bavarian purity law, health insurance and a German-speaking group official - Marco followed a language course in Frankfurt.
And already the buses run in the nighttime hours on the Autostrada, direction Brennero.
There is no beer, not yet.
Soon, everything calms down in the bus, passengers sleep.
It is better that way, they will still need their energy.
Breaks will be made in Bressanone, and Holzkirchen, while many other buses with Italian registrations plates will make a break shortly before Munich, on motorway 8.
When in the early morning, Marco's group is finally arriving at half past six as planned on the car park near place Thérèse, nearly 50 other buses from all over Europe are already there.
Elena, Luca and the others are gathering, Marco takes one last speech, explains the attack plan.
First: wear the small yellow cap.
On it is written on the left 'Oktoberfest', in Gothic, and next to it the Internet address of the travel agency of Marco 'conoscersiviaggiando.it'.
Secondly: 'when the beer tent's doors are opening, we run', shout Marco in the morning.
Run!' Run and save the seats at the bottom of the tent.
"Not all in front, otherwise we'll be blocking, and not all the yellow caps on the same benches, we need to distribute them throughout the room!"
The mug, Marco shouts, costs 8.25 euros.
And don't forget the deposit!
Show to the security guards that we behave well
As soon as you left your seats, they left! '
Thirdly: 'this evening, be back here at half past ten precisely!' Understood?
And that's it, here we go towards the celebration of beer.
Along the road, to mark the route, somebody is tying yellow caps on trees, on signs and even on an election poster of a major Bavarian party.
We want to be ready for the return.
It is the second weekend of the celebration of beer, known as the 'weekend of Italians'.
There is no precise figures; we talk about 50,000 who road through the Alps and collapse in the beer stand, 10 percent of visitors would come in deliberately to Italy this weekend.
Munich's police is reinforced by seven policemen from South Tyrol, by Italian rescue volunteers supported by the Bavarian Red Cross which realizes statistics in countries where the Italians are the first place before the British (60 interventions) and the Austrians (80) with almost 200 medical interventions.
The one that is particularly appreciated by Italian people, is the tent of the Hofbräu brewery.
Sleepless nights for shareholders in Hypo Real Estate
The German banking system is relatively stable, the federal Finance Minister insisted only a few weeks ago.
What luck that the politician used the word "relatively" and that he let slip that the German banking sector would not be spared by the movements of the crisis.
This one has indeed occurred this weekend.
The Bavarian real estate financer  Hypo Real Estate (HRE),   DAX listed, obtained a credit of one billion from a consortium of German banks  to protect itself from turbulence.
A knowledgeable source told Reuters on Monday that aid commitments are being issued up to a total of 35 billion Euros.
The Hypo Real Estate should now pay interest on the part which it would thus be entitled to.
The money comes as much from private banks as from banks of public law.
In the background, it is the daughter-company Depfa that bears the losses.
The financial balance sheet, according to a newspaper article, was very short term refinanced for long-term projects for which he had borrowed money - which is no longer possible given the state of mistrust of the markets.
In the first half of 2008, the bank's liquid reserves had been reduced by 95 per cent to 2.37 million Euros, the equity ratio had also declined slightly, from 1.6 percent to 1.45.
The current benefits and the net ones from financial transactions have, compared with the same period last year, fell to zero, the benefits from the allocation of debt and determinated securities and the termination of provisions in credit  operations had fallen by more than 70 percent to 5 million euros.
And it is only due to large profits from accounting costs reimbursements downstream from the restructuring of the former group Depfa, as well as interest payments according to the book of fiscal procedures and purchases for Konzern companies that the 16 percent gains deficit proved to be moderate.
After its privatisation in 1990, the former financial state had initially mis-speculated on commercial real estate loans, which had later been spun in to the bank Aareal.
Because the classic state financing was not enough profitable, Depfa was then committed more intensively in infrastructure projects and in funding for projects shared with private investors and State (privat-public-partnership, PPP) and diversified internationally.
On the value of the daughter-company, Hypo Real Estate needs to proceed to depreciations, which should have an essential material effect which remains unclear on the gains and losses calculation of the group.
The fact is that dividends have been brutally cut.
Already for 2007, they had been truncated to two thirds.
The Hypo Real Estate is, since the takeover of the Depfa, an extremely important investor of state and infrastructure.
It is more robust than other institutions that depend on the re-financing of the inter-banking market because it has no customer deposits.
With the bankruptcy of the investment bank Lehman Brothers two weeks ago, the allocation of funds between banks has again petered out considerably, the banks having accumulated their liquidity.
The Hypo Real Estate needs annually for a part - about 50 billion Euros - of all the credits of the Depfa, a way for short-term refinancing.
According to a press release by Hypo Real Estate,  funding needs of the group are covered by medium term credit and the company is  protected from the influence of international financial markets which are largely out of work now.
Other sources say that refinancing would be assured by funding up to the end of 2009.
The president of the executive committee of the HRE Georg Funke explained in contrast that the group Hypo Real Estate should no longer have to resort to the financial markets in the medium term.
The Federal Bank and the Federal Establishment for the Supervision of Financial Services (Bafin) assume that the capacity of Hypo Real on the market is now assured.
Bank's shareholders and creditors just have to hope it.
However, given the momentum and the unthinkability of the crisis, there is no certainty.
Moreover, This is not unthinkable that the whole funding should not be used.
But the opposite cannot be dismissed either.
Given the fact that the bank was, according to latest reports, still at the gates of insolvency late Sunday, this temporary rescue will not succeed in setting anyone's mind to rest either.
The share price has fallen by 75% to 3.30 euros.
The bond prices, however, are particularly well.
While the primary debts have barely budged, the rates of secondary loans are flagging.
The most affected are especially investment funds from the former subsidiary Württemberg Hypo and those of course that have a life expectancy beyond 2009.
The obligations of the bank Hypo Real Estate appeared still now to be a speculative alternative investment, from now their value should be seen as dependent of the stability of the international banking system after the net tightening of the banking crisis and the crisis of the Institute who has brought the crisis into the establishment by the takeover of the bank Depfa.
As the issuing institutions, governments and commercial banks which were less affected are still prepared to support the system, we can presume that in time there will be a resorption of arrears.
Or it will happen that no one would hope at this time - that the financial crisis can be overcome in the next 15 months.
But faced with renewed rumors of a partial nationalization, the probability approaching reliability is now become a mere expectation based.
This should give in priority insomnias to all long term creditors on the decision of whether they should secede from their commitments.
Short-term investors term can still use what they have disposed of for the purpose of reporting losses for the coming years of automatically deducted tax on income from capital stock market gains.
Sylvana and the secrets of Bento box
When Sylvana Hiltrop, 16 years old, has to introduce herself for the first day in the Highschool of Tachibana, girls are beginning to giggle: the German girl is so "kawaii"!
What does it mean?
Sylvana already knows this word thanks to Mangas - in her new log exchanges, she speaks of Japan.
"The first day of classes in Japan.
I was so excited.
Already the way to go to school was scaring me.
I live on the outskirts of Tokyo in the direction of Kawasaki and I take the train for 40 minutes up to Tachibana Highschool.
I had to find the road on my own, fortunately I did not get lost.
The beginning of classes does not seem to be set as strictly as at home in Lower Saxony.
Pupils appear one after another from 8 o'clock until 9:20, a round table discussion with the teacher begins the "home room."
But before the lesson begins, it was my turn to introduce myself.
I am not the kind who love to talk to people, particularly in front of a class of 40 pupils.
As I did not have yet the school uniform, I put an old skirt from my adoptive mother, as well as a shirt, long blue socks and black leather shoes.
In this dress so, I stand myself to the chair, and tried to say everything correctly: 'Sayonara Wo she Sylvana...' - I call Sylvana, I come from Germany and my birthday is next week.
At this time, I was very pleased to have begun to learn the language two years ago.
The 31 girls of the class have all whispered, giggled and made signs, and I constantly heard the word "Kawaii."
I already knew it, thanks to my mangas.
It belongs to the essential vocabulary for survival of Japanese teenagers and means "lovely, cute."
Then I quickly slipped in my place.
The girl next to me made me a great ironic smile, she felt that it was an honour that the correspondent had to sit next to her.
The rest of the hour has been relatively calm, but when the gong rang, I was properly beset.
Everyone was vying with one another in speaking, giggling and asking me a lot of questions - in this case, it is quite difficult to understand the Japanese English.
During the break, they have all taken out their Bento.
My foster mother had also made this kind of lunchbox for me - it really is something other than the miserable German snacks.
I had some rice with fragrant herbs, some small sausages, a salad of cucumber and seaweed, fruit and some kind of meat surrounded by tofu.
Most of the time, I have no idea what exactly I'm eating here in Japan.
Things have a bizarre appearance and a completely new taste.
What is certain, is that everything is really good.
Well, except maybe salty candied plums, Brrrr!
Bentos are not only lunches in Japanese schools.
It sometimes happens that a girl offers to a boy a bento she has prepared herself, and which is then prepared very carefully - in the hope to be able to know a little better the boy during the break.
I have read it in my mangas.
I am curious to know if I will be able to see it as well from here.
"Why Japan in particular?" my friends asked me when I told them that I wanted to spend a year at school in Tokyo.
so I have always answered.
"Because it fascinates me, what"
Ultimately, reading Mangas, this is what I prefer already for years.
And, in order to better understand the Mangas and the culture in them, I have also started to learn Japanese at a time.
For me, it was very clear that I would have to travel over there one day.
Because I also have a weakness for traditions and customs.
And here, one gives them a lot of importance.
On the one hand, Japan is the country of technologies and of the latest trends – on the other hand, it is harsh, disciplined and traditional.
And as everything is so well organised, I never felt lost here, even if Tokyo is the largest city I have ever seen."
Rats have feelings too
A rat or a cockroach flees before danger, does it mean that it feels fear too?
The neurophysicist Joseph LeDoux is convinced that many animals also have feelings.
But how can anyone really check whether it is feeling the same thing when it behaves the same way we do?  ("it" = un animal)
In the online magazine "Edge", contributions have been published for several years by famous scientists.
Spiegel Online presents in a series of articles some answers to the question "What do you believe to be true without being able to have proof?"
I believe that animals have sensations and other states of consciousness without me or anyone else being able to prove it until now just as we cannot prove that other human beings have a conscience.
But in this case, we can at least hope that every human brain has the same configuration.
As soon as we turn to other species and we address questions about feelings or about consciousness in general, we are moving into a terrain where it is difficult to navigate because we don't have the appropriate hardware.
When a rat is in danger, it does the same thing as many other animals: it plays dead, flees or attacks.
Human beings behave the same way, this is why some scientists deduce a comparable subjective memory.
However, I do not believe in it.
Two aspects of brain structure make the comparison of our subjective experience to that of animals difficult.
One of the aspects is that the circuits which are almost always associated with human consciousness include the prefrontal cortex (due to its participation in the short-term memory and in orientation and execution functions).
This vast region is much more developed in humans than among other primates and seems to be entirely absent in other beings.
At least for these aspects of our conscience that depend on the prefrontal cortex, including the conscience of who we are, and the ability to predict and decide, it is reasonable to suppose that human beings differentiates itself from other primates.
Another significant feature might lie in human linguistic nature: as a large part of its existence is linked to language, it often means that his conscience depends on it.
In this case, we could exclude the animals.
But even if the conscience should not depend on the language, it would influence it surely, so that the animal awareness, regardless how it is produced, would distinguish probably a lot from most of our conscience state.
That is the reason why it is so difficult to determine what consciousness may look like among other animals.
If this, internal and subjective, can be neither measured, nor, because of this particular hardware, analyzed based on our own experience, then his observation poses a big problem.
Most of my developments refer to the content of the conscious experience, but next to this there is another aspect of the consciousness that should be more easily scientifically accessible.
One could examine the process of awareness of animals regardless of their content, and that's exactly what happened in studies on the memory of primates, particularly using the example of visualization.
But in this approach that Christof Koch and Francis Crick followed, one focuses more on the nervous correlations of consciousness than on the causal mechanisms: the two may be identical or not.
Curiously, this approach also stresses the significance of the weight of the prefrontal cortex when one is trying to achieve a visualization.
But what does this result into then for the emotions?
I conclude that an emotional system such as fear is activated in a brain aware of its own activity.
What we call "fear" is therefore the mental state in which we find ourselves when the activity of the defence system located in the brain (or its follow-up, like the body's reactions) grasps the live memory.
As well observed, the emotions are closely linked to regions of the cortex that characterise the primates and humans in particular.
Subtle degrees of feeling sensation associated with our inconsatant nature, have been identified, because we can, with the help of words and grammar, differentiate and categorising situations to blame others than ourselves.
In contrast, Antonio Damasio, for example, thinks that sensations brought on by primitive activities arise in the regions of the cortex and the brain stem relating to physical sensations, as does Pankseep Jaak, who, however, focuses more on the brain stem.
Since this network has not changed much during the course of human development, it could have actually participated in any kind of transverse sensations.
From a purely theoretical point of view, I cannot contradict him, but I believe that undemonstrable.
Pankseep argues the fact that what constitutes fear among men and in rats is probably also felt as such in both cases: How can one confirm whether rats and men feel the same thing when they behave alike?
A cockroach flees before danger, but what if he is afraid?
In my view, similar behavior is not enough to prove identical experiences.
Certainly, nerve comparison helps: rats and humans possess similar brain stems, cockroaches on the other hand do not even possess a brain.
But is the brain stem behind sensations?
And even if we could prove that for Man: how could we prove it for rats?
I believe that rats and other mammals, perhaps even cockroaches (who knows?) have sensations.
But I wouldn't know how to demonstrate it.
And because their feelings are likely to differ completely from ours (since human consciousness is based on special tracks and on the language), I prefer to explore the emotional behavior of rats emotional sensations.
In every case, gripping progress is occurring regarding the understanding of the nervous system to the extent that one gauges the same thing in rats and humans.
As I am not exploring the language and the conscience of rats, either the sensations, I do not know if these exist.
We could see this as short term, but I prefer going forward rather than constantly bumping into a wall.
I am indeed a pragmatic emotional.
Platini, UEFA president: a grace period for Poland and Ukraine.
Deputy prime Minister Iwan Wasjunik explained that the preparations would soon be placed under the direct responsibility of the President and the Prime Minister.
"The government considers UEFA's decision to Bordeaux as proof of confidence in Ukraine and its ability to organize, in collaboration with Poland, the championship of Europe," announced Wasjunik.
"But it is not an amnesty for our country.
The work has just started, and there is still much to be done in both countries."
In the timetable of construction or destruction of stadiums, streets, hotels and airports, the two hosts are chasing time.
The number of stadiums for the championship of Europe might possibly be reduced from eight to six.
"We can not waste our time anymore.
"We must work at full speed", said President of the Ukrainian league Grigorij Surkis.
"UEFA constantly keeps an eye on us".
An even more radical measure was decided on in Poland.
The direction of the Polish Football Association PZPN has been suspended by the National Olympic Committee after many scandals and replaced by Robert Zawlocki, indepedent director.
The Commission met at the request of the Minister of Sports, Miroslaw Drzewiecki.
There exists "a real danger that the PZPN would not be able to act within the rules," said Drzewiecki of the Polish news agency PAP.
"We have assured in a letter to the UEFA president that preparations for the European Championship in 2012 shall not suffer from it."
Several members of the First Division League had already been, during the previous season, convicted of manipulation of the mandatory relegation; ultimately, the start of the League season even had to be postponed at the last minute.
Dennis Quaid outraged counter-attacks
She wanted to promote a new film, spoke of her private life in an interview - and now has problems with her ex: Hollywood star Meg Ryan has lifted the veil on her adulterous ex, Dennis Quaid.
He skims - and counter-attacks.
A late war of the roses in the ex-couple Meg Ryan and Dennis Quaid: seven years after their divorce, the two Hollywood actors are engaging in an unsightly battle - in full view of everyone.
Last week, during an interview for the American newspaper InStyle, Meg Ryan spoke about the causes for the failure of her marriage: "Dennis has been unfaithful for a long time, and it was very painful."
She may have acknowledged the extent of the deceit only after the divorce.
The reason for baring her thoughts lies in Ryan's media relations for her new film "The Women," which tells a story about adultery.
Dennis Quaid's reaction regarding his characterization as an unfaithful husband emerged clearly: this would be "monstrous", he said to the "New York Daily News', at 54 years of age, "Meg is again rehashing and manipulating the history of our relationship".
Moreover it would be "regrettable", that "the sorrow and the upsets included by a divorce for every child should be rekindled again in public" for their 16-year-old son, Jack."
While Ryan has lived alone since the divorce, Quaid remarried and soon became the father of twins.
His reaction to the attack was: "In any case, my life goes on."
I count myself lucky to have a wonderful family that is at its best".
The airline tickets prices and hotels are dropping
In the first half of 2008, flights and hotel nights were cheaper than the previous year.
In Germany, according to a recent study, the flights would be even cut up to 50 percent.
Flights and hotel stays would become profitable again - that is the result of a study by American Express, the provider of financial and travel services.
The company has analysed the data of bookings in the first half of 2008 and has established, after a rise in prices in the first quarter, a sharp fall in profits in the second quarter.
After the prices on the hotels market have risen for years, the nights in hotels have already reduced in many places.
From January to March, prices rose in 41 of the 48 European cities examined again 6.9 percent on average compared with 2007 in 41 of the 48 European cities examined.
From April to June, prices were already 3.6 percent lower than the previous year.
The trend was clear especially in Paris and Rome, where travellers had to pay by 30 to 37 percent less than a year earlier.
The causes of all that reside for American Express in the weak dollar which has led to a "lower desire to travel from American tourists".
The financial centres such as Frankfurt or London would be even more affected by the decline in prices of hotels than industrial sites like Hanover, Cologne or Stavanger.
In Swedish cities, hotel prices are hanging on, with a rise of 26.3 percent, the record in Europe.
Also in terms of flight prices, the trend was rising in the first quarter:
Due to the increase in the price of kerosene, passengers in economy class had to pay an average of 7.1 percent more than in 2007, long-haul flights, which consume a lot of fuel, have even risen to 29.2 percent.
From April to June, tickets prices in economy class have fallen by an average of 12.5 per cent compared with the previous quarter, in business class and in first class, however, variations in prices have been far less pronounced.
In Germany, prices have plummeted even more significantly than in other European countries.
From January to March, prices had risen by 11.9 percent, in the second quarter, they have brought 23.6 per cent down.
The German domestic flights have even been halved according to this study.
The reasons for this fall in prices would be on the one hand a bending economic growth, explains the firm.
Demand gave way in much of the market segment of airplane travel.
On the other side, there would exist an increased pressure of the competition because of the "Open Skies" treaty that liberalizes air traffic between the United States and Europe.
One sign of the tense situation is the airline companies' elimination of routes that are not profitable, as well as the higher number of airline companies that will have gone into bankruptcy during the first half of 2008 - there were 24 companies in Europe alone.
HSV wins over Gladbach 1 to 0.
With a goal and simple methods, the SV Hamburg takes the first place.
In Borussia, Luhukay still has not managed to find a fully-functioning team.
From Kristoffer Klein. Enlarge. Emergency landing for international player Marko Marin.
The Gladbach player only returned late in the game, and his high shot failed the rim of the goal.
His message was precisely shaped, it got out of his lips in a persuasive way.
He simply knew he was right.
"We need this second goal," whistled Rieger Hermann in the corridor of the changing room of the Hamburg arena.
Little was happening in the changing room, half-time was over and most had sat down again at their place.
Rieger was the HSV physiotherapist for nearly three decades; he enjoys a great reputation like many of the former players.
And this is why his request was received at strategic places.
The assistant coach Cornelius Jol has acquiesced and has given the thumbs up to approve.
Cornelius is the brother of Hamburg's head coach, Martin Jol.
Whose orders seemed to have been similar: and how that blows up with the second goal!
The application is missing.
"Everything was not very nice to see today," confessed Marcel Jansen later.
Bastian Reinhard would "also have wanted to be more relaxed."
This 1: 0 (1: 0 at half-time), the team of Hamburg due it to a successful headbutt by Mladen Petric (at the eleventh minute); and the fact that the very weak players of Gladbach could not do any harm to Hamburg weak players.
"It was a dirty victory," resumed Marine Jol.
The SV Hamburg will celebrate its 121 years this Monday.
Already on Saturday afternoon, fans were celebrating themselves, the blue sky over the arena, and the ranking tables on the giant screen that showed their club as the first in their class.
Il will be a birthday without real celebration.
"We know to step back," said Marcell Jansen.
He suspects that the intermediate result of the table reflects more the unpredictable nature of the Premier League than the dominance of the HSV.
The team with its lately committed entrants - Brazilians Neves and Silva, the goalie Petric just like Jansen laid off from FC Bayern - is certainly training quietly, but it doesn't shine yet.
"We need more charm and more dribbles", demanded Jol.
After the failure of the vote
In Wall Street, fear is passing along.
The first news of the rescue plan's failure has temporarily made the Dow Jones lose 700 points.
This was the biggest loss of points in the space of one day in all of history.
Later, the Dow Jones picked up a bit.
Around 20:30, the largest in the world stock index was trading at 10,579 point with a drop of good five percent.
The Nasdaq Stock Exchange technology index was at 1548 points with a drop of more than seven points.
Those who lost the most with the Dow Jones were at this time American Express, which lost almost 14 percent and Bank of America with a loss of about 12 percent.
No bond could yield profits any longer.
The shares of Bank Goldman Sachs showed a drop of almost 10 percent.
Only a few days ago, the great investor Warren Buffett had associated himself with the society.
Under the rescue plan, funds must be mobilized for the purchase of so-called bad mortgages.
The sum, however, should not be paid at once, but gradually.
In return, the state should recover options on the actions of the financial company, which can be exchanged in correlation to the evolution of their value in order to reduce the cost for Public Treasury.
Stock prices sucked into the maelstrom in Europe and the United States
The billions of aid for banks in Europe and the United States do not mitigate the concerns of investors.
The share price of the great German bank Hypo Real Estate collapses and pulls the DAX towards the bottom.
The US Dow Jones Index is crashing despite the government's efforts to rescue the financial market.
Spectacular declines of the courses of Hypo Real Estate and the Commerzbank led the German index (DAX) with a huge deficit.
The share of the Bavarian real estate investor lost at times three-quarters of its value despite the rescue operation by the federal government and private banks, the Commerzbank has seen a decline of more than 20 percent.
The DAX has significantly slipped below the psychological barrier of 6,000 points and was quoted at 5.839 points with a deficit of 3.7 percent.
In the whole world, stock markets fell to their knees.
In New York, Wall Street opened with significant losses.
Investors were fearing that the rescue plan of $700 billion from the US government might not be enough to restart the financial markets.
The Dow Jones at 10,809.25 points has lost in the first hour of opening 334 points, or 3.3 percent.
The House of Representatives of the United States intended to vote on the rescue plan, the vote in the Senate should follow on October 1st.
The other European stock markets also went in only one direction: in London, the FTSE 100 index had a momentary decline of 3.2 percent, the CAC 40 in Paris lost 2.9 percent.
In Asia, the main Japanese index Nikkei fell to 11,743.61 points after an initial rise of 1.26 percent.
In Hong-Kong, the Hang-Seng index has lost 2.1 percent at 18,286.90 points.
In India, the main index Sensex has lost 506.43 points, or 3.9 percent and closed at 12,595.75 points.
In the MDAX, Arcandor's auctions fell after the announcement of a capital raise.
The private bank Sal. Oppenheim has signed up to 23 million new shares.
The commercial tourism multinational has moreover indicated that the stocks will not be sold to Thomas Cook.
Dark matter influences the flight of space probes.
For years, a mysterious phenomenon has been perplexing researchers: dark matter influences the speed of space probes during what are called maneuvers using gravitational pull.
Experts fear that the general theory of relativity is not completely accurate.
For almost 18 years the "Ulysses" space probe has been flying in space.
Because of fuel pipeline soon frozen, the cryogenic death is a threat for her.
For years, a mysterious phenomenon is causing confusion among researchers - the anomaly of the gravity assist.
The gravitationnal support is a space probes' operation, in which they get an extra boost in an astronomical obect's gravitationnal field, Earth, for example.
Thus, the probes can save a lot of fuel.
The Cassini-Huygens americo-european research probe used this physics trick, just like the Ulysses solar probe.
Anyway, this is what surprised researchers for years: the flying objects are not always behaving at 100 percent as we expect according to the venerable gravity laws.
Furthermore, discrepencies appears on the speed level
The probes become unexpectedly faster or slower.
Until now, physicians could not explain this.
They named it the anomaly of gravitational support.
Some experts fear that Albert Einstein's theory of relativity, which described the force of attraction of matter as due to the curvature of space, may not be entirely correct.
American physicist Stephen Adler of the Institute for Advanced Study in Princeton still believes wholeheartedly that Einstein was not wrong and is trying to explain the anomaly of the gravitational slingshot using the so-called dark matter that astronomers have identified in the universe.
"Black matter might be responsible for this anomaly, matter which is also located close to Earth," he writes.
Researchers in the area of space know about dark matter only for about ten years.
It apparently emanates from it an attractive force whose effect is seen on other celestial bodies.
It is however completely invisible, meaning that it neither sends out nor reflects any electromagnetic radiation, especially visible light.
According to calculations of scientists, the dark matter would still represent a non-negligible fifth of the total mass of the universe.
The tourists kidnapped in Egypt are free.
After ten days in the hands of their captors, the kidnapped tourists in Egypt had to be released and Italy's Minister of Foreign Affairs confirmed it.
The kidnappers in Sudan had demanded a ransom of several million euros.
During the shootout prior to release, six of the hostage takers were killed.
In southern Egypt, five Germans have been kidnapped.
The negotiations concerning the ransom would already have started.
Germans are constantly in the crosshairs of kidnappers.
WELT ONLINE depicts the most important cases.
The European tourists kidnapped in the Sahara are obviously free.
It is what was conveyed in unison by the Egyptian state television, the Arab television channel Al-Arabija and the Italian media.
The Italian Minister of Foreign Affairs Franco Frattini, confirmed the release after news of the Italian television channel Sky TG 24: "Our citizens and the other hostages have been released.
We are in the process of checking out the state of their health," said Frattini.
The five Germans, five Italians and the Romanian and their eight Egyptians companions are doing well and are safe, announced the Egyptian national television.
The 19 participants in the trip in the desert should already be on their way to Cairo.
The circumstances surrounding the shooting before the release of hostages are still unclear: the kidnappers might have been close to ending the abduction, according to an Egyptian security official, a moment before the Sudanese army suddenly killed six of the kidnappers without any warning.
"The problem was solved.
They were in agreement with a ransom", said the agent.
All that was left was to collect the hostage", when suddenly, "this surprise" occurred.
Sudanese solders had shot six of the kidnappers this Sunday in the border area between the Sudan, Chad and Egypt, and had arrested two of them.
The kidnappers had demanded from Germany a ransom amounting to six million euros; the money was to be handed over by the German wife of one of the hostages.
The daily newspaper, "El Masri El Jom" said that, according to the statements of a German mediator, the release of the hostages was delayed because the kidnappers feared for their safety.
According to the article, the kidnappers wanted to free the female hostages after the payment of the ransom.
The men had to be held until the kidnappers had found a safe route to escape.
The German Embassy in Cairo refused to make any comment about this story.
Abuse from a stepfather "which led to suicide."
A court has been informed that years of abuse inflicted by his father-in-law led a woman to commit suicide.
Michael Trerise, 57, of Stithians in Cornwall, has been jailed for six years after he admitted to eight counts of indecent assault.
The High Court in Truro ruled that he regularly tied up his step-daughter, Stephanie Randle, during her childhood, from 5 to 7 years of age.
Trerise wrote in a letter of confession: "I feel responsible for his death."
The tribunal was informed that Ms Randle, aged 34, committed suicide at her place in Mutley, Plymouth, on April 1 2007.
When she was a child living in Coventry, Trerise had tied her up and blindfolded her before forcing her to perform sexual acts, while his mother was working in the pub.
Trerise and his wife divorced in the 1980s, and he went back to live in Cornwall.
His daughter-in-law went to Plymouth.
But the tribunal was told that Ms Randle, industrious volunteer for National Trust, was haunted by the abuses she had to endure twice a week.
Prosecutor Ramsey Quaife said in court that friends had reported that Ms. Randle, who was a good surfer and cyclist, seemed "emotionally dead," since 2006 and "had lost all hope about life."
In April 2007, her true father, Terrance Randle, found her dead in her apartment in Plymouth.
It is believed that she committed suicide by suffocating herself with a plastic bag.
Mr Randle confronts his daughter's father-in-law who had also written a letter of confession, which finished thus: "I tied her up and bandaged her regularly."
"I have not abused her sexually.
"I feel responsible for his death."
The Judge Christopher Elwen said to Trerise: "You are really bizarre as fetishist, your victim must surely be terrorized, especially at the age of 7 years."
"This unpleasant saga ended with the suicide of the victim.
And what is even more surprising, is that if she hadn't made this gesture, its history would certainly never ended in court. "
He added: "I point out in particular, as described by her father and her mother, the effects of your crime committed for years on Stéphanie.
"Without them, she would no doubt be today a young happy woman, promising, and successful."
Conviction for loss of official data.
The ministerial officer from office staff who had forgotten the top secret documents on a train, in June, will be condemned by the Official Secrets Act, knew the BBC.
The men of the Ministry of Defense was journeying when he forgot two highly classified documents on a train heading to Waterloo.
The documents went through the hands of the BBC before being handed to police.
This is the less serious condemnation of this act, without any insinuation of criminal intent.
The BBC correspondent, Frank Gardner said that this episode had many people from Whitehall.
"They thought this affair would remain between the walls of the Ministry of Defence and the Cabinet Office," he said.
The employee who cannot be named, is accused of breach of Section 8.1 of the act, that is to say of the clause that deals with the protection of data.
The Crown Prosecution Service has suggested that the ministerial officer be placed under the supervision of the Metropolitan Police, given the very sensitive nature of his work related to the Associated Committee of the Secret Services.
The documents he lost contained assessments on al-Qaeda as well as on the resources of the security forces in Iraq.
He has been informed of the decision, on Monday morning and was then transported from his home to a secret location.
Building societies face B&B bill.
The British companies in the building may have to pay a bill of more than £80 million to cover the rescue of the bank Bradford & Bingley.
The government has provided £14 billion to protect the deposits of 2.6 million Bradford & Bingleys savers.
The interests of this loan will be paid by all the companies that collect money from savers, including 59 societies of the building.
The Director General of Building Societies Association (BSA), Adrian Coles, said that it is "irritating" to know that companies and their members will have to pay the piper...
The loan of £14 billion will be repaid when Bradford & Bingleys' mortgages are redeemed.
But the interest that will increase at the same time, will be debited, each year, to the 700 financial companies that collect deposits.
The financial services compensation scheme has confirmed to the BBC, that the 59 building companies are included in this list.
It is irritating to see that the institutions that had a cautious behavior… must now pay some bills of institutions that were much less cautious.
Adrian Coles, BSA
It is proclaimed that each company must pay an amount proportionate to the deposits that it holds, and that intermediary companies must pay around 18% of the cost.
The Treasury evaluates that the interests of the loan will amount in 2009 to £450 million.
This means that companies will have to find £81 million to pay the first year interests.
Adrian Coles, CEO of the commercial committee of construction companies, told the BBC that this decision seemed unfair to him.
It is "irritating" to see that the institutions which had a cautious behaviour at the recovery of the real estate market, must now pay for the much less careful institutions.
According to BSA, no society failed since 1945, date of the first record.
"We should examine all aspects of this affair during the coming weeks to assess the options to avoid that the building societies and their members pay this bill balloon," declared Mr Cole.
The interests for 2009 span seven months from the end of September of this year until the end of March.
In 2010, one will have to pay the interests of the whole year, which could beside double.
Given that the building societies are organizations without shareholder, their members end up paying the bill either by higher annual charge or by lower interest rates for savings accounts.
Milk is increasing up to five penny per litre
People in Jersey should pay more for their milk
Jersey Dairy has announced that it will increase the wholesale price of its milk, by five penny per litre, from Monday.
It is the second increase of the price which follows an increase of two pennies in February, and comes after research carried out by a consulting firm.
The retail sellers must decide whether they will in turn, raise the price to consumers.
Before the increase of February, the wholesale price of the milk from Jersey had been changed for the last time, in 2002.
An ex-PM from Bangladesh has seen its bail refused
A court in Bangladesh has rejected a request for bail on behalf of former PM Sheikh Hasina, who thus runs the risk of being arrested on his return to the country.
Her lawyers said that the court refused to give her bail because of her indictment for having extorted 50 million taka ($729,000) from a businessman when she was PM.
This case is one of many accusations leveled at him.
Khaleda Zia, the longtime rival of Sheikh Hasina, was let out on bail earlier this month.
Sheikh Hasina should return to Bangladesh in a few weeks, but his party, the Awani League, has demanded that the interim military government in the country first give him his full freedom.
Correspondents have emphasized that the terms of her release are contradictory because if she is allowed to leave the country for medical reasons, they do not see why she could not remain free on her return to Bangladesh.
Her lawyers have announced that she will now appeal to the Supreme Court against the order of the Supreme Court.
"The supreme court has rejected the request of Sheikh Hasina saying that it does not require bail because she had been allowed to go abroad for medical reasons," declared his lawyer rafique-ul Huq.
"We will appeal against the order of the Supreme Court"
Her lawyers have argued that she needed this bail to return to the country in order to prepare for the elections in December
Sheikh Hasina should return after October 17, a former leader of the Awami party said.
She was detained last year after the interim military government had assumed power, but was released in June for care abroad.
Sheikh Hasina as zhaleda Zia, deny the accusations that they get.
Concerns for the afghan anti-polio campaign.
In Afghanistan, nearly 200,000 children have missed the recent immunization campaign against polio because of violence linked to the Taliban, said the UN.
The UN has conducted last week a vaccination campaign in the six provinces.
But she says she has not succeeded in making contact with the children in the danger zones of Helmand and Kandahar, located in the South.
A spokesperson from the UN said that it happened despite Taliban promises not to attack or obstruct the thousands of nurses during the vaccinations.
BSkyB looses the legal battle of ITV
BSkyB has lost its trial following the verdict of the Commission of Competition, which forced it to reduce its participation in its rival transmitter ITV.
The court of appeal of concurrency has ordered BSkyB to reduce its share of ITV from 17.9% to less than 7.5%.
The commission has declared that, in the past, MSkyB's participation had prevented competition and allowed it to unfairly influence ITV.
BSkyB bought its share in 2006 following an agreement aimed at preventing NTL, now called Virgin Media, from buying ITV.
In April 2007, the Office of Fair Trading stated that the purchase by BSkyB, of shares in ITV has cast doubt on the actual independence of ITV, causing the Competition Commission to investigate
The Virgin boss Richard Branson, a group of consumers and the regulator Ofcom were all opposed to the purchase.
BSkyB said that to force it to reduce its share of ITV would not be reasonable and on the contrary was excessive – especially given that BSkyB has just given up its voting rights.
New investigation in the American prosecutors' case.
The American attorney general has appointed a special accuser to check the question of the dismissal of nine American prosecutors in 2006.
Everything came out of the report of the affair from the Inspector General of the Department of Justice, who criticised the actions of some cabinet members.
The report was critical of officials in the White House, of legislators and of the former Attorney General, Alberto Gonzales.
The survey is based on the theory of the lawyers who argue that their dismissal is due to political causes.
The Special accuser, Nora Dannehy will now investigate to know if the interrogated officers during the investigation, lied to the investigators, and therefore obstructing justice.
"Serious accusations of potentially criminal conduct, unfounded, have not been fully confirmed nor resolved," said the inspector general Glenn Fine, in his report.
The appointment of a special prosecutor who is able to compel witnesses to lodge, was one of his greatest recommendations.
The quarrel started by the striking in December 2006 of nine American prosecutors made by the American Department of Justice.
At the time, the department had said that prosecutors were dismissed because of poor performance.
But it emerged later that the prosecutors who were fired had not been  criticized more than their colleagues, which prompted some observers to attribute a political significance to these firings.
Some prosecutors have been accused of being close to the Republicans in Congress, while others have refused to investigate the allegations of fraudulent vote against the Democrats.
American prosecutors investigate and pursue lawsuits on behalf of the government.
It is certain that they can be fired at any time, but they can't be for political reasons.
The head of Justice Department, the General Attorney Alberto Gonzales, is accused of being involved in this dismissal case, and at the end, he resigned.
A number of ministerial officers of the Department of Justice have also given their resignation.
The report of the Inspector General was very critical of the role of Mr Gonzales in this case, declaring that it considered him  "primarily responsible" for these redundancies, and finishes by  "abdicating his  role as leader", succeeding remarkably in not getting involved in this case.
Other cabinet officers, including the former Bush collaborator, Karl Rove, have been criticised for not being able to cooperate during the investigation.
The saga of Meat Loaf must be honored.
The rock star Meat Loaf, must be honoured at the Q Awards for his  epic song Bat Out of Hell.
The singer, who will receive an Oscar at the ceremony in London, next week, said he was "honoured" to gain this recognition.
The song of nine minutes and fifty seconds, was the title of the hit of the 1977 Meat Loaf album.
The award ceremony night is presented by Coldplay, with this year, a selection limited to four categories.
Paul Rees, chief editor of Q magazine, said: "There are songs that transcend things like time and style, and Bat Out Of Hell is certainly among these
The song, written by Jim Steinman, has required a great voice like Meat Loaf's.
It begins with an instrumental section that last almost two minutes.
The song was released in the United Kingdom, as a single in 1979, ranking at the 15th place.
Furthermore, his album Bat Out of Hell stayed nine years in the English rankings, and sold more than 40 million copies worldwide.
Meat loaf- or Marvin Lee Aday, his true name- suffered health problems in recent years, had even undergone a surgery to cure his irregular beat rate and after his collapse on stage, in 2003.
In 2007, a bad case of laryngitis forced him to cancel some concerts.
Then they found a cyst on his vocal cords.
A dark street in the city, often forgotten, and maybe soon for sale.
New York has hundreds of avenues, boulevards, streets and other parallel roads, some famous, others merely functional.
And even some old taxi drivers and long-time local residents cannot provide information to go to Extra Place, because they have never heard of it.
The street is located in the East Village and wanders through the north of First Street- not to be confused with Second Street- between Bowery and Second Avenue.
About 30 feet wide and 120 long, it looks like a dusty alley rather than an active road.
No sign indicates the street.
It is virtually impossible to find it on a standard atlas.
This street however has fans.
For example, there is Avalon Bay, the manufacturer of the recent luxury buildings on First Street.
He would like to repave Extra Place, and create a more fluid passage toward the stores and shops, which should open in the new buildings.
Other admirers, including long-time neighbours, have said to be charmed by this short-cut simply because it is one of the last and oldest streets of the block of houses.
But the Department of Real Estate Conservation and Development of the city that manages the street, has no interest in keeping it.
This month, at a meeting of the neighborhood owners committees, representatives from the city agency and from Avalon Bay outlined a proposal authorizing the building contractor to buy the street.
But the committee prefers that the street remains in city's hands, and asked a new proposal to make next month, said Susan Stetzer, local manager of Committee No. 3.
"There are only a few places left that belong to the city, and we would like the city to preserve Extra Place," she said.
"They could offer to renovate and manage it, which Avalon could also do, but we want to maintain it publically."
Avalon Bay announced several months ago that it wanted to repave the little street and install seating there, some would also be used by a cafe for which the builder will grant space.
The proposal of this potential acquisition was made public at this month's meeting.
Michele of Milly, the spokesperson of Avalon Bay, declared that although the company intends to exploit the street, this does not necessarily mean that it wants to be its owner.
"The main interest of Avalon Bay is to reconsider this abandoned avenue and make it public," she said, stressing that it was up to the city to suggest the sale."
Seth Donlin, a spokesman for the Preservation of Property, confirmed that the city really wanted to sell the street, also stressing that the agency's mission was to develop the property rather than to manage it.
Compared to its more colourful neighbour, Bowery, Extra Place has left a slight mark on history.
Some believe that Extra Place bears this name since 1802, since the estate of the big farm owned by Philip Minthorne's many children was split, leaving aside this small peace of land, wich is still abandoned.
The rear entrance of the CBGB, a punk rock monument closed in 2006, has reopen at Extra Place; the street is certainly more famous thanks to the cover photo of the album of Ramones "Rocket to Russia"
"This place was magnificent," said Danny Fields, the manager of Ramones, who took the photograph in November 1976.
It was full of scrap metal, rags, barrels, posters, leaves and strings."
Some residents, including the bloggers who had already spoken about the gentrification of the East Village, opposed the idea of selling Extra Place, saying that this humble, little property should remain public.
Others have announced Extra Place as a true rarity- a part virtually identical to the city that should be left in peace.
Jeremiah Moss, who runs a blog called Jeremiah's Vanishing New York (subtitled "The Book of Lamentations: A Bitterly Nostalgic Look At a City in the Process of Extinction") describes the history of the City and Extra Place, published in 1952 in the New Yorker.
The author, Brendan Gill, wrote: "Extra Place is a small and narrow cul-de-sac, it was dark day and night, the boundaries were done by the rusted doors of a warehouse and some shutters, full of weeks old newspapers which are blowing away along the gutters."
With few exceptions, the street has still the same appearance.
A rat runs agiley down the back alley, in front of a door that was once the CBGB, which has now become the headquarters of a chic clothing store.
Graffiti on the walls, an empty 22-ounce bottle of beer lies next to some newspapers that have just been thrown out.
A few passers-by said they only rarely thought about Extra Palce, and suggested its enhancement.
For his part, Mr Field said he thought some people underestimated the attractiveness of the street in its current state.
"The best years of my life," he declared, "took place in dark, wet and disgusting places".
The Bilingual Debate: Immersion in the English language.
In this part of the programme of Supervision of Education, Bruce Fuller and Lance T. Izumi discuss the stance of the candidates about the bilingual education.
Lance T. Izumi, a former member of studies in California, and former director of the Department of Education in the Pacific Research Institute for Public Policy, is the co-author of the book "not as good as you thought: why the middle classes should be able to choose their school."
Winning over Hispanic voters is a complex business.
The proposals of Barack Obama on education are an interesting example.
The campaign of Mr Obama points out that " African-American and Latino students have less chances of getting a degree than white students." It is true.
To fight these differences, the education programme of Mr Obama supports especially, among many other subjects, "the bilingual transitional education" for those who learn English.
However, the question for Obama is whether his desire to establish bilingual education which defends the teaching in class of languages other than English goes beyond his interest in eliminating the differences.
Take for example, Sixth Street Prep, an elementary school of the east of the Los Angeles County.
The students from this school are largely Hispanic, and with low income.
More than one-third of students, comprising many new arrivals, is studying English.
Of the CM1 students, 100% passed the State math exam in 2008, at the expert level.
Similarly, almost 93% of the students took the english language art exam
This incredible success was achieved through another ingredient than the one proposed by Mr Obama.
Sixth Street bets on analyses, experience, a constant skills  assessment as well as an exemplary attitude.
In addition, and this is an example that Mr Obama could copy, reported Linda Mikels, Principal of Sixth Street Prep, this school has introduced the instruction of the English language using the "immersion" method.
The full immersion in English  focuses on the almost constant use of English in education.
Ms. Mikels, opponent of the bilingual education, has declared "we have had a tremendous success with a student who had just arrived from Mexico, 12 months later, if you go to his class, you would have had no chance to identify him."
"This works, she notices, "it worked for us"
Mr Obama should not take the example of the Sixth Street Prep and repeat it in other schools composed mainly of Hispanic students learning English.
The excellent results achieved by this school speak for themselves; but the education policies within his party (the National Education Association has for a long time supported bilingual education) and his enormous support for bilingual education makes it difficult to predict Mr. Obama's response.
Although he is in favor of immigrants learning English, Mr. Obama recently seemed to consider this issue insignificant, when he proclaimed that we all need to stop ranting about drafting laws regarding the English language.
"Instead, he said, 'You must make sure that your child speaks Spanish".
If Mr. Obama really wants to eliminate the differences, he should carefully consider the education models that work, rather than disdaining them or considering them insignificant.
Clear oil fall following the new concerns of the economic world.
Oil prices have sharply fallen on Monday, because people fear that the rescue plan for financial markets, won't be able to revive the economy.
The futures of crude oil, fell by 7 percent at $99.80 per barrel. The New York Mercantile Exchange, during sales this morning.
Prices have fallen by more than $20 a barrel since last Monday.
These last two weeks, the commodity markets have been shaken up by the financial turmoil on Wall Street, and by two powerful hurricanes in the Gulf of Mexico.
After having seen in July, an increase reaching $145.29 a barrel, prices have dropped to almost $90 a barrel this month, before rebounding again in view of deep uncertainty in financial markets.
On Monday, investors are concerned again despite the agreement on the rescue plan, the largest in history, reached this week end by the Congress leaders.
The news was softened by the recent concerns that the crisis would be durative.
In the last episode of this financial catastrophe, "Citygroup will buy banking transactions of the Wachovia Corporation", said the government on Monday.
Meanwhile, the Belgian, Dutch and Luxembourg governments have partly nationalized the European financial conglomerate, Fortis.
Analysts at Barclays Capital said that the frenzied negotiations this weekend, concluded with the rescue agreement "do not appear to have managed to revive the market".
While the economic situation was deteriorating, demand for raw materials, including oil, should slow down.
"The vision of global equity, interest rates and exchange of the markets, has become uncertain" wrote the analysts at Deutsche Bank in a letter to their investors."
"We believe that raw materials will not escape this contagion.
"In terms of raw materials, our most pressing concern is to understand how far the american virus will spread globally and particularly, in China."
Bank analysts reduced their expectations for next year, given the drop in consumption of oil due to the slowing of economic growth, were then forced to lower by 20 percent the forecasts of oil and gas prices for 2009.
Celebration of the Second Time crucial to improving the record of the team.
After having spent during the last eight seasons, more time than anyone in the Jets uniform Shaun Ellis, the defender thought he had seen it all.
He was watching the second time, when the Jets turned a 0-0 into an explosion.
"I have never seen anything like this," Ellis said.
The second time began after the Jets and the Arizona Cardinals have badly played under some dark clouds.
Then the quarterback, Brett Favre, succeeded in passing to Laveranues Coles allowing a 12-yard touchdown, a harbinger of an afternoon during which their relationship made a leap forward.
Favre found Coles for two more touchdowns, the first when one corner back fell, and the second within 10 seconds of halftime.
"I am not out of my area" Favre said about all his passes to Coles.
"It is an average player."
"We communicate extremely well, despite what people think."
While Favre and Coles were playing wrestling, the defence beat the quarter back of the Cardinals, Kurt Warner.
Darrelle Revis, cornerback, intercepted a wild throw and ran 32 yards for a touchdown.
Eric Smith made another passs and intercepted it.
Linebacker, David Bowens dropped the ball because of Warner.
At the last change, the loss of the ball from Bowens, could be the most charming event
The Cardinals have taken control of this possession during the last 10 seconds, and then the Jets have recovered the ball, Jay Feely made a field goal from 20 yards to take a 34 to 0 lead.
It was for the best that the Jets were able to score in one time.
The coach of the jets, Eric Mangini, to whom we asked to describe this madness, said "the second time or the third?"
When he was told the two- Jets missed 21 clear points in the third quarter - Mangini said: "I can tell you that I enjoyed more the second quarter than the third.
"Many points were scored in a short time."
Rested Gebrselassie surpasses his world record.
Haile Gebrselassie, of Ethiopia, has once again proved to be worthy of his title as best long-distance athlete of the century, having beaten his own world record at the Berlin Marathon on Sunday, when he became the first to run 26,2 miles in less than 2 hours and 4minutes.
With a victory in 2: 03: 59 in a race accommodatingly flat, Gebrselassie beat by 27 seconds his record of 2: 04: 26, played last year in Berlin.
At 35 years old, Gebrselassie won the 26th world record of his successful career during which he won the World championship or the world record for any distance, from 1600 metres to marathon.
Last month, Gebrselassie had missed the Olympic marathon in Beijing, fearing - maybe in an exaggerated way from today's point of view - that the air pollution would increase his problems of asthma.
Instead, he promised to run in Berlin.
Under almost perfect conditions - sunny weather, 48 degrees at the start, 55 at the finish - Gebrselassie won Sunday, with an impressive average of 4 minutes, 43 seconds per mile.
Trail runners such as Gebrselassie and Paul Tergat, both Kenyan, converted to long-distance runners, contributed to the reduction of the marathon's record time by more than two minutes in the past ten years since 1998, when the Brazilian Ronaldo da Costa won in Berlin in 2:06:05.
After the victory on Sunday, Gebrselassie told the reporters having suffered from cramps in the calf two weeks before, and having missed training for a week.
It's clear that the rest let him stay brilliant, but not rusted.
"I am so happy," he declared to reporters.
"Everything was perfect.
I got back to it last week, and today, I had my doubts; but in the end, everything has gone for the better."
He was reproached- especially in Kenya, the East-African rival of Ethiopia- for having overly orchestrated his races by avoiding the stars of the marathon world, relying on the pacesetters as if they were in a track competition, and valuing world records more than the sense of competition.
But this criticism is not diminishing Gebrselassie high capabilities as a runner.
On Sunday Gebrselassie, preceded by four Kenyans, recorded a time of 1:02:04 halfway.
Two elite Kenyan runners, James Kwambai and Charles kamathi continued to defy Gebrselassie after the front of the field had disappeared.
At a little more than three miles from the finish, Gebrselassie made his final push to get away from Kwambai, who finished second in 2: 05: 36, improving on his personal best record of five minutes.
Kamathis arrived third in 2:07:48.
In the women's race, Irina Mikitenko, born in Kazakhstan, now a German citizen, ended a remarkable year, achieving the seventh best time ever with a time of 2:19:19.
The English Paula Radcliffe holds the world record of 2:15:25.
Last spring, 36-year-old Mikitenko surprised everyone by winning the London Marathon in 2:24:14.
She could not participate in the Beijing Games because of potential harm to her back, but promised to win in Berlin, improving on her third marathon, her personal best of under five minutes.
She ran using a clever strategy, letting the group of Ethiopian and Kenyan runners take a substantial lead, then passing them about 18½ miles later.
Askale Tafa Margasa from Ethiopia came second in 2:21:31, while Helena Kiprop, Kenyan, finished third in 2:25:01.
In a City apart, Pride and the hardships of Black Life
Hidden in the development of its great park, from a few miles of the sunny, shiny and gigantic Orlando, there is a quiet town, where are born the pride and the complications of the African-American experience.
"Eatonville, the first entirely black city to integrate, childhood home of Zora Neale Hurston," this description that she wrote in 1935, is not so simple these days. "The city with five lakes, three croquet courts, 300 dark skins, 300 good swimmers, lots of guava, two schools and no prison."
It has now become a city of pilgrimage
Alice Walker, Tony Morrison and Ruby Dee came to the Zora festival that takes place each year at Eatonville to pay tribute to Hurston, the most famous writer of the Harlem Renaissance.
And in different ways, the city that she describes - has become a landmark thanks to its inclusion in the tourist guide to Florida published by The Depression- era Federal Writers' Project- remains a place apart.
It is as independent, dignified, and private than it was already in the 1930s, when Hurston said that the black rural population of Florida was often reluctant to share its true thoughts with the white man, who "knowing us so little, does not know what he loses."
Even if it is the election year of a black president, Senator Barack Obama, who has invoked an open dialogue on the subject of race, many here remain wary of the view from abroad.
"We are very careful about how to tell the story," said Hortense Jones, 59, a longlife resident and the city's oldest parishioner.
"It must be in line with reality.
Eatonville has long been defined as a paradox of triumph and fighting.
It is both a historic model of a takeover from black people and a community of nearly 2,400 people where the poverty rate is twice the national average.
This is a central point but also an example of rural black southist culture - once scorned, other times acclaimed - reminiscent of the birth of slavery in America.
Which would explain why residents are both proud and protective.
The interest in the image of Eatonville which started with Zora, whom everyone here calls Hurston.
She presented her home-town worldwide through sincere, full of dialect books such as "Mules and Men" (1935) and "Their Eyes Were Watching God" (1937).
Five paragraphs in the guide to  Florida transform this city, located right on the exit of Route 17, a road that runs through the centre of Florida, often forgotten, which leads to a chapter of Black history and the human tragedy.
Bold as a bass drum in life as in literature, Hurston led readers to the store property of the first mayor of Eatonville, Mr. Joe Clarke, which was then divided into several private parts.
"go past the road on the left" she wrote, "you will find the modern brown and white public school, with its  ordered gardens and playgrounds that Howard Miller has always taken care of, although he can barely read and write.
She mentionned also Widow Dash's new husband and wrote that Lee Glenn "sells any kind of drinks and everything that can serve coming people.
So, in scarcely about one hundred words, Hurston associated Eatonville with a self government but also with illiteracy, remarriage, and sex.
Of course, Fodor was not this way.
This was not actually a portrait that everyone appreciated.
Zora has described the reality well" said Ella Dinkins, 90 years old, one of the young girls of Johnson that Hurston has immortalised, cited in the songs without colour, interpreted by men who have recognised their beauty."
She added: "Some people did not appreciate."
You always remember Hurston as a living and eccentric person, who was frequently coming back after his family had moved to Jacksonville, Fla.
Augustus Franklin, 77, recalled that Hurston usually arrived in town without warning, in a big Chevrolet, with a cigarette in her mouth and wearing slacks, here where, even today, we are proud of traditional clothing.
Many residents were fascinated, Mr Franklin said, while many were laughing at her.
"People were always happy to see Zora" he said.
But he adds further, swinging in his chair of the back patio which got a view on Sabelia Lake, where Hurston was certainly baptised, "she never stayed too long."
On the death of Hurston in 1960, she was poor and her books were out of production.
Eatonville and the whole world seemed to have forgotten her.
Although she was a star in the field of literature, a contemporary of Langston Hughes and the only black woman at Barnard College in the 1920s, she was buried in an ordinary grave in Fort Pearce, Florida, where she lived.
In Eatonville, no great celebration, and no commemorative plaque for the public.
I do not think that they understood the contribution or the legacy that she left to the world," said Valérie Boyd, author of "Wrapped in Rainbows", a biography of Hurston published in 2003.
A crucial moment occured in the 1980s.
Orange County public officials want to build a five-lane highway downtown to replace Kennedy Boulevard, the community's two-lane main street.
The development of Orlando has already extended Interstate 4 until the west angle of the city.
The proposal was made while Eatonville was just recovering from a difficult period of its history.
A forced integration, among many other things, ended the relatively idyllic isolation of the community.
In the 1950s, the dispute about the mix of races have led hatred to the doors of the community.
"At this time, a bunch of young caucasians came to throw oranges or objects on the people sitting on the side" said Mr Franklin.
"A woman even died."
They threw a watermelon from their car."
In a letter from 1955 addressed to the Orlando Sentinel, Hurston casts doubt on the request of the Supreme Court aimed at forced integration, characterizing its decision in Brown v. Board of Education as "insulting rather than glorifying for my race."
Residents now proclaim that the elimination of racial segregation in schools, although positive in some respects, has diluted the cohesion of Eatonville and has weakened the confidence of the young.
"Black children were used to be kissed - I remember well - we kissed our master in the morning, and in the evening too," said N.Y. Nathiri, Ella Dinkins' daughter as well as head of community of Eatonville safeguarding, a non-profit group.
That lasted, she added, till the time when the teachers and students no longer came from the same place.
"You do not kiss your white teacher because he is white - I mean that there is here, a cultural line of demarcation," Ms. Nathiri said.
The civil rights movement, moreover, helped make room for many other Zora Neale Hurstons - black writers, actors and artists who moved beyond prejudice, as she did, armed with cheerful confidence and personal mottoes such as: "How can they deprive themselves of the pleasure of my company!"
It is beyond me. "
In 1975, the writer Alice Walker went on the anonymous Hurston grave and began to struggle to revive his reputation.
Five years later, an acclaimed biography on Hurston carried out by Robert E. Hemenway, a real best seller, reintroduced her to the American cannons in that way.
The project of the motorway arrived just when the most famous girl of Eatonville had found her appeal back.
And this time, the old neighbours of Hurston regard her as a savior.
The community has begun to organize a Hurston festival to demonstrate the catastrophic consequences this highway would engender.
Hundreds of fans came to the inauguration of the festival two years after, and many are returning in January, to celebrate it.
After many years, the county rejected the proposal of the motorway.
"The fiasco of the motorway with five lanes, very fast, a real civique pride" said Miss. Nathiri.
Ms Boyd summed up everything declaring that "Zora saved Eatonville."
The victory against the motorway project allowed him to change his own image.
Non residents, such as Rachelle Munson, a lawyer who has come to our church since 1993, began to come in large numbers, and residents were beginning to reconsider the past.
Eatonville is classified historic town since 1998.
A single-subject library (renamed Hurston, of course) opened in 2006, on the magnificent, repaved Kennedy Boulevard.
Today, Eatonville remains an anomaly in Florida: six miles from Orlando, it feels at all times like an old-fashioned back street on a rainy summer day, small as it was when it was founded by 27 black families in the 1800s.
(there are today 90 percent of blacks)
Foreigners who come to discover Eatonville's history, its raison d'être, are still treated with caution.
We must ask permission for most of the interviews, and some things - such as the walls of Eatonville's old church, painted by the white men, illustrating black men in the fields - should not be photographed.
Many in Eatonville, like Ms Jones, a courageous teacher with a soft spot for bright red, are still afraid that their insular community is not well understood.
However, given the festival Hurston expansion, a certain level of local pride appeared.
The young in particular, tend to view Eatonville the way Hurston viewed her entire race: beautiful, problematic, neither better nor worse, but proud, creative, hardworking, crazy and mixed, just like the other ethnic and racial groups in America.
It is sincere civic affection we hear in the voice of Mr. Franklin's nephew, Edwin Harvey, 18, who expects to return to Eatonville after college to work for the local government or for the police force, which needs additional personnel.
And even the youngest, like Alondra and Alexia Kenon, 11-year-old twins from Winter Park, seem to have correctly learned the description of Eatonville.
"Most people passing through that area will think: 'Oh, this city has nothing, compared to others' Alondra Kenon said after Mass last Sunday.
But if you stop and take time to contemplate history is a very beautiful city. "
Here in New York, all speak fluent finance.
Still, nothing has changed.
If the tourists in Manhattan stayed far away from the newsstand and the giant television screens in Times Square, they would not realize that they are in the eye of the cyclone.
They never would believe believe that, in the glass-enclosed beehive of offices above their heads, the bankers and hedge fund managers who rule New York are experiencing "the worst office workday" since the Crash of 1929.
Delivery men continue to slip on the pavements, with their trolleys and their shelves of muffins for morning meetings.
The Latinos still drag themselves along between the residential buildings, like mules, with about 50 fancy shirts hung from yokes on their shoulders.
Office workers continues to be queuing up to buy their morning sandwich from retailers, and it is always impossible to find a taxi between 4PM and 7PM in week.
I had not felt the crisis despite the completely pessimistic stories until this afternoon when I decided to go open a new savings account.
Fortunately I had planned to work in the late afternoon, because I discovered at my local branch of JP Morgan Chase, about twenty people queuing.
Neither in front of the cashiers' windows nor to withdraw cash or to make a deposit, but before the customer service window, there where the usual customers ordered their checkbooks, tourists requested the directions for the Macy store, and new customers opened accounts.
Most of those in front of me, I would learned that later from Starr, my "personal allowed banker ", were all queuing up for the same reason as me.
Not in the same way, because they had already withdrawn their economies from the smallest banks, such as those of New Jersey, Pennsylvania and Staten Island.
They have withdrawn their money from the savings accounts of called thrifts (such as a building society), credit unions, and the kind of local savings banks and their subsidiaries which only function in a state, and which say they are treating their customers like their family.
In a recent past, 15 of these banks have gone bankrupt.
These days, Washington Mutual, a bank with capital of $327 million went into trusteeship, and while New Yorkers were returning home for the weekend on Friday evening, another bank, Wachovia, with savings accounts of a value of $440 million, desperately searched for a buyer to save it.
The office and shop attendants who stands in front me, fearful of another potential collapse have transferred their money to a bank that seems more reliable to them, the one which made most of bailouts in Wall Street.
The ordinary New Yorkers have become very familiar to the world of finance in the last weeks.
"I heard a woman in my local Chinese supermarket, speaking on the telephone about Lehman Brothers, the bank that just bankrupted, and his meagre CEO Dick Fuld, with the same familiarity that she could have to criticise a colleague.
And Lyn, the doorman in uniform of my building, has changed the subject of our usual conversation about Brad and Angelina or the shipments of my fruit and vegetable merchant.
She said to me, after my visit to the bank, "I put all my savings in the monetary fund market.
"I have changed, I do not want to take risks".
Desecrated Muslim graves, while Austria oscillates toward the right.
Heinz-Christian Strache, who abandoned the right-wing of the Austrian Freedom Party, and Filip Dewinter, from the Belgian-right Vlaams Belang, are taking part in a demonstration for the organization of "Cities Against Islamization" in Antwerp, on Thursday, January 17th, 2008.
They carry road signs showing mosques crossed out in red.
The police accuse the far-right extremists of having desecrated an Austrian Muslim cemetery, the weekend of the far-right political parties' victory in the country's general elections.
More than 90 graves were severely damaged at the cemetery of Traun, near Linz, between Friday night and this morning; it is, according to the police, an organized action.
The offenders painted on several graves, Jewish symbols such as the Star of David; the detectives think however that that could have been done to disguise the extremists' feeling of hatred towards Muslim immigrants.
This accident could be somehow linked to the elections.
A spokesperson of the local Islamic community said they were "deeply shocked" at the announcement of this desecration, which occurs right during the religious month of Ramadan which nears its end.
Austria think seriously about to get its courage back, following its oscillation towards the right at the parliamentary election yesterday.
The two right-wing parties that have won almost 30 percent of votes, the Freedom Party and the Alliance for the Future of Austria, led a anti- immigration campaign. Some of their slogans were even seen, according to critics, as xenophobic.
Heinz-Christian Strache, the leader of the Freedom Party who won more than 18 percent of the votes, launched his campaign against wearing headscarves and burkas, and has even expressed his opposition to the food halal.
During his final race in Vienna, he spoke of "a European brotherhood" to prevent the rise of Islam.
The two parties try to prevent the construction of mosques and minarets, declaring that they would be a political symbol of the Islamization of Austria and Europe.
The polls and the analyses carried out just after the elections, have defined the extreme right as the most powerful political bloc of  the country, which is demonstrated by the majority of young voters who made the difference, as anxious about their future in the European Union.
Gary Glitter forbidden to travel abroad.
The courts have banned the glamour rock star, Gary Glitter, accused of sexual abuse on children, of expatriation in France and Spain.
The magistrates imposed a ban on Glitter six months after he had expressed to the officials in charge his intention to travel to Spain from France.
Police in Kent had established the travel ban last Thursday after having proved to the judges Glitter's culpability of child sexual abuse.
Glitter, or, to use his real name, Paul Gadd, was not present at the hearing before the court of limited jurisdiction in Ashford, but was still represented by his law firm, Corker Binning.
A court spokesman said, "Thursday, 25 September at the Ashford court, police in Kent has asked for an application to prevent Mr Paul Gadd to travel in France and Spain until March 25.
"Paul Gadd was not present".
Glitter, 64ans, has informed the authorities that he wanted to go abroad, even if he has to be recorded in the lists of people accused of sexual abuses.
He must inform the authorities if he wants to go abroad for more than three days.
He must also inform the police, 7 days before his departure date.
If he does not announce his movements to the authorities, it could face a sentence of up to five years imprisonment.
The Kent police has declared that they will not discuss individual cases nor any potential Glitter displacement in the county.
A spokesman of the police of Kent has said "the police of Kent will do everything necessary to protect our children as well as those from abroad.
"We believe it is easier to monitor someone who remains in the United Kingdom because we have devices capable of managing any potential risks much more efficiently".
"to protect the people of Kent is the most important thing to the Kent police, and we are closely monitoring the behaviour of those who are accused of sexual abuse in the region, in order to minimise the potential risks to the public."
Glitter returned to the United Kingdom last month, having spent 27 months in a Vietnamese prison for having abused two little girls, respectively 10 and 11 years old.
When he was released, Glitter took a flight to Bangkok from where he should have boarded on a flight to London.
But he said not to be feeling well, and refused to head to London.
The Thai authorities stopped him at the passport control checkpoint, and at the end, he went to Hong Kong.
The Chinese authorities have refused him entry into their territory, and so was forced to return to Bangkok; Thai police and immigration officers have insisted that he goes back to England.
He finally arrived at Terminal 3 at Heathrow Airport on August 22nd, and remained there while his lawyer, David Corker, went to court of limited jurisdiction in Uxbridge, West London, to register on the list of people accused of sexual abuse, as required by Scotland Yard.
In the past, Glitter had already served a sentence of four months in the United Kingdom, for possession of child abuse pictures.
A source of the Interior Ministry said that Jacqui Smith, the minister of the Interior has been reassured and happy to know that Glitter had been forbidden to travel in France and Spain.
"I photograph the master out of the stage to capture elements of his character" Günther Bauer - Photographer.
Neither heels, nor carol clothes.
The essence of the great masters of flamenco, freed from all tension to get the relaxed look of the man or the woman.
On one hand, the artist.
On the other hand, the person.
Inseparable except in privacy, in these times, unknown to the public, where we discover intimate gestures and stolen looks of artists who do not care about getting up on stage.
In Flamenco - People, German Günther Bauer mixes the theatricality of some stage sets including singers, dancers and guitarists with this lesser-known side of the artists.
In this project, the photographer takes up the particular iconography of flamenco from different angles.
Included in the programming for the Month of the Flemish Photograph, the exhibition "reflects the international importance of flamenco, greater every day," explains the creator, clarifying that "Flamenco - People"..."it can be any of them, but after having seen the photos, the observer realizes that they are not typical images of artists on stage.
These people photographed "in the street" are artists able to transmit on stage the passion, the sadness, the joy... in captivating the public.
To capture moments of personality of these artists one should not take photographs on stage.
They have unique personalities and character.
What interested me was to create an intimate atmosphere, which would allow me to catch with the camera some personal moments of the flamenco stars."
With the festival called "Chant Populaire des Mines" in 1997, Bauer began a long trip to photograph singers, guitarists and dancers with a camera that used photographic plates.
These are portraits, which, thanks to the choice of camera and equipment, call to mind classic photography.
The implementation of various styles breaks away from the classical  image,by giving it a touch of modernity, this reflects the perception  of the flamenco, according to Bauer: "A music with very traditional roots that is changing and that surprises every day."
It is not dancing nor singing itself, but the personality and the character of the artist which captivate the public with his art.
The search for essence and for magic has been the constant in the work they are presenting nowadays here in the gallery El Fotómata.
Flamenco stars such as Diego El Cigala, Chano Lobato, Cristina Hoyos, Enrique Morente, El Lebrijano Antonio Canales, Vicente Amigo, among others, are part of the selection made from around 70 artists photographed.
The project has turned into an anthology of flamenco, which will soon be published in a album of portraits exhibited at the gallery.
Bauer's passion for portraits has led him to repeat the idea two years ago with the "Portraits of old sportsmen" ("SportARTproject").
Although the concepts are different in "Flamenco - people," the photographer admits that he loves photographing the portrait of people, getting to know them and being able to enter their life for moment more or less.
I believe that in photography, portrait is the most difficult.
You find yourself in front of people, characters that you sometimes do not know or who only give you a few minutes to make a photograph of them.
Despite these circumstances, as a photographer, I always try that my ideas become reality".
This collection of portraits of contemporary flamenco dancers  entitled "Flamenco-people", is on show at the El Fotómata gallery, located at 20 Mata Street (the streer parallel to the Peupleraie d'Hercule) through next 16 October.
Vargas Llosa confesses that the novel he is writing is "real courage."
The novel takes place in places that no one knows and deals with unfamiliar subjects, but once again, Mario Vargas Llosa is determined to move forward with the new project he is working on, a novel whose main character, Roger Casemant, an Irish nationalist who lived for twenty years in the Congo and traveled through the Amazon.
The favorite to win the Nobel Prize in Literature confessed yesterday at the Hay Festival Segovia, that the novel which is currently keeping him busy "is very daring" and that "all shows that he should not write it."
"If I was reasonable, I would not do it, but I will do so and I hope to finish it," – he concluded in his speech at the festival of exchange of ideas and thoughts that for four days saw in the city of the aqueduct  hundreds of writers, of historians and journalists and thousands of people.
The author of "the city and the dogs' was the most awaited person of the third edition of the festival and has fulfilled its contract.
Vargas Llosa, who won the Hay Festival prize by a majority vote of the participants, had attracted a full house in the Juan Bravo theater.
The host of the festival, Felix Romeo, has been faced with a public fascination that has not been seen since the last time during which the Peruvian, with a phenomenal memory and with a large dose of humour, has described the birth of his literary career, which is due to "his desire to read" and "to Live from New experiences"; how he wrote "a very methodical way" thanks to the hard work of documentation, correcting and rewriting a part of the text to face its "lack of inspiration"; how Faulkner, Victor Hugo and Alexandre Dumas have influenced his vocation, and how his memories inspire his novels.
The hispanic-american novelist acknowledged that "there is no way" to measure and whether books can change life. "but I refuse to believe that literature is pure amusment, a fleeting experience" said Vargas Llosa, who underlined that it "has an effect" and "makes people less similar" because it demands that writers  "do not to stoop to the frivolity" and live up to their vocation.
The bad weather spoils the Pozoblanco fair.
The festival of banderillas which concluded the Pozoblanco fair's bull races was suspended yesterday morning after the mounted toréadors had verified that the arena was unworkable.
In this way, the organizing committee, in agreement with Fermín Bohórquez, Pablo Hermoso de Mendoza and Leonard Hernández, has decided to suspend the celebration of the race of the bulls.
The bad weather has been hard on this circus, as two carnivals out of three could not take place.
On Saturday, it's the rain that prevented the planned celebration of the second bull race.
On the poster, were José Luis Moreno, Curro Díaz and Juan Bautista, who would have had to come face to face with one another in the arena in Castilblanco.
Thus, only the festival on Friday took place
On Friday, the winner was Daniel Luque who cut off three ears and who was carried aloft in triumph, after having made tasteful, graceful arms gestures to the bull.
The afternoon even Alejandro Talavante concluded on two banderillas planted on the back from the bull and a cut ear that the steps discovered applauded more than its combat in itself with the bull.
Even worse for El Juli, who entered the arenas of Los Llanos without pain or glory.
For his fight with the second bull, after a much better fight, he got booed by most of the public.
Inspection by police of a van in the province of Alava: two thousand kilos of hashish found
Ten minutes to five in the morning.
Traffic control by the police of Euskadi (Ertzaintza) at the border of the town of Armiñón (Alava).
The policemen stop two occupants of a van and these last two run away.
Its cargo, more than two tons of hashish, enough to arrest them.
The police followed them and have arrested one of the two occupants, a 28-year-old man, identified as A.A.J., according to information disclosed by the Department for the Interior of the Basque government.
The person arrested was accused of drug trafficking and falsification of documents.
The incident took place when various officials from the Traffic Unit of Alava performed vehicle inspections on the N-1, at the border of the town of Armiñón.
They were about to stop a van to inspect it when the driver disobeyed orders and suddenly accelerated, and then the inspection began.
The policemen began their pursuit until the vehicle stopped two miles further on the slow lane, where the two occupants got off to flee in a forested area.
The Basque police have finally arrested one of the two occupants and have seized the 2,178 kilograms of hashish that they were carrying and which they found after having inspected the van, an Iveco Daily.
The rear part of the car was loaded with haschich bundles. Then, they proceeded to its transfer to a police station to do complete inspection and weigh the drug
Moreover, officials noted that the license plate had been "falsified" because it did not coincide with what was written on the van's grey card, that is also why they have charged the detainee with the crime of falsification of documents.
The Ertzaintza continues the investigation to stop the other suspect, who has managed to escape and to determine the origin of the seized drug.
The detainee, A. A. J., 28 years old, has been placed in custody for the various steps and will be judged in the following hours.
Actress Heather Locklear arrested for driving under the effect of a drug
The actress Heather Locklear, the famous Amanda in the TV series Melrose Place, was arrested this weekend at Santa Barbara (California) for driving under the influence on medication.
A witness viewed her doing strange maneuvers trying to get out of her garage to Montecito, according to what a spokesman of California's police patrol told to People magazine.
The witness said that around 4.30 p.m., Locklear "pressed down on the accelerator, making a lot of noise, and in going backwards several times while trying to get the car out of the garage, it rolled over his sunglasses."
Shortly after, the witness, who earlier had not recognized the actress, saw that Locklear stopped in the middle of the highway and got out of her vehicle.
This person, at this moment, called the emergency services because "she was concerned about Locklear's life."
When the police patrol arrived it found the actress sat inside her vehicle, which was partially blocking the road.
"She looked disoriented," which is why agents led her to the specialist centre in drugs and alcohol for a test.
According to a spokesman for the police, the actress was cooperative and alcohol abuse was discounted from the beginning, although "according to the observation of police officers at first sight, we thought that Locklear was under the influence of a drug."
Locklear has been arrested having been suspected of driving under the influence of a substance that has not been specified, and has been imprisoned around 19.00 hours and released a few hours later.
Two months ago, Locklear came out of the clinic in Arizona where she was interned for care after a nervous breakdown.
Llamazares has asked the Andalusian federation of the United Left to assume its responsibilities in the Silva case
The general coordinator, deputy of the Gauche Unie, Gaspar Llamazares, said today that the regional federation should take a decision on the former advisor to Youth and Sports of the city of Seville, Francisco Manuel Silva, who resigned last week after being accused of having special treatment to the members of his family.
"In these cases, I am really federalist, and the Andalusian organisation will have to shoulder its responsibilities by itself" said Llamazares regarding the political party's conduct that it will adopt in Seville's city council.
However, the leader of the United Left has requested that the investigations show proof of "transparency" for the irregularities that Silva could have committed, "The United Left has always defended this kind of case that has a maximum degree of transparency".
He also stressed that the political party has "very strict ethical codes for all officials."
"Sangre de Mayo," Garci's gamble
Based on Benito Pérez Galdós' stories, José Luis Garci recreates the famous battle of the Spanish against the French in "Sangre Mayo," which is the most ambitious film of his filmography with nearly 15 million budget.
The filmmaker has tried "to stage the many characters and to illustrate the social analysis," that he has always admired in the implementation of the famous novelist, he explained today during the presentation of the film, with Quim Gutiérrez and Paula Echevarría at the head of the long list of players.
The film "Sangre Mayo" that lasts more than two-and-a-half hours will be released in cinemas next Friday and will then become a TV series of more than four hours for Telemadrid.
Big fan of the literature of Galdós, José Luis Garci asserts that with this filming he has accomplished "a child's dream" thanks to Esperanza Aguirre, who asked him,  three years ago, to film a commemorative film for the two hundred years of the 2nd May madrilene, something he has always accepted when the narrative stuck to the historical facts.
The 15 million Euros provided by the municipality of Madrid are for Garci "a unique opportunity" to reproduce with the appropriate decors and clothing the atmosphere of "a Spain which chose the wrong leader for the battle, since the fight for independence led the people to rebellion under the reign of Ferdinand VII," he pointed out.
But the filmmaker regrets not having secured as much funding as he did for the films "Captain Alatriste" and "Goya's Ghosts" – more than double that secured for "Sangre de Mayo" – because he was not able to film a few of the scenes in the script written by Horacio Valcárcel, with whom he has collaborated for almost his entire career.
The director of "Volver a Empezar" has influenced his usual way of working, his staging of the actors, with whom he rehearses before filming, and his doing no casting, since that seems "humiliating" to him and he believes that "the role of the director is to go to the theater and to movies to keep himself informed."
Many actors in "Sangre Mayo" rehearse in front of the camera, like Miguel rellán, Carlos Larrañaga or Fernando Guillén Cuervo.
Nominated four times for an Oscar (he has won one), Garci believes that the three films that represent Spain this year before the Hollywood Academy, "Sangre de Mayo," "Sept Tables de Billard Français" and finally, the winner, "Les Tournesols Aveugles," are not representative of the young Spanish cinema, "which deserves to be better known," he said.
Garci does not expect a prize from this film.
"At the beginning you believe you are working for posterity, then you realize you are working for prosperity, and now you are happy just to make one film more," explains Garci after more than 30 years of a professional career.
Isabelle Bayón gets into the skin of Seville dancer Tórtola Valencia
One Sevillian dancer will pay tribute to another Sevillian dancer.
Carmen tórtola Valencia, daughter of a Catalan father (florenç tórtola Ferrer) and an Andalusian mother (Georgina Valencia Valenzuela), was born in the District of Triana and at the age of three years went on living in London with her family.
She was a dance free dancer and expert in oriental dances.
She had an exciting life as a pioneer of the liberation of women, as Isadora Duncan, Virginia Woolf or Sarah Bernhardt.
She was vegetarian and Buddhist, and advocated the abolition of the corset which forbade the free movement of women.
The life of this woman who left her mark in the history of dance in Europe between the two World Wars has fascinated Isabelle Bayón.
"I wanted to work with Pepa Gamboa and she offered me to interpret the Seville dancer Tórtola Valencia, and it seemed unbelievable to me".
According to the dancer, "we're not trying to tell his life but to bring his thinking.
The titles of his dances made me think about flamenco.
Thus, "the dance of the butterfly" reminded me of a popular Cuban dance and "the dance of the snake" of some tangos.
Her dancing was sensual and they told me that my way of dance was similar to hers", she says.
The staging is thanks to two outstanding contributions: Miguel Poveda who will sing once more Isabela in one of his performances, as he had done at "The puerto abierta"; and that of the professor Matilde Coral, who was unusually willing to colaborate with the one that was her pupil.
"Matilde transforms Tórtola into a mature character.
I am pleased because she has agreed to play a role in my work and it honors me. "
The staging is also due to the musical compositions and to the guitars of Jesús Torres y Paco Arriaga, to the folk song of Michael Ortega, el Pulga y Moi of Morón; to the percussion work of El Pájaro, as well as to the viola of Rafa El Viola and to the collaboration of an actor, Juanfra Juárez, "who plays the role of the long-time companion of the type of artists who were regarded as divas."
This work also tells, in a certain way, about the life of this woman who had exhibitions in such faraway places, especially for the time, as India, the United States, and Russia, but also throughout Europe, since she usually lived in London.
"I wanted to memorialize her because I believe that it is women who have an enormous influence in their time and nowadays, no one knows and values her body of work," affirms Bayón.
The show will begin at 8:30 p.m. at the Lope de Vega Theatre
The publication of "Diary of a recently married poet" concludes the Triennat
The presentation of the first illustrated edition of "Diary of a Recently Married Poet " in the church of St. Stephen' in New York, where Juan Ramón Jiménez was married to Zenobia in March, 1916, is part of activities planned by the Ministry of Culture of Andalusia, to celebrate the "triennium of Zenobia and Juan Ramón '(2006-2008), held to commemorate the 50th anniversary of the concession of the Nobel Prize for literature and their deaths.
In this way, the "Triennat Zenobia and Juan Ramón" is coming to its end with the republishing of this work with, the International Congress that took place in New York, with the restoration of the Nobel Museum and with the touring exhibition « Juan Ramón Jiménez: this poplar of light » who was inaugurated in May last year and who, after having travelled across various Andalucian province, will go to New York at the International Conference.
Similarly, the Ministry of Culture of Andalusia bought eight hundred copies of "Diary of a recently married poet", published by Pedro Tabernero and illustrated by Jacobo Pérez-Enciso to perpetuate the work of one of the most famous Andalusian poets.
America pleases less without Paul Newman
"Sometimes God creates perfect people
Paul Newman was a part of it. "
This sentence is from actress Sally Field, who has worked with him in "Lack of Mischief" and clearly illustrates the despair of the American cinema, and the whole of America, with the striking idea that Newman is not part of this world anymore.
He had a hard time getting an Oscar
He was no longer acting since 2007.
Everyone knew that he was ill.
It was a blow to everyone.
"Sometimes what one feels exceeds any expression, and now I have lost a great friend," Robert Redford began crying, 'my life and my country were better, thanks to his existence ".
No one was afraid to get ridiculous or to exaggerate.
One of the fathers of cinema and the country died during a particularly dark time, when terrorists and stock markets are frightening, the Americans' self-esteem has fallen very low, while desperately searching for reasons of dignity.
When times are so tough and without reason to live, only admiration is left to human beings and it is not necesseary to be Luis Cernuda to like Paul Newman.
It was for everyone an ideal of beauty and truth.
He was an enemy of Richard Nixon and a defender of lost and defeated causes, like the foundation to fight drugs created in honor of his older brother who died from an overdose and the creation of his own brand of organic food.
This was a victory for a country which has been struggling to assert itself against a suicidal food culture.
This expanding wave of admiration swept across Hollywood without caring about the nationalities or the passports.
The latest James Bond, Englishman Daniel Craig, has ascertained that no James Bond has died before him.
Another Englishman, the Oscar-winning Sam Mendes, said that work with Newman marked the pinnacle of his career.
The bad boy coming from Australia, Russell Crowe, dared to name Newman as his greatest inspiration.
"He set a high standard for us", noted George Clooney, who is perhaps the only person today who tries to break though onto the screen as did Paul Newman: by being very honest and having a serious private life away from the camera lenses.
It is still not easy or possible in the media jungle nowadays.
But there is he who tries, and Paul Newman is one example.
After a divorce, he was married for fifty years to Joanne Woodward, to whom he was faithful even though he did not lack for opportunities not to be.
"But why should I eat a hamburger outside my home, if I have a beef in my fridge?", he used to joke.
In the sky, he proudly attends the his daughters' meeting with his fans on earth, something which is unusual in America.
"Among all major roles that he interpreted, he was very proud to be the providing husband, the father in love, the caring and philanthropist grandfather ," they say.
Madrid in the race for the organization of the 2016 Olympic Games
And yes, the dream of many of us is for Madrid to hold the Olympics, after the failure in 2012, it could come true in 2016.
But I wonder if we are ready.
If we take the example of yesterday's race: We are not!
They call it 'the perfect race', but to me, it was the worst race in which I have ever participated.
If they had taken into account any errors that occurred during the race, they would have received a pass mark.
But let us look at everything in detail and from the beginning.
The errors begin with the withdrawal of the jersey numbers, which force you to go ahead.
This is not bad, but if they make you move it would be better if they give you everything (including the electronic chip to shop).
Well no
They made you go there only to get the players' number (first mistake, traveling just for that) and (after a long queue) surprise!, there were only size S jerseys (second mistake, because I need a size XL).
In what world are we living?
Is it because of the economic crisis they have decided to buy only tiny tops with less fabric that are therefore cheaper?
Well, this is nothing compared to what happened the day of the races.
Apart from the fact that you have to go there very early to have the electronic chip taken out, the line is 15 minutes long and, what's more, you have to leave your knapsack at the entrance.
The wait lasted more than 35 minutes, which is incomprehensible since 11,000 people are expected for these races.
Since there was a long line, the competitions started and we still had  not left our knapsack at the entrance, although once that was done, getting it back was even worse.
Moreover, the rain has accompanied the wait of more than 40 minutes during which rebellions and assaults of the barrack took place.
I believe that about 500 people will have pneumonia tomorrow, and some people like me will not even be counted in the classification with the exact time, because I think the chip they gave me did not mark the beginning correctly.
Of course, if they were asking me to cite one example of perfect race, this one would certainly not come to my mind.
And I believe that we will always be able to dream of becoming the host city for the 2016 Olympic Games.
Microsoft is seeking a receptionist (virtual).
At the MIT Microsoft conference on emerging technologies, a new system of image recognition and human interaction has been presented; it's a kind of artificial intelligence, not very smart but able to perform a few basic tasks, such as calling a taxi (or in the Microsoft case, a shuttle to move around the company campus) in response to what it was asked during a talk.
Thanks to a movie camera and a system of recognition of forms and faces, this "receptionist" can know how many people there are in place, who they are - including remembering what positions they occupy - and listen and hear the keywords of their conversations.
But also to pool them according to conversation groups
In the presentation video, the receptionist detects a third person but she understands that she does not belong to the group that is speaking with her and that she is not part of the company.
She asks him if she is here to visit someone and she tells him that she will answer him shortly.
All this with no blue screen.
Impressive.
But of course this represents the future.
Now the company has other businesses to focus on, for example on the next version of its operating system, Windows.
This week we also discussed about a strategy change at Microsoft.
Windows 7 will be lighter and it will no longer have as many associated programmes.
Steve Ballmer found that if the computers were sold with the necessary instead of unnecessary applications, they would be five times faster.
This represents a discovery since Microsoft, version after version, has not stopped adding features and "extras" to Windows.
The strategy change is welcome.
Microsoft is right, its operational system loses importance, but so does its software.
When Google Chrome came to the network, I was one among those who joined the theory that Google Chrome was the first step for Google to compete with Windows.
Several people have rightly pointed out that a Web browser is not an operating system.
The operating system will always be necessary since it is the essential base for the hardware and software to understand each other.
It stands for your wife or husband whenever you have something to tell your mother-in-law.
It is true.
It will never disappear but we must see the "death" of the operating system not as an absolute truth, but as a relative truth.
Ballmer confirmed the idea this week.
People are less and less paying attention to the operating system but increasingly to the navigator.
We switch on the computer only to use Firefox, Explorer or Chrome and every day, people spend more time browsing the Internet than browsing windows.
To whom do half the applications submitted with the system serve?
He who can do more, can do less
And Windows 7 will contain fewer applications, much fewer than Vista.
Less heavy, less crowded, less complex.
For now, Microsoft is more interested in launching its own online services so that they ultimately become an alternative to Google.
They desperately need this, indeed, and I'll show you an example.
The picture in this article, was taken at the beginning of this month in one of the rest rooms reserved for Microsoft's employees, in Redmond.
On the distributor of drinks, a poster asks them to use their own search tool -- "Your research. Our future."
In 2006, a study concluded that 66% of Microsoft employees used Google to seek information on the Internet.
Last week a delay occurred in the new version of Windows Mobile 7.
It will not be released at the beginning of 2009 but towards the end of 2009 or even in 2010.
Microsoft will surely try to lauch on the market, at the same time Windows 7 and Windows Mobile 7.
The telephone, after all, resembles a computer more and more.
But the launch of Android being late and the iPhone being already on the market, this will be expensive for them.
The Stunning Marcel
Pablo Picasso wore it on the Côte d'Azur, Leonardo di Caprio wore one in Edward Zwick's "Blood Diamond," the same as Al Pacino in Francis Ford Coppola's "The Godfather" and it is part of the classic uniform for muscular gays.
And if we try to list all its appearances, it could also cite the strapping moustached which created the weight in a travelling circus.
It is not simply a men cotton undershirt, tight and sleeveless.
English people call it 'tank' but the stunning Marcel of Brussels stands out among all the others.
First, by his flamboyant name - although he is known by the name of "Marcel" - which has to do with sports because, according to legend, he took the name of boxer Marcel Cerdan, one of singer Edith Piaf's lovers.
The "Marcel" differs from others in its excellent cotton, it its single-sex cut, in its distinctive logo and in the small (barely recognizable) Belgian flag that these most well-known undershirts have at the neck.
But be careful, because the Belgian brand does not only produce tank tops.
But it also produces sweat-shirt, old fashioned boxers, cardigans in Kashmir, cotton trousers, babies, mini-shorts...
Clothes designed for the underwear comfort.
Even if it is a shame to wear them only as his underwear.
They have too much charm.
"I want to become a young mother; the candidate does not worry me"
Her huge resemblance to her sister has not prevented her to develop its own personality.
Monica Cruz is small, but full of vitality.
Currently the Cruz sisters take very seriously their new activity in fashion.
According to Monica, they are not only beautiful and famous girls who are lending their names.
She was present at the promotion the Mango brand has done in Paris at its new headquarters but also at the presentation of the most important fashion awards that the Spanish company sponsors.
Monica is warm and timid.
Tell us what you are doing in Paris.
I came to present the new collection that my sister Penélope and I created for Mango, for the new Fall/Winter season, as well as to attend the presentation of the second edition of the "Mango Fashion Awards" and the dinner of the Opera House in honor of Valentino.
A very intense, but at the same time exciting, day awaits us.
What is your new collection created for Mango for this fourth season based upon?
The cinema of the 1950s and 1960s dazzles us and we learn much from it for our collections.
I very much like to stroll around downtown and look at the women to see how they are dressed, how they coordinate their clothes. I do it often.
Dancer, actress and draftwoman, you are a very versatile woman: aren't you?
I think yes but ultimately everything is joined, and these activities have much in common.
Since I was very small clothing pleased me; I desired to go to my grandmother's house to look in my aunt's closets and to see her clothes.
It was brilliant, almost better than going to the amusement park.
Then, when I became a dancer, I was always trying to take care of the way I dressed.
Dancers like a lot being well dressed for the classes and the tests, in order to look themselves in the mirror and to feel good.
And in the role of an actress, when you wear her clothing, it is at this point that you really dive into the skin of the character.
As a result, everything is connected.
You were not long ago 30 years old: Was it hard for you?
Not at all.
I feel better than ever, my 30 years of age delight me.
I think that the woman is more mature, has more experience and enjoys life with fewer problems.
The biological clock do not scare me.
I have done all the things that I wanted to do since I was very small and this has given me a lot of inner joy.
So, do you think about becoming a mother?
Of course, I want to become a mother because my body is asking me for it and, moreover, I want to become a young mother; I do not want to lose this.
Regarding the candidate, I do not worry.
What I will do is give my son a great deal of happiness and raise him with a great deal of love.
Let's come to the cinema, you're waiting for the different films you made last year to be released.
It is true, I am looking forward to them coming out.
I, who am a woman stemming from theatre, am very anxious and worried, I would like to have everything now but of course that is not possible.
I look forward to the release of the films 'The última Hora' and 'En busca de la tumba de Cristo'.
To see what you would think of it...
A few days ago you started on the footbridge with Naomi Campbell, did not you?
Don't say that!
I did not climb up the footbridge to do the mannequin.
Quite simply, Naomi Campbell has called me, I know for some time to invite me to participate in London a parade of charity for its association with the support to women and the clothes that we exhibions - I have exhibited two clothes from our collection created for Mango – were auctioned off to collect money for the NGOs to Naomi.
The people that Naomi is a person with a tender heart.
They say so many things about her, I do know her, many things are not true.
Moreover, such a good side of Naomi fascinates me.
She asked me to parade for such a noble cause, but if she had asked me to do a handstand, I would have done it anyway.
The important thing is to make life better for women in the third world.
Repeat offenders of drink-driving will have to install the system 'alcolock'
The Minister of the Interior wants the driver who has had more than three administrative sanctions for blood alcohol count, has to install in his vehicle a system that prevents the car from starting when drunk, or if he does not exhale.
The initiative was already announced last June, and since then it has appeared in the report of the Minister of State that this initiative is seen as a pilot project that will last a year.
His goal is the reinstatement of the driver by offering him road rehabilitation courses.
The State Minister responsible for road safety but also the General Management of Road Safety and the Technological Institute Foundation for the automobile Security will take part to this initiative.
According to statistics, between 30% and 75% of motorists arrested for having driven more than once in a state of intoxication, drive again.
The alcolock would prevent this because it is a device plugged on the vehicle which measures the alcohol level in the breathe and prevent the car ignition when the driver does not blow before; or if the driver's alcohol level is higher than permitted.
Its cost is higher than 1,000 euros and is at the driver's charge.
In this respect, a study conducted in the United States in 2007 indicated that the vehicles equipped with this system reduced up to 65% of offences during the first year of installation.
And in Spain, we believe that this could save the lives of 115 people each year.
This measure confines itself to administrative penalties for two reasons: to cope with these behaviors before they become criminal offenses.
And facilitate its implementation, since judicial reform can be made in uncomplicated ways while penal code reform, however, requires reform of the existing law.
The device is not yet available on the Spanish market in any commercial form, although some industrial and official vehicles already have experimental ones.
Precisely tomorrow, the Congress members will vote for an initiative of the Spanish Socialist Party, which proposes to set up in the school buses this system, as has been done in France.
In Mexico without 'peep-toes'
At 5:40 p.m. exactly, at the officially designated time, the Spanish Air Force plane in which the Prince of Asturias was traveling landed at the presidential hangar at Benito Juárez Airport in Mexico DF.
The sun was on the verge of going down, but its beams were still forcing us to shade our eyes with our hand to see the royal couple getting down from the aircraft.
At the foot of the staircase, the Spanish ambassador and other authorities were present.
A few hours before I had asked in the street, to the taxi driver, if he was aware that the Spanish Princes were visiting the city to finish their official trip.
- Oh, well, we cannot go to the airport to pick up customers at this time... Are you from here or…?
- No, No Sir, I am Spanish but I have lived here for two years.
- Ah, very well...
But the Mexican press knows very well who the Princes of Asturia are and knows the importance of the trip.
They are several waiting in the warehouse at the airport near the red carpet and in a military row with 27 Navy soldiers.
The Prince is smiling and dressed in navy blue, the Princess, with her hair in the wind, is dressed quite soberly and is not wearing her usual "open-toed" shoes; perhaps they had told her that a storm threatened.
They make a brief stop with the photographers before moving into the room where the official retinue awaits them.
At the door of the hotel where they're staying, one of the four largest hotels in the city, a funny journalist from the Mexican television is waiting for them.
The most prestigious award in fashion
There is certainly no more appropriate place in the world to present a fashion price than Paris and there is certainly no living designer more extraordinary and better-living than Valentino.
Mango has just presented the second edition of the Botón-Mango Fashion Awards, in order to strengthen the international image of the new talents of fashion.
The winner will be awarded a prize of 300,000 euros.
Yesterday, Sandrina Fasoli, the Belgian who emerged the winner of the first edition, watched her models in the window of Mango at 54 Boulevard Haussmann in Paris and was almost weeping with emotion.
Of course this is the second largest shop of the brand in Europe that has been opened with 1.335 square metre area.
The first shop is situated in London.
The events and our desire to thank the designer Valentino, president of the jury at the competition, caused us to be at a luxury dinner at the Opera Garnier of Paris.
With the neighboring table being that of the extraordinary Chagals family, the presidential dinner prepared by Mango, seemed even more spectacular.
With a heavy heart and keeping her chin up, because of the recent death of her brother, Nati has put on a Mango outfit and some breathtaking Elah jewelry, and arm in arm with her son Luis – a handsome man of almost two metres tall – she accompanied Valentino to her dinner prepared in his honor.
Andik, the owner of Mango, a chivalrous man, as well as Baron de Rotchil ended the evening without their jacket because they had lent them to two women.
Monica Cruz, who came to the shop wearing slacks and a blouse – from her own collection - and who totally changed her appearance for the dinner by donning a long, sexy, black gown, was moved when during her nighttime visit to the opera house, accompanied by Goya Toledo, they showed us the ballet's rehearsal room and, remembering the good old times, she gripped one of the barres and made a "deep plié."
Inés Sastre did not stay for the visit of the dependencies of the palace, but she has shown us before on her mobile phone some photos of her son.
The morning after, we had the pleasure to see Olivier Martinez - another handsome man who drives bikes- and John Travolta, who arrived at the Intercontinental Hotel in Paris, with his own bed sheets and towels, after requesting that all the smells be priorly removed from his room.
Stars under the beautiful starry sky of Paris.
Oh, this is life.
1001, the anti-stress number.
There is not only 1,000 but 1,001 ways to forget the chaos and the frenzy of everyday life.
And to top it all, they are all listed in a book which will bring relax to booksellers on the 30th of September.
The alarm clock almost makes us sad when it rings every morning at 7 a.m., but it is even worse when you think to the restless rate that contemporary life imposes us.
The office is synonymous with tension and the computer with back pain.
The stress represents the trouble of the 21st century.
But there is neither one nor two methods to combat daily fatigue and the problems linked to the working world.
But precisely 1001, not one more or one less.
Apart from yoga positions, classic massage or "spa" treatments, Susannah Marriott assembles in the pages of a book an entire "menu" of methods suitable to each person's taste and time.
The antistress book is entitled '1001 Ways to relax' and will arrive to the booksellers directly from Pearson Alhambra & DK publisher.
If someone believes that it is not possible to achieve some tranquility in places such as the workplace or through personal relationships, this 'guide' denies such a belief.
Moreover, this handbook offers other methods such as contact with the nature or 100% natural recipes that help you relax.
If the adrenalin is not running in your veins to restore balance in your body and if stress has become a problem, it's time to sit on the sofa, disconnected from his mind and concentrate on the reading.
Talking in one's sleep.
Some children talk at night.
I am not referring to those who wake up very awake telling us about something that happened the day before, but children who speak in their sleep.
The first time this happens, it may surprise you, but in reality it does not matter.
It is a benign alteration of sleep that is called somniloquy.
It is quite frequent, especially among children and teenagers.
It is sure that there is more than one who speaks during the night.
This phenomenon can appear very sporadically (once in a lifetime, for example, associated with an episode of high fever), or more regularly (every day, once a week, once a month...), the day after the child does not remember anything.
There is no single cause which determines its appearance
They are often linked to other alterations of sleep such as nightmares, night terrors, enuresis (bedwetting) or sleepwalking, but it is not always the case.
As we already said before, they can also be associated with very strong fever, with situations of stress or overexcitement.
Anyway it is a phenomenon little studied.
The intensity with which it happens is also very variable.
He may speak with a small calm voice, with isolated words, murmurs or on the contrary with screams, tears, long speeches...
In cases where somniloquy occurs very frequently, it would be wise to observe the child and to consult a specialist, to check if there is a problem causing a lot of anxiety and to get an explanation for this problem.
We have said this is a benign distortion, so there is no treatment, unless it is linked to another alteration of sleep that can be treated (e.g. if it is linked to sleep apnoea or to stress).
What we can do is be aware of a number of very simple preventive measures such as:
Try not to annoy the child before he goes to sleep.
Therefore, look for quiet games and avoid programmes or television series that are more or less violent.
With very nervous children who have difficulties relaxing, relaxation techniques can be used to help them calm down internally.
This will allow the child to have a more peaceful sleep.
Once the sleep talking starts, try to stay calm.
Remember they are harmless for the child and the next day he will not remember what happened.
Useful advice
Do not wake him up.
It is useless because He is unconscious and you would wake him up
Even if he speaks, he sleeps and therefore rests.
Remember that if he feels very anguished several times, it is advised to consult a doctor or check what is causing so much anxiety to the child.
If you understand what he says (which is not usual), don't be tempted to question him to obtain any information.
You will get nothing, because while sleeping, he is not aware to arrange his thinking.
Moreover, you will hear what he says, but you will not know what he is dreaming of, so be careful how you interpret information and what conclusions you draw from this.
Never say to the child that you can interrogate him during the night in order to know his secrets.
Not even in jest.
This causes a lot of anxiety.
In conclusion, do not worry, this is nothing really bad, it is an episode that lasts only a few minutes.
Finally, Illhaeusern...
Illhaeusern has finally found the road to victory again on its own ground after a long period of scarcity.
Without playing a great match, the Yellows and the Blacks created for themselves the greater number of opportunities and succeeded in converting one into the match victory.
The pace was not well maintained during this meeting where the attackers had difficulty expressing themselves.
After a first attempt by the visiting captain Kauffmann which brushed the frame on a shot from far away, Illhaeusern began to slightly dominate and in turn Fonderflick from far away, then Hirn shooting high, Roman from his toe tip or even Diebold came to tickle Dannemarie's defence.
Opposite, there was a block in the middle field and there just remained restless Riahi at the tip of the attack.
The early second half would be decisive with first, two opportunities signed Riahi and Temporale for Dannemarie, and, immediately after, the initial score for the Illhousiens by Marais, well positioned to take a shot after a save on a first attempt by Diebold (53rd').
But the Illhaeusern striker will not be able to savor his happiness long and will have to go back to the locker room a dozen minutes later and thus leave his teammates at a numerical disadvantage.
But Dannemarie will not be able to benefit from it and will not pose large problems with one Eleven illhousien which just moved back a little “to compact” its defense, except in the very last seconds of play where, after a large misfiring, the ball passed very close to the transversal.
Sarkozy at the meeting of angry fishermen
Before taking off to the United States, Nicolas Sarkozy will make a detour via Brittany.
Faced with the strength show of the fishermen who disrupted severely the access to several ports in Brittany and Normandy on Monday , the President of the Republic decided to go on Tuesday morning to the port of Guilvinec in Finistère, to meet their representatives.
The latter have promised to welcome him "in a constructive spirit" and hope that he "will come with concrete proposals."
A presidential visit comes at the same time as the General Assembly's "crisis committee" created by fishermen in Brittany to take action against the soaring price of fuel, which has reached a record of more than an average of 1.14 Euros per liter.
According to spokesman of the Elysée David Martinon, the president "will discuss with them about the solutions that can be conceived to help their businesses regain competitiveness and to secure the conditions of employment and pay of the seamen".
Nicolas Sarkozy is expected resolutely by the fishermen.
On Tuesday morning, they have conducted truck out operations in the Morbihan and Calvados, causing almost 10 km of traffic jams .
Quiberon's marina was also blocked, but the ferries to Belle-Ile had not stopped.
A dam filter was put in on the peninsula of Quiberon.
The sailors have already shown their determination on Monday by burning, from dawn, tyres and pallets in front of the fuel warehouses in the harbours of Brest and Lorient, while the demonstrations took place in Concarneau or Saint-Brieuc.
The movement has spread to other ports along the Atlantic coast and the English Channel, like Sables d'Olonne, in the Vendée, where the trawlers have stayed at the quayside, or at Le Havre, where some twenty or so boats have blocked the movement of cargo ships.
The fishermen from La Turballe and Le Croisic, Loire-Atlantique, have stopped in the evening the blockade of the major Total refinery of Donges.
Those of Boulogne-sur-Mer have decided to wait for the holding of the Wednesday meeting at the Department to decide upon any action.
In Guilvinec, the "crisis committee" should indeed decide on Tuesday on the follow-up to the movement and on its participation in the interview scheduled at the Ministry of Agriculture and Fishery in Paris.
But some fishermen from Brittany do not want to be represented by leaders of the national committee of fishing, which has not supported their movement.
"The strike will continue" because "the fishermen will not give up" and "do not want to move to Paris', has for example announced Liliane Cariou, president of the committee of Lorient fisheries.
Professional fishermen, who pay no taxes on diesel, currently pay about 50 centimes per litre but they asses that the threshold of profitability of a boat can only be reached with a diesel below 0.30 euros per liter.
Paul Newman the magnificent
The unforgettable interpreter of "Butch Cassidy and the Kid," died from complications due to cancer at the age of 83, in his house in Connecticut.
Hillary and Bill Clinton, Nicolas Sarkozy, George Clooney, Julia Roberts, Robert Redford or Sam Mendes have saluted the movie legend and the committed actor, Paul Newman, who died at 83 years old.
Embraer maintains its delivery forecasts in 2008
The Brazilian aircraft manufacturer counts on 215 airplanes being delivered this year despite the threat of recession that looms over the global economy.
The fourth worldwide aircraft manufacturer, Embraer, is maintaining its delivery forecasts for 2008 with 215 aircraft delivered, reaffirmed Fredrico Fleury Curado, its President.
In the first half, the aircraft manufacturer delivered 97 planes.
The Brazilian manufacturer has high hopes for the Chinese market especially for airplanes running the gamut from 30 to 120 seats.
To date, Embraer has delivered 41 planes to Chinese customers in eight years.
AIG would be considering giving away more than 15% of its assets
The insurer American International Group, which the American monetary authorities have bailed out, considers to give more than 15% of its assets to repay the 85 billion dollars which had been advanced to them, according to the Sunday edition of the Financial Times.
AIG is ready to explore the sale of most of its businesses beyond its international life insurance business and its retirement business in the United States, says the newspaper which quotes sources close to the project.
The Board of AIG met on Sunday evening to review possible transfers, according to the FT.
No confirmation could be obtained from AIG.
The assets that AIG is planning to sell includes its subsidiary in air leasing International Lease Financial Corp., its participation of 59% in the reinsurer Transatlantic Holdings and its property portfolio and its investments in the private equity, adds the FT.
No final decision has been taken on these cessions, the FT continues.
AIG must rapidly get its hands on some cash to repay the 85 billion dollar loan the Federal Reserve made to it or the American authorities could take 80% of its capital, cutting proportionally the holdings of the current shareholders.
Analyzes Paris Historique of the meeting Historical Morning Meeting Morning Meeting
The New York Stock Exchange had a record drop on Monday after the House of Representatives rejected the Paulson plan to rescue the banks: the Dow Jones lost 6.98%, a never before seen loss of almost 800 points, and the Nasdaq 9.14%.
The Dow Jones industrial average (DJIA) plunged by 777.68 points to 10.365,45 points.
In terms of points, the biggest fall in its history (684.81 points) had previously been recorded on 17 September 2001, the resumption of trade after the terrorist attacks of September 11.
The Nasdaq index, predominantly technological, has given up 199,61 points to 1.983,73 and the broader index Standard & Poor's 500 8,81% (or 106,85 points), to 1.106,55 points, according to the final closing figures.
Already depressed at the start of the session, Wall Street has thrown open after the unexpected reject by the House of Representatives, of the bank rescuing plan which was supposed to regain stability in the markets.
With 205 votes for and 228 votes against, the representatives denied Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson the resources he was asking for.
Almost two Republicans out of three rejected his plan.
"It is a bad signal sent to the market, which sees Congress unable to adopt a plan", reckoned Lindsey Piegza, of FTN Financial.
"It shows how far the market counted on that plan", she added, fearing that a project adopted within several days would come "too late."
"If the project is effectively dead (...) then the baton will be quickly passed to the Fed (the American central bank) and the other central banks to handle the crisis, which would further tighten credit conditions," said Brian Bethune, chief economist at Global Insight.
And accentuating further the sense of urgency, "every day that goes by  brings the fall of a financial institution" in the United States, pointed out Mrs Piegza.
After the collapse of Washington Mutual on friday, the authorities have organised the takeover of the banking activities of Wachovia by its rival Citigroup.
In Europe, the crisis has sharply accelerated, leading to emergency measures to banks in the United Kingdom, the Benelux countries, Iceland, and in Germany, a sign that the markets are "not only to an American crisis, but a global crisis," added the analyst of FTN Financial.
The bond market has strongly risen.
The yield of a Treasury Bond for 10 years has fallen to 3.632%, against 3.827% on Friday evening, and the one for 30 years to 4.161%, against 4.357% the previous day.
Obama, winner on points of the first televised duel
The first debate on Friday between the two candidates for the White House was followed by another to know who, between John McCain and Barack Obama, won.
Not surprisingly, the headquarters of Republican and Democratic campaigns have declared their own victory in this televisiual duel which would have been followed by a third of American families.
Political analyst David Gergen believes that John McCain's delivery, while honorable, has not been "brilliant" enough to allow him to halt his decline in the polls five weeks before the presidential election.
The Gallup institute, whose opinion poll published on Saturday gives an advance of five points to Obama (49% to 44% for McCain), thinks it is the Democrat who has come through it the best.
Among the undecided voters, who are those who count, Obama has emerged the winner for 39% of respondents, while 25% of them grant the victory to McCain, according to a CBS poll.
Obama should be able to confirm his advance on Thursday with the good performance expected from his running mate, Joseph Biden, during the first and only public debate with his rival, Sarah Palin.
"It would be a mistake to underestimate her.
She has good instincts ", has, however, warned Bill Clinton this weekend.
The septuagenarian McCain has been putting forward its indisputable experience concerning foreign policy, while stressing the "naive" of his opponent on these issues which were in the heart of this first showdown.
"Senator Obama does not seem to understand that..." he accused several times.
"I do not believe that Senator Obama has the experience and knowledge needed to be president", has he also said.
An angle of attack hammered since yesterday in the Republican TV commercials.
Obama has stressed that he represents the future.
Undaunted, he was concise and accurate.
He highlighted his ability to make good decisions, and to restore United States image around the world.
"McCain hasn't understood yet, while Obama has," said this weekend, a Democrat tv ad, which accused the Republican not to have grasped the impact of the crisis on 'Joe the plumber. "
"During the 90 minutes of the debate, John McCain had much to say about me, but nothing about you," Obama criticized yesterday, in front of 20,000 people assembled for an election rally in North Carolina in a driving rain.
He has not even uttered the words "middle class" or "workers." "The financial meltdown clearly benefits Obama, who is considered by Americans as the most likely to save the declining economy.
"The coming week could be a turning point," said yesterday, the influential Democratic Senator Charles Schumer.
The Democratic Representative Rahm Emanuel, a former Clinton administration official, compared the "good economic instincts" of Obama to those of Bill Clinton during the financial crisis of 1998.
For the Democratic candidate, the current debacle "is the final verdict of eight years of bad economic policy implemented by George Bush and supported by Senator McCain."
Reiterating that he would manage to reduce taxes for 95% of Americans despite the unpredictability of Wall Street, the senator from Illinois has also indicated that the achievement of the country's eventual energy independence by promoting renewable energy was his first priority along with the establishment of a system of health insurance.
McCain sought to build a set of 45 nuclear power plants by 2030.
Carefully, both candidates ducked the questions about the financial rescue plan of $700 billion (470 billion Euro) adopted last night by the Congress and extremely unpopular.
In Minsk, "You have noticed that there was an election, haven't you?"
Young and opponents demonstrated Sunday evening on the main square in the capital of Belarus to reject the general elections results in advance.
A few hundred Belarus met on Sunday evening after the polling places on the central square in Minsk had closed to protest against the fraudulent nature of the election.
While no result had yet been announced, many young people came to demonstrate against the regime of President Alexander Lukashenko: "the dictator, resignation."
Some admit to not even having voted: "What's the point, as they will do what they want with my voice," a young says.
They do not believe that the government which has been looking good to foreign observers in order to resume discussions with the European Union is ready to carry out a democratic turn.
The sanctions, including the visa ban for 40 Belarussian leaders and the freezing of some assets, could be lifted if these elections were considered clean by the observers.
They have not been according to the opposition.
"We have been excluded from Electoral Commissions and our observers were unable to participate in the counting", lamented Yuri Potemkin, the spokesman of the Union of Democratic Forces, a heterogeneous grouping of twelve parties.
"It is a cosmetic change, says Alexander Milinkevich, former opposition candidate in the presidential elections of 2006 and leader of the pro-European movement, because the important thing is who counts the votes, and for us, it is the executive power.
If MPs of the opposition enter Parliament, it is that they have been appointed, not elected.
But their entry to parliament can mean space on television, meetings in the regions and some draft laws."
The opposition must enter the political game because "we must initiate dialogue with the European Union.
Because if our economy, which is heavily indebted to Russia, enters a crisis, and that we do not reform ourselves, we will be at risk of becoming a protectorate of Russia.
And yet we want to be independent.
The opposition fears that the Organisation for Security and Cooperation in Europe that has followed the election process will not recognize the validity of the ballot.
It underscores the fact that the participation figures seem too high, and that the general practice of voting in advance (26% of the voters in Minsk) has opened the voting to all sorts of manipulation.
"You have noticed that there was an election? the Social Democrat leader Alexandre Kozouline asks, one of the two remaining political prisoners released in August this year.
There was nobody in the polling stations.
And there will be at the maximum five opposition parliament members, those best suited to power."
The silence of the night falls back on the October place.
On television, President Lukashenko and the members of the Central Election Commission are congratulating one another on their success.
Interview - Blood become safe again.
Yesterday, Héma-Québec celebrated the 10th anniversary of its founding, and its President, Dr. Francine Décary, had reason to rejoice, because Héma-Québec has become one of the world's safeest and most effective suppliers of blood.
And above all, he has regained the public trust, which had been seriously dented by the contaminated blood scandal in the 1980s and 1990s.
As we know, the national blood reserves managed by the Transfusion Service of the Canadian Red Cross were infected with the acquired immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and the hepatitis C virus during the 1980s.
Facing this tragedy and the public discontent, the Canada's government  has set up in February 1994 a public inquiry, chaired by judge Horace Krever, which was intended to shed light upon the circumstances which led to such a tragedy and make recommendations to make sure that such a disaster will never happen again.
While judge Krever was long to submit its report, some provinces have established a committee aimed at planning a new system of blood management in Canada.
In Quebec, the Gélineau committee has fulfilled this term.
Following the Délineau and Krever reports, two suppliers have been created in Canada: Héma-Québec to serve Quebec and the Canadian Company of blood to supply all the other provinces and the two territories.
"In 1998, when Héma-Québec began its activities, barely 38% of people still trusted the system of blood in Quebec, the Dre Décary recalls.
The situation was discouraging.
Because of consistent efforts to improve blood products' safety and field work during the last years, we have returned to public confidence ", she said before proudly stating that in early 2008, nearly 94% of Quebec's population trusted Héma-Québec.
Dr. Décary nevertheless keeps in mind the fact that "trust is something extremely fragile."
Since its creation, on September 28 1998, Héma-Québec has applied the principle of precaution.
At that time, there was in Europe a sudden increase of numerous cases of the human form of mad cow disease, a new variant of the Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease, says the woman in charge since the organization's founding in 1998.
"And we did not know at all if this disease could be transmitted by blood.
We then relied on one of the key recommendations of the Krever and Gélineau reports, according to which when we don't know and it may result in a serious illness, in this case Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease that is characterized by a degeneration of the brain that leads inevitably to death, we establish a process of elimination.
So in April 1999, they refused the blood of people who had stayed more than a month in the United Kingdom since 1980.
But a few years ago, it has been proven beyond doubt that this disease is transmitted by blood.
This episode has this shown us that the precautionary principle that we applied made sense."
In 1999, there appeared on the market a much more sensitive technique for testing the start of HIV: nucleic acid testing (NAT), which can detect the presence of the virus right in the donors' blood, rather than antibodies against the virus, which is what was done in the tests used till then.
NAT allowed us to shorten the silent period, which extends from when the person was infected to when the first viruses can be found in the blood using our techniques, the specialist explains.
One could reduce this period to less than a week.
We have this way substantially decreased the risk that some donors are infected without knowing and without possible detection.
These improvements have helped to considerably lower the risk of contracting AIDS from a blood transfusion.
Today, one person out of 12 million is put at risk of receiving HIV contaminated blood.
"In other words, it means that 12 million of blood products will have to be distributed before someone is infected with HIV.
As Héma-Québec distributes each year between 400,000 and 500,000 blood products, it will take over 24 years before that occurs a case of HIV transmission by a blood products.
I think we can feel at ease today about receiving or prescribing blood transfusions to restore health," asserts the head of Héma-Québec.
"Our challenge for the next decade is to maintain the safety of our products.
You never know what pathogen will emerge in the system.
Not later than last year the Chikungunya virus appeared on Reunion Island, which like the West Nile virus, is transmitted by an insect in the blood.
We must always be vigilant," continues Dre Décary before emphasising that in addition to a safety supply, Héma-Québec must also provide an adequate supply.
"Needs are increasing because the population is ageing.
The anticancer treatments being more aggressive, patients often need a recharge of red blood cells or blood plates.
The ageing population also has implications for the network of blood donors who averages only 3% of eligible Quebecois to donate blood. "
Any healthy person, aged 18 and older who meets eligibility criteria, can give blood every 56 days, or six times a year.
On average, 14% of people who offer to give blood are not accepted, because they are suffering from AIDS or malaria, for example, and if they have traveled in a country where there is malaria, they will be excluded for a period of a year.
"With these 3%, we manage to maintain an inventory that meets the needs of hospitals.
Shortages are very rare.
But we must renew the members of this network of donors as they get older and can no longer give blood.
But it is difficult to convince people to give their blood, but especially to keep them and encourage them to become regular donor.
Life today is so unbridled, one rarely finds the time to spend an hour giving blood," Francine Décary laments.
With an annual budget of $297 million, Héma-Québec provides not only blood products, but also human tissue, including bone grafts, heart valves, the eyeballs and skin which is used almost exclusively for serious burns.
These tissues are analysed, processed and frozen before being stored at Héma-Québec which also runs the only public bank of umbilical cord blood in Quebec.
The umbilical cord which was once considered as a biomedical waste is full of blood rich of stem cells that can be used to treat serious diseases, such as leukaemia.
"We celebrated, a few weeks ago, the banking of our thousandth sample of umbilical cord blood, and we predict we will get more than a thousand per year.
We should begin to offer it for transplants at the beginning of next year," says Dre Décary who described this programme of umbilical cord blood collection as very popular.
"Several mothers are disappointed not to be able to have access to it," because Héma-Québec cannot afford to offer this complex and expensive program in all hospitals in Quebec.
Soccer - The Impact in semi-finals.
The Montreal Impact has qualified for the play-off's semi-final round of the USL's first division, thanks to a score of 3-1 (4-3 in total goals) against the Sounders of Seattle, yesterday, during the second and decisive match of the series quarterfinals in total goals, at Saputo Stadium.
The midfield player Antonio Ribeiro scored the winning goal in the 90th minute of the game.
After a first half without a goal on either side, midfielder David Testo and Rocco Plancentino scored the other nets of the Montreal team.
Roger Levesque was the only one to foil Matt Jordan for the Sounders.
Reminding that on the first match of the away-home series, on Friday, Impact suffered a 2-1 defeat in Starfire Sports Complex, in Tukwila in suburban Seattle.
The Impact will go up against the Vancouver Whitecaps in the semi-finals.
Saturday night, Minnesota, the Thunder has filled a deficit of 3-1 in the return match to win 4-3, but nevertheless the Whitecaps acceded to the round semi-final 5-4 goals in total.
Impact team should face the Whitecaps Friday and Sunday, but the series' details will be confirmed today.
In short - Victorious goal of Kovalev
The number one trio of the Canadian is ready to begin the season.
The unit composed of Alex Kovalev, Tomas Plekanec and Andrei Kostitsyn has enlivened the attack in a Canadien win of 3-2 on penalty kicks against the Panthers from Florida, last night, at the Bell Centre.
Kostitsyn, the star of the match, scored a goal, Plekanec got two assists, and Kovalev pocketed a pass in this victory, the fourth of the French in six preparation matches.
Kovalev gave the victory when marking the unique goal of the shooting.
"I am not ready yet, the Russian warned.
I must have another match to feel comfortable."
"He tried to do too much in the first period, noted Guy Carbonneau.
But I think he appreciated the end of the match.
He had a nice ovation."
Charest is betting on the Northern Plan
The prime minister does not exclude to trigger elections before the end of the year
Immediately after the end of the Liberal party's main council, Jean Charest came yesterday in Jean-Talon in Quebec, where the new health minister, Yves Bolduc (left), is trying to get elected in todays by-election.
"Push the limits of our last great frontier of the North": such is the long-term ambition that Jean Charest presented with visual force while remaining entirely in the broad outlines, at the end of the General Council of the Liberal Party of Quebec, in Lévis, yesterday.
During his speech, a sort of picture mill was projected behind him.
Turning in loops, on three huge screens, there were spectacular snapshots of hydro-electric dams, of mining, of Quebec seen by "Google Maps, of maps, etc.
Great resources as in an election period.
Besides, during the press conference, the Prime Minister refused to rule out that he would trigger the elections this autumn, although he pointed out that his time-sheet was very busy.
The "Plan North" "is the fourth part of a "vision" that the prime minister claims for Quebec, one of a new economic area, which includes an agreement on the workforce with France, an agreement between Canada and Europe and agreements with Ontario.
Often mentioned in the speech of the prime minister recently, the opening to the North - the territory North of the 49th parallel - had never been introduced.
The prime minister, however, restricted himself to explaining why the North was "a jewel with enormous potential," but did not set a specific time, state the investment amounts or disclose the precise priority of the future projects.
At most a few avenues which could be developed further: notably hydroelectricity, the forest, but over all the mining sector, led by the growth of developing countries and the reconstruction of public infrastructure.
The North contains "nickel, zinc, copper, platinum, gold, silver, iron, titanium, and even diamonds," according to Mr Charest's enumeration.
This "territory twice as large as France," it is in our homeland, it is in Quebec.
Not only is it home, but it is within us," he insisted, as if to show well that he was soliciting a national myth.
Quebec has much built itself in its relationship with the North, he said: the gold rush in Abitibi, the Quebec engineering, Bay James.
"It's up to us, it's our future", he added, after having made a dramatic pause to contemplate the vast map behind him.
The North, 70% of the Quebecois territory, includes a portion of Labrador that Quebec has always claimed, the prime minister said at the press briefing.
"This is a traditional position that all governments have reiterated.
There is a line on which there is not an agreement for a very long time and, when the opportunity arises, I repeat that position on the name of the government ", he said.
Besides, "with climate change, we must rethink our view of the North," he said speaking of the Northwest Passage, which is open all year because of melting ice.
In this new geopolitical context, the Prime Minister believes that occupying the territory is a duty.
And the inhabitants of the territory, the First Nations and the Inuit?
The prime minister said that the government of Quebec would pay great care to them and that the project would benefit them, especially young people.
Two former ministers from two different parties, Pierre Corbeil and Michel Létourneau (a former member of the Parti Québecois in Ungava), have already begun consultations with about thirty communities.
An interministerial committee which is chaired by Benedict Pelletier and in which Julie Boulet (Transport and Natural Resources) plays an important role has begun its work.
The prime minister does not exclude the possibility of a great meeting, "not necessarily a summit", but a moment where "we will have a common vision".
The development of the North would beside be in conformity with the principles of sustainable development.
The North Plan will be "concerted, methodical and environmentally friendly," he promised.
Jean Charest described this "vision" as being in continuity with that of the liberal Prime Ministers who preceded him.
"As the liberals who preceded us, we thought differently to transform the challenges into new opportunities of growth and development."
This has been one of the recurring themes at the end of the week, which began on Friday with a great cocktail event to highlight the 50th anniversary of the arrival of Jean Lesage as head of the party.
One of the resolutions adopted proposes to rename the Beauharnois plant to Adélard-Godbout dam.
"From Godbout who created Hydro-Québec, to Lesage who manufactured the quiet revolution of the nationalization of hydroelectricity, to Bourassa who made the Bay James, our party has been able to shape the future," said Jean Charest.
At the press briefing, he cited another reference, conservative, this one, the "Roads to the North" programme of John Diefenbaker, prime minister from 1957 to 1963.
While addressing the project of the hydroelectric dam of Eastmain1a-Ruper, Mr Charest stressed that its commissioning was scheduled for 2012.
"That remains between us, but I expect to be there," he confided to his supporters, prompting their sustained applause.
Indeed, the prime minister, who said in April that there would be no election in 2008 and probably not in 2009, has not eliminated the possibility to trigger an election this autumn, what the law allows him.
He underlines that his schedule is full, especially by a Federation Council's mission in China and a summit between Québec and New York.
The general Council of the weekend has given to the liberal leader a platform containing nationalists resolutions, in particular « constitutional aspirations » which have gone without a hitch: the PLQ especially calls the recognition the « specificity of Quebec » in the Constitution.
He also hopes Quebec will appoint Canadian broadcasting and telecommunications council members and that these would have a veto on decisions taken in Quebec.
From the side of the opposition, the outlines of the North Plan were welcomed with scepticism.
The head Péquiste, Pauline Marois, has brought forth again the policy for the development of the Nord-du-Québec that the Landry government  launched in 2001.
According to her, the liberal government, coming to power in 2003, has renounced to apply it.
If it had done it, "we would be further ahead today," commented Mrs. Marois alongside her candidate, Françoise Mercury, in Jean-Talon (balloting which is taking place today).
The ADQ said it supports government adoption of the Northern Plan.
"But what we hope is that it will not be just a spectacle," commented leader Sébastien Proulx, replacing Mario Dumont, who is returning from vacation today.
Letters - A disgraced country
It is Mr Vic Toews, former 'Justice' Minister (ironically) in the Harper Cabinet, who last summer made bold to say about Louise Arbour that she was a "disgrace" to Canada.
To cast shame like that on this woman who has conducted an unending struggle for justice and who deserves all our admiration says as much as on the entourage of the Prime Minister as on Stephen Harper himself.
We are facing a government which is the only one, of all the Western countries involved, not to have brought back its national locked in the concentration camp of Guantánamo.
A government that takes no account of the fact that Omar Khadr was a young teenager at the time of the crimes of which he is accused.
The only government that, despite the fact that Canada has signed the Geneva Convention, denies his own word and leaves a child soldier languish in inhumane conditions.
The only one that relies on a parody of justice to assess the guilt of the accused.
Let's remember, for the record, that UNICEF, Amnesty International and the Canadian Bar Association, in particular, are calling for the repatriation of Omar Khadr, so that he can have a fair trial in Canada.
This same government that condones torture: it matters little that a young adult is now psychologically destroyed, probably forever after years of abuse.
We are not aware of it yet, but we are currently undergoing a rampant erosion of our rights, our freedom and our "democracy", this word Harper keeps waving and which sounds so hollow in his mouth.
Now is the time when no moral no longer exists: we can bully, torture, arbitrarily imprison a Canadian citizen according to the goodwill of a government leader so far in the minority (What will be then after October 14...).
A number of voters believe that they will find salvation in a party which extols virtue, law and order: they do not see that this government has abandoned the basis of our country's reputation and dignity.
The shame, Mr Toews, it is here, in this renunciation, and not anywhere else.
Free opinion - Barrick Gold's orwellian speech
In its edition of September 17th, Le Devoir published a letter from Mr. Patrick J. Garver, Deputy Director of the Canadian mining company Barrick Gold.
Pursuing an Orwellian sort of logic, he says that the largest gold mining company in the world has brought a defamation suit of six million dollars against three authors and a poor, small publishing house in order to launch a "transparent public debate".
If it is true that judges are independent and impartial, it is not the truth that they judge, especially in the case of libel prosecution, but the law.
Not surprisingly, this fundamental difference is completely obscured by Mr. Garver.
Because, for Barrick Gold, would the best way to conduct a public debate be to ruin anyone who dares to support a position contrary to its own?
Whatever the outcome of the trial, the authors and the editor of the book Black Canada will have to spend considerable amounts to prepare their defense and to fight, with quite unequal strength, against an army of lawyers backed by the almost bottomless pockets of the mining industry.
The tactic, in these uneven struggles, is often to ruin the defendants in order to impose a gentle settlement which muffles opposition in addition to frightening anyone who dares to re-examine the issue.
If Barrick Gold really wanted a public debate, it is before the public opinion that it would had to present his vision of the facts.
Contrary to what happens in several of the countries in which Barrick Gold works, debates in Canada are normally exchanges of ideas and not truncheon blows.
It was enough for the mining industry to open its books and its files and to establish a real debate, through newspapers, the media, publications and with funding for independent research teams that could shed light on the issue.
But Barrick Gold does not seem to trust public opinion and dismissing out of hand the petitions and letters of support to the authors of Black Canada.
Perhaps Mr. Garver could explain how he can, at the same time, request a "public" debate while mistrusting the views of this same public?
In the Vice-President's world, it seems that this word only means highly paid lawyers, and not all Canadians; this is a rather narrow view of the concept.
In a democracy, even critics have the right to speak.
What does not understand - or does not want to understand - Barrick Gold, is that the public who supports the authors and publishers of Black Canada does it primarily because it rejects the brutal manner of the mining.
The public is ready to hear Barrick and to judge, but based on a civilized exchange of arguments, and not in the context of what many perceive as a gag action (while pursuing a "public debate," Barrick Gold moreover has just filed an injunction against the authors of Black Canada notifying them to stop using this term...).
Beyond Mr Garver's surreal speech, suing Barrick Gold is a direct attack against freedom of academic research and the quest for truth, which are essential to a democratic society.
She denies completely the right to quote credible sources and to debate the facts and interpretations, which is the basis of even brain work.
If it is impossible to study and to discuss issues that do not like the rich companies in this world in a country like Canada, for fear of repeated prosecution, who will be able to do this?
If Barrick Gold really wanted to a public and transparent debate, she could do so by following the scientific standards used by the authors of Black Canada.
She has a right to reply.
The academic environment, which we belong to, knows for a while how to deal with the debates and desagrements and to solve conflicts.
The excessive legal action by Barrick Gold clearly shows that, contrary to what it claims, it has no desire for a transparent debate.
This is a loss for the academic world, as it is for public debate in Canada; and it is time for governments to establish regulations limiting these kinds of malicious lawsuits.
Operation Rescue for Wall Street – Democrats and Republicans agreed
The Bush administration and the leaders of Congress, both Republicans and Democrats have finally reached an agreement yesterday on the biggest economic recovery plan since the Great Depression of the 1930s.
The new version of the $700 billion dollar plan aiming to curb the financial crisis affecting Wall Street for months has yet to be approved by both chambers of the Congress.
It includes especially: better control by elected representatives of its implementation, new mechanisms to ensure the reimbursement of public money involved, new clauses to control the number of foreclosed homes for non-payment, as well as a right of inspection on the salaries paid to executives from the rescued companies.
US Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson, Speaker of the House of Representatives Nancy Pelosi and the Republican representative at the table, Senator Judd Gregg, announced the good news a few minutes after midnight yesterday, after marathon negotiations lasting two days.
"We have made great progress towards an agreement which will be effective on the markets," declared the representative of the Bush administration, Henry Paulson.
"Everything was done in order to shelter the real economy and the ordinary Americans from the ongoing crisis in Wall Street," said the Democrat.
"It is the fundamental point: If we do not do this, the trauma, chaos and disruption on the daily lives of Americans will be immense," said the Republican Judd Gregg.
The negotiations had turned into a sprint in the last few hours by fear of the effect that would cause another failure on investors mood.
The deadline that was agreed upon was the opening of the markets this morning.
Brought into the negotiations late, the two US presidential candidates were rather favorable to the agreement, without failing, however, to express their dissatisfaction that it had to come to this extreme.
Democratic Senator Barack Obama has blamed the addition of certain provisions in the agreement, particularly the proposal to allow homeowners to keep their homes and that the pay of executives of companies rescued by the state.
"When you ask taxpayers to take extraordinary measures because of the irresponsibility of some, there is nothing to be proud of.
But these measures are necessary, " he commented on the american television waves.
Questioned on another chain, on whether he would vote for the proposed plan, his Republican opponent, John McCain, said: "I would like to see the details, but I hope so."
"The outlines that I have read that it is something that we will all have to digest and with which we will be able to move forward.
The option of doing nothing is simply not acceptable, he said.
The $700 billion plan to buy up with taxpayers' money the bad debts, risky and unsellable assets of the American financial company.
It comes after 14 months of a crisis triggered by the bursting of the real estate bubble which first led to the collapse of sub-prime mortgages before spreading to other, more widespread forms of asset-backed commercial paper (ABCP) and leading to a liquidity freeze and the failure of banks and financial institutions.
It is a group of elected Republicans who had killed the first draft agreement last week.
It is believed we are out of this impasse since Democrats have agreed that some "toxic" assets of companies in trouble are only insured by the government, rather than purchased.
In order to cut corners for everyone in Congress, they have also added a provision stipulating that if the government should take losses for five years with this program, it could put in place new taxes aimed at helping recover its outlay.
The new plan provides for the expenditure of a first tranche of $250 billion to which another 100 billion will be added if the president deems it necessary.
The payment of another 350 billion should be ratified by another vote in Congress.
In exchange for its assistance, Washington will receive shares in the rescued companies which will pay dividends in case of profit and which it will be able to sell once the storm has passed.
The federal government will take the opportunity to delay the procedures of foreclosures on homes attached to the real estate loans covered by this plan and set limits on pay and redundancy payments paid to executives of affected companies.
The architects of the plan would like to see it submitted for a vote in the House of Representatives today and in the Senate on Wednesday.
Despite all their efforts, it is not yet certain that their plan will get the green light.
Indeed, voices continued to be raised yesterday against this project, both on the Republican and Democratic side.
"Obviously, Washington is not hearing you," Republican Scott Garrett, a member of the Finance Committee of the House of Representatives, said to his constituents.
"Yes, we have a serious financial problem.
Yes, there are solutions.
But not the one which consists in taking advantage of taxpayers".
Leader of a small group in Congress nicknamed "the caucus of sceptics", the Democratic Representative Brad Sherman presents differently, but comes to the same conclusion.
"Four hundred prominent professors of economics, including three Nobel laureates, wrote to tell us: we are asking the Congress not to hurry and to carefully consider the way to follow", he said yesterday.
Meanwhile, in Europe, we had once again the proof of the crisis' global nature.
At the end of an emergency meeting, the three countries of the Benelux announced the partial nationalisation of the Fortis banking group for 11.2 billion Euro (16,3 billion Us dollars).
The intervention of the governments of Belgium, the Netherlands and Luxembourg had become necessary after the French bank BNP Paribas announced that it was abandoning the acquisition of its drowning rival since it lost 2 billion Euros (2.9 billion US) during the mortgage crisis in the United States.
Fortis employs 85 000 people and is part of 20 major European banks and the ten biggest insurers.
"This is not wasted money, said yesterday the Dutch Finance minister, Wouter Bos.
In exchange, they get a vote in the bank and influence.
This is precisely something that savers and households enjoy now that the time looks uncertain."
Meanwhile, across the Channel, the British government seemed on course to nationalise another bank mauled by the financial crisis.
According to the English press, the government will resume its accounting of all the existing loans at the Bradford and Bringley, Bank, of which more than 41 billion (75.5 billion US) are mortgage loans.
The Spanish bank Santander made it known yesterday that it would buy the branches and the customer accounts of the British bank.
The Bradford and Bringley would be the second bank, after the Northern Rock, that the British government should nationalize since the beginning of this financial crisis.
Paul Newman (1925-2008) - death of a committed icon
Her blue-eyed beauty was her trump card for a long time, some would say her weakness.
Had he freed himself from the narcissist's mirror, the American actor with the charming smile?
Yes and no.
His modesty, his sensitivity and a talent which was obvious also have taken him away from the register of power that is giving birth to the real sacred monsters.
But what a great long-distance runner!
Paul Newman, deceased on Friday, at 83 years old, because of a lung cancer in his ranch in Connecticut, remains one of the last icons of the American cinema of the prosperous years.
Less monumental than Brando, to whom he ressembles and was a long time rival on the screen, more cautious in his game, certainly more fragile, but also a great champion of freedom and the bursting of dramatic conventions.
Mixed blood often brings forth beautiful children.
He was born in Ohio in 1925, of a German Jew father and a mother with Hungarian origins.
From these European roots will be born one of the glorious faces of the American dream.
Without huge ego, the ultimate mark of quality.
Because was projected in him a whole country in love with the self made man, the Pacific war fighter, wounded in action, who in the early 1950s studied theater in Yale and then attended Actor's Studio in New York, before succeeding at the theatre, television, soon in movies.
The same man who fought for civil rights was also the race car driver, who came in second at the 24 hour mark of Le Mans in 1979, and was a sex symbol, albeit half of a model couple together with actress Joanne Woodward since 1958.
There also disappear with him the shadowy areas of this secretive, discreet, committed star, allergic to the glitz of show business whose enigma no one has completely unraveled.
An honest man, in the noblest sense of the term.
This weekend, the death of Paul Newman made film lovers' heads swim, as memories of all his major roles collided on their mental movie screens.
More than half a century of an always changing American seventh art  stream around him.
The cowboy charm of Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid (1969) and the young man rejecting his sensual wife (Elizabeth Taylor) in Cat on a Hot Tin Roof, adapted from Tennessee Williams in 1958, come racing back into memory.
Closer to us (1990), his sensitive Mr Bridge, troubled in his old age by a marriage which did not fulfil all its promises.
Many other Paul Newman went to history.
This boxer Rocky Graziano, delinquent, tormented, violent, unforgettable in Somebody Up There Likes Me (Marked by Hatred), by Robert Wise, a role intended for James Dean, resumed after his death, which really launched Newman in 1956.
This sympathetic thug in the brilliant The Sting (The Scam), Oscar for best picture in 1973.
A bitter and vengeful billiards player in Robert Rossen's magnificent "The Hustler" (1961), he played the role again on his return in Martin Scorsese's "The Color of Money," which won him in 1987 his only Oscar after nine nominations.
This face throughout the ages, it was him.
Him, again
The eras are jostling throughout his career.
Young people know him especially from George Roy Hill's cult film Slap Shot (1977), as Reggie Dunlop, coach of a rather unorthodox ice hockey team.
His fans found him again in 1994 in The Hudsucker Proxy from the Coen brothers.
With a final role of Irish Mafia godfather in the Road to Perdition of Sam Mendes in 2003, we had come full circle.
As opposed to several film legends who left the business rather early, Newman stayed in the saddle for a long time, all the while denouncing Hollywood, its wealth, its ostentation and its compromises.
The French film-maker Bertrand Tavernier regarded him, not without humour, "as a living challenge to 'underplaying' judging his performances as too forceful".
The profession has not always been kind to the wonderful Paul Newman whom the roles fell a long time all cooked in the tooth.
He played however less often young successful people than those on the fringe: neurotics, alcoholics, bastards or the desperate, whose perfect traits reflected mindless drifting and rebellion.
As a director, Newman revealed little known aspects of his true modest nature.
His Rachel, Rachel, in 1968 (from the novel of Canadian Margaret Laurence), with his wife Joanne Woodward in the main role, drew a fine female portrait of melancholy.
He, who lost his son Scott to an overdose, dedicated his movie Harry and Son to him in 1984, a modest and sad work.
Among the deluge of tributes to Newman yesterday, his great friend and former comrade-in-arms Robert Redford (they had acted together in The Sting and Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid) said, very sadly: "His presence made my life and this country better."
Generosity and love of life are vibrant features of the deceased actor.
Beyond his legendary career, we are losing a great campaigner for civil rights, ecology and independent films and an opponent of the excesses of Hollywood.
We have seen much of its face standing on vinaigrette pots, sauces, biscuits and other foods, as a process of poor taste, albeit a joke at the beggining.
The profits of these sales were nonetheless paid to his Foundation for children in difficulty.
Newman, rather than resting on his laurels, will be committed until the end.
He left to his five daughters a letter containing these words: "Always and until the end, your father has been incredibly grateful for his lucky star.
It was a privilege to be here."
And a privilege for us to have followed the path of such a coherent and generous American artist.
Model citizen, in short and above.
What could anyway produce Zuschlag & Cie in their bills factory ?
Soon, on the 8th of October, will start the proceedings concerning the ongoing criminal procedure, against János Zuschlag and his accomplices.
The politician and his accomplices are accused of fraud in the form of permanent and regular criminal organization, having led to rather sizable damages. Other charges have been brought against them, such as forgery and use of forgery.
According to the public prosecutor, money from subsidies, was spent for personal gain, while the benefits were justified by false invoices.
The money from the State and the municipalities, approximately 65 million HUF in total, was going on the one hand in the funds of the Fiatal Baloldal movement and, on the other hand, in the pocket of some people.
Their method, made also public by the authorities in charge of the inquiry, was to take the money of the subsidies received by issuing expense bills, for which no real provision was given and thus, the associations have never met their commitments.
According to the indictment, a large part of the bills were forged.
For the latter, they obtained invoice books at the Józsefváros market, while they produced the stamps at Kiskunhalas.
As for the names of societies that were included on the bills, they were decided, among others, during tours in the province of North Lake Balaton, carried out by István Lados, on the request of János Zuschlag.
According to the testimony of the latter, he was supposed to identify inns and restaurants.
For his personal consumption, he called for a bill, modeled on which they wrote other bills that they would introduce, among others, in the Ministry of Youth and Sport, the Ministry of Social Affairs and Labour, as well as the city hall to get subsidies.
The majority of bills was created by István lados and his accomplice Mr András Őri who, according to our information, was involved in files drafting needed to qualify for subsidies.
During a "circuit identification", one of the choices of Lados was a bistro.
According to the two bills issued by the Zuschlag in 2003, this place has assured the catering for a group of 90 people, members of the Biztos Pont Egyesület association.
However, according to what the manager said, it would have been impossible that so many people fit in this place, at the same time.
Similarly, during summer 2002, the bill on behalf of Jobb Jövőért foundation which will bear the name of Együtt in Harmadik Évezredért, was full of style and spelling mistakes.
A pension, located in Badacsonytomaj, had in fact only three rooms, and a maximum of ten people could spend the night there. However, the bill was mentioning one hundred and thirty clients.
Invoice providers with overflowing imaginations plunged into excess, when they said that the company Pigal KFT also belonged to the HORECA sector. In their accounts, neither the name of Jobb Jövőért nor that of Hoppá appears, according to the information given to the prosecution.
Győző Farkas, the manager of the company, said to the site hvg.hu that when the public prosecutor summoned him and showed him the bills, he knew immediately that it was forgery.
"The name of our society and our tax number were placed in the wrong spot on the stamp."
He added: "Beyond the look of it, the fact that according to the bill,  a hundred people stayed there did not make sense either, since this establishment had only eleven bedrooms, which did not have enough space.
Moreover, the bill mentions meals too, and our restaurant is closed since long ago."
Zealous issuers of bills were also not well informed about Budapest's travel agencies, which were constituting a part of their choice, but only organizing trips abroad. Thus, naively, they said some stays in Hungary on the bills were to be paid for in cash, which also runs counter to the accounting practices of the agency.
Also, as it emerged during the investigation, they also added VAT on these documents, while the benefits on the travel activities, which the destination is outside the European Union, are charged without VAT.
Similarly, the VAT rate of the four bills made out in the name of the Hotel Révfülöp to the order of Jobb Jövőért was incorrect, since the company's allowances do not cover a VAT of 25% as indicated, but a VAT of 15%. In addition, employees of the hotel issue only printed bills, while the false ones were made out by hand.
The prosecutor's investigation reveals that the "issuers" also erred in stating as the delivery cost highway transportation for the merchandise, which the company issuing the bills could not have performed, since it was only serving as the investment counselor.
Moreover, it is also for procedural defects, such as inadequate kinds of bills and false stamps, that bills issued by Együtt to Harmadik Évezredért Alapítvány, of XXI. Századi Kulturális Egyesület and Biztos Pont turn out to be wrong.
Just as in the case of the Ravenna Bt. company or the sports resort in Kunfehértó, both of which deny being responsible for invoices issued in their names.
The forgers also did not pay attention to the fact that the HIB Kft. company, located in Nyíregyháza, was in liquidation at the time (2001) when the Fiatal Városért Egyesület group was supposed to have had a meal on their premises. According to our information, this is the reason why the company's liquidator denies having issued this bill.
Invoices set deliberately
Another category of issuers of bills was composed of those who were fully aware that they were being asked to issue false bills.
The Esély Budapestért Alapítvány Foundation, at the request of the Fiatal Baloldal - Ifjú Szocialisták group, wrote an invoice to the order of the Együtt a Harmadik Évezredért Foundation, for a sum of four million HUF.
According to the indictment, the manager of the company Collab Kft. was asked to issue false invoices by one of the accused, Ludovic Györfi.
Similarly, in cooperation with the Zuschlags, the company Biogate Kft., which is currently under liquidation and which in 2003 issued bills to the order of the Jobb Jövőért Alapítvány foundation, the Atlasz Egyesület association and the Vörösfenyő Egyesület association, amounting to around five million HUF, but for which no services have been rendered.
No financial movement took place, either, given that the invoices were cancelled afterward, but the organisms avoided carefully to mention this in their accounts.
The following category of companies which issued bills is that of companies directly linked to the accused.
Thus, the administrative deputy to the executive director of the Delta Trió KFT. enterprise which trades in fuel and cars, whose headquarters were located in Budapest, but where he was nowhere to be found, was Iván Kubatov.
In October, November and December of 2005, this company has issued several bills for the sale of computer equipment, amounting to about 18 million HUF.
According to the investigation, such equipment would have been purchased by the company Cash Investment LLC of Kiskunhalas, which was in liquidation since September 14, 2005.
This company's director was a man from Romania, whom Iván Kubatov would also have sent documents relative to the company, between 2002 and 2005.
According to what we know, Kubatov acknowledged during the investigation that he issued bills on the orders of the Atlasz, Hoppá and Együtt a Harmadik Évezredért Alapítvány companies, and that he pocketed their exchange value.
It is precisely at the request of Iván Kubatov that Romanian builders have created the Fa-Bani Jos Faipari Kft. and Jos-Investment BT companies.
In reality, none of these companies were really operating, which the accused explained was due to the fact that they were not getting any work.
He even used those companies, because at maestro Zsolt Szente request, codefendant and editor of compagnies foundation acts, he established bills on behalf of associations reporting to Zuschlag, as Atlasz and Y-Generáció associations.
Kubatov gave agencies a total of 15 bills, issued by the Cash Investment, Delta Trió, Fa-Bani Jos, Jos Investment and Linaxtrade companies, with a value of 14.2 million HUF.
The public prosecutor believed that 10% of the pointed accounts on the bills as well as VAT were going in Kubatov's pockets.
The man even used the Szi-Beri Bt. company to establish fictitious bills that were used as part of the request for a subsidy for Biztos Pont.
In January 2006, the Y-Generáció Association and Szövetség a Modern Magyarországért applied for a grant from the public utility body of the socialist party, Táncsics Mihály Alapítvány (MRI).
They have achieved this subsidy for the sum of twice 500 Huf , but these amounts were not used for the objectives pointed in the demand.
In order to prevent it from being known, five fictitious invoices received from the Works Team Kft. company have been presented to the TMA.
Moreover, these are bills that have been found during the raid on the office of Arpad Kemecsei, the Minister of Education.
At the hearing, part of the accused will explain bills production method, as it had already done in front of the public prosecutor earlier.
What could be really interesting would be that the main defendant, János Zuschlag himself, decides to lift the veil on the whole story.
Until now, his confessions are not very detailed, and although he has promised repeatedly to tell the details, he has not yet done so.
The question is whether it is in their interest, or perhaps eventually the Socialists would together conclude that in exchange for reimbursement of a large part of the 50 million HUF, Zusi would wear only the hat.
Today, this one is probably annoyed, since the requests for his placement under house arrest, on a basis of a reduction of its detention conditions, keep continuing to fall in deaf ears.
While those who have caused much more important damage, and the culprits of irreparable economic crimes, walk freely or at the least, await in their own home the end of the procedure. He does not have this possibility.
The psychology of the bidding war: why do we spend more money?
At auctions, buyers tend to spend more, and overestimate the goods.
The researchers in neurology and economy of the University of New York managed to update the neural and economic bases of this known and seemingly irrational behaviour.
According to their study published in the journal Science, human beings do not want to be outbid in this type of competition, such as an auction on eBay, which is why they even prefer to pay too high a price.
These studies have tried to set a neural pattern of this kind of "game" with the help of auctions experiments.
One of the groups of volunteers was playing lotto, while the other group was taking part in a playful auction, during which, with the aid of a process of functional magnetic resonance imaging (fMRI), researchers were analyzing the active brain areas of the experiment's subjects.
In both games, the participants could win money, but during the auction whose a key element is higher bid by a third person, all the elements situated under the brainstem, called striatum, were intensively moving at the loss of the day.
This part of the brain, in addition to having several other functions, plays a role in the "auto-stimulation" mechanism of the nervous system.
This is why, according to researcher, the rise in prices is explained by the leak before the violent reaction of the striatum.
In support of their theories, the economist members of this group of researchers have pursued analyses of financial supervision.
During these, three groups were outbidding facing a partner, in various circumstances.
They have simply informed the control group of the real value of the product in question, and they have thus made their bet.
To another group, they promised that if they came out winners of the game too, then they would receive an additional $15, as a reward.
While the third group received the same $15 from him before the auction, the members of the group also lost this money if they lost the bid.
The difference between these two groups is in fact that the emphasis was put with one on victory, while with the other, on failure.
By demonstrating the assumption of neurologues, members of the "against failure" players team were willing to higher bets than those made by the control group and the "for victory" group.
"These results cannot be proven by any economic theory that already exists.
Indeed, each of them explained the phenomena noticed during auctions by the pleasure of winning and the parade before the risk.
Only the neural imaging methods have helped remove the contradiction between the two theories, leading on a third explanation. "- found Andrew Schotter, professor of the Faculty of Economics of the University of New York.
Hepatitis: when do we have to see a doctor?
In the world, around half a billion people suffer from chronic hepatitis B or C, while in Hungary, chronic liver disease is mentioned among the first causes of death.
It is estimated that 100 thousand patients are carriers of the hepatitis virus in Hungary, but only seven thousand are treated. This is due to the fact that often patients do not know that they are infected.
Hepatitis is a generic name given to infections affecting the liver and caused by different viruses.
There are many similarities between their symptoms. Inflammation of the liver and jaundice are characteristic, but the pathogenic agents and the diseases caused differ from one another.
The hepatitis viruses, in the manner of pathogenic genes, spread mainly in two ways: hepatitis A and E through the digestive tract (for example: contaminated food or water), hepatitis B, C, D and the other viruses through blood and organic liquids (sperm, vaginal secretions, saliva).
For travelers, it is anyway recommended to be vaccinated against the A and B virus. There is no vaccine against the C.
The symptoms of hepatitis A appear two to three weeks after the consumption of contaminated food, in most cases, accompanied by a poor  general condition, weakness, upset stomach and nausea.
Then there develops on the skin and white of the eye a visible yellowing, the faeces become lighter in colour and the urine, darker.  Recovery could take two to three weeks.
Throughout the world, every year, a million people die of the most serious form of this disease, as cancer or liver cirrhosis caused by hepatitis B.
The main cause is that according to estimates, only one patient out of ten receives medical treatment.
Hepatitis C may also have serious consequences: if it is not treated, it can lead to cirrhosis or liver cancer.
Most patients do not know if they are infected by the virus, because the  pathogenic gene silently destroys the liver cells. In many cases, the first symptoms only appear after 20 to 30 years.
Consequently, early prevention is very important, as well as regular screening tests.
Contamination is much higher than average among a population of three groups: those who underwent a blood transfusion before 1991, drug users and those who have tattoos.
Currently, we figure 200 million patients suffering from a chronic hepatitis C in the world.
Since the disease can be detected by a routine check in a laboratory, it is advised to consult one's attending physician from the note of unknown origin symptoms.
The disease can be cured, if it is detected in time. The virus can be eradicated from the body, this way the risk of infection disappears and the development of cancer is averted.
On 30 September is the world day of hepatitis, organised for the first time in 2004 by the organizations representative of patients from around the world.
His aim is to draw attention to chronic liver cirrhosis, caused by viruses, on the causes of its development and on the importance of an early illness diagnosis.
Does someone who believes in God feel less pain?
According to the results of recent research, religious beliefs funtion as a kind of analgesia, which would have already made the deaths of the Catholic martyrs more bearable.
The British newspaper "Telegraph" published an article stating that researchers at Oxford University have had an interesting experience while analyzing at what level the belief in God could influence tolerance to pain in human beings.
In this rather weird experience, 12 Catholic believers and as many atheists have been subjected to electroshocks, while each one of them was looking at a painting representing the Virgin Mary.
According to the results, the faithful Catholics have been able to exclude much of the suffering.
Thanks to a technique of the human brain examination, we were also able to discover that Catholics had been able to activate the part of their brain responsible for regulating the pain.
This analysis is the first of a series of experiments, to which academics, scientists, philosophers and theologians take part from different departments of the university.
Specifically, the experience is as follows: an instrument that emits sparks and broadcasts the electroshocks is set on the left hand of the experimental subject.
Researchers asked the participants in the experiment to keep looking for a long time at two paintings, one being the Virgin Mary painted by Sassoferrato in the 17th Century and the other, the Lady in Ermine painted by Leonardo da Vinci in the 15th Century.
Researchers who initiated this experience hoped that the sight of the Virgin Mary tells a sort of state of faith among the believers, while the choice of Da Vinci's painting, not very different from the first, was on its calming effect.
The experimental subjects spent half an hour in an MRI scan, and during this time, received 20 electrochocs in four consecutive parts, while either watching a painting on a religious theme or the one with a more general theme.
Catholics have said that at the sight of the Virgin Mary, they felt "safe", like someone who is "taken care of" and they "calmed down, and peace invaded them."
At the sight of the religious-themed painting, they have reported 12% less pain than when they watched the work of Leonard.
Psychologist Miguel Farias, who took part in the experience himself, believes we can achieve the same effects for atheists with some other sort of powerful image, provided we find the appropriate photo.
"We should find a picture toward which they respond very positively, such as a mother or father," the psychologist said.
Tom Wright, Anglican bishop, has welcomed the results of this research.
"The practice of the faith should change and in many cases, changes effectively our personality," added Wright.
After these excellent results, all that remains is the question of the effect on the pain regulation of the subjects if believers were shown a Madonna painted by Leonardo or by another painter of the same caliber?
Would the sight of a better quality Virgin Mary yield better results
You are what you disclose about yourself
On the occasion of its tenth anniversary, Google asserts that one can find them at the bottom of people's pockets the same way you find sky above their head. It knows where they have spent their vacation, which experts they consult and what their interests are.
This is still not enough, according to Eric Schmidt, who is one of the influential people in the organization.
While as to the sceptics establishing a parallel with Orwell's vision of horror, they do not properly see the essence of Web 2.0.
Eric Schmidt said, not long time ago, to the Financial Times that Google's main ambition is to gather even more information about its users. This is necessary so that Google's founders can keep to their original goal, which was as follows: "Let collect all the information in the world in a system!".
According to the executive of Google who was interviewed, after ten years of worldwide upheaval work, they are still only at the initial stage of their targets of being able to deal with all sources of information.
To the question: how is it going to be in five years? Schmidt replied that he would like Google to be able to answer questions such as "what could I tomorrow?" or "Which job is most suitable for me?". However, software won't be able to answer to this type of question, simple at first sight, until they know enough about users.
It is not perfectly clear to all Internet users that the words used when performing Internet searches, the IP address of the computer that launches a search and the pages which are then consulted by the people involved are precisely recorded.
Through the Personalized Search program launched two years ago, users can, for example, store their own historical research and can see what they have sought, what they have clicked on. Through this, on a long-term, Recommendations, a program based on the same logic, will be able to give much more intimate answers, and we will submit products and services based on our previous statements and our saved preferences.
"What happens if someone uses my data against me, if he looks at what I'm working on?", ask the users who worry when they see the extent of the information on Google.
In most cases, it is the potential power represented by society that can arouse fear, and it is not remorse, fear of punishment, the desire for freedom or a possible revolt against power that can arouse a counter-reaction among internet users.
It is, however, a known fact that the terms being sought are not only registered, but in some warranted cases, they are sent to a third party, and in this type of case law, nothing protects the personal rights of Internet users.
The most resounding example of these times is probably the coordinated action against Brazilian paedophiles, in which Google has sent the Brazilian government information that was collected on the public page called Orkut, thereby allowing identification.
Internet users concerned about human rights could heave a sigh of relief last May, when Google, arm in arm with the organization of legal electronic protection EFF, has proved its right to the court in front of the FBI. According to the pronounced judgment, in the future, Google will still not be bound by any point of the constitution to disclose information on the secret FBI demand, of whatever kind.
(Meanwhile, the federal government successfully obtained some 50,000 Web addresses and 1,000 research terms it gained because of the stronger child protection law, passed several years before. But ultimately, it failed to acquire the lists from investigations of individual users, or the entire list of Internet sites and keywords from the past two months.)
The judgment of Google is therefore quite inconsistent: it is attacked by those who fear the transmission of their personal data, because they think their inner world and their private sphere suffer when they are starting to use the services of Google. Therefore, they argue against them in the spirit of revolt that protests manifest against multinational companies that take pride in their conservative image.
Meanwhile, American geek culture and its "wild boys" gathers the passionate, activists and enthusiastic computer users which emerge in many countries, consider Google as the next big businesses generation, "the trendy corporation", opposed to his rival, Microsoft, classified as a world invader because of Windows, even if both companies are fighting for the same goal.
This may be explained by the fact that Google, unlike Microsoft,   ask users neither for an identification code, nor do they ask for money for its applications. The documentary code and the package of programmes, are continually updated, are more accessible, younger and cooller, when faced against the official giant of software.
The reason may also be that the geeks see exactly what is the problematic relationship between the individual rights and the Internet, and what the Web 2.0, the most proclaimed key word in recent years, just got behind him.
Indeed, the Web 2.0 does not relate to anything other than collaboration, the fact that we intentionally leave tracks behind ourselves, and that we make use of communication channels available to us, and while the size of these changes one by one, the essence remains the same: it is exposed.
Any young person, in general, can have a profile on several public pages, from Facebook to Xanga, and he can even link them to other services, such as at Twitter or Last.fm, listing his musical preferences. Then he can connect those to a friend-following site, like FriendFeed or Blip.fm. These young people can also have blogs, on which their most recent photo galleries kept on Flickr or Picasa automatically appear.
While you may know of many examples, such as the girlfriend who understands on viewing photos in the morning,  taken  with a circle of common friends, with which her unfaithful boyfriend  has spent the evening, or the society that has dismissed one of its employees, for the honest opinions that he wrote on his blog about the top management, we can be sure of one thing:  private life needs to be  completely reconsidered these days.
He who lives a life online is whatever he shows about himself, and that is how we can define the principle behind the behavior of today's young people.
Somebody who is hiding something, or at least, wants to try to circumvent Google's monopoly, can do it (starting with, for example, Scroogle, using Google's searching system, but, at the same time, leaving no sign intentionally).
The number of people who deliberately, not register themselves on public pages in order to make it impossible to locate them, is not insignificant. Google online services, from the text treatment to the image treatment, and information reading can be replaced by alternative versions, which are not linked to a huge range of servers and witch does not  collect our best profile, having been to date.
The public expects, without really hiding it, when Google will reveal his true nature.
The company, with its current value of 156 billion dollars, is worth more than IBM (140 billion dollars), Intel (124 billion dollars) or Coca-Cola (110 billion dollars). The advertising domains AdWords/Adsense threaten the turnover of advertising agencies, while the benefits introduced at increasingly great speeds are causing severe headaches, not only to Microsoft, but to many other creators of computer programs.
However, the criticisms finds, in addition to all that, contradictions with worrying effects: for example, the top management of the society has declined, in its entirety, the protests of employees, after it has doubled the price of the kindergarten company and after the company found the multiple daily food at any time of the day, too expensive. All this seems insignificant compared to the fact that already in 2006, Google has acquiesced in front of the Chinese government and according the terms of their agreement, the company detects all the results that offends the good taste, and the interests of the Chinese regime too.
According one of the society’s internal rules, new services are not announced while they can be used. What is certain, is that in the coming months and years, they will change the world on new points. While some believe that Google’s project of digitizing and archiving of books and magazines takes so great dimensions that society will soon faced the Supreme Court of United States, others fears its Health system, because in this one, we can build a complete medical benefit from our previous analyses results, our doctors and our problems.
The fact that Google is setting up a genetic database can give a good raw material for the next generation of science fiction novellists. Cory Doctorow's novel, writing with orwellian semitones, described a future in which a man could be approached in a horrendous way only through Google's data.
Two minors helped to remove clues of Ózd double homicide
"The police summoned two minors to interrogate them in the double homicide of Ózd. According to well-founded suspicions, they helped to remove traces of the crime." - declared the spokesman of the police station of the Department of Borsod.
The young people have admitted the facts they are charged. At the moment, they are accused of complicity.
The two minors, who, according to the information of MTI (Hungarian Telegraphic Agency) are young girls, are defending themselves freely.
Accessory to murder can result in a prison sentence of up to 5 years.
The suspect in the double homicide of Ózd, a young local man aged 23, was remanded in custody, on Sunday.
The charges brought against him are multiple homicide, committed with premeditation and by interest.
During the inquiry, it has been revealed that the young man aged 23 years owed a large sum of money to a 53 years old man.
The suspect did not want to settle his debt and this is why he drew his lender, last Wednesday, in an area in Ózd where he killed him as well as the man's little girl, aged 9 years old.
According to information from the MTI, the young man has premeditated his crime. The weapon with which he would commit his crimes and which was hidden on the scene of crime proves it.
The police examines the weapon and the circumstances of its use with the help of specialists.
The Warsaw Stock Exchange made a proposal for the purchase of the Prague Stock Exchange
The stock exchange of Warsaw has proposed two hundred million euros, about five billion Czech kronor, for the purchase of 100% of the package of shares of the stock exchange of Prague.
Ludwik Sobolewski, president of the Warsaw stock market, confirmed this proposal that the Poles have made, despite the fact that the Czechs had previously excluded the Warsaw stock market from the circle of potential new owners of the Prague stock market.
The cause of this exclusion is that Warsaw's stock market is owned by the government.
99% of the shares are owned by the Polish State which wants to part from more than 60% of its actions within a few months of activity.
According to the Czech business newspaper E15, the proposal of Poles represents the most high which was made to date for the purchase of the Prague Stock Exchange.
According to the Czech press, the Vienna Stock Exchange, the NASDAQ Transatlantic Exchange, the New York Stock Exchange, the London Stock Exchange and Deutsche Börse made ​​an offer so far.
Koblic Petr, director of the Prague Stock Exchange, said last week that among the interested parties, the Warsaw stock market would be the the least good new owner , and has not ruled out the fact that this could lead to the disappearance of the Prague Stock Exchange in the future.
The value of the Prague Stock Exchange is estimated between 5 and 10 billion Czech crowns by market specialists.
On the basis of an agreement between the shareholders, some 90% of the papers would be sold.
The biggest owner of the Prague Stock Exchange is the investment bank Patria Finance, with about 25 percent of shares, followed by the 14.7 percent of the bank Ceská Sporitelna and Tiger Holding Four S.a.r.l. with 13.5 percent.
The financial crisis from the point of view of the European press
In their comments Tuesday dedicated to the international financial crisis, which worsens day to day, the leading newspapers of the European press already evoked a "second 11 September."
"The global financial disaster, we owe it to the American president," accuses the Rome daily La Repubblica. "The president has not even been able to form a bloc within his own party to get behind a quickly improvised bill aimed at bringing aid to a desperate situation."
Instead of a new Pearl Harbour, as evoked by the billionaire Warren Buffett, it is more appropriate to talk of a second 11 September.
A part of the Madrid press also sees the scapegoat in Washington.
According to the view of the daily newspaper El Mundo, it is the lack of political leadership there which led the world economy to the brink of collapse.
The danger of the collapse of the American financial system is growing every day; and afterwards, the whole world will pay dearly.
Bush's plan was far from perfect, however, according to the vote in Congress, there is a real threat : that Washington does not suggest a political tool to curb the crisis.
The world economy hangs in the vacuum, just at the moment when in the history of capitalism, one of the biggest changes is taking place.
We cannot ignore the threat any longer – underlines the Tages-Anzeiger of Geneva.
Some states can still offer a lifeline to their staggering financial institutions, and thanks to their own taxpayers' money, they can save them from bankruptcy.
Of course, if more banks collapse like dominoes, then neither money nor new improvisations will not be sufficient.
In the long term, we need members of the European Union to mind less their national self-interest, and centralize control over the financial markets.
Just Monday, the weakened financial institutions have received more than 100 billion euros - recalled the Viennese daily, Der Standard, which adds that fears that European taxpayers also will have to pay, very much, similarly to Americans in order to remedy the crisis, are becoming more and more realistic.
So far, the EU has not really dealt with the crisis, which, like a tsunami, crosses, from side to side, the old continent.
The "rescuers" should not give away 100 billion Euros right away; on the contrary, it would be wise to think about the cases in which it would be reasonable to use taxpayer money with the goal of preventing more serious damage.
The smart car imitates the flight of the bumblebee
Which method would be better to develop technologies apt to avoid an obstacle, if it is not the imitation of a sensor for obstacles that already exists in nature?
As for example, the one of bees.
For the amazing design presented at CEATEC, taking place in Japan, buzzing bees first gave Nissan engineers the strategic idea which inspired them as to how they had to design the next generation of obstacle detectors.
In collaboration with the University of Tokyo, Nissan has built a mini  robot car, a bio-inspired, auto-robotized command system, model BR23C, which it has equipped with the capabilities of bees, the ultimate goal being to encourage the development of a system capable of avoiding all obstacles.
During its flights, each bee is its own space, ovally shaped, which in reality is very similar to our safe protection hulls, said at the exhibition, Kazuhhiro Doi, the director of the Department research and development and brand's technology public relations.
The multifaceted eye of the bee plays an important role, as it is able to see in all directions, in a 300 degree angle.
To mimic the functions of the compound eye, engineers came up with the idea of using laser telemetry.
It identifies the obstacles at an angle of 180 degrees and at a distance of 2 metres in front of the BR23C, it assesses the distances and sends a signal to the microprocessor board, who turns it into avoidance manoeuvre immediately.
The perception of the obstacle takes place in a split second. Then, the mini-robot, imitating the movements of a bee, immediately alters the direction of its wheels at an angle sufficient to avoid a collision.
Unlike any system that currently exists, this maneuver of avoidance happens entirely with an instinctive fashion.
"If it was not thus, the mini robot car could not respond quickly enough to avoid the obstacle," explains Toshiyuki Andoh, the director of the Mobility Laboratory and of the robotic car project.
It must respond instinctively and instantly, as this technology is correspond to the most vulnerable and most internal layer of the protection wrap, a layer where for the moment collision is considered inevitable.
This whole process should reflect what the bee do to avoid other bees.
The process must take place in a trice.
As opposed to bees, the difference is not to be able to go upwards, downwards or on the diagonal, it can only have two dimensions, and only in the direction in which the wheels can turn.
In this manner, instead of the endless combinations that bees possess to avoid other bees, in our case, one could use only rotary movement, speeding up and slowing down like maneuvers available from a mini robot car.
The BR23C uses polymer lithium batteries which are lighter and whose  energy capacity is greater, what makes their spanlife longer than the lithium-ion version.
According to Andoh, it is the instinctive intelligent reaction which is essential, not the data processing, and even less the ability to store.
This mechanism must treat with just some incoming signals per second, and deal with them.
It is not necessary to store them and react with the intuitive logic based on data from previous games. In this way, it uses continuously only a few dozen kilo-octets of memory.
We do not need gigabits memory capacity, or even megaoctets.
It is the first step towards the concept of a technology for instant avoidance. According to estimates from Nissan, this system will make its entry into serialized cars in the next ten years.
Another application could be its inclusion in the GPS satellite navigation system, so it can guide the driver to his destination and avoid the obstacles on his way.
A name has even been given to the overpriced baby.
The written version of the economic recovery plan of $700 billion, to redeem the troubled loans from banks, and to be used several times, is ready.
In the first round, half that amount will be spent.
Reuters announces that in the course of new debates which went on until after midnight local time on the East Coast Saturday, the leaders of Congress came to an agreement on the controversial issues that have gone on for days and days, related to the rescue plan amounting to a total of $700 billion.
"We have taken a serious step forward", said Nancy Pelosi, Democrat president of the US House of Representatives, according to whom it only remains to put the agreements on paper.
The compromise, born from the plan, is supported by both presidential candidates, Barack Obama and John McCain.
The US Treasury Secretary Henry Paulson, said in commenting on the results of the compromise that the programme will work and will be effective, however other measures still need to be implemented. According to Pelosi, it is not question here, of the the rescue of Wall Street, but to turn the workings of the economy in the another direction.
The written version of the plan was made public before the opening of the Asian markets, on Sunday night at 8pm local time in Washington (i.e., on Monday at 2am, according to the local time in Central Europe), but has not caused a dramatic rise in the stock exchanges.
On Monday, the House of Representatives will be the first to vote on the bill, the Emergency Economic Stabilization Act of 2008. Then, its fate will be in the hands of the Senate.
On Saturday evening, President George W. Bush spoke to Pelosi, then the White House has also welcomed the news of the agreement.
"We are satisfied with the progress that was made last night and we very much appreciate the efforts of both parties to stabilize our financial markets and to protect our economy," said Tony Fratto, the White House spokesman.
Moreover, the program diverges from the original proposal made by the Bush administration, which said that the $700 billion should be spent all at one time, for buying back mortgages related to some of the questionable loans.
Henceforth, a maximum of half the sum of $700 billion can be spent. The first 250 billion will be issued immediately after the adoption of the law by Congress, probably on Monday. This initial amount will be used by the Treasury Secretary to buy bad loans from banks, while the use of $100 billion more will be left to the discretion of the President.
The programme will be overseen by an independent organization, in which the president of the Federal Reserve will take part too.
The spending of the second half of the 700 billion depends on a new decree in Congress.
Under the terms of the law, the Department of the Treasury will be able to put a combined strategy into place: it can, at the same time, buy dubious debts, titles on mortgages and dubious mortgages, as well as other types of toxic debt.
Experts from ministry said that bailouts can take place during an auction, but also directly.
The rule allows the companies concerned to take part in an insurance program, in which the Treasury Department guarantees the instruments which are the basis for concern, for which the companies will have paid a premium equivalent to the foreseeable damages.
Henry Paulson stated that the law provides the required tools to spend $700 billion for the financial system urgent needs such as the huge buyback of dubious claims, their insurance, or to avoid the risk of the system triggering the collapse of one or another financial institution.
"We shall take the necessary measures, in order to be ready for the enforcement of the law, as soon as it will be passed," he added.
In contrast, banking executives finding themselves in bad positions and awaiting aid from the government can expect that their severance packages, called "golden parachutes" on the other side of the Atlantic, will be limited by the government.
The wages cap is mentioned only in specific cases. Moreover, restrictions depends on the way the Treasury Secretariat proposes its help to the company.
The capping provisions state that if the Treasury Department does the buyback in the form of an auction, it will levy an additional tax on the golden parachute, unless the president of the discredited bank retires.
Immediately after the purchase of the bad debts, the government will intervene aggressively to ensure that the amounts paid to top executives will not be excessive.
For the image to be complete, we still need to add that the existing golden parachutes are not modified. The cap only concerns new contracts, thus motivating the participation to the plan.
This is the first time in the United States history that legal ceiling limits will be in effect regarding the directors stipends - commented the commission president in charge of financial deliveries of House of Representatives, the democrat Barney Frank.
In addition, the state reserves the right to buy shares in banks taking part in the plan. This way, the risk that face taxpayers diminishes, because they can even gain from the deal as soon as the economy accompanied by the saved banks get back on their feet.
The draft law says that within five years ahead, the president must submit to Congress a proposal that will rule on how the losses will be returned to taxpayers, from the financial sector.
On both sides, there were obviously those who had expressed doubts about the plan.
This is not why the American citizens commissionned us , this does not protect the dollars of taxpayers - said the Republican representative of California, Darrell Issa.
His Democrat colleague from Ohio, Mary Kaptur thinks that the people who are pushing the measures are the same that those responsible for the collapse of Wall Street.
Industrial prices have continued to rise
In August 2008, prices for domestic manufacturers have increased by 0.1 percent compared to the previous month and 12.9 percent compared to August 2007 - communicates the Central Statistical Office in Hungary.
Export sale prices have increased by 1.1 per cent compared to those of July 2008, whereas they fell by 3.9 percent compared to those from a year ago.
As a result of the fluctuations in domestic and export prices, industrial producer prices rose 0.7 per cent compared to those of the previous month and by 3.2 per cent compared to those of the previous year.
The domestic manufacturing sale prices have only progressed to a lesser extent: of 0.1 percent, compared to the previous month.
Domestic sales prices in the manufacturing sectors have undergone only a small increase, on the order of 0.1 percent as compared with July.
In August 2008, the most significant price increase was observed in the manufacturing sector of shoes and other leather items (2.8 per cent), with the manufacture of bags and belts in first place with an increase of 4.6 percent for the month, then the production of shoes with a 2.5 percent increase for the month.
The level of higher prices of plastic and chemical raw materials has led to a significant monthly increase of the price of products and raw chemicals manufacturing industry (1.6 per cent).
A deflation has resulted of it in the sectors of oil processing (1.4%), in machinery and electrical equipment manufacturing (0.9 per cent) ones, and also a minimum increase in the wood processing sector (0.1%).
The prices for paper production, the activities of publishing and printing have not changed.
The other sectors of the processing industry have recorded an increase between 0.2 percent and 0.9 percent.
In the electricity, gas, steam and water supply sectors, representing a significant amount of the national industrial use, prices increased by 0.3 percent in August, mainly due to the effect of the increase in gas prices put in place by the authorities from July 1st.
Compared over a 12 month period, taking into account domestic sales in the transformation sectors, it is the price of oil processing sector that has experienced the most significant rise (32.4 percent).
In the metal products manufacturing sector, there has been an increase in prices of 13.2 percent, while in the major area of food production, beverages and tobacco, prices have gone up 11 percent.
Price cuts took place in the production of textiles and textile products (2.5 percent), and in the manufacturing of machinery and electrical appliances (0.3 percent).
In other sectors of the manufacturing industry, the price rise has fluctuated between 0.6 percent and 9.1 percent.
In the whole manufacturing industry, prices have risen 10.2 percent over the last year.
The prices of electricity, gas, steam and water have exceeded by 18,7 percent higher those of the previous year.
Among the internal trade groups and according to sectors allocation, in August, these are the founders of profit on investments that have shown the monthly price rise the most significant (0.7 per cent).
In the consumer goods production sectors, prices rose by 0.3 percent, while those of the energy producing sectors and raw materials aimed at subsequent conversion did not change as compared to the preceding month.
In August 2008, as compared to the same month in the preceding year, we witnessed the most significant increase in the areas of energy production and raw materials destined for subsequent conversion (16.8 percent).
In the sectors of production of consumer goods, an inflation of 6.8 percent was measured, while for the profit initiating sectors, a reduction of 1.4 percent.
The sale prices for export industry, in HUF, rose by 1.1 percent in August compared to the previous month, while they have suffered a drop of 3.9 percent over 12 months.
In a month, our national means of payment is weakened by 1.7 per cent compared to the Euro, and 7.1 percent against the dollar. Compared to the month of August 2007, it has increased by 7.5 percent against the euro and 15.9 percent against the dollar.
Next year, will there still be need visas to go to United States?
Kinga Göncz thinks there are good opportunities so that on 12 January, the agreement American-Hungarian visa waiver to enter into effect. This is what the foreign minister said in Chicago, before the leaders of the local Hungarian community.
According to her, "now, everything depends solely on the moment during which the entry systems and electronic control across the Atlantic will be put into service. "
However, she drew attention to the fact that in the new system, there will be no entry visa, but the tourists will have to register before departure.
The head of Hungarian diplomacy will be in negotiations from today, in Washington.
He will meet the Secretary of State, Condoleezza Rice, whom he will award the Hungarian Republic's Commander's Cross with the Star of the Order of Merit, and will meet with foreign policy advisors for the presidential candidates, Democrat Barack Obama and Republican John McCain.
Barack Obama and McCain support both the plan to rescue banks
On Sunday, Barack Obama and John McCain, the two major US parties' candidates for the presidency, both expressed their support for the 700 billion dollar government rescue plan. However, some politicians are demanding the resignation of the US Treasury Secretary.
After marathons negotiations, which have lasted for days and days, the Congress representatives and the Administration have finally announced, on Sunday at dawn, that they had reached principle agreement  on the banks rescue plan.
The financing plan, aimed at thawing the crisis on Wall Street and the paralyzed credit market, became the central issue of the presidential campaign.
Obama and McCain even present themselves, each as more capable than the other, to lead the country out of the economic crisis.
According to the most recent surveys, by putting economic issues at the forefront, Obama has once again succeeded in getting himself a bit of a lead. McCain's lead, achieved by his naming of Sarah Palin as his running mate just after the Republican convention, has melted away.
During a campaign rally in Detroit on Sunday, Obama expressed his hope that Congress would vote soon on the legislation for the $700 billion rescue plan.
He stressed that the proposal contains the passages of consumer protection that he also supports.
"This is now that we have to go ahead, with responsibility (...) a danger is threatening your work, your savings, the entire industries and the stability of the whole economy", he told in front of a crowd of 35 thousands people.
He has not failed to describe the economic ideas of McCain as outdated.
In an interview given to ABC, McCain said: "We will all have difficulties to swallow it (...) but doing nothing is not a possible path".
The Republican senator said that the proposal included the creation of a commission to monitor the Treasury and the capping of severance pay for senior leaders, and that he, personally, had very strong positive feelings about these items.
Obama has told the CBS that McCain has had no role on the negotiations' substance, while he had a daily contact with the Treasury secretary.
Nancy Pelosi, president of the House of Representatives, said Sunday that there are serious hopes that the House will vote the bill on Monday.
The press review of the German language territory
The right wing is intact, it is only at the heart of the party that voters have become more aware - this is how the Der Spiegel is refering to the low score of the Bavarian Christian Social Union in Bavaria.
Haider is ready to govern Austria, to prevent the coalition of red and black.
Der Spiegel (spiegel.de.)
In the Internet edition of the German left-wing news magazine, Franz Walter analyses the causes of the dramatic defeat of the CSU in his article entitled "The revolution in Bavaria devours its fathers."
According to this acknowledged political scientist, the erosion of the CSU started long before the sad Beckstein-Huber duo took office.
Christian Socialists have transformed Bavaria for decades and now, these are the same modern citizens who are turning their backs on it.
This change of era is simultaneously the problem of all Christian democracy, and thus, the one of Angela Merker too.
For the CSU, the failure was not a complete surprise, but on Sunday, there came to an end a process that was likely just ten years before: the undisputed hegemony of the national party ended.
Ten years before that, in 1998, the CSU won with 47.7 percent, and, for the first time since the 1950s, with a total that was below 50 percent.
It was repeated three years ago, during the Bundestag elections of 2005, which is to say in the time of the much talked-about Stoiber.
The cause can be attributed to the modernisation "devouring her parents', put in place in the region so consistently by the CSU.
It has been 40 years since sociologists have announced this but they have been greatly mistaken about the pace. However, secularization, the impact of education and the immigration of Germans from the north and from the east into the region of Bavaria, in full swing, could not fail to have consequences for the loyalty of CSU voters.
An update goes hand-in-hand with increasing opportunities, and the consequences of such a policy are also visible.
The right-wing camp is intact, it is only in the core of the party that voters have become more aware, more critical and more stubborn.
It is equally astonishing that, in recent weeks, it was precisely the academic groups which were rather distant from the CSU, such as the self-employed, the artisans, the college graduates and those with post-graduate degrees.
In these groups, support for the CSU has fallen below 40 percent.
Die Presse (diepresse.com.)
In his article entitled "who ? with who ? the party chairmen remains elusive when faced with questions of the coalition" the conservative Austrian newspaper is dealing with the situation of confusing domestic policy which settled after the Austrian elections.
The Austrian Socialists of the SPÖ want to talk with the Conservatives in the ÖVP.
The ÖVP forbids the SPÖ to meddle in its internal affairs.
The populist party BZÖ is open to negotiations. The greens do not want to agree yet over the coalition.
The elections took place, now everything revolves around the coalition; during the debates on public television, the party leaders hardly showed their cards.
Werner Faymann, SPÖ president, confirmed that he wanted to discuss with ÖVP.
The SPÖ wants to show that the cooperation of both parties is indeed possible - it is what already exists in some regions and in the socialist partnership.
The question according to whether he would picture a coalition with Wilhelm Molter, the current president of the Övp, as vice-chancellor, remains open from Faymann.
As he mentioned, Schüssel-Molterer direction was, in any case, rejected.
A copy of this combination is out of point.
Molterer reacted with caution to the proposals from the red.
As he has already said, a collaboration will surely be a failure if Faymann tries to interfere with the internal affairs of the ÖVP.
In his party, the choice of opposition or entry into the coalition is for the moment an entirely open question. These points absolutely must  be debated within the ÖVP.
Jörg Haider, BZÖ president, is open again to all proposals.
"To avoid the coalition of the red and black, we are ready to assume government responsibilities," Haider said.
Járóka said: We need to break the vicious circle of poverty and segregation
Today, began in Paris, the European Summit for Equal Opportunity, of which France is the host, representing the current presidency of the European Union.
In her speech before the plenary assembly, as one of the main spokespersons of the counsel of experts, Lívia Járóka, MEP Fidesz European People's Party, drew attention to segregation in education, because this is a violation of law which most affects Roma children, and is therefore one of the main obstacles to their success in life.
On behalf of the French presidency, this high level conference was opened in part by Xavier Bertrand, the French Minister of Labour and Social Affairs, and in part by Vladimir Spidla, European Commissioner for Work, Social Affairs and Equal Opportunities.
Among the invited people to take part in the consultation are the European social partners, as well as the most prominent legal protection representatives and European civilian agencies, in the area of equal opportunities.
According to the public relations office of the deputy Fidesz from the Populist Party, Járóka warned that in addition to the discrimination that occurs during hiring, the Roma are disappearing from the labour market primarily due to their poor qualifications.
"An overwhelming majority of young Romani have no high-school qualifications, and as a consequence of a poor quality basic education, only a tiny part has the opportunity to obtain a high education degree."
Furthermore, Járóka has insisted that education as a fundamental right of human beings plays a key role when one has to assert the other fundamental rights.
Investing in early education of Roma children means strengthening the economy of the European Union countries.
According to the MEP, it is necessary to raise awareness of these reports in the widest possible circle, equally between the Roma and the non-roms.
Indeed, the earlier a Romani child starts school, the more it increases his chances of becoming a productive member on labour market; by the tax paid from his income and his consumption, he is involved in the government budget.
"by their membership in the European Union, the Roma must be assured of their right to a quality education, and to be protected from a poor quality, sectarian education," Lívia Járóka emphasized.
According to the deputy, a European Union collaboration geared towards a goal and an action is needed for an immediate acceleration of the process of school desegregation. For this, abiding by the anti-discrimination directives in existence and in preparation is of paramount importance.
"We need to break the vicious cycle of poverty, segregation and unemployment. We must give Roma children the opportunities assured by democracy, so that they can participate in the future of Europe as citizens with full rights" Járóka demanded.
On behalf of "Année Européenne pour l'Égalité des Chances" guaranteed for all, the summit's aim for equality in Europe held every year since the summit in Berlin last year, is to ensure a unique platform to support the measures taken in favour of equal opportunities and for the fight against discrimination, targeted at European level and within individual countries.
CSU: Pardonned for a transition period.
It is in October that will be taken the decision on the fate of the fallen duo Huber-Beckstein
Despite this pathetic electoral failure, heads have not fallen off yet, and the debate on personal issues at the summits of the Bavarian Christian Social Union has been postponed.
The party's president, Erwin Hube and the regional government leader, Günther Beckstein, can still hold their place. The question is: When will end the grace?
The fate of the tandem, having suffered a catastrophic loss of poll of 17 percent, will be on the agenda of the special party congress, held during the last weekend of October.
Members of this heavily criticised pair have made felt that they didn't specifically wanted to hold their seats.
Thanks to this, they endeavored to appease the angry members of the group and of the base, which a day after the "Bavarian tsunami", demanded personal consequences for the loss of the absolute majority.
Five years before - admittedly still under the leadership of Edmund Stoiber at the very peak of his career - the Christian Social Union garnered 60.7 percent, while today, a year after the coup against Stoiber, only 43.4 percent of their strength remains.
During 46 years, the CSU has been the "only ruler" of Bavaria giving 18 percent of the German GDP.
But, conservatives have always had a strong presence in the southern region, which is an important key to the Hungarian economy. In the future, they will be forced to join the coalition.
As one of the first signs of an internal restructuring of the party, the vice president and the federal minister of agriculture, Horst Seehofer, presented as a possible successor to Huber, also received a place in this small reconnaissance group, which initiates discussions to feel the way ahead with the liberals of the FDP as well as with the Free Electors, long trained in the values of the right, about a possible coalition government in Munich.
A strange nose-thumbing was the help of the list of electeurs free, to enter the Gabriele Pauli into the legislation, whose the action taking against Stroiber served as a possible putsch by the duet Huber-Beckstein, to then  give a short shrift to the very ambitious municipal politics woman.
Now, leaders of the CSU put all their energy to stabilise, one way or another, Beckstein.
In this transition, Stoiber, who until now pulled the strings behind the scenes will also be given an active role. The former head of the regional government and ex-chairman of the CSU, has called September 28th the bitterest day of his political career.
Monday, Huber launched ascerbic remarks against the CDU. According to him, they would have earned a lot more support from their sister party.
Other CSU politicians have interpreted the defeat as a warning for the CDU and also for Angela Merkel.
Following the Bundestag election, which will take place in September 2009, Merkel will only be able to be Chancellor again if they restore in one way or another, with a joint force, the CSU, having played an important role in the national success of 2005.
According to Merkel, barely concealing her disappointment caused by the fiasco, the loss of ground of the CSU shall not negatively influence the grand coalition in Berlin.
Which is relative, however, because it will not be easier to manage the damaged CSU, and the Social Democrats' crisis is still ongoing.
Since 1946, the SPD has reached its worst results with 18.6 per cent in Bavaria.
Lukasenko - opponents 110 - 0.
No member of the opposition party gained any seats in the Byelorussian Parliament during Sunday's elections.
According to the Russian observers, this is explained by a country led by Alexander Lukashenko, who assures its prosperity and stability, while according to the Organization for Security and Cooperation in Europe (OSCE), this is explained by illegalities committed during the counting of the votes.
The OSCE, having sent 450 observers from 43 countries, does not approve the elections.
Although the legislature composed of 110 people in this country of 10 million inhabitants does very well without the opposition since many decades, before the elections yesterday, the opposition uniting its forces under the name of United Democratic Forces (ODSZ)seriously hoped that Lukashenko, renewing his mandate as president for the fourth time during dubious elections, in the footsteps of the modification of the constitution in 2006, "would allow" this time the presence of some members of the opposition in parliament.
In this way, the ODSZ backed off from the boycott originally planned.
The fact that Belarus, increasingly economically dependent on Russia, wanted improve its relations with the EU, where because the political order of Belarus is classified as undemocratic, Lukashenko and several senior politicians do not receive entry visa, was one of the expectations of the opposition. Belarus had to take a loan because of the reduction of Russian natural gas imports, always more expensive, and thus contributed to the Beltransgaz enterprise, owner of the gas pipelines crossing the country, passing into Russian hands.
The fact that the OSCE, during the evaluation of the campaign, put the emphasis on the positive changes rather than on shortcomings, such as for instance the ban to run for a third of candidates of the opposition, made reference to a prior appeasement.
However, the OSCE communiqué on Monday challenged the campaign, during which most of the opposition candidates could not appear in the media, and particularly the fact that the opposition could not be present for the vote count.
Despite all this, the opposition still feels an sensible improvement in the political regime: the political detainees have found freedom, and Minsk is ready for small confrontation with Moscow, while still refusing to recognise South Ossetia and Abazzia that have been split from Georgia. Yet, Russia and Belarus ,who form a federation on paper have considered the two territories as independent for a month now.
"We have taken two steps forward, and a step backwards, but most important is that the dialogue has been initiated between Belarus and the EU" - said Alexander Milinkevich to our newspaper.
According to the opposition candidate in the presidential election of 2006, it is desirable for it to stay like that, despite the fact that the powers that be are afraid in this parliament which has no sway, to let in even a single opponent." 
The opposition does not foresee protest actions in light of the results. It is rather trying to get its message across on the need for economic reforms to the voters.
"We obviously have a lot of concern in this area: we need to print opponents newspapers in Russia, local authorities put up obstacles against us with regards to distribution, but I can see that there are an increasing number of people supporting the elections, even among elderly people," said Milinkevich, referring to the fact that in the current regime of Lukashenko, who considers social security as its main outcome, the segment of the officially most supported retirees no longer consider it as appropriate.
"Because of the country's indebtedness and the rise of the trade deficit, the collapse of Social Security, 'evoking the silence of a graveyard', is just a matter of time" - think Milinkevich.
Unlike the opposition politician, the Russian observers certified the  elections as democratic.
Sergei Lebedev, leader of the Commonwealth of Independent States, told the Russian news agency RIA Novosti: "People do not believe in words, but in deeds." Thus, the absence of the opposition is only proof of the maturity of the Belarussian voters.
Brunetta said: "From today, breakfast before work".
Never in the history of the Chigi Palace have we had revolving doors for the entry and exit of employees.
But from today, is in effect this new measure against the smart asses, against who they clock out and then go to drink coffee at the pub during working hours.
The new anti-idlers plan was presented today by the Minister of Public Administration, Renato Brunetta, and by the Secretary-General of the Council Presidency, Mauro Masi.
"The revolving doors - tells Brunetta - are a tool to work better, with more productivity, more attendance and more services" says the minister.
Now is starting a new season of responsibility and transparency.
"It is reformism" also stresses Brunetta.
The installation of the council presidency in every building is completing with the Chigi palace.
According to Masi, "the choice of revolving doors is important, even from a symbolic point of view.
No resistance from the employees has been recorded, the secretary general assured: "It is a process shared by employees, and we have had the cooperation of all."
In short, no more breakfast during working hours: no more coffee nor croissant.
Promise of Brunetta, suggesting with a smile, "a good 7 o'clock cappuccino in the morning is a good and healthy resolution".
During a Public Administration High School conference.
from Rome, the minister tells us that "in three months, illness related absences of public employees has been reduced by 50%, that being 60 thousand more workers in a year".
And he adds that it is essential to make the public administration more efficient.
Italian, "whose wage dynamics over these past 8-10 years - explains the minister -  have doubled in comparison to those in the private sector, and well above the rate of inflation.
Meanwhile, thousands of civil servants, united to challenge the standards of the Brunetta decree by making use of Codacons.
"while the minister of Public Office spreads today data regarding the decrease in absenteeism in the workplace because of illness - writes the consumers association- the "active lazy" people continue to rise.
Indeed, in Italy, thousands of correct and productive employees of the public administration, gathered to declare war on illegitimate standards, contained in the decree.
In particular, in Tar, we question the prohibition of extra allowances in case of service disability; the extension of ill worker’s  house working hours, during which there are inspections, and other aspects of the new rules proposed by the minister.
Accidents in the workplace, Napolitano: "prevention is crucial."
Every day, in Italy, one day, there are 2,500 work accidents, 3 deaths and 27 people who are disabled permanently.
INAIL's data confirms, in fact, that in 2007 there were about 1,200 white deaths.
The figures indicate the gravity of the phenomenon, which remains one of the main causes of death, and causes almost twice as many deaths as homicides.
To focus the attention of institutions, social forces and sources of information on this dramatic issue, ANMIL celebrates today, in all Italian provinces, the 58th national day for victims of accidents at work, established as the second Sunday in October.
"The disturbing information provided by ANMIL, as well as the tragic events of recent days, confirm the importance of prevention in the workplace," says Italian President Giorgio Napolitano in a message sent to Pietro Mercandelli, President of ANMIL, the national association of those who have been injured and disabled in the workplace.
The head of state expressed his "sincere appreciation for the collaborative ongoing effort with respect to prevention in the workplace, protection of injured workers, assistance to families of victims and sensitization of public opinion."
"Naturally indignant, everyone hit the table to put an end to such tragedies which, by their size, raise the rest of media and the participation of people opinion, even if the daily reality presents the dramatic and even repetitive cases in their dynamic.
Napolitano does not deny that "there is certainly a problem as to resources: it is essential to invest in training and information."
The many initiatives promoted in the schools bear a special significance for greater awareness of the young people entering the work force.
It is our duty to keep attention focused on this phenomenon, not to underestimate the alarm about its societal importance, implement and improve the legislative standards.
For its part, the president of the Gianfranco Fini House has pointed out how much "this phenomenon of white dead is a real social emergency, who insult each of us conscience, and requires all institutions, to make a real effort to end it quickly".
The data of people injured at work appear to indicate a slight positive trend, but that does not prevent that the number of white deaths is still impressive" has the president of the Anmil Pietro Mercandelli later underlined.
"We do not want that this 'trend toward on the cheap' actually translates into diminished attention because it is precisely when attention relaxes that tragedy occurs".
"We believe that in general, we are not doing enough to contrast the phenomenon of accidents and this contrast can be done through multiple actions."
"We believe - Mercandelli emphasized - more checks and inspections are necessary, like greater intervention into the training of workers, from school onward."
He added "that yet another effort must be done concerning communication and raising public awareness.
"But the more important, a greater sense of responsibility from employers facing a phenomenon that represents a social emergency."
"Mercandelli subsequently denounced 'the safeguard conditions progressive deterioration of the work victims compensation' and 'the assistance drift where the system is moving last years'.
"The objective thus, is for giving the worker the guarantee of insurance – he added - so that the fate of anyone who has an accident, should not depend on the spontaneity or the widening of the legislature."
Finger pointed at MP3 players, they put the hearing at risk.
Listening to music at full volume for a protracted period using portable music devices, such as MP3 players, can cause permanent damage to the hearing.
This is what the European Commission announce, in a statement circulated in Brussels, quoting the Scientific Committee on the unexpected and recently identified health risks in EU(Csrseri), published today.
"From this scientific report - let us read in the footnote - it emerges that 5-10% of those who, during a period of at least 5 years, listen to music at full volume using portable music devices, for more than one hour per day per week, risk a permanent hearing loss."
"I am concerned by the fact that a significant number of young people who frequently use portable music devices and mobile phones at full volume may unknowingly damage their hearing in an irreparable way," says Meglena Kuneva.
"According to scientific data - the responsible Ue continues - it is a clear risk and we must react quickly.
What matters most is to raise the awareness of consumers and to make public this information.
We need to check again the existing control systems, given the scientific opinion, in order to make them entirely effective and that can follow new technologies. "
Brussels has asked the independent scientific committee to examine the problem, given the intensive use of portable music devices and the increase in the number of young people exposed to the noise they generate.
"The scientists - concludes Ue executives - confirm that there are good reasons to worry, and that the European Commission will now examinate with the member countries and other interested parties, which measures could possibly be adopted to protect children and adolescents in a better way against exposure to noise from portable music devices and appliances.
There is already a European standard for security, which limits the noise level of portable music devices to 100db, but the concern is growing about the hearing damages that could come from excessive exposure to such noise sources.
It is possible to adequately limit these data making use of solutions like reduction of levels and of the duration of exposure to noise.
The EU Scientific Committee pointed out that users of portable music devices who listen to music at full volume (over 89 decibels) for five hours per week are exceeding the limits currently in force as to the maximum acceptable level of noise in the workplace.
Those who listen to music in such conditions for prolonged periods, are at risk of permanent hearing loss after 5 years.
This interests 5-10% of users of these devices, and their number can be quantified at around 2.5 to 10 million people in the A.E.
Rome: Alemanno gave the start-up order to the Commission for the Future of the Capital.
Today we begin, in March we will finish, in June we will reap the benefits.
This is the schedule set by the Capitol for the work of the "Commission for the future of Capital Rome", which took place this morning, at the new seat behind the Baths of Caracalla.
In six months, President Antonio Marzano and 49 other members of the Commission will develop the directives for Rome.
In March, when they have finished, the Committee and the Council will assess the analyses and the projects, so as to present the strategic plan for Rome in June, with the "official stamp" of the Capitol and its mayor, Gianni Alemanno.
"The Commission is completely independent; all political, social and cultural ideas are represented on it, Alemanno stressed - it will have to propose development ideas for Rome, which can be used by the political decision makers, which are still the Committee and the Community Council.
No overlapping roles, but only the desire to have a setting in which to create a great project for Rome.
In March, it will have finished its work and will then disappear, because this assignment must be of precisely limited duration.
In juin-annonce the mayor- we will present the strategic plan issue from the future Rome Capital's Commission 's work. "
For those who accuse the commission to be unnecessary, given that his views will not be binding, Alemanno replies: "Everything depends on the work that the Commission will be able to do, as well as the quality of its proposals.
If the quality is there, as in France, thanks to the Attali Commission, as in Rome besides, I am sure of it, its contribution will be crucial.
Too often politics is overwhelmed by the management of everyday life and emergencies that arise from time to time.
We, on the contrary, want to look forward, and further, toward a far greater prospective, working seriously on the development of Rome and its future."
In addition, the Mayor of Rome insists on pointing out that "this committee is not a useless body or a bureaucratic group: it is absolutely free, and will not cost Roman citizens a penny, and it will serve to get information from and obtain the participation of the best minds that express the sentiments of the capital city.
To Alemanno, indeed, "it should be a draft strategic reference neither firm nor immobile, to allow our city, to improve itself, with is absolutely necessary, while thinking about its future maintaining a spirit of unity,".
A future that, says the mayor of Rome, "will not be limited to the usual local borders, but that will look further" not only as regards the future metropolitan city and its legal status of Capital, but "also as regards the role that Rome can and must have, as Capital of Europe and the Mediterranean".
Obama? The first anti-American president. This is why.
A famous American politician who wants to be considered independent, wrote: "Barack Obama will be the second anti-American president.
The first was Jimmy Carter, who, with his decisions, destroyed the US economy and had a relationship (as he still has today, as a private citizen) with the enemy Islam."
The attacks against Obama increase as the date of the elections are getting closer.
A woman from Miami has written on a website: "This person is full of ambition".
Obama is really full of himself: he believes he will win the highest office in a country which has altogether two black governors and five black senators!"
In actual fact, these are attacks which mean very little; they are obviously attacks of a racial nature, and do not answer the question of all the voters: Will he be a good president? We have, in addition, the polls, which all say that Obama will win and by a good margin.
In this case, it is again someone who speaks from the heart and not from the brain.
A Mississippi newspaper, in the South United States innards, wrote an article: once in the voting booth, we well know who the American Patriot will give his vote to.
Here is one aspect of the American mindset kept secret until the end.
"Say whatever you want, we shall see ourselves where to put the cross, on Obama or on McCain.
There are even people who swear: If Obama wins, we will leave from the United States.
Things never revealed till now, so much so that the success of the black candidate seems almost certain.
Anyway, despite all these arguments, the winning card for the Democrats is George Bush.
It was asked to 1500 people: What were the mistakes made by Bush during his term ? 89 percent replied: Iraq.
America is changing.
In Vietnam, this nation has lost 50 thousand soldiers and was sent back home with a kick in the ass.
In Iraq, 4500 soldiers have lost their lives, and Americans have not been forced to pack their bags.
Despite this, Iraq was, for most, the weakness of Bush.
Who will take the place of George W will have an enormous task to accomplish.
USA, the economic debacle is felt even among journalists: in the press is the time for deletions and many blame the Internet, this "assassin" of the print newspaper.
The Pew Research Center questioned five American hundred journalists about the status of their profession and about mind control in the future.
Well, almost all journalists are pessimistic about their future.
However, they have not openly declared to the press attaches, to be feeling less worried about the credibility.
They do not feel isolated as in the past.
The problem of American journalists, it is money, the money.
The 2008 crisis for these journalists is a crisis of destroyed economic model.
In addition, the losses incurred in the newsroom, in the room where the editors work at assembling the newspapers, are a big problem.
This is a problem that must be resolved, according to the journalists interviewed, since one hopes that traditional media such as the public understands it, will not be reduced substantially.
A clear but complex pessimism invades the American journalism.
Six in ten senior executives and journalists from printed newspapers are convinced that journalism at national level is heading the wrong way.
Locally, the executive group is at 65%.
Printed publication against broadcast.
Journalists have no difficulty in seeing where the web in going.
The larger edition homes are spawning themselves a shift towards internet, seen by many as the 'murderer' of newspaper.
The "economic pressure" that the journalists were feeling, increased up to 79%.
The 500 interviewed journalists admitted taking to technology hoping it "will do something good" for their journalism.
Today, the largest hitch in the American journalism is between those who run the newsrooms- i.e. the directors- and reporters who work for them.
56% of managers at national level, are convinced that the reporters share their values, whereas at local level, this percentage goes down to 23%.
For some, this is linked to "work safety."
The directors who plan to lose their job within 3 years, are of 47% of the national level.
Concerning journalists, we are heading towards 30%.
The one of "safe working" concerning the staff (our writers, ed) in America is still on the agenda.
Only 13% of journalists work under contract.
In such a vast nation as the United States, with 300 million people and thousands of journalists, magazines, radio, television and Internet, employers often offer what they want, and it is fast becoming an issue of taking or leaving.
Directors almost always earn big wages, whereas the editor can earn ten thousand dollars per month, besides pension and the payment of insurances.
Concerning holiday, the logic becomes complicated: x days after the first year, x days after the third, up to 15 days in all, after a certain number of years.
But, according to their disclosure, American journalists are often "sick" during the year.
It is the fault of the climate.
Unipol: Rome courthouse, Danilo Coppola stays in Grottaferrata.
The President of the second section of the criminal court in Rome, Carmelo Rinaudo, decided to reject the judgment pertaining to the estate agent, Danilo Coppola, who had asked to leave his city of Grottaferrata in order to settle in Rome.
. Coppola is investigated for bankruptcy as part of training relative to the Unipol-Bnl escalation.
During the trial, last week, he had obtained release home turned into residence requirement in Grottaferrata.
His lawyers, Michele Gentiloni and Gaetano Pecorella, had demanded that the estate agent be able to travel the route between the provincial village and a house in the capital.
According to the court, such freedom of movement (which the PM has not granted) would enable him to influence his company and to have access to the evidence against him.
Elites in danger.
The phenomenon had already been seen a few days ago, with the House of Representatives vote against the $700 billion rescue plan approved by the White House: a significant number of Americans were, and still are, more interested in punishing Wall Street than in saving the American economy.
And yesterday’s New York Times confirms it well announcing that the current crisis divides the Republican party, even more divided between his East Coast old soul, moderated, pro-federal institutions and pro-business community, and its new soul, on the contrary, conservative, hostile to « those of Washington » and to the world of finance, powerful especially in central and southern states.
The soul, precisely, which has made itself feel in a despotic way with the vote which I mentioned at the beginning.
However what has been mentioned is only one example of the changes, the big changes that the ongoing economic earthquake pre-announce or let already guess: not only in the United States, but everywhere in the West, and may be not just there.
In the United States as in Europe, the crisis seems to be accelerating phenomena hatching for some time, to the point where, in the new climate, they are solidifying and coming forth.
The first of these phenomena is the updating, the extraordinary stimulus, of the sovereign-state double category compared to a sort of renationalization of the economy.
The crisis, indeed, is a crisis of banking-financial institutions that have, obviously close relationships abroad, but who, above all, are involved on a large scale with the balance sheets of people and families who live in one country, in one state.
This immediately creates a political problem for those who govern it: i.e., how to respond to the difficulties and the protests of individuals and families who are not voters.
In short, the crisis appears economically worldwide, but politically, it is here nearly national.
The political internationalization really seems to be overtaked or, have little to say about that: the obvious evidence is provided by the European Union, which as usual, shared between the various interests and the various national strategies, not succeed to decide any common policy.
And so, it is from the government of each state that all are waiting for speeches, rescue and recovery plans, new rules, and especially a credits affection: when one’s going through a difficult period, only the States have the economic resources, the mass of financial resources able to try to put things back in place.
They also possess the necessary resources and the legitimacy to use them: two priceless resources, elements which no market or international organization can ever use in a similar way.
This new emphasis on the crisis of the nation-state is moreover in perfect harmony with the continuing major importance that the most recent economic developments of the economy tend to attribute to a factor somewhat related to this item: territoriality.
Indeed, paradoxically, when we were convinced to be entered from then in the Kingdom of the network, of the increasingly sophisticated technology, of the equipment failure, convinced that global finance was now intended to dominate world we realized just like that, that on the contrary our future will have to settle scores more and more with little material things such as water, harvest, oil.
Things that can certainly be transported from one place to another one on Earth, but which are definitively linked to a restricted area, a territory.
Thus, which is sovereign, has certainly more cards than that which is not, i.e., anyone who has the misfortune to live in a place without harvest, without oil and water.
I now come to the second novelty, however, which predicts a fracture.
He who says Territory, State, Government, inevitably says Politics, and thus Leadership.
Accordingly, the economic crisis seems to produce two converging phenomenae .
On one side, the awareness of the objective need for authoritarian leadership, the search for a person who will know how to take control of the situation.
On the other hand, a disrepute wave for the existing leaderships, economic species that have been proved inadequate and full of dark areas.
And furthermore, something even more profound, and in some sense, even worrying: a discredit, a suffering, an image of inadequacy, a sense of remoteness that tends to involve the entire class of leaders in a growing number of countries in the West.
Thus increases even more the conviction of the various classes, before the actions are the same ideas of the social elites until now to their apogee, their way of listening and of being, their culture in the complex acceptance of the term, to have same time, and to be increasingly more foreign with the opinions of the majorities.
In short, the demand for leadership is growing in a subterranean way, a powerful and multi-pronged movement of de-legitimizations of the ruling classes and the traditional political orders, which is being manifested in spontaneous electoral "revolts" and in the collective changes in mood very recently, from the conservative ascent in Bavarian Austria to the fall of the Labourites in Britain, to the rebellion of the American Congress against Bush (and it well may be that the victory of the right in Italy did not happen by chance).
We have the impression that the traditional elites, their parties, their programs, and also their rituals, their newspapers, their accredited intellectuals, their dimensions, one might say, still have more difficulty, which did not simply start today, in understanding and therefore explaining the deeper layers of Western societies and the fact that the economic crisis is magnifying, increasing and potentially creating a disturbance to an inordinate extent.
Seeing all this, to talk of a current "rebellion of the masses" on the agenda, seems frankly exaggerated.
But one says well, to keep one's eyes wide open, it is not without reason.
The super glue to walk on the walls.
Defeating the laws of gravity thanks to a super glue, and in the future, walk on walls like Spiderman.
This is the objective of various American research centers, and today, a team of four institutions has almost succeeded at it.
With an adhesive measuring barely 2.5 square centimetres, researchers have succeeded in keeping stuck a 100 kg body on a vertical wall.
Study- the American magazine Science has published the findings of some researchers from the University of Dayton, of Akron, the Georgia Institute of Technology and the Air Force Research Laboratory.
The material, invented by the team of researchers, is an evolution of those we know that use a particular structure of carbon, called nano tubes of carbon.
"The principle of the glue can be imagined as a series of tubes diperses as a pile of spaghetti." says Zhong Lin Wang of the Georgia Institute of Technology in Atlanta.
Scientists have been inspired by the legs of geckos, which are overlaid by microscopic hair which ensure the animal, a perfect adherence.
Tests performed on various materials, such as glass, Teflon, and sandpaper, have proved that the new adhesive is ten times more powerful than the legs of these reptiles, and also, that he "peels off easily from the walls," explains Liming Dai, researcher in the engineering faculty of University of Dayton.
Walk on the walls? – 'this material could be used as temporary scotch-tape" adds Liming Dai.
Maybe to walk on the walls as Spiderman? Maybe that yes, but researchers think of a use much less fascinating such as the connection between electronic appliances, given that the carbon nanotubes are conductors of heat and electric current.
Other applications could concern aerospace engineering.
For now, no super heroes.
Other Research - The University of Berkeley, in California, is doing it also, in the search for a new adhesive.
In an article in the Journal of the American Chemical Society,  California researchers introduced an adhesive made up of microfibers, like hairs, which clean dust off themselves during their movement over a surface to guarantee a perfect and constant grip.
Drugs: never with fruit juice.
caution on Pamplemousse juice, of orange and apple.
These drinks, consumed particularly in the summer because they are thirst-quenching and rich in vitamins, if combined with some vital medications, affect absorption, either amplifying or lessening their efficacy, with very serious possible consequences with respect to health.
David nailey, a professor at the University of Western Ontario in London, recalls the fruit juices risks, fresh or in can, if associated with certain medicines ingestion; during the 236th American Chemical Society national meeting underway in Philadelphia, he launches a new alarm: a glass of grapefruit, orange or apple juice is enough to reduce the some vital medicines absorption, canceling their beneficial effects and putting a risk on patients' health.
Grapefruit juice has already been heavily criticized because it is held responsible for increasing the effects of certain anti-arrythmics, antibiotics, tranquilizers, antihistamines and neurological medications up to toxic levels.
MEDICATIONS AT RISK - The Italian medications agency gave us this news in a newsletter dated two years ago, alerting doctors and patients not to underestimate the danger of this mix and to pay attention to what one drinks, if one is taking a medicine such as diazepam or methadone.
Not only grapefruit- according to experts, even orange and apple juice contains substances that inhibit medicines.
There is a long list of active ingredients whose effects are inhibited by grapefruit and other juices.
Hence, the calling of Michele Carruba, director of the department of pharmacology at the University of Milan: "These findings are in general, immediately reported to the various national and international agencies of medicines that should if needed, change the medecines informative notes.
One should always read the papers that illustrates medicines that one takes, and, if something is not clear, one shouldn't be impressed, but ask clearly to the doctor or the pharmacist "underlined the expert at the agency ANSA.
The Nobel in economics to Paul Krugman.
The Nobel Prize for Economy has been given to American Paul Krugman for his research on models of trade and the locations of economic activities.
Krugman, 55, is a neo-Keynesian who teaches at Princeton University and is also a famous columnist of The New York Times.
Krugman is one of the greatest criticism of the solutions in economy and foreign policy of the Bush administration.
A few months after the September 2001 attacks, during the days of Enron's collapse, Krugman wrote, in an article published in the New York Times, that the second event would have been more crucial than the first one, in terms of consequences on the US history.
A prediction which unleashed many controversies, and which was blamed upon the economist for years, but which now has proved accurate.
"I am surprised and even a little shocked of the speed with which the memory of scandals such as the collapse of Enron or WorldCom, have disappeared from public attention," said Krugman at the end of 2002.
According to Lorenzo Bini Smaghi, of the executive committee of the European Central Bank, Krugman is an "economist of great value, but also a divulger with a very aggressive style", particularly critical towards the excessive liberalism of the Bush administration.
Open Office, here is the third edition of the "anti-Microsoft" package.
This is the day of the release of OpenOffice.org.3.0, the open source personal productivity suite, which aims to reach still more users, from home to office, from professionals to public administration, providing a free alternative to the most famous Microsoft Office.
Following almost a year of work, done by volunteers, supervised by SUN Microsystem, the new package Open Office is shown to the public with several new features: from the welcome screen, and the interface which was reviewed and has become less austere, to other more important ones, such as the compatibility developed for the Apple MAC OS X operating system, and support for the new ODF format (Open Document Format) 1.2, the latest ISO standard version.
Open Office has especially been focusing on the interaction with the Office 2007 suite, and it is indeed possible to open documents with the new Microsoft extension  (.docx, .xlsx, .pptx)
Also interesting, certain function specific to particular modules, such as the one which can reduce the size of PowerPoint presentations, a useful example, to send them by e-mail, or to import PDF files into graphical modules while retaining the original appearance of the page.
Still on this front, it is possible to create "PDF hybrid" documents which combine the graphics typical of the Adobe format with the elements of a spreadsheet or a text editor.
The collaboration between several person is something that had various improvements within the applications: with the calcul sheet, various users can intervene, avoiding conflicts about changes, in development of texts, because each employee had a colour of comments for greater recognition in the review phase.
Some companies are even working to bring some functions of OpenOffice to the Web (in the cloud), and in the coming weeks, they should be releasing the final version.
The Italian version is downloadable at http://it.openoffice.org/download/3.0.0/download300.htmlet and adds up to the English version that was on the mirror since Friday.
In addition to Windows and Mac OS, the suite is as usual also available for the Linux operating system.
Upon request, the CD of installation can be shipped home or to the workplace.
And if the theme of gratuitousness can be a way for spread it in the houses, it is precisely in the business, that Open Office suite attempts the big challenge, already counting on various projects carried out in public administration and schools.
Not to mention the realities that offer training service, consultations and assistance, ideal for small and medium-sized firms, which might also be open to future business prospects.
Open Office is composed of five main modules: writer, for the video writing equivalent of word; CALC, is a spreadsheet that aims to replace excel; impress, meant to rival PowerPoint presentations, dBase, like the famous access, is the programme that allows us to work on databases; finally draw is the graphic module.
Target for 2008, reach 5 millions download, and considering that today there are almost 3.6 million, it is likely that, with the release of the new version, the predicted figure could even be exceed
Kohl is positive too, it is the fourth case of doping.
A new case of a positive drug result at the last Tour de France: this refers to Bernhard Kohl, the Austrian from the Gerolsteiner team, who  qualified third and was the winner of the jersey for the best climber.
It is the site of the L'Equipe newspaper which reported the news.
Kohl, 26 years old, is the fourth cyclist tested positive for Cera, the Epo of the third generation after the Italian Riccardo Riccò and Leonardo Piepoli, and German Stefan Schumacher, also from Gerolsteiner.
The blood tests carried out on the test tubes of Kohl are part of those made in recent weeks, by the laboratories in Lausanne and Chatenay-Malabry.
If the cons-analysis confirm the positivity for Cera, the Austrian will lose his third place at the Tour and will have to necessarily expect two years of elimination.
The news of Kohl's positive reaction to the third generation EPO test was confirmed by Bordry Stone, the head of the French anti-doping agency, who told the Associated Press that he had notified the Austrian authorities of the positive reaction.
The 26-year-old Austrian was placed on the podium behind the Spaniard Carlos Sastre and the American Cadel Evans, thus taking the jersey with the green dots for Best Climber.
Immigrants: New York Times wonders if Italy is racist?
Italy "as an immigrants country recently turned into a privileged destination for immigrants" welcomed with resistance.
Does this turn the beautiful country into a nation of racists? That is the question posed by the New York Times which has dedicated a long article to discussing the subject of racism in Italy, based on the case of young Abdul William Guibre, a native of Burkina Faso, killed last month in Milan for stealing a box of cookies.
This case highlights what the New York Times describes as "the paradox of the North": the northern regions are at the same time the ones where there is "more integration and more work," but also "the strongest anti-immigrant sentiment in the country and the greatest support for the Northern League."
Confirming the increasing tension between Italians and immigrants, the NYT also made reference to episodes of intolerance in Milan, Parma, Rome, Ciampino and Castel Volturno.
Not only.
Even the new legilature sought by Lega to curb immigration and facilitate the return of illegal immigrants, is cited as evidence of climate change in Italy.
Trend underlined by the Pope and also by the President of the Republic: "Giorgio Napolitano during his neeting with Benoît XVI on Quirinal, asked what the state and the church are working on together to overcome racism."
Students victims of high rents, up to 900 Euro for a room.
The renting market for students does not know any crisis
According to the latest survey of Sunia, the tenants' union, to rent a simple room can cost a student up to 900 Euros in Milan, 700 in Florenc, 650 in Naples, 600 in Rome.
"The phenomenon has now reached very seriously aspect to the extend that exclude whole groups of youth to study right because of the very high overall costs that origin families must support - explains the responsible of studies department of Sunia, Laura Mariani- in these cities, the high demand from students has so distorted the market that a widespread increase process begin even for residents.
In most cases, the rental offers in addition include a series of violations: free-type contract, unregistered, without rental limits, sub-rentals.
For the Sunia, exceptional measures through the taxation review, are needed to calm prices.
Reading the investigation, in detail, we see that in Milan, for a one-bedroom in the area of Brianza, one needs around 450 Euros; for a studio, one goes from a minimum of 650 Euros (area of Bande Nere), to an average value of 800 (area of Lambiate, Udine, and Fiera) to a maximum of 900 Euros (area of Vittoria.)
In Florence, a bed costs, on average, 350/400 euros, a room around 700 euros.
In Bologna, where students are concentrated in the areas close to the university, it costs 250 / 280 euros for a bed in a double, and 370 to 500 for a simple room.
In Rome, in the areas near the central universities (San Lorenzo, Piazza Bologna), they charge about 600 Euros for a single, 450 for a bed in a double.
Slightly lower values (550 euros for a simple) for the areas close to the other universities (Ostiense and Cinecittà).
You can only save if you distance yourself in the outlying areas: 300 euro for a bed, and 450 for a simple in the Predestina, Centocelle or similar areas.
In Naples, you need 300/400 euros for a bed. For a single size, we spend 400 to 600 euros, with higher prices in the areas of Policlinico, Vomero, and Colli Aminei.
In Bari, for a bed, it takes 250 / 350 euros, at least 350 for a singles.
In smaller towns, prices are lower in absolute terms, but they have a great importance in the cities economy.
Finally, cities such as Perugia, in which rentals are often taken by students from outside the community, there is an anomaly: the rent asked for foreign students is increased by 25 / 30% compared to that applied to Italians.
Goodbye old Cinema Paradiso, cities are getting rid of the historic movie palaces.
The historic movie theatres are closing in favour of multiplex.
"A city without cinemas is a blind city , it is like a face without eyes."
The picture provided by the director Giuseppe Tornatore, well shows what happens in major Italian suburbs, but also in the countryside cities.
The marginalisation process of cinemas, with the birth on the outskirts of big multirooms, and the death of consomption of Mono rooms in the cities's central areas, is one of the major events which seems us to be inevitable and undisputable; moreover, it has all the characteristics of a real cultural crime.
To disappear, it is often historic and full of memory places, "it is like one of my friend disappeared, someone we known, with whom we shared a bit of the road and so many emotions" observes the director of the Nuovo Cinema Paradiso, the film that offers Tornatore 20 years ago, the first Oscar and the Grand Prize at Cannes juror, and witch was telling the poetry of a provincial auditorium, and nostalgia for a way to experience cinema, maybe forever lost.
The figures provided by ANEC, the main Association of Traders, shows everything: the last five years, 316 traditional movie theaters shut down, and these are the main cities' movie houses which have paid the bill: 10 less in Florence, 9 in Milan and Rome, Naples, Bologna, 6, at least in less in Turin, 5 in Palermo.
Among the areas most affected by the closure, the Roman Emily is at the top with 82 single-room cinemas lost, followed by the Tuscany (44) and the Lombardy (41).
The evidence which confirms that the advent of the multiplex is indeed primarily responsible for their demise is that these are the three Italian regions that have the most new multi-theater movie houses: 195 more screens in Lombardy in the last five years, 81 in Tuscany and the same number in Emilia-Romagna.
"The Italian operation has expanded in an irrational fashion," observes Paolo Protti, president of the ANEC," it is useful to build new structures, but it is still necessary to ensure the survival of those that already exist, because when a movie theater closes in a city, the people who frequent it are not all necessarily prepared to go to the multiplex.
Without mentioning the missed deliberation of the credit for shopkeepers: the antecedent debt of the State is around 10 million euros.
It is shameful that, from an ethical and moral point of view, the government does not abide by the existing laws.
To support the industry will require between 16 and 18 million euros per year.
Note the case of Bologna, the first Italian city that, concerned about these closures, decided to resolve the situation with the signing of a agreement between City Hall and ANEC, the first of its kind in Italy, to protect and promote single-room movie houses in historic city centers and on the outskirts.
Among the expected norms, there are state tax measures in favour of managers and benefits for the public in terms of mobility: viewers will be able to enter the restricted traffic zone and will have special rates for parking spaces and in certain parking garages.
"It is an initiative that I am very fond of" note Giuseppe Tornatore "and I hope that other cities will follow the example of Bologna by establishing other measures.
However, it is clear that, in order to contrast the superpower of the multiplex rooms, the traditional rooms must also improve the quality of sound and image, because the public of today is more demanding.
Traditional movie theaters defence is a concern which has always been important for me: the closure of the Bagheria's Supercinema, place of my childhood and teenage, was the spark that convinced me to make 'New Movie House Paradiso' which I thought already 10 years ago.
I have lived in Rome for 25 years, and every time I walk by the Rialto  or the Quirinal de Via Nazionale, now both closed, where I have experienced so many shared emotions, I look the other way so as not to see the worn-down signs covered in dirt.
Links between politics and 'Ndrangheta, arrested Mayor of Gioia Tauro.
"The mayor of Gioia Tauro was prepared to align the town hall's choices to the interests of the Piromalli clan."
Serious charges have been leveled by the magistrates in the Anti-Mafia Directorate of Calabria regarding the Mayor and the Vice-Mayor of Gioia Tauro, Giorgio Dal Torrione and Rosario Schiavione, and the Mayor of Rosarno, Carlo Martelli, arrested this morning for Mafia association.
Handcuffs too for Gioacchino Piromalli, the former mediator between the clan and public administrations, and his grandson lawyer, namesake of the boss, already convicted of criminal association of a mafia type, and to pay 10 million euros.
"an affront to the legal and moral norms, and especially to common sense," the prosecutors write, the two local authorities had expressed willingness to pay for consultations to Master Piromalli.
"The clan was thus granted - the judges write - official access inside the town halls facilitating the possibilities, already considerable, of control and orientation from the public administration."
The president of the Calabrian regional committee Agazio Loiero, does not hide that 'collusions between local comittees and crime organizations, there are more than one of these " in his region:" There are places where the Mafia has a stronger influence than in others, where the collusion is almost inevitable.
But there is also a lot of politicians who resist the pressures from the Ndrangheta, heroes who are honest"
The arrests of this morning follow those of last July, following which the police announced having decapitated the Piromalli clan.
At the end of last April, the city council of Gioia Tauro had been dissolved; back in 1991, and always because of alleged conditions between organised crime and the local administration, local politicians had been discharged of their duties to administer the city.
Giorgio Dal Torrione, mayor of the UDC during the dissolution, had been appointed head of a center-right coalition, after the second ballot in May 2006.
He called it a scandal when the prefecture ordered the dissolution of the city council.
He accused the Vice Interior Minister at the time, Marco Minniti, accusing him of having engineered the whole thing for political purposes, but in view of the order of incarceration signed this morning, the judges explain that the Piromalli clan had even succeeded in their request for a variance in the A3 project.
Starting interceptions ordered against Dal Torrione, the PM writes, is emerged « the availability to marry expectations of a businessman, representing a more well-known group, close to the Piromalli, unifying the choices of public administration to the interests of the clan.
When the energy is born of waves, now the big ones are engaging.
Here is an enormous source which occupies over 70% of the surface of the planet and now big global energy firms are discovering it.
Waves, currents, tides, here are the new renewable sources on which colossi such as Chevron have set eyes, and are now trying to lay hands.
The possibility of obtaining energy from the movement of the sea has been considered for a hundred years; and in the 1970s, at the time of the first oil crisis, research was intensified.
When oil prices lowered, around 1980, the idea of exploiting the marine energy was sidelined, but now the environmentalists and the new increase of oil prices give a big rise to the sector
The World Energy Council (WEC) of London valued in 2007, that 15% of worldwide electricity need could be covered by systems exploiting seas swell.
That amount would be twice the amount produced by nuclear power stations.
And furthermore, there would be the currents and the tides..
Colossi to attack.
The first company to bet on marine energy has been the Enersis, who in 2005, has signed an agreement to build a plant in northern Portugal.
When the agreement was announced, it didn't really seem revolutionary.
Two years later, still more candidates among these companies which have always been dedicated to traditional energy are banking on marine energy.
"Chevron is currently studying the technologies on oceanic energy- said the spokesman of a company associated with the American oil giant, to the economic daily Wall Street Journal- and it evaluates opportunities to cooperate with us."
The cooperation in question concerns the obtaining of a permit from  the US Energy Commission for the energy needed to set up a project of marine energy exploitation in Alaska.
This is a very interesting sign, especially if you consider that the US continues to extract oil in Alaska and President Bush recently set up a project for new drilling.
Outside of Chevron, there are Verdant Power Inc. of New York and Ocean Power of New Jersey, which go the route of energy derived from the sea; and while their details are not known, the amounts invested up to now indicate a growing interest, according to observers.
Technology tuning.
The experts are stating about a technology still in its infancy, from the fact that marine energy did not dispel fears concerning environmental impact.
At the time being, systems like those in Portugal, or some in Scotland, are small, and do not seem to create big problem to the ecosystem.
To produce energy on a large-scale, however, one must use technologies with a higher environmental impact.
"And the choices are diverse: Ocean Power, for example, uses a system of buoys connected to each other.
The pressure of the waves, which moves the mud up and down, is converted into hydraulic pressure by the pistons and cylinders inside the floaters.
The pressure causes the turbine to spin which in its turn, feeds a generator.
The energy is sent to the shore through underwater cables.
For now, we have four systems of this sort in the planning stage, in anticipation of a single federal approval and part of the energy could be used for a military installation.
Verdant Power, on the contrary, already produces the energy for a commercial center and a parking lot, using six underwater turbines in the East River in New York.
The movement of the water at the tides turns the turbines' blades, creating a rotary motion which feeds a generator.
Verdant said that it had a long list of customers waiting needed permissions to draw some energy.
After the waves, tides.
A special interest, they say at the electric power Institute of Research, is deserving at the moment, the potential of tides.
Although it is an intermittent phenomenon, tide is more predictable than wind, sun, or waves, and therefore more reliable as an energy source.
And it is precisely on tides energy that states like New York, Maine and Alaska, with others, look toward the coasts, have invested $ 7 and a half million dollars in 2008 and will invest up to 35 million in 2009.
Barack Obama will be the fourth American president to be awarded the Nobel Peace Prize
US President Barack Obama will fly away to Oslo in Norway, where he will stay 26 hours and become the fourth American president in history to receive the Nobel Peace Prize.
The diploma, the medal and the $1.4 million check will be presented to him for his exceptional efforts to strengthen global diplomacy and cooperation between nations.
The leader of the White House and his wife Michelle will land in the morning in the Norwegian metropolis, and will have a busy programme.
He will go first to the Nobel Institute, where he will meet for the very first time the five Committee members who have chosen him in October amongst 172 people and 33 organisations.
The schedule of the presidential couple then plans a meeting with King Harald V of Norway and Queen Sonja.
The visit will reach its peak during the afternoon at a formal ceremony where Obama will be awarded the prestigious prize.
It will be the fourth American president to receive it, but only the third who will be awarded the prize in the precincts of the committee
The White House has informed in advance that Obama will speak about the war in Afghanistan during award.
The president does not want to avoid this issue because he is aware that he is awarded the prize as a president currently leading a war in two countries.
He has strengthened the war effort one more time a few days ago by sending additional units in Afghanistan, something that none of its critics will forget to stress.
During the ceremony, Obama will also receive a gold medal, a diploma and a check for 10 million Swedish crowns (approximately 1.1 million Euros).
He intends to donate to charities, but he has not decided yet in practice which one.
His busy programme will then take him along with his wife to a banquet, including, in addition to the king and queen of Norway, the head of government and 250 other guests.
Obama was rather reluctant to this price at the beginning.
He mentioned, for example, having the feeling that he hadn't fully earned it.
He also repeated several times that it's not a price for him only, but for all those who defend the same values.
Right after the announcement, he said that it would be for him an "invitation to act".
A defender of nature accused of blackmail
The police of Litoměřice have accused of blackmail the president of the association Society of the protectors of nature of Litoměřice.
Several times last year he appealed for a number of proceedings related to construction sites and demanded money from investors for his personal gain in exchange for the withdrawal of those appeals, said Alena Romová, spokesman for the police in Litoměřice.
The president of the Society of Nature Preservationists of Litoměřice is Lubomír Studnička.
He is currently in detention and risks up to three-year imprisonment.
The waste sorting bins are not in the know in Brno
In Prague everyone can sort out his own beverage packaging, while in the villages of Southern Moravia you come across sorting bins on every street corner.
And in Brno?
Here, you would need to take several minutes before finding the adequate dumpsters.
I do not mean that we do not sort out Brno' waste.
But I have the feeling that councillors in our city, the second largest city, are not interested enough in this problem.
Brno is in the stone age when it comes to sorting waste, not only because people can still sort only paper, glass and PVC, but especially because of the number of bins devoted to these wastes.
Have you ever tried to drop a plastic bottle in the downtown ?
It is a whole science, which requires above all time and nerves of steel.
The only place I have found for the time being, is the place of Moravia, in front of Potrefena Husa.
Mr Onderka and his colleagues please do not bear me a grudge, but it seems damn little to me.
Without mentioning the fact that in other parts of the city it is not easy either.
And finally, many of my friends don't sort out their wastes.
Out of laziness.
It is a good step for them to reach the skips.
That does not surprise me from them.
After a festival, I have offered to go throw a few bottles of glass and PVC.
Except that I saw no coloured dump-truck on Kounicova Street.
Fortunately I found the proper place while going to take the tram.
That said, waste were overflowing.
It is after all the centre of Brno, which is supposed to represent the city at best, isn't it?!
It is probably because ecology and so-called esthetics don't really interest the Socialists in Brno too much.
That they prefer to buy the city a place in the first hockey league is a disgrace to the city throughout the country, instead of buying a few extra skips and providing more of the sort of raw materials for a cleaner Brno.
I am glad to have been able to reinforce my impression with official statistics after having taken a moment to check the internet.
According to data from the EKO-KOM Company, Brno really is the worst in the whole region of south Moravia.
The budget of Paroubek has removed money from the pensions and the sick leaves.
After the Left has grown, despite the opinion of the government, the farmers or even the bureaucrats there may be a lack of money for pensions, sick leave or housing allowances.
But also for the interest on debt of the state or internationnal judicial proceedings.
This will increase the problems of those who will govern in the second half of next year, says the finance minister Eduard Janota.
When the Social Democrats and Communists imposed the increase for some classes, they based it on the fact that the government will make loans for sensible spending, pensions or medical leave. "This only puts the problems off until later, planting mines in the ground," said Janota.
It is necessary to know that on borrowed money the interests to pay are more and more high and that it must be returned sooner or later.
The State does not really have the choice to know where to draw money.
If he does not reduce welfare or spendings, he will have to raise taxes.
To all those that the left-wing has presently risen: firemen, teachers, farmers.
And thereafter, to their children.
People will get them and should not fear for their pensions or their health insurance, of which 1.8 billion have disappeared.
But at the expense of greater indebtedness on the part of the State - next year its coffers will be short not 163 billion, but more.
Despite the efforts of minister Janota the debt is thus going to grow faster and faster and with it, the expenses related to the interests.
The State will need money to pay her back and it won't be enough to increase slightly the VAT or to reduce the maternity leave as the government did it in its anti-deficit package.
Five billion will also be missing to complete the construction of roads and railways because of the transfer of money to a few groups of voters.
It is mainly about parts which have already been decided and are underway, so it is not possible to change the projects to possibly reduce their costs.
At most to keep them, which is not free either.
This means delaying or stop 30 major sites, and the removal of European funds is also in danger, according to Karel Hanzelka's warning, ministry of transport spokesman.
The ČSSD has proposed to solve the financial deficit very deftly - it will draw from the dividends of ČEZ (producer and distributor of electrical energy), of which the State is the major shareholder to feed the transport fund.
The concern is that the rising of dividends is never certain and that it is in no way a well without a bottom.
Last year, 18 billion was browser from the ČEZ into the budget.
Each year, dividends are used to pay for cleaning up environmental damages to supplement pension accounts and even serve as a reserve for the coming pension reform.
Moreover, this device increases the real budget deficit to a level of 5.7 per cent of GDP according to EU rules.
And it is far from being the end of this carnival of transfers.
The budget for various compensations to victims of Communism and of crimes, or even the home savings accounts, decreased by nearly three billion.
It is not certain that the State can act without this money.
This is a lottery.
If we lose an international procedure, we will have to pay him anyway, notes Janota.
The minister will then have to save on the department area or, in the worst case, touch the government's budget provision.
It is also short one hundred million to fund a state project of two billion, which should allow online tracking of the expenditures of each administration.
The first stage will begin in January.
If the finance minister did not find money elsewhere, the project would have to be stopped and sanctions would take place, Janota warns.
Your next smartphone will master two operating systems.
Americans are envisaging a mobile phone in the future that will allow the user to move from one operating system to another by pressing a single button.
The projects that were revealed seem promising.
One button is enough and you switch from Windows Mobile to Android in a few seconds.
It is precisely this possibility that is the goal of American society VMware, which deals primarily with the development of virtualization software for computers.
We are going to allow you to manage two user profiles at the same time on your mobile phone.
You can alternate between them, you can see the personal and professional differences
The two will work at the same time, Srinivas Krishnamurti from the VMware company said in an interview for Computerworld magazine.
It was unveiled in November last year and it was first made a demonstration of it a few days ago.
It will be on the market in 2012.
Virtualization on smartphones is absolutely no fiction.
VMware has already successfully introduced a test version to journalists, a smartphone equipped with two operating systems.
It is a Nokia N800 modified with a RAM memory of 128 MB, which ran simultaneously the mentioned systems Windows Mobile and Android.
The development of new technologies for mobile phones is booming.
The company VMware now works with the European and American operators to test virtualisation on smartphones, and customers should have access to the devices during 2012.
The lack of snow in the mountains worries hotelkeepers.
The deserted ski trails pose a problem not only for the operators of ski lifts.
The lack of snow deters people from booking their skiing holidays in hotels and guest houses.
Thus it is still possible to get free rooms every day in winter, including Christmas and New Year.
We have plenty of hits on our site.
Internet users browse the offers, ask for prices, but do not dare to commit and book for the moment.
And if they call us, they ask immediately whether there will be snow or mud at Christmas," said Martin Jandura, operator of the Spindl.Info information portal.
If we want to spend the New Year of his dreams in Špindlerův Mlýn, we would better have to not hesitate any longer to reserve.
If we give priority to Economies and the quality of accommodation only come next, then we can try to wait a few days.
The Špindler hoteliers propose for the moment only one-week visits for the New Year.
I think they will try again for a moment to place them, but they will give up too and will accept shorter periods.
And then the number of free rooms will quickly decrease," said Jandura.
The tourist agency Ingtours of Vrchlabí also still proposes vacant beds for all periods of winter.
The week of Christmas interests us the most for the moment, it is not completely sold.
There are still unoccupied, let's say, about half the rooms in our offer.
This is why we have already prepared a handful of last-minute Christmas trips," said Petr Schiefert, Ingtours director.
The tourist agency of Vrchlabí can also offer New Year in the Krkonoše, but there are fewer available places.
The 14 first days of February are selling just as well, the remaining winter stays sell moderately.
This year, interest in winter stays has been negatively influenced by the fact that there is still no snow in Krkonoše.
The people are waiting for it to start to fall.
Nobody wants to spend winter in the mountains without snow.
If the tracks recover themselves during the week, Christmas too will be complete," thinks Schiefert.
Conversely, occupancy of the hotel Horizont in Pec pod Sněžkou is slightly higher than last year.
It was an improvement of almost five per cent.
We have some spaces left for New Year as well as for Christmas.
During the January vacation there is a great deal of interest from Poles, and February sells well too," advised Karel Rada, director of the best hotel in Pec.
The Omnia hotel near the central parking lot of Jánské Lázně is also 80 per cent full during the New Year period.
However half of the beds remains empty during Christmas at the jánské lázně newest hotel.
This year, we were pleasantly surprised by the month of January, where we have already 60 per cent of occupation at the present time.
February is a little more low for now, but as soon as the snow will fall, the interest for stays in the Krkonoše will still certainly rise said the director of the Omnia hotel, Erik Sporysch.
The hotelkeepers of Krkonoše should not however hope for more snow.
On Thursday it will be fresher and there will be rain; it should be snowy in the mountains.
But afterwards, the weather should warm up, Jiří Jakubský of the Hradec station of the Czech Hydrometeorological Institute informs us.
United States: repetition is the mother of wisdom.
It has even become amusing, the hard effort with which President Barack Obama, who has a reputation for wisdom, which mimics the strategy of his predecessor on the Afghan issue, has regarded himself as quite simple.
When he eventually let his ardently awaited document leak out, it proved to be a carbon copy of the Bush scenario for Iraq from three years ago.
Not content with using the expression "as in Iraq" several times in the same text, he has in addition not hesitated to use the title of the Bush speech in January 2007 as the title of his own speech: "A New Way Forward."
Meanwhile, he has personally criticised Bush's idea to send new reinforcements in Iraq consumed by the civil war as "irresponsible and a decision with disastrous consequences."
The following months have nevertheless shown that Bush's strategy, which came from the recommendations of his campaign managers, was the only one which was possible and likely to succeed, so much so that newspapers today do not speak of Iraq at all.
This has not improved the reputation of Bush, however, objectively speaking, he left his successor a far more favourable final situation than one could have hoped.
Barack Obama hopes that in Afghanistan, the miracle will happen again
It was once again the commanding generals who asked him for a troop increase, notably the commander of the operation in Afghanistan, General Stanley McCristal, who even severely criticized the reluctance of the White House despite his customary subordination..
He asked for 40,000 men to make the situation more favorable.
The president hesitated for three months, but though he lacked for a better option, he had at least cheated the general out of 10,000 soldiers.
He has managed to obtain the promise of additional 5,000 from Europe, even though he was expecting 10,000 initially.
Which leads to most of the problems in the whole Obama strategy seems to be his intention to start withdrawing troops from Afghanistan 18 months from now and to finish the entire process three years from now. The whole Obama doctrine leads to more questions than it provides answers for.
Many have doubts about the fact that an increase of half will bring the same results as the progress in Iraq.
Despite the fratricidal wars in recent years, the Iraqi society is relatively well organised and its leaders honour the agreements.
The Afghan situation stands out for the exact opposite - one cannot rely on anyone and no treaty is respected.
In these conditions, difficult to prepare Afghan security forces, used to change of leader day to day according to what suits them.
Political institutions, although officially founded, will remain nothing more than window dressing behind which patriarchal ethnic relations will continue to proliferate.
It is particularly difficult to balance the interests of various ethnic groups given the lack of clarity about the reports, which are further complicated by the influence of Pakistan and Iran.
Even the foundation of a "quick to act state", which is the basic goal of the operation, does not seem to be very real.
The timing of Obama's strategy is perplexing given his determination.
In the past eight years, the situation in Afghanistan has only got worse and it is currently on the edge of chaos.
Only a purely romantic heart and out of the reality can be persuaded that the small soldiers sent to the tumult of the war in order to their "speedy return home " will bring a miracle.
From a political point of view, setting a date for withdrawal of the troops is purely irresponsible since the Taliban will consider it as the indirect admission of the American defeat.
The last NATO summit demonstrated that the Europeans' willingness to participate in military operations in Afghanistan is decreasing.
European politicians neither know nor want to explain their electorate how security in Germany or Italy is linked to a war in the mountains of the Hindu Kush.
Another factor which is capable of radically altering the situation is the development of the events linked to Iran.
If the situation continues to deteriorate and the strengthened sanctions do not have any effect on the Iranians, the Americans will find themselves facing the very difficult question of resolving the problem by the use of military force.
It must be answered for example when, according to Obama, America will victoriously withdraw troops from Afghanistan.
Each solution of this kind will, however, drive a dramatic reversal of the Afghan situation.
The only solution for Obama is the fact that three years are remaining until the presidential elections and therefore there is still enough time for him to develop a new strategy in case this one would be revealed to be a flop.
The leaders of Goldman Sachs bank will not receive bonuses in cash anymore.
The senior leader employees of the American bank Goldman Sachs will no longer receive bonuses in cash this year.
The company announced it in response to strong criticism of its salary practices.
The group of 30 top executives will receive shares instead of money, which they will not be able to sell for five years.
The shares could be withdrawn from the leaders in case they would take too much risk.
According to Reuters, Goldman Sachs is thus placing itself as the leader of the effort aiming to link remuneration with the long-term performances on Wall Street.
I suppose that Wall Street is well aware of the global sense that we must take, said the former investment banker Douglas Elliott of the JPMorgan company.
The concern lies in the details, he added.
Goldman Sachs bank became the target of criticism after set aside  for itself almost $17 billion in premiums on the first three quarters of this year.
For this year, the total amount of bonuses will likely exceed $20 billion despite the measure announced today, according to Reuters.
With the arrival of the financial crisis, big bonuses in the banking sector have become a sensitive political issue in many countries.
Britain announced Wednesday that it intends to spend a single fee of 50 per cent bankers' bonuses in excess of 25,000 pounds.
France is preparing similar measures.
This year women were awarded the Nobel Prize in all areas except Physics
There were five women, a record number, who were awarded today in Stockholm from the hands of the King of Sweden Charles XVI Gustave the Nobel Prizes in technical disciplines and in literature.
In addition to the four scientists there was also the German writer from Romania Herta Müller.
Two American biologists, Elizabeth Blackburn and Carol Greider were awarded with their fellow countryman Jack Szostak the Nobel Prize in Medicine for their research in the area of chromosomes.
The chemistry prize was awarded to the Israeli Ada Jonath along with the Americans Venkatraman Ramakrishnan and Thomas Steitz for clarifying the structure and function of ribosomes
The last laureate, American Elinor Ostrom with her fellow countryman Oliver Williamson, received the Nobel Prize in Economics for their analysis of economic governance.
The only technical discipline which had no female winner this year was physics.
The prize was awarded today to scientists Charles Kao for his research in the area of optical fiber and Willard Boyle with George Smith for their invention of CCD chips, which are currently on the basis of all digital cameras, fax or telescopes.
Each laureate received the diploma, the Nobel medal and the certificate of acquisition of the financial reward.
This one reached 10 million Swedish crowns in each category. (approximately 1.1 million euros).
If one of them includes several winners, they will share the reward among them.
The much awaited Nobel Peace Prize has been given this afternoon in Oslo in Norway to the American President Barack Obama.
In his speech, he acknowledged the controversial nature of his salary since he is only at the beginning of his job and since he is also the head of a country engaged in two wars - in Iraq and in Afghanistan.
In defense of his policy, he added that in certain situations war is necessary to achieve peace, even if the price is high.
The minister Janota considers resigning. Klaus has invited him to the castle
President Václav Klaus will receive on Friday morning Finance Minister Eduard Janota, who balances his stay in the government because of his disagreement with the State budget for next year as it was passed by the Chamber of Deputies
It is believed that the budget and perhaps the position of Janota in the cabinet too will be on the agenda of their meeting on Friday.
Klaus also criticizes the budget.
According to him, the deficit is too important, which is widening the public finance crisis.
It was the presidential spokesman Radim Ochvat who informed the meeting.
Janota then wants to discuss his office on Monday with Prime Minister Jan Fischer.
According to the legislation on the budget, which will be subject to the signing of Klaus, there is a deficit of 163 billion kronor that the Czech Republic will have to manage.
However, the Chamber of Deputies has approved wednesday the proposals from the left on the transfers of money and increased the remuneration of officials, the operation of social services and direct payments to farmers.
The government blamed the proposals of Social Democrats that they would indirectly increase the budget deficit.
For this reason, a violent disagreement is born between the left-wing on the one hand, the government, Klaus and the right-wing on the other hand, disagreement that calls into question the future of the Fischer cabinet which was formed by agreement between the ODS, the ČSSD and the Green Party.
Critics say that the budget, as it was voted by deputies, removes the package of saving measures passed by the Fischer government and which should, according to him, stem the debt of the State.
Klaus, who can ratify the law on the State budget but who is not obliged to do so, said today at a discussion breakfast with entrepreneurs that politicians have long neglected the "serious problem" of the "unrestrained deficiency" of public finances.
Right now there is, according to him, no favourable solution.
Only a strong government could bring an improvement, if it could rely on a consensus of political parties, according to the president.
ODS president Mirek Topolánek indicated that the budget is staggering and that the government should call into question its ulterior existence.
Petr Nečas, Vice-President of the ODS, told the ČTK that the idea of a business official supported by the ČSSD, the ODS and the Greens just doesn't fly any more.
In his reaction, Prime Minister Fischer called such words "drastic verdicts".
The head of ČSSD Jiří Paroubek reacted to Topolánek, saying that the budget deficit prepared for this year by former government of Topolánek is staggering and it will exceed 200 billion kronor.
Already on Wednesday, the ČSSD called the ratification of next year's state budget a success.
The People's Party was also satisfied.
Morgan Freeman will play Mandela in the new film of Clint Eastwood
Despite criticism that the principal roles are played by American actors, the South Africans claim that the new Hollywood film Invictus - Unbeaten will expose to the world many things about the country, its struggles and its success.
The story is about sports, relations between races and Nelson Mandela.
American actor Morgan Freeman, rewarded by an Oscar, embodies the film on Nelson Mandela's life, a tireless fighter against the racist apartheid system in South Africa and first black president.
Freeman said that it is a ninety-one years old Mandela who asked him to embodies him in the movie.
Matt Damon plays another important role.
I told him: 'If I have to embody you, I should be able to personally see you..
The 72 years old actor who has been rewarded by a price for his role in Clint Eastwood's drama Milion Dollar Baby located in the boxing environment has, for example, embodied the leader of a movement against slavery who became himself a servant, a fictitious US president, even God himself, in the movie Evan Almighty, but never someone as alive and important for so many people as Mandela.
The former South African statesman was jailed 27 years for his hard work to end the apartheid in South Africa.
He was released in 1990 and became president of the country for four years.
In 1993 he was awarded the Nobel Peace Prize.
Invictus is a Latin word meaning unbeaten and it is the title of a poem of the English author William Ernest Henley published in 1875.
The challenge was to talk like him.
The film tells the true story of joint efforts of Nelson Mandela and the captain of the South African rugby team François to unify the country. The newly elected President Mandela knows that his country still remains divided racially and economically after apartheid.
He is convinced to be able to unite his people by sport and decides to unite the rugby players who are among the "outsiders" at world scale.
The South African team will finally move forward in World Cup in 1995.
Freeman worked a few years to bring the story of Nelson Mandela to the big screen.
I had no other purpose than to play this role to bring it closer to reality, said Freeman.
The biggest challenge for me was of course to speak like him
The actor said that if he and the international politician had been in the same region, he would have tried to meet Mandela, dine with him, and to be in the wings before his speech.
The most important for him was to shake hands with him.
I realized that when I shake hand with you, I collect some of your energy, it is transmitted and I had the impression of knowing how you feel, he said.
It is important for me to try to become another person.
Matt Damon plays in the film as François Pienaar, captain of a national rugby team  in which there is a majority of white players.
The actor said he has six months to prepare for a role in the harsh environment of rugby.
For him, his first meeting with Pienaar at his home was a great surprise.
I remember when I arrived at the door of the house, he opened it for me and the first thing I said to Francois Pienaar was: 'I look much taller in the film ".
Despite the differences between actors and real models, Invictus under the leadership of the filmmaker Eastwood received positive opinions and one's even talk about ambitions for the Oscars.
Film critic Todd McCarthy of the newspaper Daily Variety summed up his positive review in these words: "It is a very good story, a very well made film."
On the film evaluations site rottentomatoes.com, Invictus received 76 per cent of positive feedback.
The mystery of the aura in Norway is resolved: the Russians were testing a rocket.
One was able to observe a strange light phenomenon of unknown origin above Norway.
The Russian Ministry of Defence has admitted only yesterday that he has tested an intercontinental ballistic missile not far from the Norwegian borders.
The launch, however, has been a failure again and the "Bulava" missile which was originally supposed to be the pride of the Russian army is gradually becoming the nightmare of the Russian generals and the Prime Minister Vladimir Putin.
His repeated presence during the tests of the rocket has not had the expected effect on the success of the test flights.
Most of the time, either Bulava did not take off, or it was damaged in flight.
Russian newspapers talk of "Bulava" as the "missile that do not fly"
A missile that does not fly but shines
This 13th test took place normally at the beginning.
It is only at the end of the flight that there was again damages to the equipment.
It is clearly the engine of the third stage of the rocket that exploded.
This time, "Bulava" has taken off from the nuclear submarine Dmitrij Donskij which was sailing under the surface of the White Sea.
This type of missile can precisely be launched from a moving immersed boat
This is why the mysterious light over Norway caused by an unidentified flying object was probably just from a defective "Bulava."
By the way, Norwegians did not doubt any moment that this is a Russian rocket.
The generals argue that this time, one cannot talk absolutely of failure.
The two first stages of the rocket have resisted and the damage has hit the third one only.
In the previous cases, the engines have had failures on the first stage.
Even if none of the launch tests have gone smoothly, the leadership of the Ministry of Defence thinks that only 6 to 13 have been failures.
The success rate of almost 50 per cent fills the generals of optimism and they say is always a day "Bulava 'fly without problems and that it will even ten nuclear cores hypersoniques a total weight of 1.15 tonnes.
The legendary Fetissov has signed at 51 years old a one-year contract with the CSKA Moscow
Legendary defender Viatcheslav Fetissov will appear again in a professional match at 51 years old.
The former world champion, Olympic champion and holder of the Stanley Cup is going to lend support to his CSKA Moscow team in need and will probably go in during the Friday match against Petrograd.
Fetissov, who ended his career at 40 years old in 1998, is currently president of the CSKA.
After the injury of Denis Kuliash we urgently need another defender.
Fetissov trains regularly and agrees to help the team.
We have yet to settle a few details on the form, says the coach of the Sergey Nyemtchinov club, quoted by the AP agency.
It was not said whether the comeback of the legendary hockey player is not for only one match.
I think Fetissov is one of those who are able to strengthen the mindset of other players, said Nyemtchinov.
According to AP, in the case of his return on the ice, Fetissov would become the oldest Russian professional hockey player.
In NHL, legendary forward Gordie Howe played a whole season for Hartford and has had 15 goals and 26 assists.
The eldest of the famous quintet Fetisov, Kassatonov - Makarov, Larionov, Krutov is one of the best hockey players and among those having the most success.
Under the colors of the Soviet Union, he won the gold twice in the Olympic Games, won seven titles as world champion, he triumphed at the Canada Cup as well as in the world junior championship.
During the second part of his career, he collected tributes in NHL too where twice he has hold the Stanley Cup.
He is a member of the Temple of fame of hockey since 2001.
Hyundai has listened to the trade unions and cancels all overtime
The leadership of the Hyundai plant in Nošovice has agreed with the unions to cancel all overtime.
It is precisely because of frequent overtime that the trade unions have declared a state of emergency strike on Monday.
Spokesman Petr Vaněk of the Hyundai plant has confirmed it.
Executive management wants however to agree with the unions about a worked-Saturday this year.
We cannot abandon our production schedule, it is essential, this is why voluntary overtime hours were proposed on Saturday, December 19th, knowing that there would be two teams, said Vaněk.
The site sedmička.cz has indicated that the company has offered a bonus of 400 Czech crowns for employees who would be part of the Saturday team.
It will also be awarded afterwards for the workday of 28 November.
The company, according to Vaněk, decided to change the way it motivates its employees in exchange for overtime.
Either they can receive extra for overtime hours or they can make December 28th a vacation day as a replacement and extend their New Year's celebrations, Vaněk said.
In addition to that all employees here on Saturday will receive compensation for transportation costs and for their lunch. 
Given that overtime hours were the most urgent and heated topics under discussion and the demands of unions and of employees who spontaneously stopped production last week, the management made the decision to cancel all overtime for the month of December, Vaněk said.
Until last week, employees of the car factory were forced to work almost daily two extra hours in addition to their eight hours.
The trade unions intend to cancel the state of strike after signing the agreement.
The next negotiation between the management of the car factory and the unions should take place on Friday afternoon.
The trade union leader Petr Kuchař said on Wednesday that they were ready to stop the strike in case their claims are met and a joint document is signed.
The situation in the factory culminated last Wednesday when nearly 400 workers spontaneously went on strike because of continuous overtime hours.
They were also protesting against poor pay conditions and of alleged hazing.
The management defended itself with the statement that employees had to work overtime to meet automobile production requirements.
During the announcement of the strike on Monday, the unions have also asked that the employees who have stopped production are not subject to sanctions.
The trade unions request the society to reduce the overtime to the minimum.
Moreover, they want this year a reward of 5,000 crowns (about 209€) for these ones.
The Hyundai car factory of Nošovice currently employs 2,000 people.
She began mass production last year in November.
It has produced approximately 80,000 vehicles up to September this year, with a production capacity of 200,000 cars a year.
Czech discovery: a substance that works on "resistant" HIV viruses too.
A team of Czech and German scientists is testing new combinations that could slow down the spread of HIV in the body.
The main advantage of the improved substance is that it also acts on the viruses that have already developed an immunity to medicines.
This reality has, in some cases, the upper hand based on the fact that the combination does not act as intensively against the common variants of the virus as well as some drugs already available.
It is not possible to recover from AIDS at the moment.
Nevertheless, we can extend radically the lives of patients through a mixture of drugs that prevent the spread of HIV in the body.
Their consumption leads, however, to a number of side effects.
Plus, the repression of this increase brings about the development of so-called virus strain on which drugs do not have any effect.
The work of experts from three institutions, the Academy of Sciences of the Czech Republic, the VŠCHT of Prague and the University of Heidelberg paves the way for a method to cope with the resistance of the virus.
They showed that substances called metalocarboranes act on the protein responsible for the proliferation of the HIV virus.
The metalocarboranes are a composite of boron, hydrogen, carbon and cobalt.
This combination is blocking the virus development in a different way than all the medicines used to date and therefore they could overcome the resistance problem.
The work of researchers leads them to discover new "improved" substances on the basis of their knowledge of the molecular mechanism of their routes on the proteins of the virus.
The metalocarboranes have a unique three-dimensional structure: two multi-walled cages are shaped by the boron atoms, hydrogen and carbon and connected by a metal atom, cobalt in this case.
A sneaky and resistant virus.
The protease of the HIV is a protein of the HIV virus which is essential to the life cycle of the virus.
Without the division of the HIV virus caused by the HIV protease the mature infectious particles of the virus would not develop.
If you stop the HIV protease, you will also stop the spread of the virus in the patient's body, explain the researchers in a press release issued by the Institute of Organic Chemistry and Biochemistry of the  Czech Republic Academy of Sciences.
In their work published in the scientific publication Journal of Medicinal Chemistry, scientists describe a number of combinations where two pairs of cages (see table) are linked by a short organic link, which is then systematically altered.
A little weaker but more reliable.
The efficiency of this series of substances on the proteases of the HIV has been tested in test tubes as well as on its resistant variations, obtained from patients infected with HIV.
On the current version of the enzyme, the effect of metalocarboranes is not as strong as clinical medicine, however it does not weakeon on resistannt versions against which current medicines are often ineffective.
The metalocarboranes, with their unique mechanism of action and their other properties, such as their biological and chemical stability, low toxicity and the possibility of additional chemical modifications, are therefore interesting compounds to study further in order to move towards the development of effective medicines against HIV, says Pavlína Řezáčová, director of the Laboratory of structural biology at the Institute of organic chemistry and biochemistry and at the Institute of molecular genetics of the Academy of Sciences.
Dispute over the budget. The ODS attacks Fischer, who defends himself.
The President of the ODS (Civic Democratic Party), Mirek Topolanek, is describing the budget ratified for the following year "alarming" and he believes the government of Prime Minister Jan Fischer should question its existence.
The prime minister described the remarks of the ODS as drastic verdict.
He says he is taking time to analyse.
The representative of the ODS Petr Nečas declared that the idea of an administrative cabinet supported by the Čssd, the ODS and Green Party did obsviously not work anymore.
According to Nečas, the head of government should decide whether he is going to accept the support of the minority in the Chamber of Deputies who are concerned with combatting the growing deficit, or whether he wants to stay in office with the aid of the parliamentary left.
Nečas has warned that the positions of the ODS and Social Democrats regarding the issue of public debt are diametrically opposed.
The Chamber of Deputies ratified the budget for 2010 on Wednesday, however with the change proposals of up to 12 billion crowns included by the left side.
The House increased the money for officials wages, social services work and direct payments to farmers.
The government's complaint about the Social Democrats' proposals was that they have been indirectly increasing the budget deficit.
The Czech Republic should handle with a deficit of 163 billion kronor.
The ODS has left the room before the vote, playing ball with the government desire which means a modified budget is a better variant than an acting budget.
Disappointment and uselessness.
Finance Minister Eduard Janota spoke of disappointment and a sense of uselessness, Prime Minister Jan Fischer indicated that the government will still consider the current situation.
Nečas is convinced that if Janota threatened to leave office in case of ratification of the proposals of changes, the situation could be different.
According to the Czech Television, Janota has made an appointment on Monday with the Prime Minister after his passage in the government.
He said at the same time that he was wondering if he would remain in office.
His disappointment about the negociations around the budget is the reason.
If Fischer decides to continue the fight against the budget deficit, Nečas believes that the representatives of the ČSSD, who forced changes to the budget, do not have their place in the government.
The Prime Minister should also make clear that he will quit if the Congress ratifies the other laws increasing the deficit, such as those that affect the health insurance, pensions, or the reform of the law on services.
Topolánek: the ministers appointed by the ODS are not involved.
This is the case of the head of government Fischer and all the government.
The ministers appointed by the ODS did nothing prejudicial, Topolánek emphasized in a written statement from the United States.
He pointed out that the deputy ministers from some ministries avail themselves of TOP 09, which voted against the budget.
Nečas emphasized that if Fischer decides to hand in his resignation in the face of having to wage a struggle against the amount of the fiscal deficit, "it is entirely logical and reasonable that it is based on the leftist majority that is currently in the House."
That said, he should not expect support and tolerance from Democrats.
I haven't thought about it and once it will be on the schedule, so I will work on it, said Defense Minister Martin Barták, elected in the government precisely by the Democrats, from the Parliament to journalists.
Prime Minister Fischer flew off in the afternoon for a debate of the European Council in Brussels.
The ODS backed down at the request of the Prime Minister.
Nečas stressed that the ODS probably would have voted on Wednesday against the budget changes if he did not explicitly asked the House Democrats to vote on the budget.
We do not have the feeling of being orphans, we are not small children, he responded to the question of whether the ODS had not been criticized by president of the Party in the House or in the country during the  negotiations of the budget.
I have not noticed that my vote would have been lacking.
I already knew when I renounced my mandate that what would happen in the following months would be a bolchevization of the Chamber and the destruction of all that was positive, Topolánek responded in person.
According to the new schedules of the CD, there will be fewer trains for the same charges.
The Czech railways will eliminate or reduce from 13 December some less loaded regional or express trains and on the contrary will increase some others.
The total cover of transport will drop at the day of coming into effect of the new schedules of two pourcent compared to today.
Most of the pricing will not change, including the base tariffs and the reduced tariff.
For example the inhabitants of the region of Ostrava will have more connections to the capital, the railways are going to add a set of pendolino trains.
Instead, an express will stop serving Bratislava.
There will be also less fast trains on the Prague - Písek - České Budějovice line, the Prague - Letohrad direct line will be drastically reduced.
At the regional level, the largest decrease in shipments concerns the region of Hradec Králové, eight per cent in total, while Prague and its environs can be pleased about an increase.
Two night trains on the Prague - Tábor - České Budějovice line have also been cancelled and the runs of some express trains on the Prague - Písek - České Budějovice line will be reduced to only a few days a week.
Among the major changes, one can see the introduction of a new direct line from Milovice to Prague: for the time being the inhabitants of Milovice must change at Lysá nad Labem.
It is the fifteenth line of the Esko suburban system, whose opening is possible thanks to the completion of the electrification of the line between Lysá and Labem and Milovice.
The long distance rails near the capital will have their final destination at the central station in Prague (Praha Hlavní Nádraží).
The ČD will introduce more SC Pendolino lines between Prague and Ostrava and trains to Šumperk/Jeseník will leave at two-hour intervals.
Travellers will no longer be able to take the Pendolino up to Bratislava from the 13th of December.
The bill this year for regional railways: 200 million kroner more.
Express trains are ordered and paid by the Ministry of Transport which will pay the railways next year a total amount of four billion crowns to settle the visible losses, the same amount as this year. The regional trains are ordered by the regions which will pay for them by a total of eight billion next year, knowing that the government will account for almost three billion.
This year regional trains are 200 millions more expensive.
The railways have newly signed a contract for ten years, until now the duration was always of one year.
The railways like the system, which also explains why they have not resorted to an increase in the prices of the vast majority of tickets.
The changes will affect only ČD Net day tickets and reduced price eLiška Internet tickets.
For passengers without a reduction card, the price of ČD Net will increase from 450 to 600 kroner.
The price of eLiška will now depend on the journey taken, while before that it was valid between the cities of a chosen region and had a single rate of 160 kroner.
The Philippine rebels are still retaining more than 50 people, the children have been released
The rebels have kidnapped today 75 people in the southern Philippines, among them are some pupils of a primary school and their teachers.
It is the AFP agency that has reported it, but which spoke at first of only 65 hostages.
The 17 children were released after eight hours, as well as one of the teachers.
The hijacking took place in the province of Agusan del Sur.
There are reports that about 19 rebels used hostages as human shields during an escape from the police.
Local negotiators are trying to find an agreement for the remaining hostages releasing.
According to the AFP agency, the rebels belong to the New People's Army (NPA), which is the armed wing of the Communist Party of the Philippines (PPC).
According to the AFP agency, the police first pursued the kidnappers after violence that occurred when two family clans were settling some old scores between them.
Martial law was declared in the province of Maguindanao in the southern Philippines due to a recent slaughter in which 57 people were killed.
Among the victims of the massacre of the 23rd of November linked to the elections of the administration of the governor there were 30 journalists.
The governor of this southern province of the Philippines has been arrested following suspicions of involvement in the massacre, as well as his father Andal Ampatuan, the patriarch of Ampatuans' influential line.
The island of Mindanao also includes active Muslim separatists.
They did, however, renew peace talks with the Philippine government on Tuesday.
The history of South Africa concerns everyone, according to Morgan Freeman alias Mandela
Clint Eastwood's new Hollywood movie arrives in American movie theaters in the coming days; the title is Invictus (the official Czech title is  Invictus: Neporažený), and it narrates a part of the life of former South African President Nelson Mandela.
The role of the fighter against world-famous apartheid returned to Morgan Freeman, who has been chosen years ago by Mandela himself to embody.
The supporting male role of the legendary South African rugby champion has been cast to Matt Damon.
With the arrival of the film in movie houses, feedback from critics and the public is being heard.
Nelson Mandela
His full name is Nelson Rolihlahla Mandela; he was born on 18 June 1918 in Mvezu, South Africa.
In 1988 he was awarded the Sakharov Prize for his freedom of thought, in 1993 he was then awarded the Nobel Peace Prize alongside Klerk.
He was the president of South Africa from 1994 to 1999.
The film contains great expectations since it is presented at a time when on one hand South Africa is in the midst of preparations for the football World Cup, and on the other hand the media are troubled by disturbing news about a rise in racial conflicts and discrimination against inhabitants on the part of the black majority in power.
According to the Associated Press, reactions to the new film are for the moment rather positive in South Africa, despite the frequent reservations expressed about the principal roles in which Hollywood stars "strut about."
Morgan Freeman is, however, quoting his own terms, proud of the movie.
I have dreamed of this role for years, and I am well prepared.
I have also repeatedly met Nelson Mandela to - as they say - gain his energy, he said during the official premiere of the film in Los Angeles.
I think it is a good thing if you have the opportunity to remember through the movie the personality and the message of Nelson Mandela.
This is the history of the south african Republic, but it affects each individual, he added.
Wear the jersey of the national rugby team
The film based on the story by the British writer John Carlin the title being freely translated. In the role of the enemy: Nelson Mandela  depicted as the defender South African human rights during his term of presidency and his part in its creation .
Morgan Freeman is trying during the film to reconcile two racial groups of a long divided country and like Nelson Mandela in 1995 he enters dressed in the jersey of the South African national team on the field of the World Cup tournament, which South Africa had then won.
For showing up on the lawn in a jersey, which is seen in South Africa as something sacred, Mandela had been cheered at length fourteen years ago mainly by the white people and had been recognized by the white population.
Let us hope that the Soccer Championship will manage to unite people once again as a single nation, said rugby player Chester Williams, who was in 1995 the only 'black' of the national team.
It remains to be seen if the tense situation in South Africa will improve.
The white South Africans, however, are skeptical as has recently confided, in an interview for LN, Christopher Dawson, fan of rugby who has fled to Great-Britain.
The Championship starts on June 11, 2010.
A transformer worth tens of million kronor in flames in the region of Louny
A fire has engulfed in the morning a distribution center's transformer of the company Čeps near the town of Výškov na Lounsku.
According to Lukáš Marvan, spokesman for the firefighters of Ústí, there are six units operating on the fire.
At first they thought they would leave the processor to smolder, but they have changed their opinion and extinguish the fire with a mixture of water, foam and a special substance.
The cause is a technical fault, a short-circuit within the processor.
Nobody was injured and, according to the company's spokeswoman Pavla Mandátova, the incident has not jeopardized the security of transmissions.
Damages are estimated at tens of millions of crowns, the exact figure will be known once the fire is extinguished.
According to Mandátova, the broken transformer will have to be replaced by a new one.
She adds that in 10 years of activity, the Čeps company has not experienced anything similar, and that incidents like these are isolated.
The supply of electricity was not interrupted, said the spokesman for the company ČEZ North Bohemia Soňa Holingerova Hendrychova, the functioning of households, government and industry was not affected by fire the transformer station.
A.S. Čeps is the exclusive operator in the Czech territory in the transmission and the 400 KV and 220 KV power lines.
He maintains, renovates and develops 39 positions with 67 distribution transformers for transferring electrical power handling assemblies for distribution assemblies and line drawings with a length of 4339 km.
Jančura will sue for libel against three prefects of the Čssd
Today, Radim Jančura, owner of "Student Agency," will file a slander complaint against three Social Democrat administrators.
And specifically against Michal Hašek of the region of South Moravia, against Radko Martínka of the region of Pardubice and against the prefect of the Olomouc region, Martin Tesařík.
Jančura said it in Dvacet minut of rRdiožurnál.
The complaint is linked to the attempt of the company to operate regional railways in some regions.
All regions, however, have ended up signing long-term contracts with the Czechs railways.
All three attacked us and say we made the foodies, while we only made an offer for what they wanted themselves
They claim that we are more expensive than the Czech railways which is not true because we know the prices of the Czech railways which have been signed last week.
So it remains for us to defend ourselves.
It is in exchange for slanders on the company Student Agency, said Jančura to Radiožurnál.
Similarly, he said that he has evidence that no region has been in agreement with the European law.
We are preparing for that a complaint to the European Commission.
Hašek considers that Mr Jančura's complaint filing represents the continuation of his media show, which is used as free advertising for his company and himself.
I am of course willing to defend my name and the name of my area and call the other prefects to do the same.
I suppose this is an opportunity to show clearly that it is precisely Mr. Jančura manipulating public opinion and uses false and misleading arguments about regional rail transport, said Hašek
Jančura has already informed last week that it will invest several million crowns in an ad that mentioned the steps unfavorable regions.
He said to Radiožurnál that he will stop the campaign after Christmas and that he intends to resume it after New Year.
He said that the campaign will target corruption at large.
Jančura began his campaign after the regions agreed to give the exploitation of rail links to the Czech railways, for an order of about 150 billion kronor, without putting bidding forward.
According to Jančura, acting in such a way is illegal and contrary to the position of the European Court of Justice.
According to him, his criticism of rail transport in the regions has even led threats from a deputy of the ČSSD to Jančura.
The only threat was that if we did not stop, we could lose our licenses bus.
He presented himself as a member of parliament of the Čssd, I do not know who he is but I would not say his name, stated Jančura today to  Radiožurnál.
The vaccination against the pneumococcal will be free and optional
Vaccination against pneumococcus overturn old habits as soon as January
It will be the first to be free and at the same time optional for families.
People are already speaking up, saying that a compulsory vaccination would be more effective.
The preparations for the introduction of free vaccination against pneumococcal are culminating.
The Pharmaceutical Institute already defines the maximum price for vaccines that health insurance will pay for.
Specialists are also quite clear about the vaccination process.
A new vaccination.
Free vaccines for children born in August.
Since January, children born last year starting August 2 can be vaccinated for free against pneumococcus.
The condition is that they have not yet been vaccinated.
If you started having the vaccination last year or earlier, you will have to pay for the following vaccinations yourself.
The first dose of the vaccine must be administered between the third and fifth month of the child's life.
Last year already one family out of four has voluntarily vaccinated its children against pneumococcus.
Yet parents paid 1,600 kroner, or more for a dose.
The vaccination of the youngest children requires four doses.
Experts estimate that each year health insurance companies spend 300 to 450 thousand kronor on doses of vaccine.
However, they save on medical care that non-vaccinated children would need.
Until now the State was spending about 500,000 kronor a year for all the vaccination of children.
The refunded vaccination was introduced with the "Janota package."
Pneumococcus is the cause of inflammations of the middle ear but also serious infections including inflammations of meninges and blood poisonings.
According to investigations in hospitals, up to 28 deaths of children under 10 years were caused by pneumococcal infections.
Apart from the Czech Republic, about 40 other countries have introduced vaccination refunded.
Will vaccination compulsory?
There are opinions regarding a possible mandatory vaccination in the future.
From January on, it must be paid by the insurance and optional.
For example, the president of the association Nahlas Rudolf Kalovský indicated that a compulsory vaccination would be more positive.
His Association promotes since long vaccination against the pneumococcus.
During an international conference in which our association took part, experts have not been really happy that we have an optional vaccination.
It's not ideal.
On the other hand, we are pleased to have been able to impose at least this.
I think it is a direction that we now need to follow, said Kalovský.
But the health ministry does not want to change the process of vaccination against pneumococcus.
We are definitely not thinking in terms of the present time, said his spokesman Vlastimil Sršeň.
Voluntary vaccination has its drawbacks, claim doctors.
Hana cabrnochová, president of the Specialized company of pediatricians, acknowledges that a vaccine based on voluntary participation has its shortcomings.
If all children were vaccinated, we could consider a decrease of vaccination renewals. "In the situation where the vaccine costs such a sum, I understand the decision making the vaccination optional" said however Cabrnochová.
Experts estimate that starting next year, more than 80 per cent of new parents will vaccinate their babies.
The vaccination against pneumococcus marks a break because it is the first children vaccination, which is funded by insurances and not by the State.
Cabrnochová explains that insurance companies should free up funds for the prevention, they would therefore economize on any future medical care.
Doctors will have to buy their products themselves
This is, however, linked to the concerns of paediatrician practitioners, which relates to the purchase of vaccines.
The original intent was to buy vaccines through insurance, the doctors receiving the same manner as other vaccine products provided by the state
However some deputies feared that this would allow insurance companies to "deduct the sums from health insurance."
Thus, doctors will have to buy the products and wait for insurances to repay them.
According to estimates, paediatricians will have to invest individually nearly 40,000 kroner per month in vaccines, which is a significant sum.
That will be far from being easy, according to Cabrnochová.
Son of an American artist involved in a "museum robbery."
The son of Frank Frazetta, illustrator acknowledged, was accused of trying to steal paintings worth $ 20 million (12 million GBP) in the museum of his father.
In Pennsylvania, the police said that Alfonso Frank Frazetta was arrested while he was loading 90 paintings in his vehicle and a trailer.
According to her, Mr Frazetta and another man used a mechanical shovel to force the entrance of the museum, in the Pocono Mountains region.
Mr Frazetta senior, 81 years old, is famous for his drawings of characters such as Conan the barbarian and Tarzan.
At the time of the incident, the artist was in Florida, reported The Associated Press (AP) news agency.
AP quoted an police official, according to whom the young Mr Frazetta may have been motivated by a family feud.
According to a police statement, the aforementioned Mr. Frazetta Jr., 52, claims to have been authorized by his father "to enter the museum, by any means, to transport the paintings to a storage facility," the agency reported.
Mr Frazetta senior denies having released such an authorization, said the agency.
The Labour party is defending the increase of the budgetary tax.
The ministers have defended the increase in taxes and the spending cuts announced in the pré-budget report, despite the criticism of the opposition, the companies and the unions.
The Tories said that Alistair Darling "failed" to show that he was serious about reducing the deficit when he postponed his decisions until after the elections.
The Chancellor also incurred anger by addressing the issues of low salaries and average salaries.
Among its main proposals are an increase of 0.5% in welfare insurance and a cap of 1% on public wages starting in 2011.
The wrath of Social Insurance
The trade unions have protested that the low salaries are penalised by a recession for which they are not responsible and have warned that "problems" are looming.
The lowering of the social insurance - which will allow to get about £3 billion per year - has got the business world angry, because from its point of view, it is a tax on jobs when the goal should be a economic recovery.
The increase, reserved for those who earn more than 20,000 GBP per year, will affect about 10 million workers.
Main points of the pre-Budget report
The social insurance will rise again by 0.5% from April 2011
The economy will fall even more than the expected 4.75% this year.
New 50% tax on bankers' bonuses
The rise of the tax on the benefits of companies for small firms has been abandoned
Tax rebate on electric cars and wind turbines.
Raise of 2.5% of the pensions
According to estimates of the Treasury, someone earning 30,000 GBP will lose 90 GBP per year and someone else earning 40,000 GBP will lose 190 GBP, whereas someone earning 10,000 GBP per year will gain 110 GBP.
The ministers said that their goal of halving the deficit before 2013 entailed "difficult decisions" but they insisted that 60% of the burden of additional taxes would weigh on the first 5% of employees.
Stephen Timms, Treasury Secretary, has refuted an increase of the tax and pointed out that cutting spending was a "drop in the ocean" compared to what was needed.
"These figures are important. They will allow us to halve the deficit, which will be crucial over the next four years", he told the BBC.
Mr Timms said he was confident and that the economic growth would get going again at the end of this year.
However, the forecasts of the Labour Party regarding economic growth-which will affect the amount that it will have to borrow and the speed at which the deficit will be made good-have been questioned after the Chancellor was forced to revise his initial figures.
In his speech, he said that the economy would probably decline by 4.75% this year – far worse than the decline of 3.5% predicted in April - while borrowing would be 3 billion of GDP over the prior estimate.
"Missed opportunity" '
The Conservatives who will launch this Thursday a new advertising campaign warning against the Labour Party's "debt crisis," have argued that the plan to borrow £789 billion over the next six years was not viable.
The ministers have failed to present a credible plan on how to reimburse, they added, "cynically" dodging difficult decisions until after the elections - which must be held in June 2010.
"They have not produced anything significant on what they will do", said Philip Hammond, Treasury chief secretary of the shadow cabinet. "They had the opportunity to do it and they have missed it."
"The major announcements will be made after the elections, whoever the winner."
Roger Bootle Deloitte.
The Labour insists that the schools, hospitals and police will be protected from further cuts, unlike the Tory proposals that would lead to faster and more important reduction of the deficit.
But the Lib Dems have argued that the money gathered due to the taxes increase and the spendings decrease would be used to support next year spending and not to reduce the deficit, arguing that the plans were "built on nothing".
Nick Robinson, Political Editor of the BBC, said that the timing of the announcements - such as the increase due to inflation for some disability benefits in April, mentioned above - would leave the Chancellor facing accusations of being disingenuous, with the money simply to be recovered in the following year.
However, leLabour insists that additional assistance is provided so that people in greatest need and that the situation will be reviewed in September 2010.
"false budget."
Although ministers have not published the details of spending beyond 2011, economists have argued that it was clear that the restrictions on public expenditure would only begin to be felt in the medium term.
The highly respected Institute for Fiscal Studies (Institut des Etudes Fiscales) asserted that the figures from the Chancellor, imply in the future, substantial reductions in many areas, including potentially transport, higher education, science and defence.
"The pain is in fact only delayed", said its director, Robert Chote.
"The most important announcements will be made after the election, whoever the winner," added Roger Bootle, economic adviser to the Deloitte accountancy.
"This was a pre-budget false report. The markets are well aware of it."
The FBI is investigating the 'arrests of Americans in Pakistan."
The FBI investigates the arrest, in Pakistan, of five Americans reporters suspected of  extremists links.
The men were arrested during a raid in a house in Sarghoda in Punjab's eastern province, announced the US embassy in Pakistan to the BBC.
The FBI said it was investing on whether that was the same men who had been reported missing from their home, in the US state of Virginia, the last month.
The Ministry of Foreign Affairs has said that it also sought information on these people.
Three of them are introduced as being of Pakistani descent, one of Egyptian heritage and the other of Yemeni origin.
If they are American citizens, of course we would like to know what the accusations are against them and under what conditions they are being detained," said the spokesman, Ian Kelly.
Katherine Schweit, FBI spokesman said that the agency had knowledge of the arrests and that she was in contact with the families of students who have disappeared.
"We are working with the Pakistani authorities to determine their identity and the nature of their activities there, and if they really are the students who are missing," she said.
The Pakistani embassy in Washington said that the men had been arrested in a house belonging to the uncle of one of them.
This one said that the house was already monitored by local police and that no charges had been brought yet against the arrested men.
The Secretary of State Hillary Clinton has refused to comment on the arrests, reported the  news agency Reuters, but she said that the US should "cooperate more with Afghanistan and Pakistan to try to uproot the infrastructure of terrorism that continues to recruit and train people."
The five students were reported missing from their homes by their families in northern Virginia in late November.
Amnesty condemns Iranians "abuses"
These last twenty years, human rights have been less respected than ever, according to the report of the Amnesty International association.
The report presents "repeats of violations" by the regime, before and after the June presidential election campaign.
A man named in the report asserted that he had been beaten and burnt with cigarettes. Another declared that he had been threatened with rape.
Iran has denied the previous criticism about its lack of respect for human rights.
The authorities said that such criticisms are politically motivated.
Thousands of people were arrested and dozens were killed in Iran, after the disputed election of President Mahmoud Ahmadinejad led to the largest public demonstrations since the Islamic revolution of 1979.
Dozens had been sentenced to prison and the prosecutors say that at least five people were sentenced to death.
Jon Leyne, BBC correspondent in Tehran, now in London, says that at the beginning of protests, the Supreme Leader Ayatollah Ali Khamenei, has acknowledged some of the allegations of abuse, ordering the closure of the detention center of Kahrizak.
But since then, the authorities have not tolerated any criticism, our correspondent said.
"false confession"
Amnesty International has related the case of a 26-year-old computer student, Ebrahim Mehtari, who claimed to have been accused of "working with the Facebook networks" and protesting against the election results.
"They often hit me in the face," he was quoted as saying.
"I have been burned with cigarettes under the eyes, on the neck, on the head... they threatened to execute me and humiliated me".
After five days, he signed a false confession and was released and left in the street, still bloody and a half conscious, said Amnesty.
In August, the election's losing candidate, Mehdi Karroubi, said that protesters detained after the election were tortured to death in prison and that others have been raped.
The Iranian authorities have denied the accusations of rape but admitted that abuses had taken place.
Amnesty has also mentioned the case of a former detainee who said he was locked in a container with 75 other people, for more than eight weeks, in a detention centre in Kahrizak.
Amnesty has accepted that the Iranian parliament and judiciary create a committee to investigate the post-election unrest and the government's response, but it claimed that the mandate and the powers of these bodies were not clear and that the results of the parliamentary committee had not been made public.
The group has said that at least 90 people had been arrested, during the last three weeks, in order to prevent further demonstrations.
Ski paths built in the park of the city
More than 100 tonnes of artificial snow has been used to transform the location of Bristol in a competition track.
The Piste in the Park (a piste in the park) event has drawn 16 semi-professional skiers and snowboarders competing for cash prices.
At the top of the runway of the Brandon Hill park, a small springboard preceded a 100m long trail.
John Hickman, a fourth-year medical student, said that the view from the runway was magnificent but that it was pretty daunting.
It's a beautiful view, with all the city lights twinkling below.
Here are found some of the best skiers and snowboarders in the country - real talent, "he added.
Prices have rewarded the best aerobatics - or figures made on the runway.
After the party on Thursday night, the snow will be left to melt.
Always them and us
Can Islam be French ?
Pluralism and pragmatism in a secular State.
Roger Bootle Deloitte.
Some readers will be attracted by this new book, admirers of the author's last book "Why the French Do Not Like the Headscarf "(2006), an elegant and well documented study of a problem that has divided and worried the country for 15 years and whose effects are still being felt today.
Mr Bowen's last book presents much larger and much more ambitious framework.
Good anthropologist, he not only wants to know what politicians and media say about Islam in France, but what is happening in the country.
He spent many months in mosques, in schools and in colleges which now provide in France what Mr. Bozen calls "Muslim spaces" for the 5-6 million Muslims.
He knows very well to listen and replicate the debates between teachers and pupils on the issues that concern them most.
Should a Muslim must marry in a mosque or in the town hall (or both)?
Should the evolution and the gay rights be taught to young Muslims?
Can a Muslim woman marry a non-musulman?
Could a  Muslim use a banking system based on interest for a loan?
These are this practical problems, he says, which are the everyday life, rather than the political dramas that concern the media.
The author identifies a new generation of imams, teachers and intellectuals, all unknown to the public, except perhaps Tariq Ramadan, a Muslim Arab born in Switzerland.
This new generation is trying to open the debate on how to be both a good Muslim and a good citizen in a modern secular society.
They do not push the debate to the end.
Conservatives do not believe in the idea of a French or European Islam.
The scholars and activists who have been interviewed by Mr. Bowen are generally in agreement with their counterparts, lawyers of a Sunni Islam purist associated with Saudi Arabia, which nowadays are a small part of Muslims in Europe.
Mr. Bowen believes that Muslim values and French secularism could be compatible.
But a compromise can only be achieved with the efforts of both sides.
He wonders just how much French politicians (and the intellectual elite which is such an intense guardian of secularity) are really committed to pluralism.
According to him, Muslims have not been spoiled, compared to Catholics, Protestants and Jews who have also had to make historic compromises with the secular Republicanism.
Rather than a growing pragmatism, it detects a "narrowness of the core values".
Can Islam be French? after reading this book, one is tempted to say "yes, but not yet."
The darkest view in the world
The Arctic is changing faster and more dramatically than any other place on the planet.
The ice composing it is melting at an alarming rate, taking with it a life that cannot survive elsewhere.
Petrol, gas, shipping and fishing are in the newly opened waters, with diplomats, lawyers and now writers in their wake.
In "On a Thin Layer of Ice," Richard Ellis, writer and illustrator, paints a natural history of the symbol of the Great North, the polar bear.
Aware of the history and complicated politics of whaling, he describes the long tradition of Arctic explorers who were doing their evidence in the white bear hunting.
The meeting of Admiral Nelson, then a courageous, 14-year-old naval cadet who had nothing to fight with but the tip of his musket, is certainly a myth, but the rest is true.
The young bear cubs captured when they were swimming alongside their mother which has just been killed, were caught and sent to zoos and circuses.
In the early twentieth century, a famous show gathered 75 bears at the same time.
Even today, the dimensions of a zoo are still generally a millionth of the necessary surface for an adult living in the wild. Climate is rarely mentioned: a polar bear living in Singapore has become green as a result of algae that grew in his thick fur.
Click here for more information.
Mr Ellis tells the stories of other writers and historians and often mentions the threat posed by hunters on the survival of species.
Despite being banned in Norway, America and Russia, the killings continue in Greenland and Canada where hunters in helicopters and Inuits on snowmobiles use powerful assault rifles to hunt their prey.
Ironically, it is in the fursthest waters in the North of these two hunter nations that the ice will stay longer.
In his new book, "After the Ice," Alun Anderson, a former editor in chief of the New Scientist, offers a clear and frightening summary of the science of the Arctic and a fascinating glimpse of what may be the future there.
Not that scientists have all the answers.
Neither atmosphere specialists nor oceanographers can describe the exact speed of changes.
It is not for lack of trying.
Late 19th and early 20th centuries, Fridtjof Nansen's pioneer travels gave the first information on the polar ice melting.
The submarines from the cold war then mapped changes in the relief under this one.
The surveillance satellites and the probes placed on the icebergs are of very helpful, but the bulk of work is done by tough men, camping in coldness.
Mr Anderson look at the extraordinary and tiny world of the Arctic ice dependent system formed by the brackish water lattice pressed by freezing.
But the bear mentioned above with the microscopic marvels contained in the ice, will be totally lost with the disappearance of the summer ice, scheduled between 2013 and 2050.
"In a few months, it will perhaps be our turn."
Some Marines, among the 6,000 people who placed wreaths on the graves at Arlington
Private De'Angello Robinson, 19 years old, made a seven hours trip by bus to drop a wreath on the grave of a soldier that he had never met.
For him and for the other Marines who made the trip from Camp Johnson in Jacksonville, North Carolina to Arlington National Cemetery to decorate the graves, this day was devoted to saluting the men and women who, one day, were in their place.
In a few months, from where we will be sent, we will risk being in their place, Robinson said about the fallen soldiers.
If it were to happen to me, I would want someone to do the same thing for me, it's why I just try to show some respect.
He was one of 6000 volunteers gathered Saturday morning to lay wreaths on the graves of veterans in different sections of the cemetery during the Arlington Cemetery ceremony.
In 1992, Morrill Worcester, owner of Worcester Wreath Company in Harrington, Maine, launched the commemoration, and other people decided to decorate several hundred tombstones in the ceremony at Arlington Cemetery.
Now, to continue an 18-year tradition, Morrill and his wife Karen, make the journey each year, stopping in various cities on their way, to organize celebrations in honor of military personnel and victims of terrorism.
The Worcester have also founded a non-profit organization, Wreaths Across America, whose aim is to promote the event in all of the other states.
This year, volunteers have placed more than 16 million wreaths on graves at Arlington National Cemetery, around the Pentagon, on the graves at Fayetteville National Cemetery in Arkansas, in Battery Park in New York City, and on the site of the memorial for victims of United Airlines flight 93 in Shanksville, Pennsylvania.
For the second year in a row, the foundation Walmart Foundation has given more than $150,000 to buy and transfer the crowns.
Charleen Hunt, 70 years old, from Westminster, said she had made the trip to Arlington in honour of her husband, a military career defunct.
Although her ​​husband is not buried in Arlington, Hunt said that for her, this gesture was a way of thanking those who had sacrificed.
It is a small sign the civilians can make to support our troops, she said.
It is like visiting a family grave.
Muffled up in several layers of winter clothes, the volunteers walked between the lawns and the wide hills of the cemetery.
The volunteers have chosen old graves, dating from the first and second world wars, as well as from the Vietnamese War because they are not visited so frequently as the new graves, said the organizers.
The mood was of optimism, while children played and couples held hands, resting fresh pine wreaths on the gray tombs.
Each round crown had a dark green colour, with a small red bowtie on top.
Nearby, silence hovered on Section 60, where most of the veterans of wars in Iraq and Afghanistan are buried.
The United Service Organizations have given 1,000 kronor to decorate the section, but the dark mood of the current wars filled the area.
People were crying without hiding, other were praying and families and friends were supporting each other in the cold air.
Some were reading aloud the names engraved in the stone while others were leaning to see the small black and white information cards, stuck into the wet soil for those whose graves had not been completed yet.
Sandra Lockwood was one of many mothers in tears, on the grave of her son.
She left Zanesfield, Ohio, and had driven eight hours to come and collect herself at the grave of Marine Gunnery Sergeant David Shane Spicer, who died in battle in July.
No one should ever forget thanks to what we are free... my son has paid for it, she said.
"Long after I am gone, I want someone to remember him."
A US citizen arrested by the Cuban authorities
The Cuban government has arrested a US citizen who was distributing mobile phones and laptops in the country, said the services of the American Foreign Office.
The national, who has not yet been identified, works for Development Alternatives Inc., based in Bethesda.
The company is working on projects for clients such as the U.S. Agency for International Development and the World Bank.
The consular authorities and the U.S. Interest Section in Havana are trying to have access to the detainee who was arrested on the 5th of December.
The specific charges were not made public, although under the Cuban law, a Cuban citizen or a foreigner visitor can be arrested under the pretext of being 'dangerous'.
All the so-called revolutionary activities, including moderate protests and critical writings, bring the risk of being arrested.
The anti-government graffiti and speeches are regarded as serious crimes.
Cuba has a bloggers community which gets bigger and bigger, led by Yoani Sánchez, popular commentator who frequently writes on the way are husband and herself are monitored and harassed by the government agents.
Sánchez has made several requests to leave the country to go receive rewards but authorizations have always been refused him.
The detention of an American citizen will perhaps increase the tension between the communist government of the brothers in Cuba and the Obama administration which is pursuing a "soft" approach to improve relations with the island.
The announcement of the arrestation was first reported by The New York Times, on Friday evening.
The new US policy insists that the Cuban government advance by taking firm steps, such as the release of political prisoners and creating more space for the opposition, so that the US can reciprocate.
Mobile phones and laptops are allowed in Cuba, even though there are new and desired consumer goods in a country where the average wage of a civil servant is $15 per month.
Just this year, the Cuban government accorded its ordinary citizens the right to buy mobile telephones; they are principally used for texting or for a 15-minute conversation, which corresponds to about a day's wages.
On the island, the Internet use is extremely limited.
It is available in luxury hotels and for foreign visitors in the country, as well as in some government buildings, such as universities.
Cubans who want to connect must often give their name to the government.
Access to many websites is restricted.
The detention of an American in Cuba is rare.
Of the few Americans incarcerated in Cuba, most are behind bars for crimes such as drug trafficking, said Gloria Berbena, Press Attache with the U.S. Interests Section in Havana.
Berbena said she could not provide more information about the arrest.
Arrest and detention are a big mistake.
An activity which, in any other open society, would be allowed -- the distribution of free mobile phones -- is a crime in Cuba, said Jose Miguel Vivanco, Director of the Americas Program of the group Human Rights Watch, which recently published a harsh report about freedom in Cuba, called "New Castro, Same Cuba," referring to the installation of Raul Castro as leader of the country to replace Fidel, his ailing older brother.
According to Vivanco, a defendant is often arrested, sentenced and imprisoned on the same day.
He said that any solution would probably be policy and that the Cuban government often causes a negative reaction in the United States, when the two countries are beginning to get a better dialogue.
The Pakistani authorities prevent a plot to send troops in Afghanistan
On Saturday, the Pakistani authorities reported an organisation suspected of preparing a plan to send five men from Northern Virginia into Afghanistan in order to kill American troops, saying that they hoped this would help to dismantle a significant network of terrorist recruiters plundering the Internet in search radicalized young men .
Investigators said they were chasing a hidden insurgent, known as Saifullah, who invited these men to Pakistan after having found them when one of them made comments approving the wave of terror on YouTube's video site on the Internet.
Once they arrived in Pakistan, these men were guided by Saifullah who tried to help them get back to the remote region of Pakistan's tribal belt, home of al-Qaeda and of its terrorist training camps.
But a representative of the Pakistani secret services who was informed about the case said Saturday that Saifullah had not managed to convince the commanders of al Qaeda that these men were not involved in the CIA plot to infiltrate the terrorist network.
Thus, they have been isolated for days in the eastern city of Sargodha, far from the forbidden northeast mountains which had became a refuge for terrorists.
They were considered as infiltrated agents.
This is why they were rejected, said a representative of the authorities who spoke on the condition to be kept anonymous because of the confidential nature of the case.
The authorities' representative said that the men were determined and they are still trying to obtain the necessary permissions to enter into the Al Qaeda camps when they were arrested by the Pakistani law forces.
The case of these five men -- who remain in Pakistan and who are being questioned by the FBI -- emphasizes the crucial role of recruiters in the identification of potential terrorists and, perhaps more important, in determining the people who can be trusted.
Since the 11 September 2001 attacks, the American Intelligence Services' priority was to infiltrate men in al-Qaeda network.
The recruiters of the organization play the role of gate-keepers, refusing entry to those who do not show a serious commitment and those who can turn out to be spies.
According to analysts, the potential American recruits are closely studied by al-Qaeda.
But they are also very attractive to the group because of their potential access to American targets, and their propaganda value.
However, Evan Kohlmann, expert from the NEFA foundation based in the United States, said that terrorist groups must also pay more and more attention in recent years in the choice of people that they accept as the American intelligence services have become experts in their recruitment methods.
If you try to infiltrate someone into these groups, what better way than to follow its model of recruitment that so many other people have already followed? said Kohlmann.
The model is the one which is more on more on the Internet.
Tens of thousands of protestors in Copenhagen request an "action" for the climate.
Tens of thousands of protesters marched in the streets here Saturday, calling for greater action on climate control on the part of the negotiators working in the Palace des Congrès at the Bella Convention Center in the city.
The number of demonstrators was estimated at 100,000 people, but 25,000 according to police estimates.
This event has gone relatively smoothly, although a small number of masked activists has lit some explosives close to a set of government buildings, located in town-centre.
On a day in which little happened during United Nations-sponsored talks on climate, thousands of activists took to the streets holding signs in English saying, "There is no planet B," and one in Spanish, which said, "The Earth says that she has had enough."
Several celebrities have joined the protests, including the Danish top model and photographer, Helena Christensen, who said that travelling to the homeland of her mother, Peru, has opened her eyes on the heartbreaking problems the country is facing because of the impact of climate change that is already happening."
This is one reason why I decided to join the great march -- to spread the word and appeal to the leaders in the entire world to make fair, ambitious and committed decisions, she said.
This isn't an easy task, but it must be taken, it is not possible anymore to avoid it.
Police prevented the demonstrators to come too close to the Bella Centre and said they had arrested 19 people because they were wearing a mask or they were in possession of pocket knives.
Police prevented the demonstrators to come too close to the Bella Centre and said they had arrested 19 people because they were wearing a mask or they were in possession of pocket knives.
According to a passerby who requested anonymity because of his involvement in the climate talks, the activists, who wore masks and black clothes, lit a number of explosives near the main waterway in Copenhagen, which is surrounded by several ministries.
They were launching them near the buildings, he said, adding that these were first rockets, followed later by "a few big explosions".
Inside the Convention Centre, people were gathered around television screens to follow the march throughout the afternoon.
But it seems that demonstrators have failed to revive the awareness of key authorities such as Su Wei, China representative on climate.
When he was asked if he thought that a demonstration would have a positive impact on international deliberations, he said in English "In fact, this is something I was not aware of.
He then continued in Mandarin, saying "the event being important, I cannot hear what happens outside".
He observed that marching could seem harmful or useful, depending on the outlook.
It shows the interest of the public and the various sectors on the subject of climate change, he said.
On the other hand, "you can also say that they disrupt the talks or that they are damaging to the freedom of others."
The results of the tests show tenacious differences between races
The federal report last week on the results in mathematics brought  good news for public schools in Washington D.C.
Although the District is still far behind the leading institutions, the report shows that the Grade 4 and Grade 5 (cm1-cm2) are showing much greater progress in the last two years than in cities such as Atlanta, Chicago and New York.
But what stands out in the latest figures from the National Assessment of Educational Progress (Evaluation nationale du progrès de l'enseignement) is the persistent gap between the results for African-Americans and those for Whites, both locally and nationally.
The average results for white children in Grade 4(CM1) from Washington D.C. have risen over the past two years from 262 to 270 (on a scale of 500), but those of their African-American classmates increased by only three points, from 209 to 212.
The achievement gap has actually risen between 2007 and 2009, from 53 to 58 points.
The progress of African-Americans in Grade 8 (4th year) remains generally constant, falling just one point from 245 to 244.
The average result among whites was not included in the test results because the sample was not sufficiently significant.
The overview over a period of six years is no more encouraging.
In 2003, the gap between blacks and whites in the Grade 4 class (CM1), when the first NAEP district report was published, was 60 points (262 to 202).
Although the results achieved by children in both groups have increased during this period, the difference has only decreased to 58 points.
Last week, some advocates in the District have expressed concern that rising celebrated by the head of educational institutions group  Michelle A. Rhee and the Mayor Adrian M. Fenty (Democrat) were powered by the white students who were already good elements.
That would mean that we have elevated the aggregate by considering the elements at the top of the ladder, which is problematic and embarrassing, has said Jeff Smith, Director of D.C. Voice, a non-profit group that defends the equality in the education of the District.
I am not jumping for joy for one or two points earned, said Kwame R. Brown (related Democrat), a member of the Council of D.C. and whose daughter was in grade 4, Eaton Elementary (elementary school).
Often critical of the style of management of Rhee, Brown said that the message of the results of tests is that the middle schools (colleges) of the city are desperate for attention.  Often critical of Rhee's management style, Brown said that the message from the results of tests is that the city's middle schools are in desperate need of attention.
Really, you always want to see the positive signs and I respect this.
But what is frightening, is that we do not spend enough time and energy on our middle schools.
Rhee said that the district should continue to find better ways to meet the needs of students in difficulty.
This autumn, for example, some teachers have been trained to use a new reading method, the Wilson Reading System, which aim primary school and beginning of middle school pupils who have not included the foundations of reading earlier in their school route and who are lagging behind their peers.
Every day, the mathematics programs, for grades Kindergarden through sixth focus on games and experiences based in real life, as they have been put in place in the district by the former head Clifford Janey, she must also be credited for the progress of the NAEP that was reported last week.
I just simply believe that we must continue to work to provide better interventions for these pupils who are below the level of their class,  Rhee said.
Others argue that the results of the NAEP raise the question of whether Rhee can keep raising the overall results of the system while providing with money and resources the schools with fewer good results in order to reduce the gap.
This is a dilemma for Michelle Rhee, said Bruce Fuller, a trainer of education at the University of Berkeley in California who studied the results of tests of the cities.
The conventional political solution is to allocate your resources and management reforms to schools in the poorest neighborhoods of Washington.
Also this targeting can have political consequences which hassles this important program.
But the problem, of course, is that like other school superintendents, she is trying to use middle class whites and blacks.
We focus to ensure the development of a system of good schools.
We need to strengthen our school districts so that all families, regardless of where they originate, should be confident that their children can get an excellent public education.
Janey, now superintendant of schools in Newark, declared in an interview this week that one of the essential elements in reducing the achievement gap was for the traditional public school year length, currently at 180 days in the District of Washington, to be competitive with the charter schools.
About 200 days are needed to have the strength to change, said Janey, who came to an agreement with his teachers union last year for 185 days, which he considers a "starting point" to yet achieve an increase in the next contract.
Turning higher education into a promise for the future
The bus stopped at Gettysburg College with a long whistle.
Graciela Rodriguez, age 12, comes down from it and blinks for a moment at the sight of the white columns, brick facades, and green lawns.
The parents of Graciela had only been able to complete high school, in El Salvador.
Until recently, Graciela herself, who was born in Silver Spring and lives in Riverdale, had never set foot on a university campus.
Also, when she and other students in 8th Grade (fourth) of the group explored Gettysburg where school fees are $38 690 per year, her attitude was less one of a new impressed student than of an enthusiastic one.
Great This is where I am going to study! exclaimed Graciela who would like to study medicine, while the guide was leading them towards the entrance of the building of science.
Yay, really? she said dreamy, when we pointed out to her the low ratio between professor of law and student.
The University of Pennsylvania was the seventh the children visited during their three-day journey of discovery and now, they had completely incorporated the message: The question is not whether you are going to college:
The question is where.
Although this question is still largely asked for the large number of American children born from Hispanic immigrant parents who have left the school or became parents while they were teenagers, they are also hundreds of thousands to benefit from the university system that will enable them to enter the middle class.
In fact, one second generation Hispanic out of five pursues his studies at the school -- a notable success when you consider that both of his immigrant parents, for the most part from Mexico or Central America, entered the United States without having finished school.
Their success is important, researchers say, they open the way for the following generations who will play an important role in the workforce of the country.
The researchers who study fighters claim that they have a natural affinity with school and an innate need to succeed.
Many are also those whose parents set high aims for their children and who find ways to compensate their lack of familiarity with the American schools.
Coaching programs also play a very important role to help Graciela and millions of children like her to reach university -- especially if her efforts are regular and on a long-term.
When you look at children from low-income families with parents who do not have experience and skills to help them navigate the system, any intervention, at any time, will not help, said Patricia Gándara, researcher at Davis, University of California, who has studied Latin-American students.
We must think to offer a support network for these children, from kindergarten through high school.
The federal program, which has funded the visit of the universities of Graciela is a good example.
Known as Gear UP (prepare yourself), it provides more than $300 million per year to local school systems to organize programs in preparation for college which begin when students from low income families are in High School and continue until the end of the High School years.
Since 1999, the program has been followed by more than 10 million students, with more than 60 percent going to university, according to the US Department of Education.
The oil Ministry of Iraqi obtains agreements with 10 foreign oil companies
Despite the concerns about violence and political instability, the Iraqi government has managed to attract some major oil companies to rebuild its infrastructure in difficulty during two auctions that ended Saturday.
The 10 agreements brokered by the Iraqi Ministry of oil with the foreign oil companies suggests that the oil companies in China, Russia and Europe are about to play a major role in the restoration of the oil industry in Iraq, quashed by decades of war and sanctions.
American companies are spread with a participation in only two of the 10 auctioned fields.
Seven American companies had paid to participate in the second auction, which began on Friday.
The only one who had made a bid has lost.
Two American companies have received contracts for the fields auctioned in June.
The weak representation of American oil giants in the opening of the oil sector in Iraq has surprised analysts.
Iraq has finally opened its doors, after six years of war, and instead of American companies, it is Asian and European companies which are paving the way, said Ruba Husari, editor of Iraq Oil Forum, a news site on the Internet.
It will take a long time before another offer is made in Iraq.
Concerns about security, reinforced by massive coordinated bombings Tuesday, and political instability since American military troops were withdrawing have slowed down the American oil companies, preventing them from entering more forcefully into Iraq which has the third largest crude oil reserves in the world, analysts say.
The American companies were in some cases at a disadvantage because of their rivals, especially the Chinese and the other government-controlled energy companies, which had significantly lower labor costs and which were more prepared to take risks because they did not have to report to shareholders.
Exxon-Mobil and Occidental Petroleum Inc. were the only American companies that obtained contracts with the ministry.
The largest American companies, such as Chevron and ConocoPhillips, who kept strong ties with the Iraqi oil ministry and brought them their technical advice, have left empty-handed.
The Russian companies Lukoil and Gazprom were the two main shareholders in two of the contracts awarded this weekend.
Chinese National Petroleum Corp., owned by the state, has raised more the offer on contracts than other companies and left with significant holdings in contracts for two major fields.
We all know that China is becoming a major economy, as well as a technological power, said Assam jihad, spokesman for the oil ministry.
We are confident that Chinese society will be equal with its competitors and fulfill its commitments in Iraq.
The companies pre-selected to submit auction bids made offers which were then compared to the price per barrel which the ministry was prepared to spend to stimulate production above current levels for each area.
One of the main organisers of Al Qaeda would have been killed in Pakistan
It seems that an American missile which struck along the border with Afghanistan has killed one of the organizers of al-Qaeda operations, this week, American counter-intelligence authorities said Friday.
If the information is confirmed, it would be the second deadly attack against one of the terrorist leaders this autumn.
Saleh al-Somali was one of two Arab men suspected of having been killed by a pair of rockets fired into their car, on Tuesday, near the town of Miran Shah, in the province of North Waziristan, according to American sources and Pakistani authorities in the region.
Local authorities have said the missiles were fired by a pilotless aircraft of the type used by the CIA, inside the lawless tribal border of Pakistan.
They were driving a white car, heading towards the Afghan border, when the car was struck, said a member of the Pakistani Civil Secret Service, speaking by telephone from Miran Shah.
The authorities said that the suspected local militants rushed in and rapidly confiscated what remained of the "totally shattered bodies."
It was completly impossible for local authorities to check the identity of the victims, but the two American anti-terror representatives gave unspecified evidence that Somali was one of the dead.
Somali was described as being one of the al-Qaeda military organizer Responsibles who ran the terrorist operations of the group outside the Afghanistan-Pakistan region.
His role was to organize plots throughout the entire world, said one of the authorities, who requested anonymity citing the sensitive nature of the air strikes inside Pakistani territory.
Given its main role, this included probably attack conspiracies against the US and Europe.
He has followed the strategic instructions of the leaders of al-Qaeda and has translated them into plans of action for possible terrorist attacks.
A second representative of the American authority has said that Somali had risen quickly in the ranks of al-Qaida and had very good relations with other extremist groups in the region.
It is perhaps not known to the greater American public, but it does not diminish the threat that it constitutes for us and our allies, said the second official representative.
If his death is confirmed, Somali would be the second major figure of al-Qaeda or the second Taliban leader killed since September, when a similar attack killed Najmuddin Jalolov, leader of a faction of militants in the tribal belt, as well as three other operatives.
The pace of attacks performed by CIA's drones has decrease since the summer, of about six operations per months to two, according to the figures provided by the Long War Journal, a tempered website by a non-profit group.
This decline is perhaps due to improved tactics from the terrorist groups that have progressed in order to reduce their vulnerability while also ruthlessly killing the suspected informants, the site says.
The UN correspondent to Kabul withdraws
The UN special envoy in Afghanistan, Kai Eide, said Friday that he would resign in March, ending a tumultuous tenure marred by allegations of extended corruption during the UN backed presidential elections.
Eide's departure happens as the Obama administration has decided to send 30,000 additional soldiers in Afghanistan.
The UN envoy has said that he supported this increase, but he has expressed his concern regarding the timing of the United States for a withdrawal of troops which would start in 18 months and which would force the other governments of NATO to withdraw their forces.
We need to accelerate the development of our security forces in Afghanistan, send the right signal to the Afghans and remind them that they can trust the international community, said Eide in a telephone interview from Kabul.
Our commitment must be long-term.
The Norwegian diplomat also urged the US and the other military powers to increase the number of international officials helping the political transition in Afghanistan.
The military increase must be copied by civilians, he said.
Eide said he did not resign but that he would keep the commitment that he had made to his family, in March, to spend only two years in Kabul.
He said he wanted to inform the United Nations.
The Secretary General Ban Ki-moon now knows that he has time to find a replacement.
I just said it was better to start looking for my successor, said Eide.
When I came here, there had been a gap of two months between the departure of my predecessor and my arrival.
According to representatives of the UN, Ban has already begun to seek a replacement.
The representatives affirm that the name Staffan di Mistura has been cited; he is an Italian-Swiss citizen who recently chaired a UN mission to Baghdad and Jean-Marie Guéhenno, a Frenchman who previously directed UN peacekeeping operations.
Eide's reputation in Afghanistan has been hurt after his former deputy, Peter W. Galbraith, accused him in September to favor President Hamid Karzai during the presidential elections and hide the evidence of a massive electoral fraud.
Eide denied this allegations but he said that accusations to Galbraith -- which has been dismiss -- "have damaged the mission because there was already a big dose of skepticism regarding the international observation of elections."
Eide said he had proposed the appointment of a civilian representative to co-ordinate the rescue of American forces in Afghanistan.
He also urged the UN Executives to allow his successor to hire more staff from the US and other Western countries than what is attributed to the mission in Afghanistan, saying that this would give them more confidence in the way their money is spent.
Eide has expressed his frustration concerning the limits of his power in Afghanistan, saying that the heavy regulations on recruitment from the UN disturbed his chances to bring new talent.
The UN's rules are such that I was able to recruit only one person since May, he said.
It is catastrophic and it cannot last.
Gates: Iran must undergo further sanctions
Defense Secretary Robert M. Gates said Friday that the major world powers would soon impose "serious additional sanctions" on Iran because of its failure to engage in talks on the nuclear ambitions.
Gates, speaking in front of 300 American soldiers in northern Iraq, for a one week visit in the war zones in Afghanistan and Iraq, has played down the possibility of a military action against the Islamic Republic.
There is no good option in Iran, he said, in response to a soldier's question on such an outcome possibility.
One of the things that weighs the most on me, is that if I learnt a thing in Iraq over the past six years, it is the unpredictable side inherent to the war.
The Obama administration is considering a set of sanctions aimed at the military and political elite of Iran, but Gates has pointed out that some of these sanctions could also affect the Iranians in the street.
He said that a "combination of incentives and punishments" might be needed to persuade the Iranian government that it would in fact have worse security with nuclear weapons "because" his people would suffer greatly with these sanctions.
On Friday, in a statement of the White House spokesman, Robert Gibbs, the administration has joined the European leaders in warning that Iran will face the "probable" consequences if it does not bring its nuclear program in full compliance with the UN Security Council and its supervisory body, the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA).
Iran keeps on saying that it wants to develop its nuclear experience on peaceful purposes only.
In the Geneva talks, on October 1st, it indicated that it would resume the dialogue on the reduction of its nuclear program and agreed to abandon a major part of its stock of enriched uranium, in exchange for fuel desperately needed for a medical research reactor.
The administration has prompted such an agreement, a mean to develop confidence on both sides and win time for negotiations.
Since then, Iran appears to have distanced itself from the proposals in the agreement - in part, say experts, because the Iranian leadership is divided on whether or not to deal with the United States.
Frankly, I think the inflexibility of Iran with respect to some of the proposals of the international community to which they had in fact agreed at the beginning of October, prompted the international community, including the Russians and the Chinese, to join forces on items they had not previously considered, in terms of serious additional sanctions against the Iranians, said Gates.
President Obama has set December 31st as the deadline for Iran to respond to the proposals, before he turns to other options, including the pursuit of what Secretary of State Hillary Rodham Clinton once called "accumulated sanctions."
In a statement on Thursday in New York, the Iranian mission to the United Nations condemned what it calls "the baseless allegations" of some members of the Security Council on the nuclear activities of Iran and said that it agreed to continue talks with the United States and five other major world powers, "in order to get a long-term satisfactory solution".
Gates, who was to return to Washington late on Friday, has met during the morning, Iraqi Prime Minister Nouri al-Maliki, before flying to the oil rich region of Kurdish in order to meet the leaders of the troops in Kirkuk, Kurdish and Irbil.
Tensions persist between Kurds and the Arab majority in Iraq, particularly on the borders, property rights and the share of income.
Gates has urged both sides to reduce the potential conflict in order to avoid delays to American plans for the reduction in the number of American troops, from 115,000 to 50,000 before the end of August.
Gates also wants to ease the anxiety of Kurds concerning the pending  withdrawal. The American authorities quoted Gates saying to Massoud Barzani, president of the regional government of Kurdistan : "We will protect your security, prosperity and your autonomy within a unified Iraq."
"We won't abandon you."
In an aging China, a change of direction
Wang Weijia and her husband grew up surrounded by propaganda posters preaching to them, "Mother Earth is too tired to welcome more children" and "Another baby is another grave."
They have so far learned the lesson that the authorities of Shanghai government, alarmed by the low birth rate in their city and the population ageing, have radically changed direction this summer and have begun to encourage young couples to have more than one child; their reaction was instantaneous and firm: never.
We have already given all our time and all our energy to one child.
We have no second left, said Wang, 31 years old, director of human resources and father of an 8-month-old son.
More than 30 years after the introduction of one-child policy in China, creating two generations of unique children notoriously with good cheeks and spoiled, nicknamed the "Little Emperors', a population crisis is threatening the country.
According to the UN, the average birth rate is 1.8 children per couple less than six when the policy was implemented.
As for the distribution of the population, it is envisaged that the number of residents greater than 60 years will explode from 16.7 percent of the population by 2020 to 31.1 percent by 2050. This figure is well above the global average of around 20 percent.
That imbalance is even worse in the coastal rich cities with a highly educated population, such as Shanghai.
Last year, people aged 60 and over accounted for nearly 22 percent of the population of residents registered in Shanghai, while the birth rate was less than one child per couple.
Xie Lingli, director of the Shanghai Municipal Population and Family Planning Commission said that fertile couples should have babies to "help to reduce the proportion of the aging population and prevent a lack of labor in the future."
Shanghai is about to become "as old - but not as rich, however - as developed countries such as Japan and Sweden," she said.
A gradual reduction
Written in the country's constitution in 1978, China's one-child policy is to this day undoubtedly the most controversial requirement introduced by the communist government.
Couples who transgress this policy may have to pay huge fines -- up to three times their annual income -- and to suffer discrimination at the workplace.
The Chinese authorities missioned the police to help the country to avoid a dangerous trend for its natural resources, while lawyers for human rights have denounced the abuse in implementing this policy.
In rural areas, law-enforcement representatives forced women pregnant with their second child to have an abortion.
Moreover, many couples have resorted to selective abortions, leading to an abnormally high boys-girls ratio.
In recent years, the authorities responsible for the population have gradually softened their position on the one-child policy.
In 2004, they allowed more exceptions to the rule -- including for residents of cities, members of ethnic minorities and the cases in which a man and a woman already have only one child -- and in 2007, they toned down their harsh slogans quite a bit.
Qiao Xiaochun, a professor at the Institute of Population Research at Beijing University, said that central government authorities have recently discussed even more radical changes, such as allowing couples to have two children if one partner is an only child.
In July, Shanghai became the first Chinese city to launch an aggressive campaign to encourage births.
In no time at all, the posters urging families to have only one child have been replaced with copies of the regulations detailing who has the right to have a second child and how to request authorization.
The city government dispatched family planning authorities and volunteers to meet with couples in their homes, and to slide brochures under their doors.
He also promised to provide psychological and financial advice to those who would like to have more than one child.
According to the head of Family Planning, the response has been disappointing.
Disappointing answer
Although officials in a rural town on the outskirts of Shanghai say they have seen an increase in requests for records of couples wanting a second child following the launch of the campaign, the more urban district reported that there was no change.
The town of Huinan, with a population of 115,000 inhabitants, for example, still receives only four to five requests per month.
Disappointed officials in Shanghai say that, despite the campaign, the number of births in the city, in 2010, is still expected to be only around 165 thousand -- slightly higher than 2009 but lower than 2008.
Feng Juying, the person in charge of the committee of family planning in the municipality of Caolu in Shanghai, said that the financial considerations are probably the main reason why many people do not want to have more children.
They want to provide for their first child, she said.
Yang Jiawei, 27, and his wife Liu Juanjuan, 26, have said that they would really love to have two children and that they are legally authorized to do so.
But like many Chinese, they have only the minimum health insurance and life insurance provided by the government.
Without a social protection, they say, the decision would be irresponsible.
Westerners wrongly consider that the one-child policy is a problem of rights, said Yang, a construction engineer whose wife is seven months pregnant with the first child of the couple.
It's true, they are robbing us of the chance of having more than one child.
But the problem is not only the law.
It is the money.
Other couples cite psychological reasons to explain their hesitation.
Wang, chief human resources, said she wanted an only child because she was one herself. "We were the centre of the family and were used that everyone was looking after us."
We are not used to taking care of someone else and we really do not want to take care of others."
Chen zijian, 42 years and owner of a society of translating said it more bluntly.
For couples where both are working, middle class, who are lowering the birth rate, he says, one must be selfish to succeed well.
People between 20 and 30 years old have grown up watching their parents fight during the rise of capitalism in China and they do not want to live the same way, he is quoted as saying.
Even one child asks a lot of time to his parents, he says.
A mother must abandon at least two years of her social life.
Then there are the problems of space -- "You need to change your apartment" -- and planning -- "when your child is only 9 months old, you must write his CV to obtain a place in the best nursery school."
Most of his friends are ready for that experience once, said Chen, but not twice.
Our generation is the first one to benefit from a higher standard of living, he says.
We do not want too many sacrifices.
The UN group plans projects for emissions reducing
The climate conference, sponsored by the UN - characterised so far by disorganised posturing and mutual recriminations -- is back in the spotlight on Friday, because of the publication of a document outlining the ambitious cuts in greenhouse gases over the next 40 years, with industrialized nations bearing most of the burden in the near future.
The text which could provide the foundations of a final political agreement to regulate greenhouse gases, has emphasized the remaining barriers, as much as it has lighted up the path to take.
But it was seen as an important step forward in the negotiations which don't have much time left, with more than 100 world leaders coming to Copenhagen next week.
Written by a special working group from ONU, the text does not say how much rich countries would give to the poor to cope with climate change, on short and long term.
And it offers a wide range of options for key issues, including how developed economies and new emerging economies could reduce their production of carbon and what would be the upper limit of the rise in global temperature that those responsible would be prepared to tolerate.
It gives a great flexibility to the process, said John Coequyt, Washington Representative of the Sierra Club.
Michael Zammit Cutajar, who wrote six pages of the document, studied a 180-page text about the negotiations to concentrate on what the Executive Secretary of the United Nations Framework Convention on Climate Change, Yvo de Boer, said was "the full picture" regarding climate change.
It shows the guidelines of a potential agreement in which the industrialized nations would collectively reduce their emissions in 2020, by 25 to 45 percent compared with 1990 levels, while the main developing countries, during the same period, would reduce theirs by 15 to 30 percent.
Together, the countries would reduce emissions between 50 and 95 percent by 2050.
The European Union has also revied negotiations on Friday, promising to provide $3.6 billion per year over the next three years to help the poorest countries to adapt to the impact of climate change -- to cope with floods and droughts or to prevent deforestation.
However, on Friday, the same verbal squabbling occurred, which have dominated the negotiations since last week.
Todd Stern, the representative of the United States in the climate negotiations rejected any discussion requiring the reduction of greenhouse gases by industrialized countries, as compared to the voluntary efforts made by the major emerging economies, where the latter were not being funded by developed countries.
This change is the signal that the Obama administration is becoming more tough toward China than the Bush administration has been two years ago.
The United States is not going to sign an agreement without efforts and actions of major developing countries, said Stern who also regretted that the text is not insistent enough to ensure that the cuts could be verified by outside observers.
Stern has made his comments one hour after the Chinese foreign affairs deputy, He Yafei had said that the principal US negotiator, either lacked "common sense", or was "highly irresponsible" for having said earlier that week that the US would not financially help China fight global warming.
With the future economic trajectories of the main world powers at stake, some flaws appeared both within the Third World and between the industrial world and the Emerging Economies.
The battle now is more relevant to the rescue of individual economies than that of saving the planet, with China and the United States cutting back on their respective obligations while poorer nations insist that the two dozen most influential countries are ignoring scientific needs to act more boldly.
Ricardo Ulate, a delegate from Costa Rica, said that it was not surprising that the major powers are fighting over who should bear the costs of the reduction of greenhouse gases, even if the vulnerable countries had become more aggressive in their attempt to make the big emitters accountable for their actions.
This is really a game in which has developed a new economic hegemony, said Ulate, which is also adviser on the climate for Mexico and Central America for Conservation International.
Some countries which are more vulnerable to the impact of climate change have indicated they would continue to press for a legally binding treaty, in Copenhagen, although most of the main participants say that negotiations will lead, at the least, to a political agreement.
The Alliance of Small Island States that includes 43 states, has drafted a 24-pages treaty proposal, early Friday morning.
Artur Runge-Metzger, director of the climate division of the European Commission, has said that the action of the small island states has "put political pressure on the whole political process, in part because they are now unified and are asking the emerging economies such as China and India, to act.
The debates have become an urgent matter, while the delegates were focussing on the fact that they had to solve most of the issues pending before the heads of governments come to an agreement.
High level officials such as Indian Environment Minister, Jairam Ramesh and the Chinese deputy minister descended from their plane and ran into the Bella Center building to attend meetings behind closed doors and information conferences, in order to make complaints which will be considered in the course of the following week.
The real picture of the gathering -- during which 13,000 people come in and out of the Palais des Congrès every day -- activist guitar players performing nightly shows, mocking the countries which, according to them, betray each other and whose proposals are made and distributed on paper rather than by emails -- is a real challenge.
The intensity is only increasing: almost all the important ministers are here and no later than on Wednesday, 60 heads of governments will be in Copenhagen.
We are entering the big boys playground, said Carlos Manuel Rodriguez, vice-president of Conservation International worldwide politics.
The trucks are arriving.
In Great Britain, the first 225km/h train will redefine the Monday Syndrome.
At 5:13 am, Monday morning, a whistle will burst through the night to signal the departure of a train that will mark a transportation revolution in Great-Britain.
The country's first high-speed commuter train will reach 225 km/h, as it runs from Ashford, in Kent, to London's St. Pancras station, covering the 93 km in 38 minutes.
Lord Adonis, the transport minister, will be joined by Lady Kelly Holmes in the first commuter train Javelin outside London.
He hopes that the new service will allow Great-Britain to include an international network of fast and reliable trains, and will link the large conurbations of Midlands, North and Scotland to London.
Little rundown slums will become flourishing suburbs, business travel times will be much shorter and the change from air travel and car travel to train travel will reduce the country's carbon emissions while lessening congestion on the roads.
In theory, the three main political parties adhere to this project.
But the ten billion pounds needed to build a new rail network, the inevitable battle of schedule and fears of dangers to the environment may slow down the British high-speed lines.
According to The Times, High Speed Two (HS2), a company founded in January to make a feasibility report for the government, will turn in its report to Lord Adonis on December 30.
That will permit him to get a detailed map of the route for the next planned stage of the TGV network.
The new line linking London to West Midlands will be drawn in the five metres of the urban area and sites where the impact on the environment can be controversial.
In the countryside, the map will be drawn up to 25 metres of the final route.
It is equally expected that HS2 presents three options for a larger high-speed network, go towards the north.
Lord Adonis will answer in the spring.
The preferred options are put at the forefront of a Y configuration in which a high-speed line will go as far as the West Midlands.
The line will diverge into two at or near Birmingham, with one branch heading toward the west of the Apennines at Manchester and Scotland and another going toward the northeast, toward Sheffield, Leeds and Newcastle upon Tyne.
A single line will cross Scotland.
"It seems it will be the best option of performance", a professional of railways said.
When it is finished, the journey time between London and Edinburgh will be reduced to 2 hours 40 minutes.
The first branch, which will not open until 2025, will allow all passengers to travel between London and Birmingham in 49 minutes, compared to a trip of one hour currently.
The proposals will allow trains to travel to 400km / h, making the UK grid the fastest in the world.
The original route is designed to allow trains of 400m in length that are able to carry 1100 people.
Up to 18 trains per hour can operate on a London - Birmingham line.
A terminal that can handle 20000 passengers per hour would be necessary.
Given the space constraints, it is intended that an existing station will be expanded to receive the high-speed network.
Experts of the rail industry say that only St. Pancras International or Euston offer this possibility.
Lord Adonis will announce whether he feels the project must be put in place, but more lengthy public consultation and planning procedures mean that a final decision will not be made before a general election.
Even if he launches the machine, the network will have to be built piece by piece.
The trains will initially have to use the existing rail lines north of Birmingham, except where high speed lines already exist, meaning that the travel times between London and Scotland will remain longer than three hours.
This solution seems to be the best to ensure a passage from planes to trains, constituting a reference point for the revolution of railways.
The taxpayers pay back the loan of 75 000 GBP for the orangery of Tory
Alan Duncan, a leading Tory member of parliament, has cost the taxpayer thousands of pounds per year to pay for the cost of an orangery built in in his home constituency.
The head of the party which has been demoted by David Cameron for having complained that members of parliament had "maintained," has increased its loan of 75 000 GBP to build an extension in Oak to its second home in Rutland.
He had been allowed to have the extra interest, amounting to hundreds of pounds per month, paid by the taxpayer.
The Commons authorities received complaints at the time and were not interrogated by Sir Thomas Legg, who controls members' spending. Last night, Mr Duncan stated that complaints could not be any "clearer and more simple."
Mr Duncan, one of the richest members of the parliament, is the owner of a two storey house in a village of his constituency of Rutland - Melton.
The nearby houses were sold for nearly a million pounds.
The ground floor includes a kitchen, a living room and a dining room, but the salary office claims that Mr Duncan needed more space.
Last year, he added a veranda to the house, describing it in his plans as an orangery.
The neighbours describe it as a "veranda for fun."
Mr Duncan was not asked to give an explanation for the increase in borrowing during a recent investigation made by the Standards and Privileges Committee of the House of Commons, concerning his disposition of previous loans.
The Committee has cleared him last month of the charge of infringement of rules, after an investigation of his spendings.
In 2004, Mr. Duncan has changed the legal security of the loan of 271.406 GBP from his property in London to the home in his constituency that he has bought in 1991, the year before becoming a member of parliament.
The documents published this week show that Mr Duncan was claiming approximately 1,400 GBP per month of interest on loans up to March last year.
In April, its claims have increased by more than 1,800 GBP per month.
The interest rate on the RBS loan of Mr. Duncan has not been changed at this time, suggesting that all increases were intended to finance the loan of 75,000 GBP.
The RBS variable standard interest rate fell from 7.94 percent in December 2007 to 4 percent in March of this year, without budging since then.
The latest publication of the authorities of the Commons shows that Mr Duncan continued to ask 1,250 GBP in May.
Mr Duncan has lost his post as head of the shadow cabinet in September, after an undercover journalist allegedly filmed him saying that members of parliament had to survive "on a budget" after the spending scandal.
"Actually, it is now national, you have to live "on budget" and you are treated as "sh.t"
He said: "I spent my money on my garden and I asked for a small part, based on what was correct.
And I could have asked a hell of a lot more, but I didn't. "
The member of parliament, a millionaire since his former job as an oil negotiator, started to have to explain his expense spending, in May, after it emerged that he had asked for thousands of pounds for his garden, before agreeing with the office in charge of expenditures that it "could be considered excessive."
An activist has dug a £-shaped hole in the lawn of Mr Duncan, in protest after it was revealed that he had asked for 4,000 GBP during three years.
Asked about the increase in borrowing last night, Mr. Duncan said: "It was for capital improvements, approved by both the office that handles expenses and then by Legg."
He added: "There is no problem of a cop-out or development or rules utilisation or whatever.
It was completely clear, in the rules, allowed, etc.
It could not be clearer or more simple."
Believers, come everybody to see Brighton's Advent calendar.
The bathing boxes of Brighton have found a new means of promotion for the winter months, an interactive Advent calendar.
Beyond, a group of alternative church which encourages the spiritual exploration of creativity, invited 24 owners to decorate their cabin for every day of December, using Christmas' songs as theme.
The event began on December 1st, when visitors were allowed to visit the rear cabin, from 5:30 to 6:30 p.m. each day, with patés and hot wine served free of charge.
The Christmas carols chosen so far include: "I Saw Three Ships; O Come, O Come; Emmanuel and "The First Noel," for which the cabin is presenting the work of Janette Tozer, a local artist.
Martin Poole, 50 years old, an assistant marketing of Hove TV, is an unpaid priest from the diocese of Chichester and director of beyond.
He said: "We want religion to be closer to the people in a post-Christian society.
"As a Church, why do we expect that people would enter into a strange old building? It seems to me that the Church should be closer to the people and celebrate in a more exciting manner.
"The idea of the Advent calendar in the beach hut came just after a conversation with some friends, during a dinner.
Brighton is such a creative and vibrant place and we are trying to experiment and to represent that through spirituality."
Strong mobilization in Copenhagen and across the world concerning the climate
Throughout the world and in Copenhagen, where police made hundreds of arrests, tens of thousands of people demonstrated Saturday to demand an ambitious and binding agreement with regard to the fight against global warming.
At least 30 thousand people, according to the police, about a hundred thousand, according to the organizers, marched in the cold in the Danish capital, outside the United Nations Climate Change Conference, which is charged with leading by Friday to an agreement which could come into force on January 1st of 2013.
For Connie Hedegaard, the Danish president of the climate conference, the growing mobilization for climate control throughout the world, as illustrated by these protests, has contributed to making "the political price" of failure in Copenhagen very high.
The incidents in the Danish capital occurred shortly after the departure of the motorcade, when a group of 300 demonstrators, all dressed in black, smashed windows with bricks and hammers, said an AFP journalist.
Riot police officers immediately intervened ruthlessly.
In total, police announced the arrest of 600 to 700 people, mainly, according to them, members of the "Black Bloc," the various ultra-violent splinter groups which were out in force at the NATO summit in Strasbourg, France, in April.
The Climate Justice Action (CJA) coalition, one of the organizers of the demonstration, denounced the conditions in which hundreds of protesters have been arrested "without distinction"; stressing that hundreds of them "were still detained in the street on Saturday evening, handcuffed and kept in a seated position despite the extreme cold."
From the Parliament, the procession, rather good child, went towards the Bella Center, site of the negotiations.
The demonstrators stopped some 500 meters away from the building, without trying to enter it.
A stage had been put up to accommodate the expected speakers, before a candlelight evening with the participation of Cape Town former South African archbishop, Desmond Tutu.
Most of the demonstrators had come by bus and train from large cities in Europe, but many Asians, including some Chinese people and Koreans, were also present as well as Africans.
Nearly 3,000 people, the majority  in sky  blue raincoats, had  first gathered in the morning in Copenhagen at the appeal of Friends of the Earth, who intended to form a "blue tide" for "Justice for the climate".
Today, we come down in the streets to seek compensation for ecological debt for the South, explained Lidy nacpil Philippines campaigner of  the Jubilee South coalition in Copenhagen.
We cannot continue to say: we have time, has estimated the Beninese singer Angélique Kidjo.
There are rivers drying up in Africa, watercourses where one can walk as it had never been possible before.
For the first time in the history of the climate diplomacy, born in 1992 with the adoption of the UN Convention, the anti-globalisation movement has brought himself closer to the environmental organizations.
The French MEP José Bové, a figure of alter-globalism, explained having come to Copenhagen to "link environmental justice and social justice": "Today, there is no disconnect between the fight against climate change and the fight for another world."
The Asia-Pacific region, home of many islands particularly vulnerable to global warming, had given the kick-off of the demonstrations.
A few 50,000 persons, according to the organizers, were down the streets in Australia.
In Manila, a few hundred people, mostly students, marched in red, sporting bandanas praising solar energy.
In Hong Kong or Jakarta, but also in Canada, few hundreds demonstrators crowds are also formed reclaiming bold action against climate change.
In France, the demonstrations organised by the "350" network have gathered a few hundred people, particularly in Paris, Marseilles (South), Lille (North), Bordeaux (West) and Lyons (East).
In Geneva a few dozens of people assembled.
Separatist Abkhazia has elected its President, Georgia denounced a "joke"
Abkhazia has elected its president on Saturday, a little more than one year after Moscow's recognition of this pro-Russian separatist region of Georgia, whereas Tbilisi denounces a "farce".
Some 131,000 people were expected to participate in the first election since the Russia-Georgia war in August 2008 for the control of South Ossetia, another Georgian breakaway territory recognized by Russia
The polling stations closed at 17H00 GMT.
The turnout was 58% a few hours before the closure, according to officials from the Electoral Commission of Abkhazia.
The first interim results were to be announced during the night between Saturday and Sunday.
The five candidates on the ballot, including the outgoing president, Sergey Bagapch, absolutely reject the idea of reunification with Georgia, which has condemned the holding of the election.
This election is a farce.
From his side, Georgian President Mikheïl Saakachvili "regrets that Abkhazia has fallen under total occupation from Russia," his spokesman, Manana Manjgaladzé, said.
Besides Russia, only Nicaragua and Venezuela have recognized the independence of this territory of 216,000 inhabitants, while the rest of the world considers it a part of Georgia illegally occupied by Russian troops.
After having parted with Georgia during the 1992-1993 conflict, which has done thousands of deaths, Abkhazia seeks to show through this election that it is ready to join the international community.
This process is one stage of our new life, our new era as an independent state, Svetlana Kvartchia, a 54-year-old historian who confirmed having voted for Mr Bagapch, told the AFP.
She was among the voters who went to the polling station in a Soukhoumi school, the capital, in a beautiful white building with a few palms in the entry.
The issue of Russian domination is at the heart of the presidential election in this region of sumptuous landscapes, along the coast of the Black Sea.
Large signboards showing Mr Bagapch alongside Russian president and prime minister, Dmitry Medvedev and Vladimir Putin, are set everywhere in this small territory with 216,000 inhabitants.
In Gali, in the West of the country, the leader of the district, Beslan archba, gave a warm reception to Russian officials who came to supervise the progress of the poll.
We, people of Abkhazia, are grateful, he said during a brief ceremony, in reference to Moscow support, in particular, the decision to recognize Abkhazia's independence.
I hope that your country will soon be recognised by the United Nations, responded Ostrovski Alexei, a member of the Russian parliament, raising a glass of vodka.
On its side, the opposition represented at the ballot by the former Vice President Raúl Khadjimba and two businessmen, Zaous Ardzinba and Beslan Boutba, criticizes agreements concluded with Moscow last year, such as the one ceding to Russia control over the Abkhazian railways for 10 years ago.
The fifth candidate, Vitali Bganba, says he supports neither the current leadership, nor the opposition.
A majority of 50% plus one vote is needed to win the election.
If no candidate meets this threshold, a second round must be held within two weeks.
Climate: demonstrations throughout the world, incidents in Copenhagen.
Tens of thousands of people marched Saturday throughout the world, calling for an ambitious and binding agreement at the Climate Conference in Copenhagen, where police, on the alert, arrested nearly 700 people in connection with a major demonstration.
Thirty thousand people according to the police, hundreds of thousands according to the organizers, marched in the afternoon cold in the Danish capital, which is hosting until December 18th delegates from 193 countries, in search of an agreement which would become effective on the 1st of January 2013.
Leaving from the Parliament, the wake, generally well behaved, went in the direction of the Bella Center, where the negotiations are taking place.
The demonstrators stopped some 500 meters away from the centre, without trying to enter it.
A stage had been put up to accommodate the expected speakers, before a candlelight evening with the participation of Cape Town former South African archbishop, Desmond Tutu.
A few moments after the departure of the procession, a group of several hundred demonstrators, all dressed in black and armed with bricks and hammers, broke the windows, an AFP journalist stated.
Anti-riot policemen immediately surrounded them and stepped in ruthlessly, throwing several of them to the ground.
The police announced the arrest of 600 to 700 people, saying that they were mainly members of the "Black Bloc," the various ultra-violent splinter groups which especially made their presence known at the NATO summit in Strasbourg, in eastern France, in April.
In the late afternoon, a policeman was injured in the jaw by a paving stone and four cars burned near a squatter's dwelling in incidents that led to the arrest of 20 people, according to the police.
We have our eye on the extremist groups, warned police spokesman Henrik Jakobsen, while the security forces' helicopters were in the sky.
Most of the demonstrators, who came by bus and by trains from major cities of Germany, from London, Amsterdam or Milan, were of European origin.
But many Asians, including a number of Chinese and Koreans, were also present and Africans too.
Nearly 3,000 people, the majority  in sky  blue raincoats, had  first gathered in the morning in Copenhagen at the appeal of Friends of the Earth, who intended to form a "blue tide" for "Justice for the climate".
Today, we are out in the streets to seek compensation for the ecological debt for the South, explained Lidy Nacpil Philippino campaigner for the Jubilee South Coalition in Copenhagen.
We cannot continue to say: we have time, has estimated the Beninese singer Angélique Kidjo.
There are rivers which are drying up in Africa, there are streams in which one can walk as one never could before.
For the first time in the history of the climate diplomacy, born in 1992 with the adoption of the UN Convention, the anti-globalisation movement has brought himself closer to the environmental organizations.
The French MEP José Bové, the face of alter-globalism, told the AFP that he came to Copenhagen to "link climate justice and social justice": "Today, there is no disconnect between the fight against global warming and the fight for a new world."
Oxfam mobilized several celebrities, including Danish model Helena Christensen the former UN Commissioner concerned with refugee affairs Mary Robinson, who had to address the crowd.
The Asia-Pacific region, home of many islands particularly vulnerable to global warming, had given the kick-off of the demonstrations.
A few 50,000 persons, according to the organizers, were down the streets in Australia.
In Manila, a few hundred people, students for most, marched, dressed in red and using bandanas boasting solar energy in front of the town hall of the capital of the Philippines.
In Hong Kong or Jakarta, few hundreds of demonstrators also rallied to call for an action against the climate change.
In France, the demonstrations organised by the "350" network have gathered a few hundred people, particularly in Paris, Marseilles (South), Lille (North), Bordeaux (West) and Lyons (East).
In Geneva a few dozens of people assembled.
History and geography have been strengthened by the reform of the high school, according to Chatel.
National Education Minister Luc Chatel said in an interview to appear in the JDD Sunday that history and geography were "strengthened" by the general school reform, despite their teaching no longer being compulsory in the final year of High School.
From here on, first level pupils will all have four hours weekly of the same program as a shared common culture, says Mr. Chatel.
For the minister, "we have to stop being hypocritical" because, according to him, "Level S is no longer a science level," but "essentially, attracts the best pupils".
Social Study and Economy courses and Litterature courses cannot remain underestimated in front of Scientific courses, he continues by pointing out : "I have neither heard many historians and intellectuals who are outraged by the absence of History and Geography courses in the final year in technology high school.
On Saturday, an IFOP poll published in L'Humanité revealed that nearly seven out of ten French people (69%) disapproved of the government project to abolish the compulsory teaching of History/Geography in the Senior year of High School. Many scholars and teachers have also criticized this elimination, as well as the left and some elected members of the right.
The minister however added that removing the philosophy of the Scientific Bacalaureate programme was "out of the question".
Luc Chatel has also defended the reform of teacher training, while 16 organizations (of students and unions) have called for a day of action on Tuesday to protest against the project, which, according to them,  sacrifices the educational training of future teachers.
In master (M2), they will pass an eligibility test at the beginning of the year which will cover their discipline, then at the end of the year an admission test which will cover their capacity to teach, has explained the minister.
They will also follow internship positions during the year of M2 then will be during a first year in front of pupils as trainee teachers.
If you add up all the courses offered before the competition, you already get more presence in front of the pupils, more than 300 hours, he continued.
Finally, the minister says he will propose "the individual right to training, something that does not exist in national education."
He also reaffirms the project to remove the schoolcards "by 2012."
At Normale Sup, experts have 15 minutes to convince over the climate
Fifteen minutes to talk about the challenges of the Copenhagen summit: it is the challenge that was accomplished Saturday morning by Jean Jouzel, vice-president of the Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change (IPCC) invited by the Normal School of Ulm street.
Jean Jouzel, also a Nobel Peace Prize winner, inaugurated the first of the "Ernest" conferences, a day consisting of a series of 15-minute, filmed lectures by experts, which are open to the public, stated an AFP journalist.
We wanted to do something that catches people and makes them want to know more, said outside the conference Edouard Hannezo, 22 years old, one of the organisers of this day that takes its name from the one given by the students to the fish in the school's pond.
We choose around twenty speakers among experts in their discipline and we select them for their charismatic side, he specified.
On global warming, "we can talk for hours, but we can also speak of the key objectives in a few minutes", Jean Jouzel told the AFP, speaking without notes, but using charts, in front of about 50 people.
This is part of our role of scientific, he pointed out, hoping that the auditors will remember that "the Copenhagen conference is based on an extremely serious scientific file".
The videos derived from these conferences will be put online on the site of the school from the 15th of December.
The next day "Ernest" is scheduled for February, followed by others at a bimonthly pace.
Late payments: anger of prison guards, planned actions.
The unions of prison guards called on Friday for a "general mobilization" to demand the payment, between now and the end of the year, of bonuses and overtime whose payment was pushed out to January for budgetary reasons.
Fo-pénitentiaire (2nd overseers' syndicate) has asked the personnel who will not be in service to show on Tuesday morning in front of the prisons and "block" them to "denounce the theft of their ownings."
The CGT-penitentiary (3rd trade union of the profession) calls upon them to "meet in general meetings in various prisons for strong action", judging as "a disgrace and unacceptable" the non-payment  in December for "overtime, night bonuses, Sundays, and holidays" worked in October.
And the first trade union of supervisors, the union of independent Federal prisons (UFAP / UNSA), "called for a general mobilisation (...) to make evident the discontent and anger".
The leadership of the prison administration and the Justice Ministry explain that extra hours have greatly increased in 2009 and have not all been budgeted for, but they assure that the remainder will be paid for in January.
The Chancellery said at the end of the day that Michele Alliot-Marie had sent a letter to the wardens unions guaranteeing that this payment would be made next month.
I know the efforts done by the staff for the operation and the modernization of our prison system, wrote the minister of justice in this letter.
I asked the administration department of the prison to set in motion with no delay a serie of measures to ensure that this situation, born of a bad assessment of the overtime hours, does not happen again in the future, says Mrs Alliot-Marie.
The pay of December will be small, except for the staff of direction receiving the famous functions and objectives premiums, deplored the UFAP / UNSA, for whom "the budgetary constraints are easy to blame".
It is a real scandal, has incensed the Marseilles' Interregional FO union, in announcing its decision to boycott until further notice "all the meetings and summons".
The staff will not work on their Sundays and holidays if those of October are not given legal status in December, the same goes for overtime, also threatens fo rhône-alpes-auvergne.
Now that we are increasing our tasks and our missions without increasing our staff, it is truly wrong to dare to go after our workers' money, the prison union in Bordeaux believes.
According to the trade unions, the situation is not the same in all regions, some being less badly off than others.
But in any case it doesn't add up, has noticed the UFAP's secretary-general, Jean-François forget.
For Christmas, Obama says he offers "better things" than those he receives
US President Barack Obama, who is preparing to spend his first Christmas with his family at the White House, confided to the "Papesse" of the small screen Oprah Winfrey that he had a simple rule on the matter of gifts: "I give cooler things than the ones I receive.
In the scope of a special show which will be broadcast Sunday night on ABC, the president and his wife Michelle offer a glimpse of how they intend to celebrate Christmas in their new and prestigious remains.
Even Bo, the small four-legged companion of the family will be a part of it.
Santa Claus also loves Bo, Michelle Obama has thus said, pointing out that the dog would "obviously" receive a present, according to extracts of the programme broadcast in advance.
And Michelle Obama has registered her objection to the false claims of her husband as to the quality of gifts he receives: "Certainly not, I gave you very nice gifts last year," she teased the President.
Absolutely, he was forced to admit before responding with humour while pointing to the pearl necklace of the First lady: "Who gave you this?".
During this one hour show, in a relaxed atmosphere , with the famous presenter who was a fervent support of Barack Obama during the presidential campaign, President and his wife were also remembering their favourite gifts when they were children.
Barack Obama recalled a ten-speed bicycle, but also a basketball that his Kenyan father that he rarely saw offered him for Christmas.
I remember the time when I met my father who came to see us for Christmas and who gave me a basketball, the President said.
It was only much later in my life that I realized it was he who had given me that basketball.
On her part, the First Lady remembered her dollhouse.
I didn't really know how to organize a house so I had aligned all the furnishings against the wall, rather than arrange them around the fireplace, but I loved that little dollhouse, Michelle Obama said.
Johnny Hallyday operated on again, RTL confirms he is in an artificial coma
Johnny Hallyday was operated on again in Los Angeles because of "major lesions" after an operation in France, but the situation is "under control" according to his entourage, while RTL says that the singer has been placed in an artificial coma to help him avoid pain and complications.
The 66 years old rocker was re-operated during the night of Wednesday to Thursday at the Los Angeles Cedars-Sinaï hospital after that American doctors had noted "lesions resulting from the operation" of the disc herniation performed in Paris on November 26, said his press service in Paris, specifying that these injuries "needed a restorative operation".
However, the singer's press service wanted to be reassuring, stating that the situation was "under control", while announcing that a new medical bulletin would be communicated later in 48 hours.
According to RTL, partner of the last tour of the singer, Johnny Hallyday would however have been plunged into an artificial coma to avoid "pain and complications".
It is only in 48 hours that we will have a little more assurance on the state of the patient when he will have opened an eye, adds RTL.
When questioned by AFP, the press service has neither confirmed nor commented on the information.
RTL also says that, "according to some sources" no drain would have been put after the first operation in Paris.
The rocker was operated at the international clinic of Park Monceau for this slipped disk.
The operation, scheduled for several days had been practised by the neurosurgeon Stéphane Delajoux, a renowned doctor in the midst of arts.
This one was not available on Thursday evening to comment on the information from RTL.
Following the operation he has practiced on Johnny Hallyday, the singer was hospitalized Monday in the Cedars-Sinaï hospital of Los Angeles, for an infection following the intervention.
The singer Eddy Mitchell, Johnny Hallyday's friend, estimated Thursday on RTL that his friend had "a bad patch" but said also "no worries" for the rocker, who is a "fighter".
He had called me just before leaving for Los Angeles, and I told him that it was bullshit because spending 12 hours on a plane after such an operation, it is not feasible, Eddy Mitchell said.
On Wednesday evening, the producer of the singer, Jean-Claude Camus, had wanted reassuring, asserting that Johnny Hallyday " reacted in a satisfactory way to antibiotics " and that the infection was "diked".
Mr Camus also said he had spoken with Laeticia, wife of the singer, and had not noticed any particular concern.
But the singer's health problems have only gotten worse since July when he was hospitalized for nine days following a fall on his yacht.
Two months later to general surprise, Johnny Hallyday was revealed to have been gotten an operation for a "small colorectal cancer', then a slight infection.
Late September, the singer went back again as planned on his long "66 Tour", presented as his farewell tour.
But since then, every health problem is abundantly discussed. Fans and journalists noticed the singer's difficulty in moving around on stage.
In mid-November, his entourage was even forced to deny a new hospitalization.
Euro-2009 /Small Pool: Bousquet's First-Place Win In His Favorite Distance 
The Frenchman Frédérick Bousquet, triple medalist at the 2009 World Championships in the Olympic pool, achieved on Thursday an international title in a distance he particularly favours, the 50-meter free-style, during the Euro-2009 short-course Championships in Istanbul.
The first day of this contest where the wetsuits are allowed for the last time saw only three world records beaten whereas a flood was expected.
One has been improved by the Hungarian Evelyn Verraszto on 200 metres individual medley swimming and the two others by Russia in 4×50 metres medley swimming relay.
A disappointment for Bousquet, who had his eye on the world record in the 50m freestroke, in which he holds the record in the long pool (20.94).
In one of the two major swimming distances, the 50m freestroke, it was the 28-year-old Frenchman who won in 20 sec 53 in a final in which ten swimmers started rather than the usual eight, a first on the international level.
Bousquet outdistanced the Croatian Duje Draganja (20.70) and the Russian Sergey Fesikov (20.84) but didn't succeed in lowering the world score (20.30) as he had planned it.
One can always dream bigger dreams, and under the circumstances, I had said that if the world record was within my reach, I was going to attempt it.
Like Bousquet, almost all of the swimmers were wearing polyurethane suits, which will be banned from 1st January.
The cause of 238 world records since February 2008, these combinations finish their saga in Istanbul, which hosted the first ones in 1999, at the same competition.
The use of combinations was not helpful this time for the German Paul Biedermann, double world champion in the pool this summer in Rome, world records to boot.
The young swimmer did not succeed in lowering the record he held in the 400 m freestyle (3:32.77) but nevertheless imposed by showing the second best time of his career (3:34.55), ahead of the Russian Nikita Lobintsev (3:35.75) and the Dane Mads Glaesner (3:36.82).
I didn't try my best for this course.
I knew I could not break a world record at that time, but I managed to defend my title and I have accomplished my mission.
Lobintsev will be a serious rival in the future, said Biedermann.
USA: a panel of a sarcophagus that belonged to Zola appraised at $1.5 million
A panel from a Roman sarcophagus that belonged to the French writer Emile Zola was appraised Thursday at 1.5 million dollars, clearly far above its estimate, announced Sotheby's, the art seller. 
This two metres long on 63 cm high front display, dating from the third century A.D., was estimated between 150,000 and 250,000 dollars.
The marble, "representing four dionysian scenes in a sophisticated, architectural setting, with satyrs and devotees of Bacchus all around, is a rare piece. There are only four or five of them in the world," Florent Heintz, Vice-President of Auctions of Ancient Roman and Egyptian Art at Sotheby's "explained to the AFP on Tuesday.
It was sold among a hundred of lots.
The sale is still underway but this lot is certainly the one on which buyers have the most bids so far, said a spokesman for Sotheby's, Dan Abernethy, to the AFP.
The discovery of the acquisition of this marble by Emile Zola, dates back to a few days.
The panel remained in Rome for almost 300 years in the famous collection of the Borghese family, then appeared successively in the home of French actress Cécile Sorel, who made it an element of her bath in her Parisian townhouse, and in the home of Paul Reynaud, a minister at the time of the Third Republic in France and Council President briefly before Marshal Pétain came to power.
A grey area of about fifty years was remaining.
Sifting through the database of the Louvre Museum, Florent Heintz has found that this panel was part of a "Emile Zola succession" opened in 1903, a year after the death of the author of "Thérèse Raquin" and of the portrayal of "Rougon-Macquart."
Zelaya's aborted attempt of departure from Honduras to Mexico
Mexico decided on Thursday that conditions were not ripe for the transfer onto its territory of Manuel Zelaya, the toppled President of Honduras, who was denied a safe-conduct pass by the revolutionary government.
For now, after a night-time telephone conversation with President Zelaya, everything seems to indicate that the possibility of achieving this transfer has not been met, said the Mexican foreign minister, Patricia Espinosa.
Having arrived on Wednesday in El Salvador to pick up Mr. Zelaya, the  Mexican government plane left to return to its place of origin, according to a source in the Director General's office of the Immigration Department.
The rebel government wanted to force Mr Zelaya to "resign" and to seek political asylum abroad to give him a free ticket.
But the dethroned President refused, because he wanted to travel to Mexico as an invited sitting head of state.
The rebel government "has had another failure in wanting me to give up my position (...), they wanted me to resign", Mr. Zelaya said Thursday on Radio Globo, on which he often speaks since the beginning of the political crisis which has been going on for five months in the Central American country.
I can stay here ten years, here I have my guitar, added while playing a few chords the deposed president, who took refuge in brazilian embassy in Tegucigalpa for two months and a half.
The Mexican Embassy has submitted a request to us for a safe-conduct pass, but unfortunately we cannot accept it because it contains no request for asylum, the Minister of the Interior of the rebel government, Oscar Raul Matute, said Wednesday on Honduran radio station HRN.
I do not seek asylum in any country, Manuel Zelaya had answered in an interview to the Telesur channel, which is based in Caracas.
A possible departure from Honduras will have to occur as president of the Honduran people, he pointed out.
Rumours of Mr Zelaya's leaving had mobilised on Wednesday supporters of former president, who came to unite around the Embassy of Brazil, where the military have strengthened their siege.
Brazilian Foreign Minister Celso Amorim criticised the position of the revolutionary government.
This demonstrates the marginal nature of this government towards international standards, he estimated.
Zelaya, who became close to the Venezuelan socialist president Hugo Chavez, was overthrown on June 28th, the day he held a popular referendum to prepare for his re-election, against the advice of the Supreme Court, the army and the Congress.
Exile to Costa Rica, he returned unexpectedly on September 21st and took refuge in the Brazilian Embassy.
If he leaves, he will be arrested for the crime of "high treason" of which the court accused him, according to the revolutionary government.
The rebel president Roberto Micheletti has managed to hold a presidential election on November 29 to replace Mr Zelaya.
Porfirio Lobo was elected during the controversial election recognised by the United States but disputed by Latin American countries such as Venezuela, Argentina or Brazil.
Three days later, Congress voted overwhelmingly against the return to power of Mr. Zelaya until the end of his term on January 27th.
Wall Street is rising, the US trade balance is fuelling optimism
The New York Stock Exchange has finished up on Thursday, the figures of the american trade balance testify the resumption of the activity of both US and its partners: the Dow Jones won 0,67% and the Nasdaq 0.33%.
According to the closure final figures, Dow Jones Industrial Average moved forward 68,78 points reaching 10.405,83 points, and Nasdaq, mainly technological, 7,13 points reaching 2.190,06 points.
The enlarged Standard & Poor's 500 index has gained 0,58% (6,40 points) to 1.102,35 points.
There is good news coming from various parts of the economy, Piegza Lindsey, of FTN Financial, reckoned.
But it remains anecdotic, she has tempered, believing that the market focused on "The half full glass".
For Peter Cardillo of Avalon Partners, investors are particularly focused on American trade balance figures, "which show that activity is improving in the fourth quarter."
The US trade deficit declined in October by 7.6% as compared to September, to 32.9 billion dollars.
On the opposite analysts expected a deepening of the deficit.
Both imports and exports have increased.
The big news is the growth in the volume of trade, particularly in exportation of goods, which reflects the growth of the economies of the United States' main trading partners, commented Christopher Cornell, of the research firm Economy.com.
However, the new registrations in the US unemployment have risen against all expectations last week, to reach 474.000 requests.
But over the last four weeks, the average of the number of new job-seekers " fell at the lowest for one year ", Said Scott Marcouiller, of Wells Fargo Advisors.
The bond market has lowered.
The yield of 10-year Treasury bonds has risen to 3,482% against 3,423% on Tuesday evening and the yield of 30-year bonds to 4,492% against 4,408% the previous day.
Cuba: hundreds of supporters of power jeer at the "Ladies in White."
A few hundred supporters of the Cuban regime shouted down, Thursday, wives of political detainees gathered in Havana for the global day of human rights, and impeded another demonstration in which about ten dissidents were arrested.
About forty 'women in white', the wives and relatives of political prisoners, were booed in the street by supporters of the government  of Raul Castro as they marched towards the centre of the capital demanding the release of political prisoners, reported a journalist of the AFP.
"Down with the Yankees!", "Mercenaries!", "The street belongs to the revolutionaries!", "Long live Fidel and Raul!" chanted the supporters of power to the rebels with their fists lifted high.
These last ones were escorted by plain-clothes officers who came to "protect them."
The day before, a similar demonstration took place against the "women in white" in Havana, without any injuries or arrests.
But in the Havanese neighborhood of Vedado, dozens of dissidents who were about to show on Thursday for the International Day of Human Rights have been, them, picked up by plain-clothes officers, ascertained a journalist of the AFP.
The policemen have forced into civil vehicles the dissidents who have been vilified by government supporters, according to this journalist.
The arrests of dissidents in similar circumstances last few hours in general.
Recipients of the 2005 Sakharov prize of the European Parliament, the "women in white", had organized an unauthorized march to "ask for the release of all political prisoners," around 300 prisoners according to the dissidents, said one of their leaders, Laura Pollan, whose husband Hector Maceda is serving a sentence of 20 years in prison.
Mr Maceda is part of the group of 75 Cuban dissidents arrested in March 2003, 53 of whom remain behind bars.
Cuban authorities consider opponents as "mercenaries" or "agents" in the pay of their enemy, the United States.
Extremely rare, Cuban television reported on Thursday's demonstration of pro-government against "cons-revolutionaries".
Cuba, headed by a single party, the Communist Party, is regularly accused by NGOs of European and American to flout the rights and freedoms, including speech.
A fanatic kills a man in his 80s with a knife and injures 5 in Clichy-la-Garenne
A gunman armed with two knives killed an octogenarian and wounded five others in the city of Clichy-la-Garenne (Hauts-de-Seine), at rush hour, Thursday evening.
According to the first elements of the investigation, the attacker, aged 28 years, would have struck with two knives and for undetermined reasons, an octogenarian in or before a pharmacy at 85 Boulevard Jean-Jaurès, we learned from police sources and from witnesses.
Badly wounded, the old man, born in 1929 according to an official of the police union Alliance, died in hospital from his injuries.
In or in front of the same pharmacy, he ran into a couple, whose wife was pregnant.
The husband, in his thirties, intervened and was injured.
The first two victims, severely injured, were admitted to the hospital where the octogenarian died.
The life of the other injured person is in danger, vital organs are apparently affected, according to the police sources.
The pregnant woman then made a malaise and was hospitalized "in shock", according to a police source.
The gunman, who appeared under the influence of alcohol or drugs, according to police sources, would then fled into the street, always boulevard Jean Jaurès.
It would have wounded two bystanders, apparently at random: a thirty and forty, the latter seriously.
The scenario remained confused in the evening.
He was armed with two butcher knives that he was carrying crossed behind his back, explained Arnaud Pressé, an Alliance Union official in Hauts-de-Seine.
Several passers-by, including young people, according to testimonies gathered by the AFP, tried to control the madman.
I saw a chap around 30 years old with a green jacket.
Three young people have tried to intercept it.
They did not succeed because the guy was tough, reported Alberto, barman in a nearby bar.
A crowd fell on him, including a municipal police officer who broke his wrist, he added.
Always Boulevard Jean-Jaures, at the height of No. 61, two municipal police officers, including their manager, attempted to detain the gunman were injured with fists, according to police sources.
The events occurred in one of clichy-la-garenne's main street, where many shops are.
Passers-by came to tell me that there was a person injured outside.
I went out, I saw a 70-year-old person on the ground, I put him in recovery position, and I saw a very important wound to the abdomen, Frédéric Allione, a 35-year-old pharmacist, told the AFP.
Five minutes later a second person, in his 30s, arrived, suffering knife wounds.
These are numbers of the national police who arrested the man without identity papers.
The Nanterre prosecutor took from the investigation the departmental service of judicial police in Hauts-de-Seine (sdpj 92).
The gunman was hospitalized Thursday night.
He had not yet been heard in its custody.
A police source has not ruled out that he is committed to a psychiatric hospital.
According to another police source, it took six police officers to overpower him at the Clichy police station where he was taken away.
He was "in an overexcitement state" like "all this kind of maniacs whose strengths increase greatly under the effect of action".
USA: Polanski's lawyer calls again to drop charges
The lawyer of the franco-polish film-maker Roman Polanski has called once again Thursday in Los Angeles (California, in the western United States), for the abandonment of the prosecution against his client, currently under house arrest in Switzerland because of a morals charge over 30 years ago.
Hummel Chad, the lawyer of the director of the "Pianist", has denounced in front of three judges of the Second District of California court serious procedural errors at the time of the facts, in 1977.
I am calling for the abandonment of the charges here and now, said Mr Hummel, before adding that the behaviour of the judge in charge of the case at the time, Laurence Rittenband, "sent shivers down the back '.
According to him, Judge Rittenband -- who has since died -- would have spoken, before pronouncing his sentence, with a prosecutor who would have told him that Roman Polanski deserved to be sent to prison -- which is a serious error in procedure.
This discussion was revealed in the documentary "Roman Polanski: Wanted and Desired" (Roman Polanski, Wanted and Desired), from the very mouth of the prosecutor in question, David Wells.
But Mr Wells had finally declared the end of September that he had "lied" to the author of the documentary.
In case the court refuses to abandon the prosecution, Mr Hummel has called for holding a trial, which would allow him to present the evidence of his arguments.
The charge has also reiterated the case already developed in the first instance, namely that no charges drop could be seriously considered as Roman Polanski did not intend to stand before the court.
The film-maker, aged 76, had fled the United States in 1978, before his sentencing for "unlawful sexual intercourse" with a 13-year-old minor.
He has never set foot in the United States since.
The Assistant District Attorney for Los Angeles County, Phyllis Asayama, thus declared that Roman Polanski "must be present at the hearing."
In this case, do we want to send the message, not only to (Roman Polanski) but also to other defendants, that it is possible to escape?, asked Mrs Asayama.
For her, the filmmaker "requests a favour of the court, while scorning its authority."
One of the three judges who now have 90 days to make their decision, he also stressed that "there were other alternatives to flight."
Mr Hummel was not the only one who ask to drop the charges against Roman Polanski.
Samantha Geimer's lawyer, the victim, has also claimed, once again, the end of the prosecutions.
Pointing out that her client no longer puts up with being harasseded at each new development in the Polanski case, she added: "Nobody in this room can say that the procedure was fair.
Thirty-two years is enough. "
Roman Polanski was arrested the 26 September in Switzerland on an american extradition warrant.
After more than two months behind bars, he was placed under house arrest in his chalet in Gstaad, pending a possible extradition.
Wall Street ends without direction, held back by the rising of the dollar
The New York Stock Exchange closed without direction on Friday, in a market torn between better than expected indicators in the United States and the rise of the dollar: the Dow gained 0.63% but the Nasdaq lost 0.03%.
According to the final figures at closure, the Dow Jones industrial average rose to 65.67 points at 10,471.50 points, while the Nasdaq, mainly technological, has abandoned 0.55 point at 2,190.31 points.
The widened index Standard & Poor's 500 has risen by 0.37% (4.06 points) to 1,106.41 points.
Honestly, the market is very calm, noted Mace Blicksilver, Marblehead Asset Management.
It remains within narrow margins, the volume of trade has become very weak and I think it will remain the case until the end of the year.
The trend was sustained by the publication of economic indicators which were better than expected, which "helped improve the market's view as to the strength of the economic recovery," the Charles Schwab analysts summarized.
In the US, retail sales rose by 1.3% in November for the second consecutive month and much more than expected.
US consumer confidence was also clearly up in December, at 73.4 against 67.4 the previous month, according to the preliminary estimate of the University of Michigan index.
The indices were, however, slowed by a new progression of the dollar, at the highest level for two months against the Euro, which "pushes towards the bottom those sectors which are sensitive to the economic situation," explained Owen Fitzpatrick, of Deutsche Bank.
Technology stocks lost ground as well.
The bond market has decreased.
The yield of 10 year treasuries has risen to 3,540% against 3,482% on Wednesday evening and 30 years ones to 4,497% as opposed to 4,492% the previous day.
The election of Miss World once again in South Africa
After a month's journey through South Africa, the 112 candidates for the title of Miss World are preparing to take on Saturday the final stretch to realise their dream: to be elected the most beautiful woman in the world in front of a billion viewers.
During this great display of beauty organized for the second consecutive year in the vicinity of Johannesburg, five of them have already secured their tickets to the semi-finals.
Miss Japan Eruza Sasaki, Perla Beltran Acosta of Mexico, Mariatu Kargbo of Sierra Leone, Kaiane Aldorino of Gibraltar and Yanbing Ma of Canada have been elected Miss sports or Miss top model during their stay in Africa.
It has been a real whirl.
Visit beautiful cities such as Port Elizabeth, Durban and Cape Town, it was extraordinary.
I have seen plenty of things and lived so many experiences!, exclaims Miss Sierra Leone.
This competition, which is held for the ninth time in South Africa, is broadcast on Saturday directly from Midrand, north of Johannesburg, starting at 5 p.m.. (3 p.m. GMT).
I could not dream about a better country to put back my crown.
This experience was fascinating.
I am glad to have lived it twice, emphasizes Miss World Ksenia Sukhinova in the heat of the southern summer.
For the young Russian, her second stay in South Africa has been marked by many exchanges with the candidates and the rediscovery of "breathtaking landscapes in this country."
After a month of galas, rehearsals, meetings with the press and safari, the Misses now focus on competition.
The Indian Pooja Chopra hopes to follow the steps of Priyanka Chopra, elected in 2000 and present at this election, and those of Aishwarya Rai in 1994, who both became Bollywood stars.
It is the dream of every woman to be crowned the most beautiful of the world but it is not only about the appearance.
We are the ambassadors of our countries and I want to return home with the crown, flings Miss India with a broad smile.
According to the organisers, music and dance will punctuate this 59th edition.
Candidates will parade in traditional costume and of course in a swimsuit.
The show will be hosted by Chinese television anchorwoman Angela Chow, South African ex-beauty queen Michelle McLean and Miss World committee member Steve Douglas.
South Africa showed that it knew how to welcome the world with a warmth and pride that is difficult to match, warrants Julia Morley, president of Miss World.
Like last year, the candidates went on a safari, visited the famous township of Soweto, this time by bicycle, and tasted the local cuisine.
A exceptional fact, they also met South African President Jacob Zuma and shake hands.
Not likely for a head of state, notices Miss Sierra Leone.
Their happiest memory will no doubt remain the draw in Cape Town (southwest) for the football World Cup in June 2010, a way for the country to do a little more promotion for the event.
I went with people I thought I would never be able to approach.
I will no doubt return for the 2010 Miss Universe Pageant, says Miss Italy, Alice Taticchi, enthusiastically.
The news of Johnny Hallyday "are very positive," according to his son David
News about Johnny Hallyday "are very optimistics" said his son David last Friday on his arrival at the airport in Los Angeles where he should go by his father, hospitalised for several days.
The news is very positive.
He is very strong, it is going on very well, told David Hallyday to the press  as he came out of the plane that flew him from Paris shortly after 1 PM local time(9 PM GMT).
The singer's son, looking relaxed, assured us that he was going to go "very quickly" to Cedars-Sinaï Hospital in Los Angeles, where Johnny Hallyday was admitted on Monday due to an infection following an operation for a herniated disc on November 26th in Paris.
The singer was "placed in an artificial coma last night in Los Angeles for comfort reasons, to prevent suffering and to be able to administer his treatment," said the press service.
Johnny Hallyday had already been placed in an artificial coma by doctors in the hospital Cedars-Sinaï Los Angeles, where he was admitted on Monday for an infection following the operation of a discal hernia on 26 November in Paris.
The singer has had to be re-operated on  between Wednesday night  and Thursday because of serious lesions resulting from the intervention.
On Friday morning, his wife Laeticia went to the French High School in Los Angeles, where their daughter Jade goes to school, to attend a school play, an AFP photographer said.
The head of orthopaedic and trauma surgery of the Pitié-Salpêtrière hospital, Yves Catoné, announced that he would go to Los Angeles on Monday beside the singer.
The producer has sharply questioned Dr Stéphane delajoux, the neurosurgeon who operated on the singer on November 26 at the International Clinic of Parc Monceau in Paris.
We were told it was a massacre.
The surgeons of Los Angeles said they were outraged, Mr Camus said.
I have heard about a possible legal action to come, he said.
Jean-Claude Camus estimated that Johnny Hallyday had "left far too fast to Los Angeles, with the permission from the Parisian surgeon".
I had this doctor personally on the phone, who assured me that there was no problem for this trip and I was amazed, given that I have had myself two spinal disc herniations, he added.
Shortly before on RTL, he had indicated that the singer had apparently "left without a drain, without anything," after his operation in Paris.
Dr Stéphane Delajoux is very well known in show business.
He operated the actress Marie Trintignant in Vilnius, a few days before her death, in a clinic in Neuilly-sur-Seine where he worked at the time.
In 2007, he had also operated on actress Charlotte Gainsbourg to reabsorb a hematoma following a brain hemorrhage.
But he is also a doctor with a dodgy reputation, who was repeatedly condemned by the justice system in medical liability cases, as well as for tax fraud and swindling.
Olivier Metzner, Esq., the lawyer for the national medical society, accused him of being "a man without scruples" pursued "regularly" before the organization's Council, and someone who is "far from being recommendable."
After several days of silence, Dr Stéphane Delajoux spoke on Friday through his lawyer, David Koubbi.
He indicated that the operation "went perfectly well" and the post-operative tests were "normal."
The operation "was not haemorrhagic and therefore didn't need to put a drain," he added.
In any event, the singer's tour, whose health problems have increased since this summer, appears in parentheses.
Quite evidently, a resumption of the Tour on January 8th (in Amiens) as planned, seems much too soon, said Mr Camus.
The UDF association increases the tone and commands the new centre to stop using its acronym
The UDF association, controlled by François Bayrou MoDem, responded Friday to the takeover attempt of the president of the New Centre, Hervé Morin, on the symbol of the former Giscardian party, requiring him to do not use it on any material back-up, at the risk of prosecution.
Hervé Morin has publicly announced his intention to recover the UDF acronym, judging that François Bayrou does not deserve to defend its political legacy after reaching out towards the left-wing.
The defence minister, whose party is a partner of the UMP, had also planned to confirm this strategy on Saturday before the National Council of the NC.
To press its approach, he received Hervé de Charette's support of  (ex-UMP now in NC) which claims UDF copywrite for being the first to deposit it in 2004 in the National Institute of Industrial Property.
But on Friday evening, the Bureau of the UDF Association, controlled by friends of François Bayrou who do not want to lose, has come out of its silence to launch a formal notice to the minister and to the deputy, demanding that they stop the use of the acronym and that they transfer the ownership of the brand, under threat of prosecution.
You have increased, in recent days, statements indicating that you were going to propose to your political movement to resume using the acronym UDF, wrote the association in a letter signed by 19 of 24 board members, including François Bayrou and Marielle de Sarnez of the MoDem, as well as Senator John Arthuis of the Centrist Alliance.
You have also seen fit to place on your militant material and on the home page of your site, the name of this movement, the "New Center," and the slogan "the UDF today," the signatories of the letter also note.
As you know, you have no right to use this symbol, explains the UFD office which calls on the NC to stop "immediately the use of the UFD name for any credibility as well as of (its) internet site."
He also asks Hervé de Charette "to pass on the property of (the) brand to its legitimate copyright holders".
If you did not do it, courts would be seized to enforce the law and the legitimate rights of members of the UDF, warn the signatories.
In their letter they specify that UDF  "is an independent political movement since 1978" and argued that Mr Morin and his friends "made the choice" to leave it in 2007 "to create a competitor party, like others did in 2002, to create UMP."
The new centre therefore did not have, according to them, any right to use the acronym UDF (Union for French democracy).
They also recall that the last congress of the UDF voted in 2007 its membership to the modem for three years and creating an office in charge of defending "the material and moral interests" of education founded by Valery Giscard d'Estaing.
As for Hervé de Charette, is pursuing the bureau, "when he established the brand," he was "more unites the UDF for three years', but the UMP.
He takes advantage outrageously and fraudulently of the absence of file of the UDF acronym to file it on his behalf.
This unscrupulousness is in the process of turning into crime, they proclaimed before mocking the strategy of the NC: "It would seem to us that in politics, as in life, it is worthier to make a name for oneself than to try to escape anonymity by fraudulently taking a name one has no right to."
Liliane Bettencourt affair: françois-marie Banier will be judged for abuse of weakness
The court in Nanterre decided Friday to judge the artist François-Marie Banier to determine if, as accused by the daughter of the billionaire Liliane Bettencourt, he took advantage  of the weakness of the octogenarian to steal part of her fortune.
The photographer of 62 years, known for his photos of stars, will be judged on 15 and 16 April 2010 for abuse of weakness, a criminal offence with a maximum sentence of three years' imprisonment and 375.000 euros fine.
This decision means that there will indeed be a trial in this case worthy of a saga about one of the richest families in France, where mother and daughter have been ripping each other apart while holding the reins of the L'Oréal cosmetics empire.
But the 15th criminal court has also ordered that a medical expertise to Liliane Bettencourt, 87 years old, should be led collectively by three doctors.
The heir and main shareholder of L'Oréal has always refused to submit to such an examination, not anyway under the terms proposed by the public prosecutor of Nanterre during the investigation.
The doctors named on Friday must submit a report before March 10, 2010, particularly saying whether Liliane Bettencourt could have been in a weakened state and during what periods.
I think she will submit it.
I am going to talk to her about it, Mrs Bettencourt's lawyer, Georges Kiejman, said at the exit of the hearing.
For his part, the lawyer of Françoise Bettencourt-Meyers, Olivier Metzner, welcomed the court's decision.
This is excellent news (...) The expertise will show that he (Mr Banier) has manipulated this elderly lady who must be protected, he said.
For two years now, the only daughter of Liliane Bettencourt has engaged in criminal proceedings against François-Marie Banier, photographer and jack-of-all-trades artist, whom she accuses of having benefited for years from her mother's weakness to obtain a billion Euros' worth of gifts, in the form of checks, life insurance policies and paintings by the Old Masters.
On her side, Liliane Bettencourt has always denied being manipulated by the photographer, that she considers as a long time friend.
While the court should examine the admissibility of the action by Mrs Bettencourt-Meyers, the lawyers' pleadings turned sometimes into the big family outpouring on Friday.
Thus, the lawyer of Liliane Bettencourt indicated three letters sent by her (in 1999, 2003 and 2005) to her notary, in which she was saying she was wary of the husband of Françoise Bettencourt-Meyers.
In the letter of 2003, Liliane Bettencourt added, according to the lawyer: 'Please explain to my daughter that I have written to Banier once, twice a day for 15 years.
Françoise, I have never been able to speak to him since his marriage."
For his part, the prosecutor of Nanterre once again judged that the plaintiff was not able to act, all the more because a guardianship judge declined in recent days to grant her request for an order of protection for her mother.
Liliane Bettencourt "has the full ability to act justly, she is not under protection and has no guardian.
Nobody else has to act in her place," said the representative of the Crown, Marie-Christine Daubigney.
The court decided finally that it would pronounce itself once the trial will take place on the admissibility of Mrs Bettencourt-Meyers.
Managerial revolution or end of business intelligence?
If nothing changes in the governance of the big French companies, our struggle for the development of business intelligence will have been vain...
For more than a decade, the attitude of the management of large companies with respect to its employees, recalls the position of companies with respect to the consumers before the marketing revolution: it is about making the staff adhere to "values" determined from on high as it was about in the past, of imposing on the consumer products conceived by factory technicians.
By putting the customer at the heart of the company, the marketing revolution has put the strategies of market conquest in place... although the authoritarian temptation to impose products unrelated to factors of customer preference returns regularly!
Demobilization of employees can lead to a deadly demoralization.
Suicides at France Telecom, PSA or Renault are only the visible part of a much more general phenomenon which hits particularly managers.
These layoffs seriously threaten the development of all of the company’s intellectual functions, including R & D and, even more, its business intelligence.
Indeed, the IE "requires of all the stakeholders (...) a proactive approach and a forward-looking vision"; it needs employees to make a commitment that the recipes of an authoritarian management authoritarian completely frustrate.
This is why we call for a managerial revolution which would involve putting the staff at the center of the company's concerns to the same degree as the clients.
The relative usefulness of internal opinion polls
The investigation of domestic opinion – likes the questionnaire submitted by Orange to its employees - will it encourage this revolution in  managerial practices?
Unfortunately, I'm afraid not.
-First because I was able to note that, in a new situation, any structure finally ends up, after many detours, in doing primarily … what it has always done.!
- Then, because authoritarianism – one of the diseases of power - grows in proportion to the importance of its own failures.
Finally, because most of the leaders have a simplistic view of human behaviour.
Coming from the great schools of engineers, they have a mechanistic interpretation of psychology.
They are adopting, out of intellectual comfort, the old behaviorist theory, recently reactivated by American "neuroscience" and widely aired, without its knowledge, by learning institutions and the media.
Thus, suggesting that it is possible to handle the "levers" (sic) of executives involvement, a recent survey by Ipsos published in Le Figaro.fr is it reinforces the leaders in a mechanistic governance position, inappropriate for the actual world.
Identify and measure the causes of mobilization.
Instead, the managerial revolution necessary to the good functioning of modern companies requires them to adopt a finalist vision of human behaviour.
It is to include, in any reasoning or practice of governance, a fundamental observation: for employees, the commitment to the company is only possible if it is clear that the latter is a means of achieving part of their dreams, their ambitions, their projects.
Currently, only the studies arising from the Multifunctional Analysis  adopt this conception of the motives of the employees.
These studies have shown that they judge their company based on predetermined popular opinion which allows them, through their perceived image of the company, to assess what it offers them for the realization of their lifetime plans.
Thanks to the identification and the measurement of the mobilisation factors, business managers can control, foreshadow and anticipate their "social performance" and put their human resources's management back on the right track.
Thus they create a breeding ground for a concerted development of robust and effective economic intelligence.
Oslo speech: the "just war" brings praises from the right to Obama
The American right welcomed on Friday the speech given the evening before in Oslo by Barack Obama, pleased that the Nobel Peace Prize winner of 2009 had defended the concept of a "just war" against the enemies of the United States.
The Conservatives, who had ridiculed awarding the prize to Mr. Obama on October 9th, applauded this time the presidential speech, like Sarah Palin, former candidate for the vice-presidency during the 2008 elections.
I liked what he said, said Mrs. Palin, the muse of the right wing of the Republican Party, in the daily newspaper USA Today," adding that she herself had addressed the "sometimes necessary" subject of the war in her memoirs which have just been published.
War is obviously the last thing in my opinion that Americans want to, but it is necessary.
We must stop these terrorists over there, she felt.
Mr Obama, who  inherited two wars from his predecessor George W. Bush in Iraq and Afghanistan, dedicated himself Thursday in Oslo to justifying the use of force, a way to explain his decision to send 30,000 additional troops to Afghanistan nine days earlier.
Another opponent of Mr. Obama, Newt Gingrich, has estimated that the president has done a "very good job" in Oslo.
I found the speech very good, welcomed the former president of the House of Representatives, who has particularly appreciated the mention of "The existence of evil in the world" in the presidential statement.
In some parts, I found this speech quite historic, said Mr Gingrich, interviewed during the radio programme "The Takeaway".
The former elected official, regarded by some as a candidate for the Republican nomination for the presidential election in 2012, said that he was delighted to have seen "a president from the left" remind members of the Nobel Committee that "they would not be free and could not put a price on peace if the recourse to force did not exist".
For Michael Gerson, a former George W. Bush press member turned Washington Post columnist, Mr Obama gave "a very American speech."
In addition to representing himself as a "citizen of the world as he always does, he spoke as an American president," reminding the Europeans "that they live in a bubble of security that they have not created and that they don't do much to preserve it," Mr. Gerson said.
Among the few on the right not to be convinced, a hawk in the Bush era, former UN Ambassador John Bolton, described the speech as being "dull, turgid and lacking inspiration" on the National Review Online site.
To the left of the president, the Democratic Representative Dennis Kucinich was alarmed to see Barack Obama justify the use of force.
When one connects the war with the notion of justice, it is easy to justify the killing of innocent people, he warned.
The centre-left press remained, however, laudatory toward the president.
The Los Angeles Times, while continuing to think that the Nobel Prize was awarded prematurely to Mr Obama, has described his speech as "superproduction" even for an orator known for his talent.
The speech in Oslo "should serve as a roadmap to guide international decisions against wars, poverty and oppression," the California daily flared.
Mr Obama "gave the speech he must", deemed the New York Times, judging it "bleak and edifying at the same time".
Reutirs: three marathons for an agreement which saves the Christmas supplies.
After three marathon sessions of negotiations, the unions of the road sector and TLF, only employer organization to have stayed until the end, have reached an agreement on Friday evening that puts an end to the slogans of strike and to the threat weighing on the Christmas supplies.
In the signatories meeting on Friday evening, Dominique Bussereau, the Secretary of State for Transport, was "delighted" with this agreement which was reached after several negotiating sessions that started on Wednesday morning.
After a second night of debate the negotiators left in the early morning on Friday, with the hope to sign soon after the late morning the text of agreement.
Even if three employers' organisations (FNTR, Unostra, OTRE) have closed the door.
But it took still more than six hours of a meeting began at 11 a.m. so that everyone agree and that at 6 p.m. the text is signed.
The conflict "would have been very damaging for the companies" and "it was feared that it will disrupt the Christmas holidays parties" said Mr Bussereau.
The text provides a salary increase of 4% for the lowest wages (in the local and regional road transport), and 2.9% for the highest ones (international road transport).
In the hourly rate for low earners, "we're going from 8,72 euros to 9,06.
It is not much, but we start very far away, said Patrice Clos (FO).
Tonight we will order to our activists that there was no obstacles, no blockade of the supplies centres.
But there may still be some holdouts who are not happy, he added.
Philippe grillot, president of TLF, welcomed "a good agreement", even if it was "difficult to concede the increases on the senior salaries because of international competition."
According to him, the increases will be around 170 Euro per month for low wages and from 100 to 120 Euro for the highest ones.
It is the agreement of common sense and respect of employees, Maxime Dumont (CFDT) said, while Thierry Douine (CFTC) welcomed a "historic agreement".
As for him, Richard Jaubert (CGT) has come up with "an acceptable compromise."
The agreement also provides for the upgrading of travel expenses by 3%, and maintaining the general state of road transport till the first half of 2010, which will make it possible to address the issue of a 13th month and modernization of the collective agreement.
Mr Bussereau reminded that "a drop of 100 million euros in employers' contributions" was the subject of a governmental amendment to the financial bill reform for 2009, voted in the night of Thursday to Friday by the National Assembly.
The government will ask the Senate to vote it "in identical term."
The signing of TLF allows that the agreement applies in the first instance to companies belonging to this organisation, and in the second instance, to the entire profession, in case of an extension by the Minister of Labour.
It will be "in the shortest possible time", assured Mr Bussereau.
The opposition of employers' organisations can only delay the process.
The FNTR denounced a "fool's market" because the 100 million euros "had already been promised for the sector to offset some of the carbon tax."
The Secretary of State for Transport forced us to negotiate in an emergency, not in conclusion to a shared analysis, but not to upset the turkey eaters for the next Christmas Eve, the Unostra complained.
For the Otre, the agreement risks "digging the grave of a very large number of small- and medium-sized businesses in the next 12 months".
RER A: disruption this weekend, trade unions unhappy with the RATP's proposals
The disruptions on the RER A, the biggest line of urban public transportation in France, are going to continue during the weekend, while a meeting Friday on the second day of the strike between the unions and management of the RATP has left them unsatisfied as to their demand for a bonus.
On Saturday and Sunday, during this important shopping weekend before Christmas, there will only be trains between 10.00 a.m. and 8 p.m., with a train out of two on the central section (between La Défense and Nation) and a train out of four outside the central section.
The interconnection with SNCF will be suspended at Nanterre Préfecture, which will force passengers to change trains.
The Galeries Lafayette, who expect 200,000 customers every day, were delighted that "the RATP is making efforts to serve the department stores".
The RER A crosses the city of Paris from West to East.
The RATP section runs from Saint-Germain-en-Laye and Nanterre to Boissy-Saint-Léger and Marne-la-Vallée.
On Friday, about a train out of two circulated at peak times, and almost no train off-peak, as planned.
Like Thursday, there was no melee on the dock since the Franciliens had organised themselves.
And in the morning, the station of Saint-Germain-en-Laye (Yvelines) was much less crowded than usual, particularly because of the absence of schoolboys and secondary school pupils.
At Boissy-Saint-Léger (Val-de-Marne), Jack Nbakina, an engineer for 29 years, explained that he got up "an hour and a half earlier, to be sure to arrive on time."
The Saint-Lazare station has not been saturated, said the SNCF, which had provided a management of agents and policemen.
RER A operated by SNCF from or to Cergy-le-Haut arrived or went to Saint-Lazare station to join the tube.
New general meetings of strikers will be held on Saturday and Sunday, which will examine the results, found to be "disappointing" by the trade unions, there is a meeting with management on Friday afternoon.
The RER director proposes to negotiate a special protocol for the RER A on all aspects, working time, career development etc.
This is not what the drivers wanted, who demand a due allowance, according to Thierry Garon (South).
The RATP has even put to one side its premium proposals, cried out the CGT, stressing that the management "was not able to solve a problem while it's done for the truck drivers and the SNCF."
A new meeting is scheduled for Monday for "a broader examination of the working conditions," the RATP said.
That also made the trade unions say that the company "was making fun of users of the weekend".
In the course of the morning, some 150 drivers had invaded a committee of establishment at the headquarters in Paris.
This is when the leadership, which previously refused any discussion during the strike, had suggested "for the sake of appeasement" the meeting.
The conflict threatens to widen to the RER B on Tuesday, after a warning by UNSA and Indépendants.
The trade unions ask for a bonus of 120 euros (UNSA) to 150 euros with EUR 30 variable (CGT, FO, CFDT, South, Indépendants) and complain of the deterioration of the working conditions on that one million daily passengers line.
The drivers of the RER, all in the second part of careers, have from 2.200 to 2.700 euros gross and 600 to 650 euros in premiums, for staggered hours, Sundays and holidays.
The Turkish justice dissolved the pro-Kurdish party, a decision with serious consequences.
The Turkish Constitutional Court announced on Friday the dissolution of the main pro-Kurdish party of the country, a decision that was immediately followed by expressions of anger by the Kurdish community, in the south-east and Istanbul.
This decision is likely to greatly complicate the task of the government, which has just reached out to the Kurdish community to try to put an end to 25 years of conflict.
The Democratic Society Party (DTP) was dissolved because it had become a "hotbed of activities prejudicial to the independence of the state and its indivisible unity," the President of the Court, Hasim Kiliç, told the press after four days of deliberations.
The decision was unanimous in the 11 judges, while a qualified majority of seven was required to make the dissolution, said Mr Kiliç, adding that 37 party seniors, including its president, Ahmet Türk and member of Parliament Aysel Tugluk are banned from politics for five years.
The judge has also announced the parliamentary immunity closure which was enjoyed by Mr Türk and Mrs Tugluk and confiscated party's assets by the Treasury .
The DTP has 21 seats in Parliament (out of 550).
Its leaders had warned before the verdict that members would be moving out of the Parliament rather than sitting as parliament members without a party.
The decision follows a process triggered in 2007 by the Court of Cassation's prosecutor Abdurrahman Yalçinkaya, which accuses the DTP to obey "directives" of the Kurdistan Workers Party (PKK), considered as a terrorist organization by Ankara and many countries.
Many observers believe that the DTP is the legal political showcase of the PKK rebels.
The party assures however that it has "no organic link" with the PKK but refuses to call it a terrorist organisation and calls for the government to negotiate with it.
The court's verdict comes as the government has just reached out to the Kurdish community by proposing a series of measures strengthening its rights, to try to stop the Kurds' support of the PKK and put an end to the conflict.
The leaders of the DTP had said that a dissolution could lead to an escalation of tensions in the Anatolian south-east, where many demonstrations against the detention conditions of PKK leader Abdullah Öcalan have degenerated into clashes with the police in recent weeks.
Upon the announcement of the judgment, a thousand demonstrators gathered in front of the DTP in Diyarbakir, the big city in the south-east populated by a majority of Kurds.
The police fired tear-gas grenades and used water cannons, while demonstrators launched Molotov cocktails or stones, with slings.
One hundred people marched also in Istanbul.
After the verdict, Mr türk insisted that the court ruling would "deepen despair."
Turkey cannot solve this issue (Kurdish Ed) by banning a party, he said to the press.
The government, formed by a party stemming from the Islamist movement, has also deplored the decision.
We are opposed by principle to the closure of parties.
This does not solve anything, minister of Energy Taner Yildiz said.
This decision is a complete undermining of the democratic overtures launched by the government, political analyst Ahmet Insel commented.  You could, I suppose, use "torpedoing" if you prefer.
We can expect, of course, a reaction from the PKK, he added.
On Thursday, the PKK has claimed an attack that had killed seven soldiers three days earlier in the north of Turkey, one of the most lethal in recent months.
The first snows can fall
What Wolfgang brauburger wishes, is a very harsh winter.
But the road winter services manager (FES) precises clearly that this is not to annoy people.
This is simply so that the agents can test the vehicles and learn to control them.
According to meteologists, that could be for this weekend.
More than 300 agents and 120 vehicles are ready to tackle the snow and ice.
The FES follows a very elaborate plan.
Mr Brauburger explains that when it starts to snow on Frankfurt city  and temperatures are below zero, winter services vehicles travel 20 main roads (nicknamed A roads).
That includes the streets with a great deal of traffic, the main arteries such as the Neue Weg and the Hanauer Landstraße.
Also included are access for the firefighters, the routes of public transport, the pedestrian areas and the sloping streets as the Atzelbergstraße.
The agents of the FES begin their service at three in the morning.
If necessary, the 1,040 kilometers of roadway must be salted with a road surfacing material which adheres well in 3 hours at the maximum.
This is why works at FES begin at 3 o'clock in the morning "so that the roads are clear when the daily traffics begins."
Where it is becoming more difficult, it is when the snow starts falling at 7.30 in the morning.
This is causing problems, the head of the road clearing and sanding service says to us "because no driver is willing to let the salting vehicles pass by."
Then, if it does not snow anymore, we deal with the access roads and the feeder roads - like the Rat-Beil-Straße.
Secondary roads and side streets come last.
Mr. Brauburger knows that it always causes a few complaints.
At 5 a.m., the pedestrian FES team is in motion to clear first those zones deemed dangerous and passages.
As to the bicycle paths, the FES services cannot usually take care of them.
Mr brauburger specifies that there is in Frankfurt, a service special that deals to monitor the state bridges between 22:00 and 4:30.
Since the ice forms very quickly on these surfaces, the salting vehicles act as soon as the temperature falls below 2 degrees.
It also happens that the police call for help from this special service when it is needed.
The Cradle of Dinosaurs
The Tawa hallae looked like the other carnivorous dinosaurs: this biped measured approximately 2 meters long by 1.50 m high, its rear limbs were powerful, its elongated skull was equipped with sharp and curved teeth, its short arms ended in sickle claws and it had a long tail.
If this species had lived a few million years later, she would not have had anything outstanding.
But, as Sertling Nesbitt of the University of Texas in Austin and his colleagues report it in the magazine Science on Thursday , the Tawa hallae is one of the first dinosaurs with these morphological features.
This animal was living 215 million years ago in New Mexico which was then part of the emerged lands of the supercontinent, Pangea and was near the equator.
Sertling Nesbitt said that the discovery of Tawa sheds new light on the evolution of the first dinosaurs.
Indeed, he informs us about the relationship, the distribution and the characteristics of these last.
It's in 2006 that Sertling Nesbitt has undertaken searches with other paleontologists, on the Gohst Crawford ranch site in northern New Mexico
Randall Irmis of the Museum of Natural History in Utah, a member of the excavation team, tells how they sometimes found about a dozen skeletal remains in a single day, which is absolutely unique for a sedimentary layer dating back to the Triassic Period.
The scientists realised very quickly that a portion of these bones belonged to a new species.
The excavations have revealed the remains of five specimens.
A discovery which confirms theories about the beginning of the evolution of dinosaurs.
Researchers have named it Tawa after the word of the Hopi Indians for the Sun God.
For Sterling Nesbitt, it is a quite exceptional discovery: the fossils of dinosaurs from Trias are extremely rare and limited to a few fragments of incomplete bones.
Not all the experts in palaeontology share this enthusiasm.
For example Martin Sander from the University of Bonn does not find this discovery particularly spectacular, but he adds that it allows us to confirm some theories about the beginnings of the evolution of dinosaurs.
According to current knowledge, dinosaurs appeared on Earth about 230 million years ago.
Most of the older fossils, however, are fragmented and incomplete, which makes the classification of the very first dinosaurs a very difficult process.
The experts are wondering amongst each other during which period the saurians divided into three major evolutionary groups: the théropods (carnivores) which include the tyrannosaurus and the velociraptor that appeared later on and from which the birds descended, the sauropods, four-legged with a long neck,  and those that are related to them and the ornithischian herbivores, of which species such as the triceratops and stegosaurus are part.
According to research conducted by S. Nesbitt et al., Tawa is one of the first theropods.
This species presents an interesting ratio of features both primitive and developed, S. Nesbitt said.
Researchers have found signs which suggests that the Tawa hallae had small air bags in his bones near the skull, as have the birds that are the descendants of theropods .
These small pockets of air facilitate the breathing of birds compared to mammals.
It seems that in the Tawa hallae, the vertebrae were partially filled with air.
According to Randall Irmis, the Tawa is one of the oldest theropods with small air bags in his bones.
Since the descendants of the immense sauropods also had hollow backbones with air sacs in them, one might think that their common ancestor already had that beneficial innovation.
Three successive waves of migration to North America.
As the most primitive known dinosaurs had lived in South America, researchers concluded that the saurian had appeared over there.
Consequently, the three main lines of evolution divided and spread from South America to the rest of the world; that is to say the whole of the emerged land which formed the Pangee supercontinent.
It seems to be confirmed by the fact that the team of palaeontologists has also discovered the remains of two other theropods which are not particularly related to it.
The three species can not descend from a common ancestor that would have migrated, the researchers argue.
Alan Turner of the Museum of Natural History of New York and co-author of the magazine Science Studies said that there would have been at least three waves of migration to North America.
Of course there are a few contradictions.
Martin Sander, paleontologist in Bonn said that there exists an even older species, the Silesaurus, that lived in present-day Poland and that belongs to a group related to dinosaurs.
According to him that could give a distorted view because there is in South America a large number of dinosaur fossils that have been preserved while one finds virtually none on other continents.
However, how the dinosaurs managed to become the dominant tetrapods of the Jurassic era when they belong to a relatively rare branch of cousins to the reptiles, is still a mystery.
During Trias, dinosaurs shared their habitat with many other reptiles, such as the ancestors of present-day crocodiles and many other lizards.
Towards the end of Trias dinosaurs spread across the globe promoting the development of many new species, while others, that were related to them, disappeared between Trias and Jurassic.
Such a success is however not eternal.
To explain this transformation, Martin Sander sees two hypotheses.
There may have been a mass extinction to which dinosaurs survived randomly, whereas other reptiles disappeared.
Or the dinosaurs were better suited and so they could eliminate the competition on the ground.
In any case, such a success is not eternal.
150 million years later, the fall of a meteorite fostered the development of a group of animals that had also developed during the Triassic and that, since this time, were vegetating in the shadows: it was mammals.
Solidarity from Vienna to Sao Paulo
The list is long and there are signatories from all over the world.
There are the ones from teachers of the University of Toronto, the University of Cambridge, the University of Vienna, or of Berkeley in California.
There are those of lecturers of the University of Naples, Quebec, Edinburgh, New York, São Paulo, Berlin or Bremen.
The evacuation by the police of the casino of the J.W. Goethe University in Frankfurt made waves around the world.
278 professors and other teachers, from the J.W. Goethe University but also from other institutions of higher education in Germany, Europe and North and South America, expressed their solidarity with the student protesters of the Westend Campus.
In a statement written in German and English, they were condemning the intervention of the police requested by the executive committee of the university.
Last week, University President Werner Müller-Estler evacuated the buildings occupied by the striking students and teachers after graffiti had been scrawled on walls and works of art.
Five students were injured during the evacuation.
The signatories believe that the damage did not justify "such violence from the police squad against the students and teachers who had organized their own courses".
The evacuation is an "unacceptable breach" of the freedom of research and education.
Focusing the attention exclusively on vandalism acts serves only to "delegitimize and criminalize the protest" and is trying to make forget the mobilisation's reasons.
The Managing Committee of the University has thus evaded the debates that would be yet necessary.
Lecturers requires that the ongoing criminal prosecution should be suspended immediately.
The majority of the occupants did not take part in the vandalism.
Legitimation of the protests
Young people from trade union Verdi of services sector and the German Confederation of Unions (DGB) show solidarity with students.
The protests are only the legitimate expression of a growing concern for our own future, said Alexander Klein, regional secretary of young people from the trade union Verdi.
As for the Science Minister of Hesse Land, Eva Kühne-Hörmann (CDU), she has sided with the action taken by the President of the University and the police.
We thank the president of the university.
Any sit-in and defacement of the premises is totally unacceptable, she said at the Regional Parliament of Wiesbaden last Thursday during the television programme "Aktuelle Stunde".
We understand the meaning of the protests but do not accept vandalism, said the CDU member of the Peter Beuth regional parliament.
The parliament groups from the opposition SPD, the Greens and the Left Party (die Linke) did not share this point of view.
The CSU is making an excuse of a few daubed walls to criminalise the protests, Janine Wissler from the La Gauche (Linke) party said.
Instead of considering the arguments and the claims of the students, one shrugs them off.
The party La Gauche has filed a motion which summons the Minister of the Interior to submit a report on the conditions of the intervention of the police.
The new "Silicon-valley"
For a long time she had the reputation of a secret city, forbidden to the Western visitors.
Zelenograd, one of the ten districts of Moscow, was, under the Soviet regime, a place of research for secret arming, under strict monitoring.
Today, with its 216,000 people, 37 km from the centre of Moscow, the town has the reputation of being the Soviet "Silicon Valley".
Major production and research sites in micro- and nano-electronics have set up there.
Since September 2008 representatives of Zelenograd have created ties with Riedberg, Frankfurt's science area – with academic institutions and companies at the center of innovations in Frankfurt (FIZ).
There were mutual meetings, and last Wednesday representatives of Zelenograd and Riedberg ratified a "memorandum of close cooperation."
The signatories were the Deputy Mayor of Moscow, Juri Rosljak, and the Prefect of Zelenograd, Anatoly Smimov, for the Russian delegation, and Edwin Schwarz, Project Section Head, for Frankfurt.
In 2010, representatives of the FIZ and SMEs, which the skill is scientific research, will leave to Zelenograd for a seminar.
Scientific exchange
It is a lasting scientific exchange.
But also of economic relations.
It will enable companies of the FIZ to enter the fully expanding Russian market.
Conversely, the Russian scientific companies want to secure contracts in Germany.
Zelenograd is the headquarters of institutions and famous Soviet research companies.
There is the Institute of electrical engineering of Moscow, the big firms Sitronics and Rosssijskaja-Elektronika.
The town was founded in 1958 as a "planned socialist city" for weapon research.
Zelenograd (literal translation of "green city") takes its name of the forested hills at the heart of which the research centres are located.
The S21 project: an obstacle to Stuttgart
We cannot put high enough the extent of the Stuttgart 21 project.
For his supporters it is nothing less than "new heart of Europe."
If one wants, S21 is far more than the burial of a railway station in the ground, more than a massive construction project that will plunge the heart of the capital of Baden-Württemberg into a dispiriting chaos of work sites for a decade.
Stuttgart 21 was born from the spirit of the 1980s.
The train stations with front of the line tracks that ended in the heart of cities had a reputation at the time of being relics of 19th century transportation techniques that had the effect of slowing modern rail traffic because too much time was required to get the engines from the back to the front.
Arrival, short stop, departure – that is what you have to do.
This is why the front line stations must disappear: in Frankfurt and Munich.
And in Stuttgart too: a railway station, which is located half-way between Paris and Budapest/Bratislava on the Magistral trans-european line and whose slogan is "Heart of Europe."
The project S21 will really start, although the visions of the 1980s are no longer compatible with reality.
Even the most ambitious planners recognized that the cost of putting the railway stations under ground in the capitals of Hesse and Bavaria was exorbitant.
As a matter of fact, stations at the head of each line do not really pose problems of entry and exit, since the advent of modern trains, reversible ones with auto-rails and pilot-cars at both ends.
However the achievement of Stuttgart 21 alongside the new route of the inter-city line towards Ulm is triggered now.
The regional and municipal policies prevailed.
The railway company is of the part because it is the taxpayer who paid the price of the risks of the largest infrastructure project of the Federal Republic and not the public enterprise.
From an urban point of view this project let itself relatively well justify.
One obtains an urban area that – according to the graphics of the planners generated by computer – will be very green.
For the railway transportation system the S21 is harmful.
The passage station and the section enlargement are designed for a people traffic which was attribued - and this is typical of the 1980s - a huge growth.
At the time the competition of cheap flights did not exist yet.
Modern traffic policy should first concentrate on improving merchandise shipping since railway transport is much more environmentally friendly than by truck over the highway.
But the new route, with its inclines, is not suited to freight trains.
The S21, and this is much more serious indirectly affects many other rail projects.
For example, six billion euros will be swallowed up in the project of the Souabe.
It is the official number.
Experts believe that 10 to 15 billion is more realistic.
One thing is sure, in the next decade this money will be missed for other junction and congestion points in the network.
The list of the Ministry of Transport mentions 60 large projects in all.
One of the most important is the enlargement of the section across the Rhine Valley of a good 180 kilometres.
Since 1987 this line is built in slow motion.
It would really be urgent here to accelerate hard.
But the S21 project has the effect of a braking sabot.
The Rhine Valley route is becoming the bottleneck of international freight traffic, and it is happening in the very heart of Europe.
The government is reviewing the judgement concerning the airport
At the Regional Parliament of Wiesbaden, the Land's government has raised the possibility to appeal the judgment of the Administrative Court in Hesse regarding the ban on air flights at night.
The Economy Minister Dieter Posch (FDP) has announced that the coalition CDU/FDP had entrusted experts to examine the legal status of the ruling by the administrative court which is a document containing more than 400 pages.
The Court of Kassel had justified in a written document that the Land should adapt the regulation regarding the ban on night flights in case the construction project of the north-west runway of the airport of Frankfurt would be realized.
The permission to land for 17 planes between 11 p.m. and 5.00 a.m., as envisaged by the government of the Land, is not compatible with the legal protection of citizens against nocturnal air nuisances.
The coalition must have decided by January 4th if it wants to make a further appeal against the ruling.
The opposition criticises this delay and tries to put pressure on the government representative so that he gives up the appeal to the Federal Administrative Court in Leipzig.
The head of the parlimentary group SPD Torsten Schäfer-Gümbel asked the CDU and FDP to back up their promises made before the elections, to ban night flights. Otherwise, it would be consdidered as going back on their word.
It is very difficult to be allowed to keep its word, said the Greens' leader Tariq al-Wazir alluding to the FDP's electoral catchphrase "We keep our promises".
The minister Dieter Posch refute accusations from Schäfer-Gümbel which claims that the national government is trying to allow night flights using "weaseling lawyers"
It takes time to perform a precise legal review.
The coalition does not wish to make any decisions on the basis of a "quick first impression".
The decision must be legally accountable, said Stefan Müller (FDP).
The opposition's interpretation of the statements of his faction about the ban on night flights is completely erroneous.
US banks pay back the allocated aid
The big American banks, very affected by the crisis, are breaking their link with the state.
Bank of America announced on Wednesday that it had fully repaid to the Treasury $45 billion (more than 30 billion euros), corresponding to the aid granted under the Tarp rescue plan.
The American television channel CNBC said in a report that Citigroup considered also to repay the received aid.
Banking institutions are trying to get rid of legal restrictions tied to the acceptance of certain amounts, such as limitations on the bonuses awarded to CEO's as well as the payment of higher fees.
The Bank of America launched a capital increase by the sale of securities from investors who reported $19 billion dollars of new money.
The rest of the money comes from the bank's savings that have been filled by the sale of several branches from other sectors.
Last Wednesdday evening, Kenneth Lewis the CEO of Bank of America made a point to thank the American taxpayers: the injection of capital has considerably helped to overcome a difficult period.
The banking institution had overestimated its resources in buying the Merrill Lynch investment bank at the height of the financial turmoil.
Citigroup is also considering getting money on financial markets in order to free itself from the guardianship of the State.
The American bank could thus launch on Thursday a $20 billion capital increase, reported the CNBC channel quoting banking circles.
Citigroup spokesman did not wish to comment this information.
In June the Goldman Sachs, JP Morgan Chase and Morgan Stanley banks had repaid the money they received.
Accelerated election
Ultimately, everything has past faster than expected.
Barely two weeks after the sacking of the current holder of the post of chief editor Nikolaus Brender by the board of directors of the German channel ZDF, the successor is already appointed.
The Commission wanted to vote last night to confirm the nomination.
Peter Frey, who runs the Berlin newsroom of ZDF, was the odds-on favourite.
The process has not wanted to confirm - officially - the vote in order not to anticipate the procedure.
However, it seems that there was also the wish not to further harm ZDF intendant Markus Schächter in case the proposal would not be accepted by the Board.
Frey, who is the candidate of Schächter, needed the votes of nine members of the Commission out of 14.
The result of the vote was not yet known at the conclusion of the redation of this edition.
Two weeks ago, Schächter had proposed to the board to extend Nikolaus Brender's contract five years, but it was rejected.
Only 7 of the council members had declared themselves to be in favor of Brender's renewal while 7 others had voted against. Bender's impeachment by the vote represented a bitter, though predictable, failure for Schächter.
Indeed, the CDU, which has a majority on the board had already suggested several weeks before the vote, their unwillingness to renew Brender to his post.
It is Roland Koch, the Minister-President of the Hesse Land, who had organised a league against the chief editor.
He had rejected extending the contract of the esteemed editor-in-chief citing the fact that the ratings of the ZDF newscasts had fallen under Brender.
This is why protests were still taking place, almost until the vote, lashing out at the growing political influence exerted on the ZDF.
At the end there was even 35 experts in public law who had interfered in the debate and felt that the way to act Koch was unconstitutional.
But it will have achieved nothing.
Peter Frey: who is he?
Peter Frey was born on August 4th 1957 in Bingen.
He has studied politics, pedagogy and Romance languages (Spanish).
He then worked at the Südwestfunk (radio body of Rhineland-Palatinate) and at the Frankfurter Rundschau (German daily newspaper of national significance).
In 1983, he becomes an editor at ZDF, first for the news magazine "heute-journal"(a newspaper today).
Then his journey continues: from 1988 to 1990 he was the deputy executive editor at the time; then Washington correspondant in 1991 and 1992, and, until 1998, he was the editor and presenter of "Morgenmagazins' (a bimonthly news program airing during the morning); until 2001 he was responsible for the foreign policy service of the ZDF and then head of the Berlin editorial board.
After the disgrace of Brender whereas he had just been elected journalist of the year by the specialized revue Medium Magazin, the Greens have announced they will put down a constitutional complaint
The enemy of Koch on board, the minister - Rhineland president - Palatinate Kurt Beck, said last week that the states should change the intergovernmental ZDF treaty so that the intendant proposals of employeers may not be blocked by a political majority  biased.
Nevertheless, Beck has no plans to ask for the withdrawal of the politicians who are members of committees overseeing the ZDF.
Peter Frey, the likely successor to Brender, had ably maneuvered before the board by vehemently criticising the Commission's decision to dismiss Brender.
Thanks to this evidence of journalistic independence, Schächter was able to propose him for the position of Editor-in-Chief without losing face, the same way the Administration Council could elect him without anyone suspecting it was partisan politics to place him in the post.
In the arithmetic representations of parties, Frey is classified as a left-wing liberal.
Large cleanup in the academic studies
Partial success for students: After a year of instructive strike  ministers of education and cultural affairs of Länder decide to be more accommodating: during a meeting between ministers and representatives from the conference of vice-chancellors, an agreement has been set up stipulating that working conditions of bachelor or masters degree students should be improved.
In future, students should be able to complete their studies.
They particularly agreed to reduce the weight of exams: a unique exam should end the chosen study module.
Furthermore, the burden of work will have to be reconsidered to ensure "a realistic and acceptable proportion."
The political authorities and and institutions of higher education wish to facilitate the recognition of examinations between universities and abroad.
The states have also pledged to set up more flexible joint structural requirements for the Bachelors and Masters tracks.
Regionally, there should be no different regulation from a Land to another.
Less tests
Since the beginning of the student protests in June, the ' Minister of Education of the federal states and the rectors of the universities have been constantly repeating the currently fashionable term: "studiability."
But for the first time, this expression seems to take a practical meaning.
The Accreditation Council has decided to slash the number of some tests: "Each module should normally be completed by a single examination," we read in a thirty page document on the future conditions of entry to university degree programs.
Reinhold Grimm, President of the Accreditation Council says that by greatly reducing the burden of the tests one should be able to stop the disruptions, which have been considerably damaging to the ability to learn.
"Studyability" should moreover be, in future, the benchmark of the organization of studies.
The modules as the substance must be examined carefully to see if we cannot prevent this stifling feeling felt sometimes in the course choice.
Hamburg / Berlin - According to the latest RAID information about Kunduz, the opposition believes that Defence minister Karl-Theodor zu Guttenberg (CSU) is guilty of deliberate deception.
Students should "have the opportunity and the necessary leeway to allow and encourage personal initiative."
The new regulation will affect the new University courses, but will also be suited to the existing courses.
These cycles must be "reaccredited" every 5 years, which means however, that it is only by 2015 that all the cycles will have been examined.
There are 10 accrediting agencies responsible for the entire federal territory that depend on accreditation councils created by the Länder.
In October, Education Ministers had pressure the "Landër" so that they influence the agencies in order to make the programs not too heavy and the review system not too strict.
In some states, specialized universities and colleges have already come to an agreement with their regional ministers to take appropriate action.
So far, Rhineland-Palatinate is the only state which agreed to give more money to the development of Bologna process.
With these funds, universities should organize tutorial programs and strengthen the offices of teaching orientation as well as the exam offices and those of international relations service.
The Länder and the universities forecast for this a budget of 10 million euros.
In early 2010, the government wants to introduce an amendment to the law on institutions of higher education to the Parliament.
Following this, there will only be one exam to take to finish the studies.
The curriculum will have to be more flexible, and besides we must be able to guarantee that we will accept the marks given by other institutions of higher education and access to the Masters degree must be simplified.
By the end of next year, the "studiability" of all academic cycles will be examined.
Last Thursday, the government and opposition once again have debated the question of study conditions in the country.
The decisions were appreciated but criticisms have been heard.
The federal President of the socialist students' union has indicated that he wished that the organisation for educational policy does not happen again in the future "behind the closed doors" of Ministers and vice-chancellors of universities.
After the education strike at the latest, the students, as well as concerned persons, should be able to express themselves a little.
The future graduates of higher education received the support of the president of delegates to the conference of rectors (HRK), Margret Wintermantel: "The experience of the students is very useful to us," she said Thursday during a meeting with the education ministers of the states, with which the HRK is working on a common reform project. 
For the Union of Education and Science (gew) the decisions made in Bonn do not go far enough. It demands the right and opportunity for each Bachelor graduate to enroll in a Master Cycle.
Andreas Keller, member of the steering committee of the GEW, further requests that the federal states assure today's Bachelors students that tomorrow there will be enough places for Masters students and that learning conditions will be as good as possible.
The Länder must therefore hire more lecturers.
However, the education ministers have not mentioned the possibility of easing access to the Master.
More than a footnote on Herta Müller
It is with the words "arrived in Germany and it is beautiful, almost no more inspection points..." that begins a work of the poet Werner Söllner, in which he describes in snippets of troubling sentences, the experience of a dissident arrived in Germany who won the freedom but lost at the same time his linguistic territory.
Werner Söllner, born in 1951 in Banat in Romania, was first a professor of German and English in Bucharest and, subsequently, Collection Manager in a publishing house for young people before settling in Frankfurt am Main.
Söllner received various literary prizes; in 1993 he held the much coveted Chair of Poetry at Goethe University in Frankfurt and since 2002, he has been the Director of the literature forum in Hesse at the Mousonturm Artist House in Frankfurt.
He caused people to talk a lot about him in non-literary circles last Tuesday, at a conference in Munich whose theme was "German Literature in the Mirror in Romania and the Distorting Mirror of Your Securitat Files."
Visibly disturbed and embarrassed, Söllner made a statement in which he acknowledged to his fellow German-Romanian writers such as Richard Wagner, William Totok, Franz Hodjak, and Helmut Frauendorfer that he had collaborated as an informer for the Securitate political police.
In 1989, Söllner received the German language prize together with some of the other participants.
The enlistment tests had begun insidiously in 1971.
"I am," concludes Söllner, "someone who has not sufficiently known how to withstand the trials of intimidation of the Securitate."
The poet Werner Söllner is the informant Walter (IM Walter).
Almost simultaneously with the awarding of the Nobel prize to Herta Müller for his exemplary literary battles with the mechanisms of the power of the dictatorship, the literary scene is shaken, especially the community of German writers of Romanian origin, by a case which clearly shows the abyss and the heinous acts of a political system based on police surveillance and intelligence.
Werner Söllner is, as far as one can say based on current knowledge, not just guilty but also a victim.
In his own Securitat dossier, Walter played a role, literature expert Michael Markel said after Söllner's confession and he referred to the positive influence of Walter, who had interceded on his behalf.
"he may had been able to get him out of difficult situations at that time", according to Markel.
Markel felt the moral need to make this comment.
The form in which Söllner made his statement before the public was unexpected; however, the admission by a former dissident of his collaboration with the Romanian Intelligence Service (SRI) is not, in fact, so surprising.
Germany is a pleasant haven for Securitat spies Herta Müller had already written in July in the newspaper "Die Zeit", after having read the 914 pages of her own dossier.
We may suppose that the victims will have made speculation and will sometimes have guessed what real names were hiding behind the borrowed names Sorin, voicu and also Walter.
In contrast to Germany where consultation of the Stasi dossiers is a reliable process for the moment, the attitude toward the legacy of the Securitat's files is still very confused.
A systematic clarification has been repeatedly frustrated and slowed down in the past.
It is that only in 1999 that a national council corresponding to the Birthler institution  was created to work on the assimilation of the archives of the Securitate (CNSAS) but the return of files has rather dragged on since.
There is, since 2005, a law that defines the management of archives.
That the influence of former members of the Securitat in Romania is still considerable, is confirmed by the interview of a former head of the Securitat of Temesvar who, after the announcement of the award of the Nobel Prize to Herta Müller, spoke in a very disdainful way about the winner.
She had a psychosis, and ultimately they only questioned her once.
The infamy of power felt it could express itself here, without any hindrance, under the guise of freedom of expression.
Certainly, many unavoidable questions are involved in the Söllner case, as so often happens in the context of a cover-up.
Why now? Who was robbed? The measured reaction of listeners to Söllner's confession gives us hope that the next chapter will be defined more by a thirst for knowledge than by accusations and a sense of shame.
On the genesis of the work of Herta Müller, which received the Nobel prize yesterday, it is more than a note at the bottom of page.
Uproars in the Champions League
We had the impression that a representative was coming, dressed to the nines coming straight from a nice Christmas celebration where a sporting goods manufacturer had displayed his merchandise when the new VfB coach Christian Gross showed up at 11:45 in a Mercedes C Class he had just called for, with an orange plastic shopping bag from the manufacturer in his hand.
The man, whose bald skull drew the attention, allowed himself to be led in the city which was still foreign to him.
Otherwise our quinquagenarian would have been able to take the wheel himself – he had not drunk any alcohol, and he was not drunk with happiness, either.
He had spent a pleasant evening but tomorrow he had to go back to work.
Because it is now that it would start.
The words of the Swiiss that we just hired three days earlier were clear: "We have indeed reached the round before the quarterfinals", that is to say in the Champions League thanks to our 3 to 1 against Unirea Urziceni of Romania " but we must not let ourselves be blinded by the success. It will be a rough struggle not to drop again".
The "tough work" awaits us on Sunday.
There, it comes to daily repeated in Mainz, the results of the Champions League.
And the weaknesses which have been dug out after the three punishing goals from Marica (5.), Träsch (8) and Pogrebnyak (11) have to be overcome.
Draw of a lottery
The Champions League round of sixteen (match go 16. / 17. + 23. / 24 February / return match 9. / 10. + 16. / 17. March) will be drawn on the December18. in Nyon.
The sudden office taking's joy of Babbel's successor was finally moderate.
And the joy was not moderated only for those who had brought them luck, who had transmitted to the destabilized Stuttgart professionals an unfailing desire and joy to play.
I went to see the players and I told them that they should concentrate on their strengths, I advised them to be more courageous, the "souls' plumber" – Gross - explained, the recipe for success that was sounding so well but which was no longer efficient with the therapist Babbel.
It has triggered a certain magic, confessed Jens Lehmann - supporter of Babbel -, "in soccer when there is a new impetus things happen sometimes that one would never have thought possible."
And Sami Khedira who, after weeks of pause for injury, rank best player in the world thanks to its dynamism, tried to describe the "phenomenon" seen by a proverbial « fresh wind » and the working method of the new leader: "It is someone to go into action and requires discipline.
This is what we need in the current situation".
But apparently Babbel had lacked some.
VfB Stuttgart has not yet turned the corner, warned manager Horst Heldt
For the time being, VfB Stuttgart is mostly in need of tenacity.
Just as Gross, the players and the manager refrain about overstating the victory against the completely exceeded and weakened defense of the Romanian guests.
They had also won in Glasgow before having had, four days later, a rude awakening in Leverkusen with the 0:4, objected Khedira.
Horst Heldt, the manager, said that they had actually reached one of the objectives of the season but there were others which were still very far off.
We have not yet passed the difficult hurdle.
If Heldt is not moody to celebrate the day of his 40th birthday, even after the first victory at home for three months, is due to the weekend's events as a television interview of the goalkeeper Jens Lehmann triggered just before the match begins.
There are decisions that others make and not Jens, countered Heldt, in response to Lehmann's acerbic criticism.
He had accused the direction of weakness in style and said that it had decided to change the coach under pressure from pubescent fans.
Lehmann had also judged as a sign of loss of authority and of jealousy the fact that his day off after the game had been taken away from him.
The statements of Lehmann were "marked by a pure selfishness" thrust Heldt and announced the consequences for the goalkeeper.
They were more likely to become friends for life these two quadragenarians.
In any case, they were in agreement about everything else, which is to say that without the previous work on the group by the replaced coach, the strong and aggressive sports representation would not have been possible.
Babbel and his assistants "played a large part in the success" retorted Heldt and Lehmann in unison – and even the man with the plastic bag agreed.
World heavyweight championship
Heavy fighting in Bern: Kevin Johnson, the challenger, repeatedly provoked Vitali Klitschko, the world champion, both verbally and with gestures.
But after twelve difficult rounds the Ukrainian defended his title of heavy weight champion of the world according to the version of the WBC Federation.
Judges were unanimous, he won by points.
Hamburg – Vitali Klitschko retains his title of world heavyweight champion
The WBC Federation announced that the 38-year-old champion had won a unanimous victory on points Saturday night against the American, Kevin Johnson (120:10).
For the third time Klitschko honorably defends his title since his comeback, on the stage, in October 2008.
Beforehand the Ukrainian had already won the title of world champion of the WBO and WBC federations twice.
Unfortunately he didn't pass the KO as expected.
Klitschko, coming out 39 times a winner in 41 professional fights, has had to concede his defeat twice because of injuries.
The Johnson challenger has had to accept his first defeat in the 24th fight.
In the Berne Arena, before 17,000 spectators, the great Klitschko wanted above all to control the fight, from his height of 6 ft, 7 in, using his left hook.
Johnson, about four inches shorter, who proclaimed before the duel the end of the Klitschko era, managed to avoid the champion's blows, preventing Klitschko from bringing into play his dangerous right counterpunch.
Johnson, too passive in action for a challenger, has above all tried to make the rounds.
Although he kept provoking Klitschko by words and gestures, his strokes reached only very rarely the champion.
He is still the second boxer after Timo Hoffman in 2000, to have exceeded with Klitschko the distance of 12 rounds.
The challenger had done a lot of noise in the Swiss capital before the fight.
He insulted Klitschko, calling him a "dirty zombie" who "is not really capable."
During the weighing on Friday, the champion could not help provoking Johnson by making him drop his sunglasses from his nose "to be able to see his eyes."
Fourth victory since Klitschko's comeback.
Klitschko imposed again during his fourth fight since his comeback on the 11th of October 2008.
After a break of almost four years, he had beaten at the time the Nigerian Samuel Peter in Berlin and recovered "his" WBC belt that he had to leave before without a fight.
This year, defending his title of champion, he won the fight against Juan Carlos Gomez from Cuba and in September against Chris Arreola from the USA.
"I only took one hit in this fight, and am in perfect shape" said Klitschko to explain his quick return on the ring.
His dream is to try to gather in the family the four most important titles.
His brother Wladimir is champion of the WBO and IBF federations.
But it is Britain's David Hague who, having dethroned the big Nikolai Walujew - 2.13 metres - in November, is wearing the belt of the WBA.
This summer, Haye had cancelled a game against Vitali Klitschko which should have taken place in September.
It would seem that its marketing company now intends to have this match played at Wembley Stadium in London.
The Kunduz case
A frontal attack by the opposition: the head of the parliament coalition Green Group, Jürgen Trittin, accused Defense Minister Guttenberg of lying about the Kunduz case.
The SPD and La Gauche (die Linke) parties ask the Chancellor for explanations.
Hamburg/Berlin - After reviewing the latest intel on Kunduz air attack, the opposition accused the minister of defence Karl-Theodor zu Guttenberg (CSU) to have hidden willingly some facts.
The Minister has intentionally "formulated an untruth" on the deadly attack on two tankers last September, said the leader of the green parliamentary group, Jürgen Trittin, on Saturday during the information programme of the ARD channel "Tagesschau" (News at 8pm).
In clear, this means that he lied.
The order of killing has been given to total disregard of the rules of the International Security Assistance Force in Afghanistan (Isaf).
It is, in essence, the content of the report available to NATO and that has been read by Mr Guttenberg, Trittin said.
Last Friday, according to new revelations from the media, the goal of the strike was in reality, not to destroy the stolen trucks, but to eliminate two major Taliban leaders.
According to the inquiry report of NATO, 142 people were killed or injured during the American aerial attack which was launched at the request of German Colonel Goerg Klein, military commander from Kunduz.
On Saturday, the Greens, the SPD and the Left called on Chancellor Angela Merkel (CDU) to speak to the Parliament as soon as possible and reveal what Guttenberg really knew about the incident.
Jürgen Trittin and his colleague from the Green Party Renate Künast believe that Mrs. Angela Merkel must clearly state whether the strategy of targeted killing is part of the federal government's Afghan policy and whether the chancellery, army and intelligence services have approved this new strategy.
The government spokesperson categorically rejects these criticisms.
The chancellery has in no way influenced the interventions of the military in Afghanistan, he said.
On Saturday, voices were getting louder to express doubts regarding the real reasons concerning the referral of Inspector General Wolfgang Schneiderhan and Secretary of State Peter Wichert, as it was presented by the ministry.
According to the pieces of information from the Spiegel newspaper, the information they had handed over to Guttenberg concerning the attack of the tankers were both accurate and complete.
Officially, they would have concealed the existence of the NATO report and hid some troublesome details from the Minister.
From staff members of the two senior officials, one hears however that they have informed the Ministry of Defense of the existence of several reports, including a two-page document by Colonel Klein and a report by the military police.
The "Frankfurter Allgemeiner Sonntagszeitung" reported that Wichert would have meanwhile called for a facts clarification in a letter.
Until now, he has received no reply
On Saturday, the ministry did not want to comment these accusations, and refers to the inquiry commission of the federal parliament which would be formed next Wednesday to bring the facs in question to light.
The worlds of dream
Some see, while awake, images and voices that nobody else sees or hears.
It is not only among patients with psychological illnesses, or under the effect of drugs, that the boundaries between fantasy and reality become blurred.
While these phenomena occur during sleep, everything is going very well.
When we are lying in our darkened bedrooms, we can give ourselves over  to dreams and to the wildest fantasies without any barriers.
However, the one, who experiences the state of dream when awaken, hears and sees things that others do not, has quickly the reputation of being mad or drugged in our Western world, or at least of being an eccentric.
Such images and voices only appear among those who are mentally ill or under the effects of drugs.
It is our imagination that is involved: it is the same neuronal activity which allows us to design houses, paint pictures or write novels, but which sometimes causes the boundaries between dreaming, madness and reality to merge.
A state of conscious awakening, taking the shape of a dream, can present itself in the most diverse forms, called in the best of cases visions, in the worst madness.
But even if the cause and the effect can be distinguished from one another, the visions of the mystic Hildegard von Bingen, the drug experiences of the New Age prophet Carlos Castaneda, the trance states of shamans, psychoses and hallucinations are attributable to very similar processes.
There are hallucinations or delusions when the balance of neurotransmitter substances in the brain - first and foremost dopamine, norepinephrine, serotonin and achétylcholine - breaks and that the interaction between different parts of the brain is disrupted.
Complex hallucinations and delirious thoughts are very often present during schizophrenic psychosis.
The earth's gravity strength has no more power over the person.
Since Antiquity, philosophers and doctors have always looked into the relationship between madness and dream.
For Aristotle, hallucinations were a form of daydreaming; Wilhelm Griesinger, one of the founders of modern psychiatry, noted in 1861, "a great similarity between madness and dreaming," for Sigmund Freud the dream state was "a psychosis, with all of the irregularities, imaginings, delusions and sensory illusions that go into one."
We are in the autumn of 2001 when Henning T turned into a figure of a comic strip.
His body is two-dimensional with screaming colours.
Gravity has no more power over him, he is hovering close to the ceiling.
He feels a blow.
Behind him winged evil creatures, grimacing, with a bloody mouth, showing their teeth.
They are chasing him, kicking him with heavy blazing boots, drop him against the walls, he feels pains in his all body.
Thundering, evil, howling voices, coming from the walls and the radio.
He can no longer stand these voices that insult and humiliate him.
Henning T. rips two cables from his stereo system, makes a loop from them and attaches it to a hook set in the ceiling.
He climbs on an audio subwoofer and puts the loop around his neck.
He jumps.
The loop is coming off.
May this teach you a lesson, the voices scream in a chorus to tear the eardrum. "go to a clinic and go cure yourself!"
Today Henning T. is 40 years old, he has experienced six acute psychosis, the last one goes back to 2 years ago, the first one nearly 20 years ago.
It was triggered by LSD.
The diagnosis: paranoid, schizo-affective psychosis, in addition he is manic-depressive, he takes medication for depression, mania and schizophrenia.
He has learnt to live with his illness, he has been married for three years.
During the psychosis I experienced terrible fears terrible and deep despairs.
Illusions are a harsh reality.
Around one percent of the population suffer from schizophrenia at least once in their life; in psychiatric clinics it is the most common illness after depression.
In a schizophrenia crisis, people can no longer make the difference between the inside world and the outside world, they are in a state of strong excitement, which makes that they may suffer from hallucinations, megalomania, relationship madness or persecution.
It is very common to hear voices – voices which order, which comments or talk.
Optical hallucinations are not rare either.
The affected person can no longer distinguish between what is important and what is insignificant, the brain can no longer filter the disruptive signals, the conscious is flooded with sensations.
Just like the dream, the psychosis opens the floodgates to a tide of ideas and fantasies that emerged from the deepest layers of consciousness.
The perception of reality in psychosis is focused on the subject, according to Professor Thomas Fuchs, head of department of psychiatry of the University Hospital Center in Heidelberg (Allgemeine Psychiatrie im Universitätsklinikum).
The schizophrenic is in the centre of the situation, everything has a meaning that is focused on him.
At the same time, he finds himself in a passive role, he feels like dreaming, overcome by the events and he cannot act on them actively.
This is the reason why schizophrenics often feel threatened, watched, manipulated.
In general they do not have the opportunity to adjust reality, illusions are a harsh reality, to wake up is excluded.
To experience a hallucination once in his life.
Unlike the dream, according to Fuchs, "the sensory and space structure  of the reality that is perceived during the psychosis, is fundamentally preserved".
Thoughts and delirious hallucinations are based on reality, lived alienation happens in a real framework.
Why our brain does this kind of antic, is still a puzzle for researchers.
Exceptional situations can cause one to momentarily lose his or her sense of reality, according to Fuchs.
But only a small number of people will develop a psychosis.
There seems to be a genetic predisposition to schizophrenia, but studies on twins have shown that genes are not the only determining factors.
Researchers suspect that the people involved presents tiny brain damage.
We assume that the neuronal maturation of the brain is disturbed at an early stage of development, for example by a viral infection of the mother during pregnancy, Fuchs explains.
But what is still unexplained, is how the anomaly of the neuronal system happens and also the fact that it does not happen for many years.
The environmental factors also play a role – stress or a traumatic experience can be a psychosis trigger, however, if there is a predisposition.
Hallucinogenic drugs can also trigger psychoses because they act on neurotransmitters.
When our brain heats up.
What is crazy, says Professor of Psychology Erich Kasten of Lübeck is that the psychotics suffer from hallucinations and take their costly medicines to unravel them when others are buying very expensive drugs to obtain them.
The perception of pleasant or unpleasant illusions is often just a point of view.
For ten years, Kasten has collected reports about hallucinations and the phenomena relating to visual delusions: last year he published his findings in a work entitled "The Imaginary World In Our Heads."
Hallucinations are part of the typical concomitant phenomena of psychoses but also of an impressive number of many other pathologies.
One counts among them psychological troubles such as borderline personality disorder or depression but also migraines, epilepsy, multiple sclerosis, Alzheimer's or traumatic brain injuries.
It is surprising to find that under certain conditions even the brains of healthy people are subject to hallucinations. 
The hallucinations, according to Kasten, consists of fragments of memories that are normally inhibited.
They take shape when the areas of the brain which deal with sensory perceptions are hyperactive or not sufficiently curbed; when our brains heat up, but also when there is lack of stimulation.
Drugs can trigger this state, as well as a brain injury or a psychosis.
But the lack of stimulus too, stress, unhappy love affairs or other exceptional mental states.
In recent studies, one third of participants acknowledges having had at least once in his life the experience of a hallucination.
In the summer of 2005 Sarah K. is 16, she lives in the little town of Mecklembourg - formerly Pomerania - and she goes to school.
A girl pretty normal to tell the truth.
If the images and voices weren't there.
During recess, a thin, young boy, with chestnut hair, speaks to him. 
When she answers him, her comrades look at her, surprised – nobody else sees or hears this boy.
They believe that this timid girl is a dreamy lunatic, but Sarah K is not dreaming, she is certain about that.
She is awaker, hears and sees this boy just as she sees and hears the girl who is sitting next to her on the bench.
She can even sense his presence temporarily.
It is a pleasant feeling, she finds this youth sympathetic.
Am I crazy?, she sometimes asks herself.
But she knows very well that this youth and the other visions are not real and that they will disappear again.
By night, spooks are generaly frightening.
Often the visions are cumbersome.
When she is in class, sometimes she cannot follow the course because, to her eyes and ears, the professor seems to be introducing a new pupil who is invisible to the others, even though the professor is obviously in the midst of explaining some equations at the blackboard.
By night, the outbreaks are, generally, frightening.
When, in the darkness of her room, she awaits sleep, which happens too rarely and far too late, she often cannot distinguish if she is awake or already dreaming, if the images she sees, grinning faces or the girl with bloody cuts on her arms and her legs are in front of her open or closed eyes.
Leave me alone, she cries at the creatures.
She doesn't talk about it to his parents or friends, she would be taken for crazy.
Autumn 2009. Sarah K. is now 20 years old.
She had her baccalaureate last year and she lives with her friend.
One year ago the hallucinations have ceased.
Since she contacted via Internet the psychologist Kasten she knows well that she is not insane.
Madness is also a work of art of despair.
When someone is socially isolated or does not have enough incentives, the probability is high that he will have hallucinations after some time.
I suppose that the brain not being occupied enough, makes sure that there is activity in there.
Sarah K., only daughter, was afraid of other children when she was small and often played all alone.
Her hallucinations began when she learned at age 13, that the man she had called Daddy, since she was in age of thinking, was not her real father.
The same areas of the brain are active in visual and acoustic hallucinations and with real impressions and sounds, so it is very difficult for people like Sarah K to tell the difference between illusion and reality. "Each experience," according to Kasten "takes place in the brain, reality is formed there.
Hallucinations are also images that form in the brain, which is why they seem so real."
For Kasten, nighttime dreams are also a form of hallucination.
The hallucinations of healthy people are no different fundamentally from those in acute psychoses.
Unlike schizophrenics, the mentally healthy person is able to recognize that fantasies are not real images.
This is why Kasten advises her patients to cherish the hallucinations as a particular talent.
There is a only one step between dream and hallucination.
In our world too focused on the conscience we unfortunately  quickly tend to take the imaginary experiences for ailments, according to Michael Schmidt-Degenhard, professor at Heidelberg clinic and chief doctor of psychiatry and psychotherapy of the  Florence Nightingale hospital in Düsseldorf.
A psychosis is a very serious illness, painful but also with something positive and creative in it – madness is a work of art of despair.
Schmidt-Degenhard has studied the form of experience called oniroïd, a specific form of the modification of consciousness brought about by dreaming.
Oniroïd experiences are very complex dream-like states which are perceived as real by the person who experiences them and which he cannot differentiate from dreaming even when he is awake.
The oniroïd state of consciousness occurs during a trauma or in situations of extreme pathology as in patients with polyradiculopathy who, while fully conscious, experience paralysis.
According to Schmidt-Degenhard, when a human being is threatened with the loss of his self and his world, due to a total and permanent inability to move, he replaces this real situation which disrupts his life with his own fantasy world disassociated from reality.
It is a state of mental limit between dream and hallucination.
As it is not possible to overcome the situation in reality, a change in the world has taken place but the real situation is represented in the imagination.
This is in fact, an intense form of means and performing in a situation intolerable in itself, an organizational capacity that is given to us men, in order to not sink into the nothingness of loss of consciousness.
Everything is real, even later in memories.
Peter Classen Cornelius from Zurich and art historian also describes his oniroid experiences in his book "Change of heart" as an action to safeguard the soul.
He was 49, when his awareness left for a several days journey after the operation of a corneas with a transplant, meanwhile, his body was doomed to stand still while being resuscitated.
Claussen plunges into a world which he has created, visits foreign places, travels in time. He sees himself as an old man bedridden in a railway sanatorium, a robot at his bedside looking after his health.
He lives during the Middle Ages among nobles who manufacture drugs based on blood.
He is kidnapped by a Greek on a motorbike who takes him to his country, he surfs with his hospital bed on a mass of hardened ice in the Alps and he meets a Korean mafioso.
He is completely absorbed in this imaginary world, everything is real even later in his memories.
According to Claussen these interior voyages differ fundamentally from any dream.
The dream is a completely different state, he writes describing what he has lived.
Instead of dreams, the memories from the mental travel are extremely clear and very detailed even years later.
You could even say that they are much more distinct and intensive than true live experience.
The intensity of this experience shatters the horizon of our other everyday experiences, according to the psychiatrist Schmidt Degenhard
Ultimately, oniroïdes delusions, psychoses, hallucinations and psychedelic experiences show us how fragile our interior representations of exterior reality are, even in a waking state.
Any change in the state of consciousness, sums up psychologist Kasten "can cause a distortion of what we call reality."
An experiment that can also be quite enriching.
The first snows can fall
Burda
At 27 years old, the children will take over the publishing house.
The appointment of Kallen as CEO of Burda editions is an interim solution: in the long-term, Hubert Burda hopes that his two children will take the press group over, he told Spiegel magazine.
The holding company must remain 100% a family business.
Hamburg - In the long term, publisher Hubert Burda sees his company in the hands of his children
The two children will inherit at 27 years old and are firmly committed to integrate the company, Hubert Burda, 69, said to Spiegel.
All details have been settled in advance.
The question about whether or not they will be active in the company will be asked later on.
One will also have to see if they are able.
We cannot impose their children to 7,500 employees without knowing whether they have the ability to look at it.
This will demoralize children as well as the company.
Burda let it be known last Thursday that he is pulling out of his post as President/Director General beginning in January and that his successor would be Paul-Bernhard Kallen.
Kallen, 52 years of age, has been a member of the board since 1999.
He was primarily responsible for the technology sector.
Later he held the Treasury department that is to say he was responsible of the company capital and after Jürgen Todenhöfer's departure he also took the head of the marketing, the foreign department, the printing and the finance.
Thus for the first time it is not a family member who is head of Burda Editions.
Burda's children are respectively 19 and 17 years old, his son Felix, who would now be 42, died a few years ago.
The nomination of Kallen also serves to make the connection for the next 10 or 15 years."
Burda specifies that the holding company must remain 100% in the hands of the family.
Ruination has always taken place in the families who have let themselves being led by a bulimia for capital, who have made enormous unfortunate speculations by thinking that they could always climb higher.
This has never been my strategy.
I have never had one universal power dream, said Burda.
I absolutely do not see myself in the role of preceptor of the country as Springer could be and I do not intend to be part of the international leagues like the Time, these companies have become much too important.
Integral beauty
Everything you can wish for, in terms of beauty and well-being, within easy reach.
This is the aim which seems to be set by El Corte Inglés who just ushered in Callao mall (Madrid), a multidisciplinary space more than 1,000 sq.m, dedicated to wellness and body-care.
The spa, located on the eighth floor, has prestigious brand names like Hedonai, the specialist in laser hair removal, Spaxion, with its relaxation rooms and beauty treatments, Luis & Tachi, hairdressers, Marina d'Or, which has a gym, and Occitan with its natural cosmetics, among others.
There is also a food department, with especially a tearoom, which propose tea of more than 130 different kinds.
Spaxion suggests, among other things, enjoying a relaxing massage with your companion, while contemplating the exceptional views over the capital, or hiring the relaxation area for two hours to hold your own "Beauty Party" with eight of your friends and relaxing with a Jacuzzi session and a massage while drinking a glass of champagne.
In total, there are 250 M2's divided into 12 rooms, where one can benefit from the most innovative face, body and hydrotherapy care.
Such as, for example, ultrasonic cavitation used to combat cellulite or vibrating platforms.
The sports room also has these devices, as well as virtual "trainers" who guide the clients' steps, offering them a full, personalised treatment.
Il all starts by the introduction of your personal code on a tactile screen, located on the front of the device.
Several videos show us how to properly perform our exercise program.
His trainer ensures that 15 minutes (warmup and stretching included), is enough to work all the muscles of the body.
And if, after having made our bodies work, we wish to go through to the hairdressing salon, Luis & Tachi has a room where they offer treatments for repairing the hair, for light or for nutrition, all personalized.
Innovation and exclusivity appear to have been the watchwords of this urban spa, which will be open every day of the year from 10am to 10pm.
Various cleavages
Christmas is coming, and it is never superfluous to study the look of stars and to adapt it to our festive wardrobe.
The shape of the neckline, very important to highlight the silhouette, is one of the variables that we must take into account.
Here are a few suggestions
The singer Fergie chose an exaggerated and very complicated neckline. This is not a good idea.
Endesa and Barcelona, are equipped with the electric car.
The electricity company Endesa, in collaboration with the Ayuntamiento of Barcelona, has created the "Oficina Live".
It is a project to develop and promote the electric vehicle in the Catalan capital.
The "LIVE Office" (Logistics for the Integration of the Electric Vehicle) will define and coordinate the road map for the integration of electric cars in the city and will put agreements with regard to mobility in place, while taking steps, coordinating, presenting grants, etc.
Moreover, it will develop the MOVELE project, promote the electric car, and welcome the opinions and the work of the sectors involved.
Ultimately, the idea is to launch what will become the future of transportation.
3 "electrical cities."
But Barcelona is not the only city that will get involved in the implantation of electric car in Spain.
Madrid and Seville come to join the project.
It is the three cities chosen by the government, within the framework of  the Movele Plan, in order to launch the implementation of electric cars.
The electric company Endesa has already signed a framework agreement with the Generalitat in Catalonia.
It aims to promote Research and Development technology in the autonomous community of Catalonia.
Among these latter can be found the activities related to energy, especially to energy efficiency.
This is not the only initiative to which Endesa takes part, in terms of promoting the electric car.
The company takes part in standardisation groups at the European level and is currently involved in a range of supplementary projects such as G4V, ELVIRE, or CENIT VERDE.
Zapatero predicts "a peaceful future" for the engine sector.
The president, José Luis Rodríguez Zapatero, foresees "a future of peace" for the Spanish automotive industry which, he reminded, is the country's main area of export.
In the president's presentation of the economic report for 2009, Zapatero recalled the measures initiated by the executive over the course of the year in support of the automotive sector.
"Without the Plan of Competitiveness for the automotive sector, we would have today a desolate landscape, closures of some of our main production sites," the President of the government said.
"With this plan and the brands decision to remain in Spain, in a very competitive field, we can see peaceful vistas for the future of this industry, which is our main export business" he added.
In that sense, he pointed out that the Competitiveness Plan, included in the Full Plan for the Automotive Sector (PIA), has devoted 800 million euros to the projects of 19 manufacturers and 137 ancillary businesses, which mobilized an investment of more than 3,000 million euros.
The chief executive explained that this investment was intended as much for the development of new models as for the modernization of already existing products and processes.
Zapatero also emphasized government measures to support the demand, referring to Plan 2000E, established in collaboration with the autonomous communities and the car companies.
According to the President, this plan has helped reduce by 6% the average emissions of new vehicles sold on the Spanish market and has contributed to a "sharp increase" of registrations, which have improved by "40%" in November.
20 000 square meters of collection cars "
Madrid is hosting the first edition of the International Classic Car Show, a meeting place for professionals and motoring enthusiasts.
This event will take place from February 5th-7th, 2010, at the Crystal Pavilion of the Casa de Campo in Madrid.
It is an area of exhibition of 20,000 square metres, where will be present more than 200 national and international exhibitors.
Not only can you find vintage motorcycles and collectible cars, but you can also find at Classic Auto Madrid articles of all sorts linked to the world of motoring.
Thus, among the pavilion exhibits, we can find accessories, spare parts, components, textile accessories, supplements, magazines, miniatures, etc.
Hundreds of articles pertaining to the world of engine-collecting, to satisfy collectors and amateurs alike.
Among the participants, we will find among others the companies Clásicos de Mos and Good Old Times, experts in car sales, Juan Lumbreras, catering, Coupe-Francisco Pueche, car sales and restoration, or Cochera Clásicos, Mercedes Benz specialist.
Aptitude test outdoors
But the commercial activity in this room will also include parallel activities: rallies, sports exhibitions, aptitude tests, presentations and competitions.
Aptitude tests with vintage cars and motorcycles will also take place on a circuit made outside the park of exhibitions.
Mazda3 i-stop : a long lasting sporting spirit.
Madza intends to prove that sport spirit is not angry with environment respect.
To this effect, it has just added to the Mazda3 the engine stop and start system called i-Stop, a device which, at least for the moment, is available only on the 150 horsepower 2.0 gasoline engine.
This second generation of Mazda3 is known for the good marks it has received overall.
The details, the finishing of the vehicle, the habitability, the behaviour, the mechanics, the i-Stop system...
All these aspects are noticeable in the new Mazda3.
Starting with the driving position, it appears that the front seats have excellent ergonomics and fixation.
The touch of the steering wheel is also particularly pleasant.
Continuing with the whole formed by the dashboard and the console, we see how Mazda has followed the Japanese tendency to create a futuristic interior design with many buttons and control panels along with vivid red and blue colors.
This style reminds us, partially, of the Honda Civic.
It is why we can say that both the Mazda 3 and the Civic, both Japanese, contrast with the seriousness of German products, particularly the Volkswagen Golf, which everyone wants to overtake.
Continuing with the cockpit, this Japanese compact car offers a habitability more than sufficient to allow four adults to travel with a high level of comfort.
In addition to all this a large trunk with regular shapes.
The automatic stop and start engine system, at least for the moment, is only available with the two-liter, 150 horsepower gasoline engine with  manual six-speed shift.
This engine is a true joy. It is shown in its finesse, its low noise, its benefits and consumption control.
Indeed, although the most requested Mazda3 are the diesel models, those who do not do a large number of kilometers per year should not rule out this i-Stop with gasoline engine, both for its great speed comfort and for its controlled consumption.
Regarding the level of equipment, the model chosen for the test is the Sport, meaning the one which offers the highest number of series elements.
Among the standard equipments, the Blind Spot Information System (BLIS) which erase blind spots, the traction and stability controls, the speed regulator, photosensitive inside mirror, on-board computer on a large screen, parking sensors, independent air conditioning , rain and light sensors, Bluetooth and Bluetooth audio, and the 17 inches alignment wheels, are particularly remarkable.
Moreover, as if this equipment weren't enough, this version had the Premium Pack, which, for €1,500 more, includes, among other features,  bi-xenon adaptive headlights and an audio system with a Bose disc changer.
Conclusion
The Mazda3 2.0 i-stop is one of the best compact cars in its class.
It is especially demonstrated by the quality of materials used, by his behaviour and by his high level of equipment.
Moreover, those who do not travel many miles per year will be able to choose the i-Stop version only associated with the gasoline 2.0 engine of 150 hp.
The only drawback of this model is its high price, which cost between 21 770 Euro for the Luxury finishing and 23 270 Euro for the tested model, the Sportive.
In return for this large sum of money, the Mazda3 will give us a large dose of satisfaction every day.
Luxury "premiere"
L.A. covers the red carpet with sensuality embodied by Penélope Cruz, Nicole Kidman and Fergie.
The stars have blinded us more than ever, wearing models as elegant as sexy for the release of Nine. (photos: Gtresonline).
Our "Pe", as sophisticated as usual, had opted for a dark "lady".
FonPeek's promise
Peek is extremely limited, it is a device which only allows you to  look at your e-mail, without offering the possibility of seeing certain types of attachments or surfing the Internet.
It took advantage of its five minutes of fame in the United States when TIME magazine named it one of the products of the year.
In truth, it is more difficult to see him in the streets, but the idea seems interesting, especially for young people.
Unlike Smartphones, Peek offers a very low price and monthly subscription - less than half of the cost, for example, of a subscription for an iPhone.
Given its success, the company has launched two new devices: one designed exclusively for Twitter, the other with a free lifetime data service, six times more expensive than the Peek.
Fonpeek, presented yesterday at the "Le Web" event, is the invention European version and its third incarnation.
It is just as limited as its American big brother, but contains a surprise.
The price of its monthly subscription, about 12 euros, includes the roaming across Europe.
Those who travel with a smartphone already know what it is like to lose access to one's data when one crosses a border or to desperately seek a cafeteria with WiFi (or a connection to FON) to be able to check one's e-mail.
The idea of a roaming at a fixed price is incredibly seductive and it makes a long time that it should work.
Indeed, some operators benefit from special traveling arrangements and options, but as far as I am concerned, I would need to have obtained a PhD in physics to understand them and to wear magnifying glasses to read the small-printed lines.
The repeated reminders of the European Commission to propose affordable  roaming fees across Europe have been barely perceptible.
Outside one's native country, one hesitates to use the data, and that's not wrong.
That a small device like Fonpeek (it is always funny that it is called FON even though it does not have WiFi) offers this kind of fare, means that operators are starting to think differently and are considering various suggestions that help making their data network profitable.
Kindle is another good example, it includes the download of books and other research on the Internet.
Without a subscription and without any hassle.
It is a connected device and one pays at its purchase and not every month.
And this is what I hope to see some day for the FonPeek: an option to buy with an access for life same as Peek has already offered it in the United States.
It's not that I want to buy it.
I read my mail on my phone, thank you.
I wish for it simply because I believe that it is a more fair formula for the consumer.
It would be interesting to see a computer with this same system.
Michelle's favourite colour
Yellow is probably the favourite colour of the first lady of the United States.
She went to the United States presidential inauguration of Barack Obama with a dress and a coat of this color, and in effect she chose the same to accompany him in the second instance, without doubt the most important of his life: the awarding in Oslo of the Nobel Peace Prize.
Michelle Obama was wearing a model very similar in those two occasions: in addition to their resembling colour, drawing a yellow to green with bright reflections, both times, consisted of three parts: the penitent, the jacket and the coat, in the same tissues, and was adorned of a large embroidery and a necklace.
So at first glance, it seems that the first lady of the United states is following the aftermath of the Princess of Asturias and chose to get the same clothes.
But the fabrics from which the two outfits were cut make them very different.
While she wore a heavy lace fabric for the inauguration, in Oslo she wore a printed velvet.
The accessories are also different: green shoes with medium heels for the first event, and a similar model, but gold-trimmed, this time.
The hairdressing has changed too: The hair is now raised whereas she was having it undone last time.
75% of working mothers have had professional problems because of their childbearing
Discrimination at work has risen in recent years, especially for the young generation women, who want to be mothers.
This is what was shown by the "Fertility and Careers of Women in Spain" study carried out by the CSIC in collaboration with the Instituto de la Mujer (Woman's Institute).
The inquiry, carried out on 9 737 women from ages 15 to 75, leaves no room for doubt: 75% of working mothers have seen their careers limited because of motherhood.
The study indicates that there are many differences having to do with the beginning of life as a couple and the number of children, whether the woman is working or not and the type of employment.
Those who do not work outside the home, work part-time or have a less stable jobs, get married sooner, have their first pregnancy sooner and have more children.
On the other hand, women having a stable job, mainly in the public sector, reject entering a couple and the first pregnancy, and have fewer children.
Women between 35 and 49 years of age with a permanent job have their first child, on average, 3.7 years after becoming a couple. This figure rises to 4.1 among those who work in the public sector. "These data show that women who had a stable job needed more time in their lives to get it, which led them to delay the union and the arrival of children.
In addition, the type of employment greatly influenced motherhood, but not as much the beginning of life as a couple, "explains Margarita Delgado, the researcher at the CSIC.
The level of education is another factor which widens the gap between the age of marriage of women and their first child.
According to the investigation, the more they are educated, the more they marry and have their first child later.
The difference remains even among women of the same generation.
For example, in the group being between 35 and 49 years old, those who have had elementary and advanced education have become mothers for the first time respectively at 25.1 and 32.1 years old on average.
"Another distinction also appears among women, according to their education level.
While those who have done studies elementary marry and have their first child before finding a stable job, those who have done studies of average level or above reverse this programme and give priority to obtain a stable job as a precondition to marriage and the arrival of a child, "says Mrs Delgado.
Diane Kruger is worth it too.
L'Oréal Paris has just added a new name to its envied list of ambassadors: Diane Kruger.
From next year onwards, the German actress will embody the image of several of the brand's products, uttering the universal maxim: "Because I'm worth it".
The protagonist of Merry Christmas, one of the most elegant actresses of the international stage, thus comes to join other celebrities enrolled at L'Oréal Paris, like Linda Evangelista, Jane Fonda, Andie MacDowell, Eva Longoria and the Spanish Penélope Cruz.
Before her, the last to enter this very select club were the actresses Evangeline Lilly (lost) and Freida Pinto (Slumdog millonaire).
Among men, the cosmetics brands count also luxury ambassadors : Patrick Dempsey (Grey's Anatomy) and Matthew Fox (Evangeline's companion in Lost).
The prices of the British fashion
The British have a lot to say in the world of fashion.
Its biggest representatives, creators and models, from yesterday and today, gathered for the annual awarding of their price, which took place in London at the Royal Court of Justice.
Nobody has missed the meeting.
Former model Jerry Hall and her daughter, Georgia May Jagger, elected Best model of the year.
The Ace gamble of Manuel Vincent
Manuel Vincent offers us in Poquer of ases (Alfaguara, illustrations of Fernando Vicente) about thirty "x-ray" of writers who have crossed his literary life (and sometimes, his other life).
It does not do it according to the predictable and dreaded styles (biographical summary, life and work), but in seeking something similar in the ignition kernel of the created character.
The trip is exciting and Vincent spares neither fears nor illuminations.
Delicious pleasure, this book is also a moving invitation to readings and rereadings.
I leave you here a few snapshots.
On Albert Camus: "In its pages, I discovered that the Mediterranean was not a sea, but a spiritual impulse, almost physical, which I even felt without naming it: pleasure against disastrous fate, morals without guilt and innocence without any god."
On Samuel Beckett: "Nihilistic, allegorical Christian, he wrote what he had in his blood, not in his head, between impotence and ignorance, with a splendid poetic wit, devoid of meaning, like the blade of the knife that failed to kill him.
On Graham Greene: "Our man has been inspired by this woman with a passion that lasted 13 years, in the flesh of which he joined the  emotion of adultery to the pleasure of remorse, a spiritual privilege which was to reach heaven by the road to perdition."
On James Joyce: "Ulysses was published in Paris in 1922 by Sylvia Beach. It is one of the 8,000-meter summits of universal literature, which it is necessary to climb by the North face, on which the best mountain climbers let go and then catch themselves again."
On William Faulkner: "He was a strange character.
By himself, he said sometimes he was the heir of a landowner of the county and other times that he was the son of a black woman and a crocodile.
These two dreams were of greatness."
About Louis-Ferdinand Céline: "This writer take in the mad scream pushed from a bridge by this character of Munch to lead his echo deep in the night of the 20th century, in its literal form, and he did it in self-escape invoking the posteriority with an asticots violent speech."
About Dorothy Parker: "One day she knelt and prayed: "Dear God, I beg you to do that I stop writing like a woman."
On Joseph Conrad: "On his tombstone was engraved Spenser's verse: "Sleep after effort,/ after the storm, the port,/rest after war/worn out after life, death is very pleasing." 
On Virginia Wolf: "in her luggage she was carrying her depression too.
Her husband accepted very normally that she told him that Edward VII was spying on her between the azaleas or that the birds were singing in Greek.
There has never been a man as patient and as deeply in love with a neurotic whose literary talent exceeded her madness."
On Pío Baroja: "What did Martín-Santos do if it is not trying to hide Joyce at Baroja's?
What did Benet try if it is not to put to death Baroja by Faulkner?
What did he do if not to seek the glory for this man so that he could use him as a pedestal? "
A cowardly attack
Last week, my mother, who is about 70, was strolling through our neighborhood in the city of Fuenlabrada, when a group of young people between 15 and 18 passed her and our dog, a mixed-blood, rescued from the ASPCA and weighing no more than six kilos, and, without saying a word, they kicked him twice which left the dog seriously injured.
Our indignation is huge because we do not see what is fun in gratuitously attacking a small defenceless animal which, moreover, was on leash.
One must also add the outrage of a lady who was quietly passing by and who, when she injured these individuals, came to fear for her physical well-being, since an oddball who attacks an animal is capable of doing the same thing to a woman, a child, an elderly person or, ultimately, any person weaker than him.
The episode happened around 5 p.m., on a normal Tuesday, in an usually quiet district.
The dog moaned all day.
Of course we filed a complaint at the neighborhood police station even though we doubt that much will come of it, and, though we don't want to offend any sensitivities, we just want to say that the cowardly killers were Spanish.
Outrage led us to denounce this deed.
We do not understand what is happening in young people's mind for them to find amusing to mistreat defenceless animals without reason, which gives us love, friendship and companionship.
We don't know where good education and respect of animals and people has gone.
Michelin and Festival, together for the wearing of the helmet
The tyre manufacturer Michelin, in collaboration with the Spanish foundation for road safety (fesvial), has launched a campaign to encourage the use of helmets, mainly among younger motorcyclists, as indicated it today both structures.
This initiative aims at raising awareness of the importance of wearing a helmet, since it is the only element of protection to prevent injuries to the head, or even death, in a two-wheelers accident.
Michelin has indicated that this campaign showed its commitment to road safety which "goes beyond the design and manufacture of safer products," and said that it contributed to this goal by other actions of an educational and informative nature.
This new campaign of encouragement for the wearing of a helmet when on two wheels, with the slogan "to be or not to be," will include a first phase during which posters will be distributed in more than 500 motorcycle garages, in order to ensure the widest diffusion.
Finally, Michelin has pointed out that road safety "is a constant concern" for the company, because as a manufacturer of tyres for two-wheeled vehicles, one of its main goals is to develop always safer products.
The sale of light commercial vehicles is improving
After nearly two years ago, the market for light commercial vehicles is beginning to see some light at the end of the tunnel.
The 9 425 vehicles registered in November in Spain account for an increase of 12.6% compared to 2008 and, more important, they represent the first increase after 22 consecutive months of decline, according to figures from the employers' association of the manufacturers Anfac and ganvam  , the dealers.
However, it should be set against the good news, since the yardstick used for comparison, the month of November 2008, has been particularly bad, with a decrease of 60% compared to the previous year..
As a result, despite last month's rebound, registrations accumulated during the past 11 months are 40% below those of the previous year.
Since January, if you add all vehicles in the category of light commercial vehicles (derivatives of tourist cars, pick-ups, minivans, small vans and light trucks) 95,853 have been sold.
The big clouds that affect their demand the most have not dissipated. Indeed, although they are also bought by individuals, most of the purchases are made by small or medium-sized businesses, which pay in almost 100% of the cases by means of outside financing.
Thus, besides the restrictions implied by limiting bank loans,we have to add other factors such as the increase in unemployment or the persistence of the poor economic situation.
Dealing with this situation and unlike passenger cars, purchase aids of 2000E have been little used.
In addition to individuals, the self-employed and the small businesses which want to acquire a commercial vehicle slightly under 3.5 tonnes with a level of CO2 emissions that does not exceed 160 grams per kilometer,can also benefit, but the number of operations speaks for itself.
Yesterday, at Ganvam, they brought up again the need for management to pay particular attention to these vehicles and to industrial vehicles (trucks and buses).
The Dealers Association foresees a 2010 similar to the year that is ending, for which it calculates a drop in sales (of passenger cars and 4x4s) of 19%.
Emergency brake assist is now mandatory
As has occurred with the ABS anti-lock braking system, and as will be the case with the ESP stability control, systems to aid in emergency braking will be a compulsory element in European cars.
They are already mandatory in newly registred cars and light commercial vehicles, while a tolerance period for the rest of vehicles has been set until the end of February 2011.
The measure, imposed by the European Union, aims to strengthen the protection of pedestrians, even if, by its mode of action, it can also help prevent many rear collisions.
Emergency brake assist increase pressure on the breakes in emergency situation detected by the system thanks to the kick given by the driver.
But this last one does not maintain the pressure until the end.
According to a study conducted by Bosch, the manufacturer of automobile components, a third of drivers involved in an accident had not been able to rely on the brake before the collision, and half of them had not benefited from its full force.
Up to 1,100 accidents
The intervention of the aid, however, requires the maximum from the brake system, reducing the distance the car needs to stop.
According to an EU study, if all cars were equipped with this feature, as many as 1,100 fatal accidents in which pedestrians are involved could be avoided each year.
This reduction would be even more important by popularizing the so-called intelligent emergency braking systems: we estimate that one accident with road casualties out of four would be avoided.
In this case, the vehicle is equipped with a system which, thanks to a radar or a camera, detects obstacles and warns the driver, in addition to slightly acting on the brakes.
If the driver reacts, he is helping it by increasing pressure on the pedal, if it is necessary.
If he does not react, and although the collision is inevitable, the facility exert the maximum effort on the brakes to minimize the damage.
General Motors postponed until January the plan for Opel
While workers from Opel's Figueruelas plant (Zaragoza) have been warned by Nick Reilly, the new president of General Motors (GM) Europe, that production of the new Meriva would be launched during the first week of April – probably the 8th –, according to Javier Ortega, the North American manufacturer has warned that it will need more time to conclude the Opel rescue plan.
Nick Reilly, the new President of GM Europe, intends for each point of the plan to have been approved in advance by the concerned party.
And this may mean that the final document, which will first be submitted to the workers and then to the governments of the countries where the factories are located, will be postponed until early 2010.
In contrast, at GM, we are assured that a decision on the sale of Saab should be taken in the coming days.
